      "identifier" : [
         "8_06920_11"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "PAGES MANQUANTES",
         "LETTRE DE SA SAINTETE BENOIT XV A MGR ANDRÉ FRUWIRTH, EX-MAITRE-GENERAL, Archevêque d'Heraelée et Nonce Apostolique en BavIère à l'occasion de son 70ième arnneraaire de naissance Vénérable Frère, Ayant appris incidemment que le 21 août vous aurez heureuses ment atteint la fin de votre soixante-dixième année, Nous ne pou-. vons laisser passer cette heureuse circonstance sans vous exprimer' toute la joie que Nous en ressentons. Les multiples services que vous avez rendus à l'Eglise, - tant pendant les années où vous avez rempli avec prudence et habileté les hautes fonctions du Généralat dans l'Ordre illustre des Pre-' cheurs, que depuis le temps où vous vous acquittez d'une manière aussi digne que louable de la Nonciature Apostolique, - vous invi- tent justement à remercier Dieu pour l'abondante moisson de méri-' tes que vous y avez recueillis en même temps qu'ils Nous donnent, l'agréable occasion de vous dire combien Nous sommes pleinement satisfait de tous vos travaux. Aussi Nous trahirions les plus sincères élans de Notre ceur, si en cette heureuse circonstance Nous ne vous exprimions pas les sen- timents de gratitude que Nous entretenons et le fidèle souvenir que Nous gardons de vous pour la bienfaisante assistance qu'en tout temps le Pontife Romain a tirée de vos services. C'est dans ces sentiments que Nous formulons les voeux les' plus ardents pour votre propre bonheur, que Nous prions le Sei-· gneur de vous accorder encore de longs jours pour le bien de la Religion et à l'avantage du Saint-Siège, de conserver inaltérable votre vigueur toujours juvénile pour l'accomplissement parfait de votre délicate et périlleuse Mission. En témoignage de Notre spéciale bienveillance, Nous vous ac- cordons de grand coeur pour la pleine réalisation de Nos vSux, et comme gage des faveurs célestes la Bénédiction Anostolinns.",
         "LA COMPLAINTE DE LA POLOGNE UR la plaine nue, le vent de la Baltique passe en tempéte. Il fauche, à grands coups de ses ailes humides et glacées, les herbes jaunies où gisent des cadavres raidis. Il cingle de grésil les murs délabrés d'une chapelle à demi ruinée. Un vieux prêtre y célè- bre, avant le jour, la Messe des Morts, en ce matin du 2 Novembre, l'an de la grande guerre. Debout autour de l'autel, hâves de froid et de faim, quelques- pauvres paysans prient et pleurent avec lui. La foi de la Pologne jamais ne cbancelle; son espoir ne peut faiblir, car tout lui parle de Dieu, même le soufle de la tourmente à travers la steppe dévastée. C'est le Jour des Morts ; et ses fils sont tombés par mil- liers, sur tous les champs de bataille. D'autres ont péri sans nombre, écrasés entre deux murs de fer et de flamme, noyés par le flux et reflux d'invasions sans pitié. Ils ont même dû verser leur noble sang pour des maîtres sans âme, bourreaux de la Patrie démembrée. La loi brutale a dit de marcher, ils ont marché, les premiers, au front des armées fratricides ; nulle place ne convenait mieux à leur séculaire bravoure, pour se battre et mourir. Et mourir deux fois, comme ils le savent faire, pour l'avoir appris des ancêtres intrépides. Aussi dans la chapelle en ruine, par trois fois, ce matin, le Sang Rédempteur appelle la Pitié Divine sur l'immense calamité, et la paix éternelle sur les âmes des tombés. Dans la morne complainte du Vent de la Baltique, l'âme de la Pologne sait entendre le chant de l'espoir qui ne meurt pas. Elle l'a connue souvent, en effet, la passée dévastatrice des barbares. Au X1II siècle, sur la plaine fertile et les villes prospères, s'abattent soudain, féroces et innombrables.",
         "LA COMPLAINTE DE LA POLOGNE 323 Sont-ce des Scythes ou des Mongols ? on ne sait trop, Mais ils viennent du fond de l'Oi dent, des landes arides et. glacées, où la vie dure trempe des muscles et des coeura d'acier. Leur large facejaune, aux traits frustes et stupides, ne sait exprimer que la cruauté et la luxure; et, quels désire allume en leurs sens grossiers la vue de ces richesses jusque- là insoupçonnées. Partout où ils passent, l'incendie et le massacre font le désert, ils ignorent la pitié et n'ont jamais subi la contrainte. Quand ils sont repartis, aussi soudainement qu'ils étaient venus, il faut un siècle pour réparer l'outrage de l'invasion brutale. Des martyrs sans nombre ont succombé, en levant vers- Dieu leurs yeux rayonnants d'espoir; des fils vaillants leur survivent, \" Sicut sagitto in manu potentis, ita filii excusso- rum.\" Ils ont reçu en héritage une patience inlassable, et surtout une invincible tenacité. Sur la glèbe fertile, plus pauvre encore, mais aussi plus fécond, le foyer se relève, non loin de l'église ruinée ou d'un monastère hâtivement rebâti. Le sang des martyrs va même- faire germer des apotres qui s'en iront, avec l'audace cheva- leresque de la race, porter l'évangile de paix jusqu'au fond' du désert glacé où le Grand Khan dresse sa yourte nomade. C'était une noble vengeance. Un peuple ne saurait mourir quand il possède une vue si haute des intérêts de Dieu ; c'est là, la source inépuisable de son dévouement aux grandes causes; ce qui lui donne foi en sa divine mission d'être le rempart de la civilisation chré- tienne. La brêche sanglante fut sans cesse relevée par le main du Dieu fort, qui tient à renverser la toute- puissance- du mal par les plus faibles des moyens humains. Bien des fois, en cette longue série de malheurs, il est revenu le Jour lugubre des Morts; la tempête de Novembre chantait sa complainte de deuil. Dans les chapelles dévas- tées, la foule gémissante revenait pleurer et prier, et repren. dre courage en psalmodiant le Dies irae, l'hymne tout vibrant des éclats de la vengeance Divine, des soupirs de l'espoir humain. Voici des jours de trêve, de prospérité et de gloire; mais non toutefois d'inertie. Les volontaires dA la Pni mRnin -",
         "3zl ]REVUE DOMINICAINE rice de la cause sainte. Pendant que le moine prie et s'im- nole en son cloitre, que les apôtres vont au loin semer l'évan- ile de paix, le chevalier court à la défense de la Religion. Contre les phalanges Polonaises vient, à maintes reprises e heurter le Turc. Ivre de haine fanatique, la rage au coeur [e ne pouvoir écraser un si frôle obstacle, il redouble ses essauts furieux. Jusqu'au dernier, livré sous les murs de 7ienne ; où l'immortelle épée de Sobieski lui inflige telle dé- aite que jamais il ne s'en est relevé. O mystérieux desseins de la Providence Divine! Des aêmes contrées lointaines, de l'Est surgit lentement un adver- aire bien autrement redoutable. Ce serait, celui-là, presque i frère de sang, s'il n'avait mêlé sa vie obscure à tant l'aventures légendaires: invasions, alliances et migrations liverses. Au génie slave il joint l'astuce de Byzance. D'elle, n effet, il a reçu la foi chrétienne, mais souillée par le schis- ae et tarée d'orgueil. Il a des mours de parvenu. Il aime taler un luxe asiatique, somptueux et de mauvais goût, dé- ýaré encore par des rudesses et des vulgarités de sauvage. Il une piété d'enfant, des superstitions étranges et une énergie ans frein. Malheur à qui viendra lui barrer la route, quand ,n maître autocrate et ambitieux l'affolera de ses idées de onquête. Aussi, lorsqu'il s'est pris de haine pour le Polonais, bstacle à ses visées, et dont le faste, la puissance et la bra- oure l'offusquaient, il n'a voulu voir en lui que le Latin, sclave de Rome. Et Rome, c'est l'antique ennemie de lyzance ; parmi les monarques d'Occident, le plus redouté; seul qui ne lui a point fait de plates avances, qui même, uelle injure, a regardé avec indifférence son luxe et ses pré- ntions grandioses. Il fallait donc, et de tout son poids, briser cet obstacle. ,effort fut long et sanglant, par ruées violentes, et non sans ývers, parfois désastreux. La force brutale du nombre de- iit finir par l'emporter; ce furent les mauvais jours entre us: le massacre systématique, l'oppression savante, le knout la Sibérie, la spoliation et l'exil: un intn nAhl -,- puis",
         "LA COMPLAINTE DE LA POLOGNE 325 pour être le prix d'une odieuse complicité, la Pologne agonisa lentement. Oui, les mornes jours de deuil! lorsque dans les églises tendues de noir, on chantait le service funèbre de l'indépen- dance perdue. Pleurer de tels morts, n'était-ce pas un acte d'odieuse et criminelle révolte ? La troupe des Cosaques ivres accourt, le blasphème aux lèvres, et le pavé du temple ruis- selle de sang, car maintenant, après tant de protestations inutiles, la foule immobile et silencieuse se laisse immoler sans fuir. Au Sang de l'Agneau Divin, sacrilègement répandu sur les gradins de l'autel, se mêle celui de l'officiant, brutale. ment assommé. Puis, les torches du catafalque renversé à coups de crosse, allument l'incendie, effroyable holocauste, dont la flamme s'éleva maintes fois vers le Ciel, ce jour du 2 Novembre, sous le Règne des Czars Autocrates de la Sainte Russie. Le Polonais sait mourir; la Pologne ne meurt pas. Elle vit toujours, dans le même espoir invincible. Dieu a ses des- seins où l'homme ne peut rien lire ni comprendre. La foi immortelle, gardée par une langue jamais désapprise, est pieusement emportée, au plus profond du cur de l'exilé, sous les cieux les plus lointains. N'est-ce pas le gage certain d'un avenir où nos coutes vues ne peuvent manquer d'entre- voir une destinée Providentielle. Déjà dans l'estime de l'homme sensé, c'est une gloire sans égale d'avoir versé tant de noble sang, d'avoir tout perdu après avoir tant donné. Elle a bien tout perdue la Pologne meurtrie: avec l'in- dépendance, l'élite de ses fils, morts ou exilés; tous ces ar- dents patriotes, venus tour à tour se briser, en d'inutiles et glorieux assauts, contre le colosse germain ou l'odieuse",
         "permis de l'entrevoir déjà assez sûrement. C'est une vision d'Apocalypse, le spectacle actuel de l'Europe, bouleversée par la plus atroce des guerres. Jamais l'orgueil humain n'avait entassé, dans les arsenaux de la \" Paix armée \" de tels moyens de destruction. Toutes les ruses de la diplomatie, toutes les inventions de la science, toutes les ressources de l'industrie et de l'épargne publique, ont servi pendant quarante ans, à préparer l'impitoyable lutte. Le champs de bataille, c'est la Belgique ruinée et sacca- gée. C'est aussi, et plus encore la terre Polonaise. Ce n'était donc pas assez d'avoir subi, un siècle durant l'oppression Moscovite, d'avoir été souillée par la botte du Prussien ? L'outrage suprême, après avoir été fécondée du sang des martyrs et des braves, c'est de boire le sang impur des cou- pables si rudement châtiés à l'heure actuelle. On ne peut voir sans une poignante ironie, s'égorger avec une telle fureur, ceux-là même qui se partageait, il y a un siècle, la terre où ils se battent. Hélas ! dans la mêlée irrésistible des nations, les Polo- nais doivent se battre sous toutes les Aigles. Ils ont la triste tache de défendre leuis oppresseurs, de disperser leur bra- voure sur tous les champs de bataille; comme s'il fallait purifier l'expiation par l'holocauste des curs brisés; voir une fois encore la Patrie dévastée, son foyer consumé dans l'impitoyable marée de flammes, qui va et revient au souffle vengeur de la Justice Divine. Si cette Justice peut être apaisée, ce doit être par les malheurs indicibles de l'infor- 5unée Pologne. Après l'heure terrible de la justice, surement viendra 'heure de la réparation. L'homme propose, Dieu dispose ; ,'homme détruit, Dieu reconstruit; l'homme oublie, Dieu se iouvient. L'homme aveuglé par la passion, ivre d'orgueil, le voit rien hors sa coterie et ses ambitions; l'oeil de Dieu le se ferme jamais sur les stériles agitations humaines; il les ,end fécondes, en suscitant, au moment voulu, l'instrument it la nation de son choix, pour accomplir une oeuvre nou- ,elle, étonnante de simplicité, d'apropos et de succès merveil-",
         "LA COMPLAINTE DE LA POLOGNE 327 Ce n'est rien, évidemment, d'avoir si longtemps occupé, aux confins de la civilisation, le poste périlleux d'avant-garde destiné à recevoir et repousser le choc de la barbarie. Les affaires et l'argent comptent aujourd'hui pardessus tout; les hommes préoccupés ont oublié ou n'y songent plus. Mais Dieu garde fidèle mémoire du sang versé, de la ruine et de l'exil, des longues années de misère et d'oppression. Ce n'est rien non plus aux yeux des gens pratiques de nos temps, d'être un rêveur obstiné, vivant de ses gloires passées; d'espérer toujours quand on sourit ou méprise; d'avoir, au fond du cur, l'enthousiaste amour du sol natal mouillé de larmes et de sang, jusqu'à emporter au loin, d'au- cuns le firent, une poignée de terre Polonaise pour la mettre dans sa tombe d'exilé. C'est toujours plus grand que d'être, par exemple, un Teuton, avide et pratique, certainement, tout pétri de science surhumaine et de kulture. . . . inhumaine. Ce n'est guère, au regard de la civilisation moderne, toute imprégnée de cette sombre et égoiste philosophie ger- maine, c'est moins que rien, la foi simple et confiante du Polonais; sa piété naïve et forte envers sa Dame, la Vierge Marie, Celle qui a conservé son âme toujours limpide et pure, aussi bien sous le sayon du laboureur que sous le haubert du plus noble chevalier. A cette foi profonde, il doit les dons précieux de sa na- ture: le sens si délicat de l'idéal, la sensibilité très vive, l'imagination ardente; un dévoûment que rien ne rebute, malgré la défiance naturelle aux opprimés. Que faut-il de plus pour lui assurer une vocation providentielle; celle de devenir quand les temps seront plus calmes, l'apôtre des na- tions slaves, attirées ou séduites par le Schisme Russe. Après les rudes leçons de la guerre surgira le nouvel Hyacinthe, missionnaire infatigable des immenses contrées orientales. fr. J. D. BROSSEAU, *",
         "UNE CONVERTIE MISS AGNÈS MacLAREN IV VIE CATHOLIQUE OLONTIERS les protestants nous prennent en pitié, nous catholiques. Suivant eux, nous vivons dans une étroite enceinte, fermée de toute part, sombre et obscure comme une vieille prison du moyen-âge. Toute initiative et toute velléité d'indépendance viennent se briser contre ces murs comme l'oiseau dans sa cage qui fatigue ses ailes impuissantes à recouvrer sa liberté. [elle MacLaren l'avait pensé comme beaucoup d'autres. Et spendant, comme cette enceinte, au contraire, est vaste et immeuse ! comme l'air en est pur et fortifiant! Comme elle 3t étendue et pleine de promesses cette carrière ouverte à initiative et à l'activité de l'âme catholique ! Elle y trouve, lle y reçoit, la direction la plus ferme et la plus féconde, cur peu qu'elle en accepte le joug, littéralement suave et iger à celui qui veut être sincère et fidèle. qu'elle",
         "UNE CONVERTIE 820 prouvent que cette sensation de calme, de repos et de quié- tude si bien décrite par Mgr Benson dans ses \"Confessione d'un Converti.\" \" Je voyais devant moi la vérité se dressant comme un pie neigeux, et j'avais à me rendre vers elle, Jamais, ne fut-ce qu'un instant,. jamais je n'avais douté de cela depuis le moment où je m'en étais convaincu, et je n'ai pas besoin de dire que je n'en ai jamais douté dans la suite. Il y avait en moi une certitude absolue d'accomplir la volonté de Dieu, en entrant dans son Eglise. Nulle trace chez moi de tentation contre la foi. L'âme s'était attendue à voir les cieux s'ouvrir, à voir jaillir des flots abondants de grâce, des torrents de plaisir, une gloire éblouissante et une musique supranaturelle, et au lieu de ces merveilles, rien n'était des. cendu sur cette âme qu'un immense fardeau dans une sorte de brouillard percé d'un unique rayon, qui venait de l'étoile de la foi divine, aussi ferme, aussi sûr que Dieu sur son trône. \" Tout ce que j'avais naguère trouvé de direction et d'encouragement dans une ancienne maison, je l'ai retrouvé è présent de la part des prêtres de cette Eglise, et en les décou. vrant aussi bien doués de science que d'amour. Toute cette liberté de foi et de pensée individuelle, que quelques-uns se figurent être un privilège des confessions non catholiques, j'ai trouvé tout cela expressément procuré et garanti dans nos temples, et j'en ai usé désormais avec bien plus de con- fiance, sachant que l'il de l'Eglise était sur moi, et enfin qu'on me frapperait s'il m'arrivait de me hasarder trop loin.\" Ce sont les sentiments d'une âme profondément catholi- que, et c'est déjà une grande grâce que de jouir de pareille certitude et de semblables consolations. Elle venait comme",
         "880 REvUE DOMINICAINE Elle était à peine devenue catholique, que déjà elle offrait le précieux concours de son expérience de catéchiste presbyté- rienne qu'elle avait été autrefois. Il y avait des lacunes dans l'enseignement donné autour d'elle, les méthodes n'étaient pas assez simples, ni assez pratiques. Ses conseils furent très bien accueillis, aussi voulut-elle faire davantage. Elle fit venir d'Angleterre des tableaux artistiques qu'elle offrit gra- oieusement aux maîtres et maîtresses de catéchisme. C'était le catéchisme en image qui s'introduisait en France. Ce mode d'enseignement se répandit très vite et devint très populaire. Une autre question allait occuper l'activité de Melle MacLaren. Au cours de sa carrière médicale, elle avait été à même de constater les désastres causés par la prostitution. Plaie profonde et d'autant plus douloureuse, que les popula- tions se soustraient davantage au joug des prescriptions de la loi chrétienne. Il fallait s'attaquer à la racine du mal. \"Dans son désir d'extirper l'une des racines de si grands maux, Agnès jura de faire la guerre à ce qu'elle appelait, dans son langage circonspect: \"la réglementation légale du vice.\" C'était une lutte bien faite pour tenter une âme de la trempe de Melle MacLaren : d'un côté, noblesse du but à at- teindre, envergure du débat ; de l'autre générosité sans borne, confiance à la fois illimitée et prudente, activité inlas- sable mais qui saurait s'arrêter à temps devant l'impossible. Mais combattre ce vice publiquement avoué, toléré, sinon favorisé dans la plupart des agglomérations tant soit peu considérables, c'était une tache audessus des forces d'une seule personne; l'Etat seul pouvait intervenir efficacement. Elle ne tarda pas à le comprendre. Aussi la voyons-nous",
         "UNE CONVERTIE 881 souvent au cours des siècles contre le mal et ses fauteurs \" Ces efforts se heurtaient contre le courant de la licence, puissant au point de faire la loi \", dit l'auteur de sa vie. Nullement découragée, Melle MacLaren chercha un autre principe de solution à cette difficulté. Il serait plus, lent mais plus efficace. Elle s'appliqua à préconiser l'éducation au sein de la famille. Celle-ci n'est-elle pas avec l'Eglise et par l'Eglise la plus grande école des mours ? Le respect des lois de Dieu, les sages conseils, l'exemple quotidien des parents avec une répression discrète et énergique ont fait plus que qui que ce soit pour faire naître et croître dans l'âme de l'en. fant le respect de soi-même et de la loi morale. Et, c'est bien le principe le plus efficace de l'intégrité des moeurs publiques, Les débuts de la vie catholique de Miss MacLaren furent encore marqués par son adhésion au Tiers-Ordre de Saint- Dominique. Comment connut-elle les Dominicains ? Nous l'ignorons, mais elle dat souvent les entendre dans les chaires, des églises catholiques qu'elle fréquentait assidûment, ou les rencontrer au cours de ses sorties et de ses voyages. Leur prédication lui plaisait, elle était comme un écho de cette préoccupation si personnelle d'atteindre plus vivement les âmes pour les amener à Dieu et à son Eglise. Les uvres Dominicaines l'intéressaient. Elle avait déjà reçu le sacre- ment de Confirmation dans la chapelle des Dominicaines de Béthanie. (1) Un peu plus tard, elle fait le pélérinage de Saint Maximin où l'on conserve les restes de sainte Marie Madeleine; elle se hasarde jusqu'à la fameuse grotte de la pénitence. (2) \" Ce fut à Rome que Melle MacLaren demanda son affi- liation à l'Ordre des Frères-Prêcheurs. Elle s'y rendit dans lu",
         "REVUE DOMINICAINE omne de 1900 et se présenta d'elle-même au Révéren- me Père Cormier alors Procureur Général de l'Ordre et tis Maître Général. Elle s'installa chez les Dames de la .aite où elle voulut faire ses exercices spirituels. Silence, .té au règlement, méditation des grandeurs de Dieu, telle sa vie dans ces jours de solitude. Sa piété et son recueil- nt édifièrent encore cette maison comme toutes celles qui vaient jadis donné l'hospitalité. Elle fut admise au Tiers e le 26 Octobre. Elle avait désormais une famille spiri- a, une lumière sur la terre, au ciel la protection des s de l'Ordre de Saint-Dominique. Son amour pour la le dominicaine se manifesta dès lors par le vif intérêt le portait à son apostolat, quelqu'en fut la forme: oeuvre iséricorde ou enseignement doctrinal. Nos Pères, char- e l'Université de Fribourg, furent l'objet de son tout al dévoûment. \"Que n'ai-je, disait-elle, un million de rs à leur offrir pour alléger les charges de leur installa- l'améliorer, les aider à poursuivre leurs études et propa- i belle doctrine de saint Thomas \". Miss Agnès fut plus que jamais dominicaine, c'est-à-dire .e, à sa manière sans doute, mais c'était une excellente ùre. Elle continua de visiter ses patients, se préoccu- de l'âme autant que du corps; elle continua d'assister muvres. auxauels elle nortait l'aumône sniritnelle dA nRA",
         "EN BELGIQUE OUS sommes heureux de publier les quelques pages qui suivent; elles nous ont été envoyées par le R. P. C. Doyon, O. P., aumônier du 22ième Régiment C. F. Depuis un mois les troupes canadiennes sont au feu. Sur la Bel- gique, nos lecteurs apprendront sans doute avec intérêt, les renseignements suivants: Belgique, Du front, 26 septembre 1915 Mon cher Père, . .... Le pays où je suis est borné par des collines et des moulins aux grandes ailes. Bailleuil est notre voisine. Il tonne sans cesse tout en face et à côté; c'est ici que le canon ressemble le plus au tonnerre. La 5iènie Brigade, dont je suis chargé depuis le 1er sep. tembre, a reçu le baptême du feu.- Noblesse oblige; aussi, le 22ième qui s'est montré si ferme sur la route, malgré tous les désavantages de la chaleur, des longues étapes, des retards, des repas, enfin de tout ce qui fatigue, énerve, épuise, s'est vaillamment conduit au front où il soutient le choc de l'en- nemi depuis huit jours. Le 25ième et le 26ième sont aussi sur la ligne. Le 24ième entrera à son tour, pour la grande narade où la vaillance, l'endurance, la tenace énergie valent",
         "REVUE DOMINICAINE Chaque jour, passent au-dessus de ces tombes, les gros obus lancés par les formidables canons qui répondent victo- rieusement aux obusiers allemands. Aux environs d'Ypres, l'héroïque cité, se livrent les plus violentes attaques de cette guerre d'horreur et d'infamie. L'orgueil allemand viendra trouver son humiliation et sa défaite devant la cité de la Vierge. Les Flandres étaient nettement antipathiques au gou- vernement français, pourchasseur des ordres monastiques et insulteur de Dieu et de sa sainte Mère. Le Kaiser le savait: Aussi, chercha-t-il à s'attirer les sympathies de ces demi-alle- anands dont la langue n'est qu'un dialecte allemand ; il pro- tégea leurs biens et propriétés, lors de l'occupation, pendant onze jour, par les uhlands, de la majeure partie de leur terri- toire. Mais maintenant, me dit le brave curé qui a été pris comme ôtage, et menacé d'être fusillé, le peuple voit clair, et reste à jamais attaché à la Belgique, royauté catholique, che. valier de yaillance, d'énergie et de bravoure si françaises. Le peuple a vu de près et aimé les admirables religieu- ses et les saints religieux proscrits, et, dans sa foi, il espère que le pays qui a donné au monde une si belle floraison d'apôtres, se convertira, et redeviendra le champion de la cause du Christ et de sa Sainte Mère. La Vierge reste l'es- poir de ces populations où la foi est si vivace, les murs si austères, le travail si fructueux. Le peuple flamand, si profondément dévôt, prie et invo- que tout spécialement Notre Dame de Puine d'Ypres, la vierge du grand miracle de 1383. Jugez s'il a raison. Il arriva donc que sous Charles VI, roi de France, il y eut guerre contre l'Angleterre. Tout disentiment entre nobles et bourgeois cessa, à Ypres, devant la menace de l'as- servissement à un pouvoir étranger. L'amour du clocher - comme aujourd'hui - dominait alors tous les Aantim.nf T.u V __ -- siège",
         "EN BELGIQUE Du 9 juin au 8 août 1383, l'armée anglaise et gantoise fit le siège d'Ypres. Vaillance et prières furent employées à préparer la victoire finale, et la levée du siège le 8 août. Lors- que parurent les armées alliées, la victoire fut définitive. Dès 1384, les magistrats décidèrent que, tous les ans, seraient célébrées, à Ypres, le 8 août, des fêtes communales et une procession solennelle : c'est la Puinday, g g Aujourd'hui, Ypres l'héroïque prie et et espère. Cette fois le secours vient par les armées expéditionnaires du Canada. Est-ce par un dessein providentiel que le 14ième bataillon de la 3iène Brigade - ayant comme chapelain M. le Chanoine Sylvestre - et le 22ième bataillon, formés, en si grand nombre, de catholiques canadiens-français, soient appe- lés à la défense et à la délivrance certaine de l'Ypres, cité flamande de Marie, comme Montréal est la ville canadienne de Marie ? Prions et espérons. Quand, demain, la Vierge délivrera la ville d'Ypres, le pays de Belgique, et l'ancienne mère-patrie, la France, du joug de l'orgueilleux allemand, sur l'estampe commémorative du triomphe définitif, puisse t-on renouveler sans mensonge officiel, la vieille estampe d'Ypres de 1383 ; sous des crossee et des lances mêlées en champ - symbole de l'union du cler- gé et des bourgeois - puisse-t-on lire, comme se lisait sous l'image de la Vierge sauvant la ville, la vieille devise, gage de paix et de perpétuelle sécurité : Concordia civium. Priez pour moi et mes chers soldats. Bien vôtre, fr. C. V. DoYoN, O. P. Aumônier-capitaine à la 5ième Brigade, ~I.",
         "L'ALCOOL ET LES PRÉJUGÉS Sans autre préambule, nous abordons ce grave sujet. On 'essent qu'il est étendu, puisqu'il s'agit des travers de ýsprit humain, et alors même que ces travers ne portent que r un seul point, le sujet, qui en traite, reste encore assez bste pour qu'il n'y ait pas de temps à perdre. * * On définit le préjugé: une opinion, une croyance qu'on fait sans examen. D'où il résulte que s'il est un acte de sprit humain qui ne lui fasse pas honneur, c'est bien le ýjugé. L'honneur de l'esprit humain, comme sa fonction 3entielle, est de considérer, d'examiner, de peser le pour et contre, de citer à son tribunal les différentes parties qui t à déposer dans l'affaire en litige, et de porter ensuite un ,ement qui soit fait en pleine connaissance de cause. Le ýjugé est exactement le contraire de tout cela. Il est ac- \u003eté sans examen, il est suivi parce que tout le monde le t; c'est le premier mouton de Panurge, avec cette diffé- [ce que le préjugé ne garde du mouton que son inintelli- ice, sans en conserver la douceur ! Il est pire, dans un sens, l'erreur: dans l'erreur, du moins, on étudie avant de se noncer; il est surtout plus tenace au'elle. nonr la, ami--",
         "L'ALCOOL ET LES PRÉJUG s \u003combres, successivement et par degrés.\" Puissé-je faire i paraître quelques-unes de ces ombres épaisses qui enveb pent la question dont nous nous occupons, et à la favt desquelles l'alcool a conquis son pouvoir néfaste 1 . . Ainsi donc, en invitant mes lecteurs à me suivre dans région des préjugés, ce n'est pas précisément dans une régi ,de soleil et de clarté que je les conduis; c'est plutôt da: une forêt de maquis et de broussailles que nous engageo nos pas, et encore ne suis-je pas bien sûr d'écarter à droite à gauche les branches qui obstruent la route, au point i la rendre agréable à tous,.en ne permettant à aucune de e branches de blesser quelqu'un au passage. Dans ce problèm de l'alcool,-en effet, on s'est plu à entasser les préjugés les ui sur les autres, et je ne sais, si de fait, il est au monde u problème sur lequel les préjugés aient amoncelé plus d'ol seurité. Voyez plutôt: s'agit il de chanter la vertu de l'alco, sur l'organisme humain ? L'alcool est un apéritif et il ei un digestif; l'alcool est un stimulant et il est un nutriti l'alcool est un réchauffant, et, ô logique ! il est aussi' un ri fraîchissant; l'alcool préserve des maladies infectueuses, prévient la grippe et l'infuenza, il soutient la faiblesse, conserve la force, il est le bienfaiteur insigne de la santé, est la panacée universelle à tous les maux qui affligent l'ht manité. Pauvres lointains ancêtres, avant l'apparition d l'alcool, comme vous avez dû être chétifs de sang et de racý vous qui ne connaissiez pas la valeur du petit verre, et qui, défaut de spiritueux, vous contentiez d'être simplement SpJ",
         ",Bab REVUE DOMINICAINE fameux coup d'appétit, de celui qui ouvre l'estomac ? Vous çonnaissez la spirituelle réponse du professeur Trousseau : \"Je pnse qu'il ne faut pas s'ouvrir l'appétit avec une fausse clé.\" t si cette autorité ne suffisait pas, j'en appellerais à celle de Claude Bernard, qui a soutenu, après expérience faite sur des lapins et des chiens, que l'alcool n'excite pas du tout l'ap- pétit. De l'alcool comme digestif, voici ce que dira le même auteur: \"Si l'on donne des aliments à deux chiens se trou- vant dans les mêmes conditions et qu'ensuite on administre à l'un de l'alcool et à l'autre de l'éther, on verra en les ouvrant au bout de cinq à six heures, que la digestion stomacale est terminée chez celui qui a reçu de l'éther, tandis qu'elle n'est pas commencéé chez celui qui a reçu de l'alcool.\" Stimulant, l'alcool pourra donner ce qu'on appelle le \"coup de fouet \", mais il est avéré que l'on prodigue ainsi en tluelques instants la quantité de force que l'on devrait conserver pour toute la durée du travail. Les athlètes, les lutteurs, les jockeys, tous ceux qui ont à augmenter la force musculaire, sont d'une sobriété extrême, et ne sait- on pas le mot des cyclistes: \"L'al- cool coupe les jambes.\" Nutritif, l'alcool ne l'est en aucune façon, comme renfermant néant en albumine. Un savant dira: \"Il ne nourrit pas plus que l'éther, le chloroforme, l'opium ou le tabac.\" (1) Un autre insistera: \"Il est scienti- fiquement établi, incontestablement démontré que l'eau-de- vie ne nourrit pas plus l'homme que le coup d'éperon ne nourrit le cheval.\" (2) Réchauffant enfin ? Mais, au pôle nord, Nansen n'en voulut jamais; mais un autre navigateur, Sir John Ross, affirme que ses marins abstinents supportaient bien mieux que les autres la rigoureuse température des régions polaires; mais l'on sait que l'alcool est totalement supprimé dans la marine américaine. Restons-en là, car grAce à Dieu, cette sorte de préjugés tend plutôt à disparal- tre, et il n'y aura bientôt plus à les prôner que ceux qui veu- lent abriter derrière eux leurs désirs et leur passion. , . it une",
         "L'ALCOOL ET LES PRÉJUGÉS 889 ou douloureuses de la vie, nécessité que Mgr l'évêque de Chicoutimi expose ainsi: \"Il est passé dans les murs du peuple que la boisson est nécessaire ou du moins de haute convenance en toute circonstance de la vie. On boit aux heures de tristesse pour se consoler, et aux heures de joie pour mieux se réjouir encore. On boit pour fêter le baptême d'un nouveau-né; aux noces et aux funé. railles, on boit encore; on boit, en partant pour les chan- tiers, afin de s'encourager, et, en revenant, pour fêter la retour. On boit à la conclusion d'un marché heureux, même si avant de le traiter, on ne s'est pas mis hors d'état de ne le faire qu'au détriment de. ses intérêts.\" Il serait facile de multiplier les exemples. On boit aux encans et on boit aux corvées. C'est par là que vraiment se termine uni plaidoirie; c'est par là que décidément se vide une cause... ' et la bouteille aussi. Si l'on est plusieurs, il faut bien se manifester de l'amitié; si l'on est seul, \" que faire en un gite, à moins q.ue l'on ne songe\".. . devant la liqueur blanche OU jaune ? Parlerai-je de la circonstance, particulièrement grave, des élections ? Ou sait à quoi s'en tenir sur ce point, et d'ail- leurs, n'est on pas heureux de constater en passant, les pro- grès sensibles qui ont été réalisés en ces occasions, depuis la prédication de la croisade ? C'est ainsi que l'alcool devient, par un préjugé qu'on peut appeler séculaire, l'accompagne- ment obligé de toute cérémonie, de toute fête, de toute réu- nion, de toute relation, de toute circonstance, en un mot, OÜ il suffira que deux hommes aient à se serrer la main. Comment vaincre ce préjugé, car c'en est un véritable- ment, et l'un des plus sots, que de s'imaginer que tout amU- sement doive être à base d'alcool ? Il n'est qu'un moyen, mais il est sûr, il est radical: il consiste à vaincre tout d'abord",
         "la cause de la tempérance le plus considérable effet, et il ritera, sur l'heure, d'en être proclamé le chevalier. Mais dit chevalier, dit précisément dominateur, en sa cons- ice et en ses actes, du respect humain; et où ira-t-il puiser courage d'affirmation et sa force de triomphe ? Dans la viction de son coeur. - Tout est là. - Si nous sommes vaincus de la vérité, de la bonté, de l'importance, la nécessité de notre cause, nous ne nous attarderons plus : vieilleries de la mode ou de la coutume, nous devien- ns enfin personnels d'une personnalité légitime puisqu'elle pule à la vérité, d'une personnalité efficace puisqu'elle spire de la conscience et qu'elle pousse vaillamment au olr. Il faut bien \u0026tre poli, dira l'un. Il suffit d'dtre modéré, iquera l'autre. Résignons-nous : nous voici engagés sur deux nou- \u003es pistes de préjugés. O politesse, que d'indignités on \u003eètre en ton nom ! O modération, que tu as perdu de 2es et braves gens en tout ordre d'idées, et jusque dans e religieuse ! Or, savez-vous ce que c'est que la politesse, Lvez-vous jusqu'où conduit la modération ...... quand n'est pas modérée ? « Il me semble, disait LaBruyère, que l'esprit de poli- i est une certaine attention à n'im m. n ... -1\"n",
         "L'ALCOOL ET LES PRÉJUGÉS traires aux vôtres, et alors vous leur rendez service, vous les convertissez peut-être par votre attitude ferme et résolue, et ne pensez vous pas que la meilleure politesse que l'on puisse faire à quelqu'un, c'est de le convertir ? Quant à la modération, je ne répugnerais pas à m'enrôler sous son drapeau, pourvu toutefois que l'on ait la bonté de me préciser, en cette matière d'alcool et de façon pratique, sa mesure et son étendue. C'est qu'en effet, selon la juste remarque du Dr Legrain : \"Chacun reste libre de circonscrire les limites de la modération suivant ses goûts, ses penchants et ses passions \". De quel droit ira t-on cir- conscrire ces limites à un, ou deux, ou trois verres par jour ? S'il me plaît de reculer lcs bornes et de ne les fixer qu'à cinq, ou huit, ou dix verres par jour, dira-t on que je suis immo- déré ? Une double réflexion s'impose ici : premièrement, \"ce'est l'usage quotidien des boissons fortes qui est vrai- ment dangereux, parce qu'il produit peu à peu l'habitude dont l'énergie s'accentue de plus en plus. On prend un coup d'appétit le matin, on le répète avant le dîner et le souper, puis il faut un punch avant d'aller se coucher; la constitu- tion s'accoutume à cette excitation agréable, bientôt on aug- mente la dose, l'alcool pénètre lentement dans l'organisme, il s'y emmagasine à notre insu. Vienne ensuite une circons- tance favorable, et la passion fera explosion.\" (1) En second lieu, la dépense qu'entraîne la prétendue mo- dération, n'est-elle pas immodérée ? Quoi ? Dans un budget familial relativement rèstreint, on arrivera à dépenser en pure perte, à gaspiller sans aucune espèce de profit, une som-",
         ",342 REVUE . DOMINICAINE nels, les hôtels et les auberges. Et l'on est prié de consi- dérer que cette tradition est vénérable par son antiquité et s'impose en quelque sorte au respect des peuples. Ne remon- te-t-elle pas à la fondation même de la colonie ? Nos pères l'ont vigoureusement implantée, en leurs poitrines d'abord, puis au cur de leurs descendants. Et nous l'avons reçue, comme un joyeux héritage, dans l'ivresse de notre reconnais- sance. Et l'on veut qu'aujourd'hui nous en fassions le ,sacrifice ? Oui, si sacrifice il y a, il faut l'accomplir ; si tradition il y a, il faut la briser. Nos pères ont pu être grands et remplir de grandes choses; mais puisque, selon le mot de Bossuet, \"la sagesse humaine est toujours courte par quel- .que endroit \", nous avouerons que la gourmandise de la bois- son fut l'endroit par lequel la sagesse humaine de nos pères ne fut pas toujours bien longue. D'ailleurs, l'Eglise ne _essa jamais de protester contre cet abus, et n'est-ce pas Mgr de Laval qui a été le premier apôtre de la tempérance au Canada. Non, il n'est pas exact de dire que la vraie tra- dition canadienne soit l'alcool et l'usage de l'alcool et l'abus de l'alcool. Il faut affirmer hautement que la vraie, constante et profonde tradition de notre pays, ce fut la lutte à toutes les époques contre l'ennemi, ce fut la tempérance demandée par nos évêques, prêchée par nos missionnaires et pratiquée, quoi qu'on en dise, dans nos familles saines et chrétiennes; et c'est pour continuer cette tradition, en la fortifiant et en la rendant indestructible, que l'on nous demande d'abandon- ner l'autre tradition, la tradition de fausseté, qui ne tend qu'à devenir la tradition de ruine et de mort. fr. HENRI HAGE, O. P. *",
         "LA VIE RELIGIEUSE EN ANGLETERRE, AVANT LA REFORME CHAPELLES ET OBITS MORTUAIRES ES deux institutions, dans l'Eglise d'Angleterre au moyen âge, ont été généralement fort mal comprises et encore plus mal interprétées, La plupart des écrivains les considèrent seulement au point de vue du dogme du purgatoire: elles montreraient alors jusqu'à quel point la néces- sité de prier pour les morts était enseignée au peuple par les autorités religieuses, et ce, en vue du profit pécuniaire à en tirer. On en est venu, alors, jus- qu'à croire que le mot \" chantry \" signifiait seulement un lieu ou chapelle quelconque, dépendant de l'Eglise paroissiale, où des messes étaient célébrées pour l'âme des bienfaiteurs ou donateurs particuliers. Sans doute, de telles fondations ont existé, mais ce serait se méprendre totalement sur leurs des- tinations que d'appliquer ce principe avec trop de rigueur. Dans un sens plus large et plus exact les prêtres de ces cha- pelles étaient considérés comme assistants, ou même, dirions- nous aujourd'hui, comme des vicaires. Ils étaient entretenus au moyen de revenus, laissés à cette fin par ces bienfaiteurs, fréquemment aussi par les contributions des paroissiens. La raison d'être de ces chapelles et des prêtres attachés à leur desserte, c'était surtout d'assister les pauvres de la paroisse, de visiter les malades et de preter assistance dans les céré-",
         ".chapelles, contribuait grandement à rehausser l'éclat des céré- monies paroissiales; de plus les oeuvres de charité y trou- vaient un secours très appréciable, souvent nécessaire. On aura peut-être meilleure idée de ces fonctions, à la veille de la Réforme, par l'exemple de la fondation d'une .chapellenie faite à l'autel Sainte Anne dans l'Eglise de Bads- worth. Elle date de 1510, et fut établie pour le repos de l'âme d'Isabella, épouse de William Vavasour, et fille de Robert Urswick. La charte demande que le chapelain soit un prêtre séculier, non pourvu d'autres bénéfices, et qu'il soit tenu chaque semaine de célébrer une messe de Requiem, avec la récitation des Vêpres et Matines de l'Office des Morts. Au Lavabo de la messe, l'Officiant devait se tourner vers le peu- ple et l'exhorter à prier pour l'âme du fondateur; il récitait alors le De Profumdis avec l'oraison Inclina Domine. Une fois par année, le mardi dans la semaine de Pâques, l'anni- versaire du défunt devait être célébré, avec distribution aux pauvres, sous la surveillance du Curé, de la somme de dix shillings et huit pence. Le chapelain devait être suffisam- ment versé dans la grammaire et le plain-chant, être présent au cheur de l'Eglise paroissiale, pour Matines, la Messe, les Vêpres et les Complies; de même aux autres offices des Dimanches et Fêtes pour y prendre telle part qu'il convien- drait au Curé de lui assigner. Il lui est interdit de s'absen- ter pour plus d'un mois, et toujours avec permission de ce même Curé, qui pourrait le priver de sa charge pour certains délits spécifiés. Dans ces mêmes chapelles furent établis las R.rviw.i",
         "y avait dans cette paroisse \"1400 personnes hospitalisées, et que le curé n'avait nul autre prêtre pour l'aider à en prendre soin que les deux chapelains \". Pour cette raison, ces fonda- tions auraient dû être épargnées. Bien loin de là, nous trou- vons, deux ans plus tard, les biens fonds destinés à la subsis- tance des chapelains, aux mains de deux spéculateurs-John, Howe et John Broxholme. D'après les registres de la paroisse de Saint-Nicholas dans la même ville, nous trouvons que les membres de la Société de la Vierge contribuaient au soutien d'un prêtre. Or' il y avait dans cette paroisse 200 hospitalisés, et comme les revenus étaient fort réduits, on n'aurait pu trouver, pour en prendre soin, d'autre prêtre que celui payé par la société. Cependant les officiers du Roi n'hésitèrent nullement à con- fisquer la propriété servant à son entretien. Inutile d'insis- ter d'avantage, dans le seul comté de Nottingham on pour- rait mentionner une vingtaine de faits semblables. Il est donc évident, que, pour les paroisses, le principal avantage provenant de la fondation de ces chapellenies et obits n'étaient pas les ressources pécuniaires, toujours forte- ment exagérées par les auteurs protestants. Une opinion erronée et tendancieuse cherche en vain à faire croire que cet argent servait uniquement à faire dire des prières pour les morts. Sans l'assistance des prêtres, qui vivaient de ces reve- nus, le service du culte dans beaucoup de paroisses aurait été négligé, à tout le moins, célébré avec une simplicité peu con- venable. Les documents les plus sérieux en font foi, la spo- liation par le Roi Edouard VI de ces chapellenies n'avaient pas pour but de mettre fin aux prières superstitieuses pour les morts. La vérité est tout autre en réalité, ce sont les pauvres qui ont ainsi perdu bien des riches aumônes, laissées par des personnes défuntes pour soulager leurs misères. De plus les églises paroissiales ont été privées du ministère de ces prêtres, non pourvus de bénéfices, mais en revanche, s'oc- cupant à travailler au salut des classes pauvres, à rehausser' l'éclat du culte.",
         "MÉDITATION POUR NOVEMBRE Le temps ne nous a été donné que pour recevoir, dans notre cur, cette larme qui coule de l'éternité, et germe en nous les bons désirs; pour entendre intérieurement la parole de la vie éternelle : c'est cette parole immuable qui est la vie, qui est l'âme du temps. Pressez ce mot aveugle et sourd, et il arrivera peut-être à ne plus rien exprimer, sinon l'incognito de l'action provi- dentielle. Le temps n'existe que par ce que Dieu y met et y per- met: il y met notre foi, il y permet nos infidélités. Le temps est loin d'être vide, car il est plein de Dieu et de son amour. Tangente mystérieuse du fini et de l'infini, le temps est ce point inétendu, indivisible, insaisissable, où la Toute-Puis- sance sollicite l'homme mortel de recevoir le grain d'éternité qu'elle veut jeter en lui. Mais, d'ordinaire, le rapide mouve- ment de nos rébellions repousse violemment le germe de vie qui s'échappe précisément par ce fatal point de tangence. Le temps, c'est donc aussi notre cur et nos uvres; si notre temps n'est pas rempli, c'est que nous avons fait le vide en nous; c'est qu'en nous allégeant de la plénitude de Dieu, nous sommes tombés dans les profondeurs de notre indi- gence. Le temps est une continuelle sommation de salut adres- sée par la grâce à la volonté; et une continuelle réponse de la volonté tour à tour bonne, mauvaise, languissante. Donc, pas une heure, pas une minute indifférente dans la vie: car il n'est pas un instant de lacune à l'esprit ou au coeur de l'homme; et peut-il exister une affection, une pensée indiffé- rente ? Pas un cheveu inutile, pas une parole perdue; pas une intention qui ne laisse sa trace au livre de justice. Oh! il faudrait avoir peur de Dieu comme d'un rude exacteur de vertus, si la doctrine de l'amour ne nous eût appris qu'il est aussi le compagnon de notre travail, l'ami présent à toutes nos souffrances, qui les soulage en les por- tant. Mais sa miséricorde est jalouse ; elle sait mauvais gré",
         "MÉDITATION POUR NOVEMBRE 347 à qui craint de la fatiguer, et ne s'irrite que du refus de ses, prévenances. Guide vigilant, elle ne nous permet pas de marcher sans elle; elle veut tout à la fois nous précéder et nous soutenir. Bien rarement, et toujours pour notre malheur, s'accom- plit ce que nous avons voulu de ce \"je veux \" prononcé par le moi. Dieu ne répond jamais à cette initiative qui usurpe l'indépendance. Lorsqu'il ne prévient pas, il défend ; et s'il permet, c'est qu'il veut punir. L'homme qui marche sous la menace de son silence, s'arrêtera un jour avec effzoi. S'il n'est tout-à-fait hors la loi de grâce, hors la vie spirituelle à la dispersion de son coeur, à la fuite de ses pensées, il sentira l'absence de Dieu. Car son intimité avec nous est la seule réalité de nous-mêmes; son secours, la seule recomnandation de nos uvres; seules, ses larmes donnent à nos larmes la saveur de la vérité. Il est notre justice, et il nous l'impute, si nous savons déposséder notre moi de ses dons. Créancier de nos âmes, il acquitte pour ses débiteurs, qu'il rend désor- mais créanciers de ses promesses. L'éternité, c'est la sagesse de Dieu; le temps, c'est le coeur de l'homme. La vie est bien moins une succession de jours et d'heures qu'une continuité d'avertissements. Malheur au peuple, malheur à l'homme qui émancipe le Temps de la Raison souveraine, le prenant pour quelque chose qui puisse tenir devant la pensée, sans être gros de volontés, d'avertissements et de conseils! Malheur à l'homme, malheur aux peuples qui n'ont plus le sentiment de l'ADM1- NISTRATION DIVINE ; ils ne savent plus lire dans leur vie. Ils ont effacé le nom de la Providence, la lettre mère de l'al- phabet universel; et, tantôt ils s'étonnent de ne pouvoir lire, tantôt ils se croient la faculté de lire en convenant d'un nou- veau signe, tantôt ils disent anathème à toute lecture. Il dévorent le temps, et le temps les dévore! *",
         "DANS L'EGLISE ET DANS L'ORDRE LES ACTES DU SAINT SIÈGE BENOIT XV ET LA GUERRE La dernière livraison reçue des Actes du S. Siège fait connaître de nouvelles faveurs spirituelles pour le temps de la guerre. C'est d'abord le privilège accordé à tous les prêtres, sécu- liers ou réguliers, qui, dans la guerre actuelle sont préposés au soin spirituel des soldats, de bénir d'un seul signe de croix, sans la formule usitée, les médailles de Saint-Benoît. Une seconde faveur est accordé à tous les fidèles. Il y a, dans le Canon de la Messe, plusieurs prières où le prêtre demande la paix ; le Souverain Pontife permet aux fidèles de les dire dans leur langue, et ainsi, de gagner une indulgence de 300 jours pour chaque récitation, et, en plus, une indul-",
         "DANS L'ÉGLISE ET DANS L'ORDRE 849 II DANS L'ORDRE iNOUVEAU PROVINCIAL Les lecteurs de la\" Revue Dominicaine \"ont déjà appris par la voix des journaux l'élection, le 30 août dernier, du T. R. Père E. A. Langlais à la charge de Provincial des Domi- nicains de la Province Canadienne de St-Dominique. Le Révérendissime Père Général de l'Ordre a confirmé ce choix par ses Lettres du 18 septembre. Le T. R. Père Langlais demeurera au Couvent de St-Hyacinthe. LES NÔTRES À LA GUERRE Plusieurs religieux dominicains des provinces françaiseu sont à la guerre, les uns comme aumôniers, d'autres comme infirmiers, d'autres en plus grand nombre, comme soldats; en cela, ils obéissent aux lois de leur pays, qui ne reconnaissent plus l'immunité personnelle des clercs et des religieux. Des religieux de notre Province dominicaine d'Angle- terre ont volontairement pris le même parti. Plusieurs Frè- res se sont engagés comme soldats, et le fait, dit on, a eu du retentissement dans les milieux protestants. Plusieurs Pères sont aumôniers dans les troupes anglaises envoyées aux Dar- danelles ; du nombre est le R. P, Albert Knapp, bien connu",
         "1700 enfants ; il y a 19 couvents de SSurs annamites avec 497 moniales, et 120 prêtres indigènes, tous profès du Tiers- Ordre, qui vivent de la même vie commune que les Pères, et les aident dans leur ministère. Le T. R. P. Vicaire Provincial, de cette chrétienté, le P. Moreno, vient de traduire en langue annamite, les vies de Saint Dominique et de Sainte Catherine de Sienne. Aux îles Curaçao, confiées à la Province dominicaine de Hollande, les religieux exercent aussi un ministère fructueux. Ils sont 33 assignés à l'unique couvent du S. Rosaire de Cura- gao ; 5 seulement y résident, les autres necupent les îles adja- entes. 29 religieuses du Tiers Ordre s'occupent de l'éduca- tion des jeunes filles et d'un hôpital. Pour l'année 1914, le nombre des chrétiens s'élevait à 54,000 ; les catéchismes sont bien fréquentés, les communions sont très nombreuses ; dans presque toutes les paroisses est érigée la Confrérie du S. Rosaire ; dans les paroisses de villes, les missionnaires ont établi des Sociétés ouvrières, des patronages, des bibliothè- ques publiques et des journaux. LIs DoMINICAINs DE BARI Les dures leçons de la guerre actuelle ramènent, il est certain, une foule d'esprits vers les croyances religieuses ; même si depuis longtemps ils n'avaient connu nos vérités saintes que sous l'angle faussé du préjugé. Ce fait consolant se produit en France, notamment; et aussi en Italie. D'où, réveil des passions anticléricales, assoupies quelque peu par les préoccupations de l'heure présente. Ne fallait-il pas dé- fendre les esprits déjà assez influencés, contre une impression profonde et néfaste, produite par le patriotisme et le dévoû- ment dont a donné si bel exemple le prêtre-soldat comme le ehrétien pratiquant. L'Ordre de Saint Dominique a en l'honneur de subir une de ces attaques. Elle a été retentissante autant que ridicule ; isez pour mettre en lumière le vrai patriotisme de certains sectaires, et, mieux encore, celui du religieux, voué par toute sa vie au respect de la Loi souveraine de Dieu d'abord, puis je celles de sa patrie, si elles ne violent pas l'autre. Des isprits sérieux n'ont pas manqué de faire cette grave remar- lue, parue dans une feuille plutôt libérale: \"L'heure n'est ?lus de diviser les forces vives de la nation par de stériles et",
         "DANS L'ÉGLISE ET DANS L'ORDRE 851 haineuses discussions; surtout par des procédés indignes de l'homme assez sage pour savoir calculer la portée de ses actes \". Donc, à Bari, port de l'Italie méridionale, dans la Pouille, sur l'Adriatique, cinq Dominicains ont été arrêtés et jetés en prison, le 2 Juin dernier. On les accusait d'avoir: 1) établi des communications avec une Puissance ennemie, l'Autriche, au moyen de projections lumineuses produites par un appa. reil électrique trouvé en leur possession ; 2) de détenir en leur maison une forte somme d'argent, de provenance autri- chienne et destinée apparemment à des fins suspectes. Ce délit d'espionnage et de haute trahison fut porté, après de minutieuses perquisitions, devant le Tribunal militaire de la ville par un lieutenant d'Infanterie, anticlérical notoire et agent probable des sociétés secrètes. Or la procédure, en tout conduite avec une équité par- faite et une réelle habileté, a démontré clairement, et déclaré par sa sentence, l'inexistence du crime, partant, l'inanité des accusations, évidemment malintentionnées. Seulement, pen- dant deux mois la basse presse d'Italie s'en est donné à ceur joie, en fait de déclamations furibondes, d'imaginations miro- bolantes. Si ceux de Marseilles sont du Midi, jugez un peu si ceux de la Pouille en sont; sans vouloir porter préjudice aux autres provinces. L'appareil incliminé, c'était une lanterne de projection, bien ordinaire et déjà en usage depuis assez longtemps. On la destinait à illustrer des catéchismes ou conférences reli- gieuses ; conférences ajournées à cause de la guerre, et sur- tout du mauvais fonctionnement de cette malencontreuse machine. Les signaux lumineux, c'était la lumière assez pâle qui éclairait, jusqu'à une heure avancée parfois, la veil- lée des religieux ; ils donnaient pour lors l'hospitalité à un aumônier militaire, ami du père Supérieur. L'argent trouvé, la somme considérable de 30,000 Lires, c'était, en phis de la maigre caisse du petit couvent, des au- mônes recueillies par le Père Scognamilio, Prieur, et destinées aux pauvres catholiques du Monténégro, grandement éprou- vées par la guerre. Monseigneur Dobrecie, Archevêque d'An- t:-:-a, ma n_ Phrps d'intéresser les Cardinaux et Pré-",
         "sieurs lettres ont été lues au tribunal, démontrant claire- it la source de ces aumônes. Entre autres: 100 lires du dinal Archeveque de Naples, 50 dollars de la Délégation \u003estolique au Canada, 1,000 Lires du Commissariat de re Sainte à Paris, 1,200 des Missions Catholiques de in. En plus, l'uvre de la Propagation de la Foi, par Conseil Central de Paris avait envoyé à Sa Sainteté oft XV une somme de 30,000 francs pour les missions. Saint Père avait chargé le Cardinal Gasparri, Secrétaire sat, de faire parvenir cette somme à Monseigneur Dobrecie son commissaire, le père Scognamiglio. Mais quel scandale de trouver autant d'argent entre les ns de ces prétendus pauvres ! Quelle déconvenue de con- er dans ces âmes, obscurcies et rabaissées par l'ignorance i bigoterie, d'aussi nobles sentiments de charité et de 'iotique dévouement. Dénués eux-mêmes, ils s'occupaient vement de venir en aide à la brave petite nation, alliée sur patrie. On sait par ailleurs que le Code très large i Solidarité universelle est on ne peut plus indulgent r les adeptes des Loges quand ils ont le bonheur de ma- les fonds publics, pour le plus grand avantage de l'hu- ité. Mais l'élan est donné, et comment ne pas exploiter à une aussi riche veine ? Les Frères de Bari, acquittés : honneur, ont été chaudement applaudis et félicités, ac- 14s même, au sortir de la Cour Martiale. Les juzes de *"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Mensuel"
      ],
      "published" : [
         "[Saint-Hyacinthe : Couvent de Notre-Dame du Rosaire, 1915]"
      ],
      "lang" : [
         "fra"
      ],
      "pkey" : "oocihm.8_06920",
      "key" : "oocihm.8_06920_11",
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ],
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06920_11",
      "label" : "Novembre 1915",
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "source" : [
         "Bibliothèque et Archives Canada."
      ]
   },
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06920_11/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1"
}
{
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.80809/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1",
   "version" : "0.4",
   "doc" : {
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.80809",
      "label" : "Poems of peace and war",
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ],
      "key" : "oocihm.80809",
      "published" : [
         "London : Heath, Cranton, [1916]"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "1 microfiche (20 fr.)",
         "Imprint date from Watters.",
         "27 p. ; 14 cm."
      ],
      "creator" : [
         "Fenton, Frederick B."
      ],
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "CIHM Microfiche Series (IMonegraphs) ICfMH Collection de microfiches (monographles) Canadian Instituta for Historical Microraproductloni / ln.titut Canadian da microraproductions historiques ©1996 Technical and Bibliographic Notes / Notes technique et bibliographiques The Institute has attempted to obtain the best original copy available for filming. Features of this copy which may be bibliographically unique, which may alter any of the images in the reproduction, or which may significantly change the usual method of filming are checked below. 0 D D D Q' Coloured covers / Couverture de couleur I I Covers damaged / — ' Couverture endommager I I Covers restored and/or laminated / Couverture restauree et/ou pelliculde I [ Cover title missing / Le titre de couverture manque fj\\ Coloured maps/ Cartes geographiques en couleur I I Coloured ink (i.e. other than blue or black) / Encre de couleur (i.e. autre que bleue ou noire) r~] Coloured plates and/or illustrations / Planches et/ou illustrations en couleur I I Bound witti other material / — ' Reli6 avec d'autres documents Only editran available / Seule Edition disponible Tight binding may cause shadows or distortion along interior margin / La reliure serree peut causer de I'ombre oo de la distorsion le long de la marge interieure. Blank leaves added during restoratk\u003ens may appear within the text. Whenever possible, these have been omitted from filming / II se peut que certaines pages blanches ajoutdes lors d'une restauration apparaissent dans le texte, mais, kirsque cela 6tait possible, ces pages n'ont pas m film6es. Addttional comments / Commentaires suppl^mentaires: Various paglngs. L'Institut a microfilm^ le meilleur examplaire qu'il lui a 6te possible de se procurer. Les details de cet exem- piaire qui sont peut-§tre uniques du point de vue bibli- ographique, qj peuvent modifier une image reproduite, ou qui peuvent exiger une modifications dans la meth- ode nonnale de filmage sont indiques ci-dessous. I [ Coloured pages/ Pages de couleur I [ Pages damaged / Pages endommagees I I Pages restored and/or laminated / Pages restaur^es et/ou pelikujldes r^ Pages discoloured, stained or foxed / Pages decolorees, tachetdes ou piquees I [ Pages detached/ Pages d6tach6es r^ Showthrough/ Transparence j I Quality of print varies / ' — ' QuaWe in^gale de I'impression I [ Includes supplementary material/ Comprend du materiel suppi^mentaire I I Pages wholly or partially obscured by errata slips, tissues, etc., have been refilmed to ensure the best possible image / Les pages totalement ou partiellement obscurcies par un feuillet d'errata, une pelure, etc., ont 6t6 filmees k nouveau de fa9on a obtenir la meilleure image possible. I I Opposing pages with varying colouration or discolourations are filmed twkie to ensure the best possible image / Les pages s'opposant ayant des colorations variables ou das decol-orations sont filmees deux fois afin d'obtenir la meilleur image possible. This itMn is f ilmad at titc raduction ratio chackad balow/ Ca docwnant ast film* au taux da rMuetion indiqii« ci-detsous. 10X 14X 18X 22X 2CX XX J 12X 16X 20X 24X 28X 3 32",
         "X I* copy filmed h«r« has b««n raproducad thanks tha ganarosity of: National Library of Canada L'axampiaira fiimi fut raproduit grica i la g*n4rositi da: Bibliotheque nationale du Canada la imagas appaaring hara ara tha bast quality )ssibla considaring tha condition and lagibility tha original copy and in kaaping with tha ming contract spacificationa. iginal copias in printad papar covars ara fllmad iginning wich tha front covar and anding on a last paga with a printad or illustratad impras- sn. or tha back covar whan appropriata. All har original copias ara filmad beginning on tha St paga with a printad or illustratad impras- \u003en. and anding on tha last paga with a printad illustratad imprassion. Las imagas suivantas ont *ti raproduitas avac la plus grand soin. compta tanu da la condition at da la nattati da l'axampiaira film*, at an conformiti avac las conditions du contrat da filmaga. Las axamplairaa originaux dont la couvartura tn paplar aat Imprimia sont filmis an eommancant par la pramiar plat at an tarminant toit par la darniira paga qui comporta una amprainta d'imprassion ou d'illustration, soit par la sacond plat, salon la caa. Tous las autras axamplairaa originaux sont filmta an commancant par la pramiAra paga qui comporta una amprainta d'imprassion ou d'illustration at an tarminant par la darniira paga qui comporta una talla amprainta. la laat racordad frama on aach microficha lall contain tha symbol -^ Imaaning \"CON- NUEO\"). or tha symbol V (moaning \"END\"), hichavar applias. aps. platas. charts, ate. may ba filmad at ffarant reduction ratios. Thosa too larga to ba itiraly included in one exposure are filmed iginning in the upper left hand corner, left to |ht and top to bonom, as many frames as quired. The following diagrams illustrate the athod: Un das symbolas suivants apparaltra sur la darniire image de cheque microfiche, selon la cas: la symbols «ii»\u003e signifie \"A SUIVRE\". le symbols ▼ signifie \"FIN\". Les canes, planches, tableaux, etc.. peuvent atra filmis A des taux de r*duction diff^re^ts. Lorsque le document est trop grand pour itra reproduit en un seul clich*. il est filmi A partir da Tangle supirieur gauche, de gauche k droite. et de haut en bas. an prenant la nombra d'images nteessaire. Les diagrammas suivants illuatrent la m*thode. 1 2 3 1 2 3 4 5",
         "6 Mtatocorv risoiution tist chart (ANSI ond ISO TEST CHART No i] 1^ 1^ ^2 ■ 40 1^ 1.8 1.6 _^ x^PPLIED IM/IGE Inc ™^ 1653 Eost Mam Street FJS Rochester, Ne« York U609 USA :aqp (7'6) *82 - 03OO - Phone ^B (716) 288 - 5989 -",
         "Fan",
         "c WORLD RELATIONS AND :hh continents AN KLEMENTAKV .Ko.KA.MV KCK TMB J...oK .... „ OF TMK Pl'MLIC SCHOOLS n)I)LK IRADKS MV ALEXANDER McINTYRF BA v.c..P«.v..,..„. ,, ,„, ,^,^„^^,^ ^,,,,^^^__ ;_^^— Part I. WORLD RELATIONS Fart II THE CONTINENTS Aiit/iorizeH for Aulhun:td for use in the .' use m the S-hooh of Alberta Schools of liritish Coumbia THE EDUCATIONAL BOOK CO.. LIMITEL",
         "TORONTO Copyriifht, Canwlu, lllll, K\u003e Tmk Kuucatiunal B410K C'oHrANV •\u003e! Torunco.",
         "Limitad. p III: JACK h.«h m-h..., ..W.. • \" \"^^ \"\"' \"\"' \"•'\"' ♦'\"■ \"''^■■\"\"■\"' ''•••«r,.,,hy .,f ,(,.. ..n,r...M.. .,.,1 -..n;!:::::::::r:;:tM':i::;::i;:-;;;i;:.:\u003e,:^ -^ ■•' '•\"••^ ^.^ .•■.■ r not tl.f fa..l. .,f tl,.. huIm.., , c. ' r . '• \"\"\"' \"\"\"*•'\" •■^-\"\"\"••r\"- TI.U, |...«..v..r, i- hav.. not fullv „ra\u003e|„..| (i,.. ,M,.,..r in. ,1, I \" ■'\" \".\"•\"';''.\"\" \"\"\" l'^\"''«*'\"- '\"\"1 t.-...|,..n., af ,.r..«,„. ■^:-T:,k:z'!^^^B^^ '• outline.! i.. „.,. ,.;.„.„.., J i: :\".,.'■ •\"' \"';■'\"\" ^•''■^- -' •^'\" ■\"\"\"••' »'\"\"'- -- often „„..st i,...o.„,H.te„t i,. ,e..,ra, ie, kS I T\"\"' \"'\"\" T\"'\"\" \"' \"\" \"\u003e-'^\" -^I\"-....., an.l thattlH.Ke.,Kru,,hv.:f,ln.«ru.Iei; « , ... \"7'' '\"\"\"\"\"'• ''\"'\"■ \"\"•^'\"\"'''- \"\"\"'\" »'- '-'\" the en.l their Jan, of . pr.\" r ^e \" ^^^^^ \"* , !• '\"\"' \"\"• ''\"''\"•'•\" •'-- .'one on f.eln,, ,.. teacher i. the n.uin reaJ.n .. ttJ! 1; h^^^ , ... m.-t the nee.I...f t .hii.lren an,| of ,h,. hurriedly. „H ,hev are inten.le.l a. Z^^' , \\ \"'\" *\"'' ''\"^ l'\"*\"'^ \"'\"'\"''' '\"■ I\"\"\"\"'' - r work-,K.rhu,.H the .no.t d ■ . , I j J^^^^^^^^ ■\"\"\"*'\"''«'■ \"' \"\"- --.un-Iln J The real whole.\" the mutter an,l nuj^ 7.htuirt' TT \"'\"' \"'\" '\"\"'\"\"'■'\" \"' \"'•' \" \"\"^'' - ' cla.He.an.lalHoin various clajj n t \u003e!, ^'^^ /'\"*■ \"\"' '1'\"\" \"«'\"\" \"' '^\"\"\"\"' ^'•'-' n.onth., teaela.r« are UHk..,l,onmketh.Liv! .... '}\" \"'\"\"\"•'\"' \"\"' •«' i.*Hue,l within a t.^ hy HO .loinK. much of 'he author !nZ|, l?\"' \"^ u'\"\"\"\" ''\"'' \"'\"' '\"\"'^- - \" -hole, sin., of the work nmy te discovered. \"'\"\"' \"'*\"^\"'' ^'\"•\"'•' '^^hanut^-rize the pre^-ntatio,, The Hecond |Mjrtion of the text deals iviit, .1.,, , i of th.. elementary ^c'...!. For many t't .rZ' ,'' \"' ll\"'''\"'- '' '\"\"' ''' \"\"' \"\" »'\"\"'- cover this in a single year. So .onZ hat h;. eTu : ri^'t'\"'?''' \"'\" \"'T\"\"^''' ''' •'\"« •\" elernent .n successful geography teaching. H w ^.^ , , Y. ! f / ^''^ ^^ 7'\"''\"''^ '' ''^ »\" picture of each continent should stand out fr all \"l. ','' T: \"\"\" \" '\"^«\" \"'\" '\"\"'\"\"t of Grade IV is con.plete in itself, and of .... ,'!:'' r'th\"\" ^ '• ,\"\"\" ?\"\"\"^- '''^\" '\u003c•\"»■'-''''\u003e■ th.s grade. Huch a pupil, however misses 1 he n '\" ''\"; '\"\"',\" ''■''^\"■« •\"''-' \"' the end ,f intense geographical pictur:. of GraL vlLl Vj '\"'\"■\" \"' \"''\"'\"'\"^ '\"\"\" ''\"■ '\"8\" -\"' - \u003evhich it is the centre. The illutaiio J ! ZTZZi^^T'^'V'''\"' .\"'\" ''•'\"\"^'^ \"' considered as illuminations of the text and . 1. „l7 ? .\" '\"\" ' \"'^•\u003e' '*''\"\"'■' \"\"'■••'\"f\" '.« matter emph.isizes the fact that we are .Mr e IT \"'\"' '\"''\"\"^- 'r'\"' \"''\"I\" -''J-t- fact the teacher should l.ar in mint/:/ ^l • f;: ro\";t'; 'T ^'^''\" '^'^ \"^ -- n.is .my be advanced. Hitherto, teachers in the ju n ir Ld . 1 T'\" ^^' *^'^''' '•\"\"■''\"'-\" then, a small library of geographical referen'eVf ' w h '' '^f'\" ^\"\"^ '\"\"' \"\"^ ^\"''\"^'- «''\u003c'\"t \"'-nds of the chihlren. The iuthor tru , th.t . J ' '' ''\"''' =\"\"' -^'\"\"'\"^ ''\"*'\"►•''■ t\" the W'iNNiPKo, September Ist, 1911.",
         "Ul CONTENTS PARTI. lyoHLl) RELATIONS DlBKCTIOW TlIK WkatHKH Occupations . Maps What the Wohli. is . The Eahth .Spins ov Its Axis Ti.K Kakth Hkvolvks Ahout thk Sun Cli.matk Thk Air Thk Continknts a.vi, Ock*vs NOHTH AMKUrCA KUKOPK SOL'TH AMKUICA ASIA . !) l;i i;i 15 ii; 17 18 IS AKISICA •VrsTI.'AMA . \" ' ■ ■ ''\"'•: KAin-H, TlIK HOME Ok\\uv •\u003c'» Pku.u.: Livk iv ,,,k Com, Nok,;,' ,. Iiijc I'oifKsis OK TlIK Hut Bklt I'hK (iriASsV ColNTIiV DksKICI- LiKK TlIK N'oHTiiKHV Woods Thk Fa km Lanhs . I''l.sIIIN(i . Mountain Likk MANUKACTUIilNli Thadk RkVIKW (^fKSTIONS. PART II. A NORTH AMERICA Canada . Thk Canadian Phovinc Nkwpoundland Thk United Statks Mexico . Ckntral America . The West Indim EUROPE Grkat Britain and Ireland France . Germany Italy Austhia-Hun(jahy . Russia BKI.IilUM . Holland STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS I'AUK . 49 . 6.t . 70 . 97 . 97 . 103 103 103 104 112 119 ! 120 { 121 123 123 I 125 1 125 EUROPE— Dknviakk NoinVAY AND SWKDKN Switzkrland . I Spain and Poktunai, I Grkkck . The Balkan Countkifs «OUTH AMERICA RkVIEW yuKSTIONs ASIA . . AFRICA British East Akkic^ AUSTRALIA Tasmania Nkw /kaland GKOfiRAPlIK AL \\aMKS «L'.;„KSTI„NS KOU CoLLATKHAlRkaDIN.; North Amkrica, Physical Political . l\u003eOMiNioN OK Canada Manitoba, Saskatchewan, and Albert hLRoPE, Physical . VK'iKTATioN Regions ok the World Europe Pclitical South America, Phvsk kl C'OLOKED iMAPS P40K 31 32 33 35 36 38 40 41 42 13 44 45 45 4(! i'AI.K . 126 . 126 . 127 128 129 129 131 144 115 163 181 192 192 195 202 50 55 1 South America, Political Asia, Physical IMOK . 137 62 . 147 Political 88 . 150 105 Akrica, Physical . 164 10« Political . . 169 113 AcsTKALIA, PinslCAL 132 V Political . . 1,S3 .",
         "186 F \"^ ■ ( M *.'\"■\"■ x. t^- m.. K-'--.-'- Vl^ Ir\"^ Mil , , i\u003eJ ■kid. ...i d A'atiiral Jiridye on the Kicking llurse River, Uritiah",
         "Columbia. PRIMARY GEOGRAPHY PART I WORLD RELATIONS DIRECTION time, but huw can these directions be If you were asked tlie .luestion : \"Which is *\"\"'\"' '^^ \"'M''*^ • -'^'^^ soineone to point to find a place, we must know in what d\"recUo\" \"\" \"\"rthern part of tin; sky. TJ,o clmrt from us It hes. To helj) us in this, we have the '\"\"y J\u003e«Jp you to find these stiirs. 8onie tTrteTol ' Si '\"*' ^'\"^' ''\"'\u003e ^\"\"^^' ^'^^ P^-^P'« '^^^ that the seven st.trs look like a wagon «lmwn by three horses. C'an you see the horses ? Others see a plough, while others see a great big dipper. The right name of the group containing the.se seven stars is the Great Bear, be-cause people long ago thought it looked like a l)i!ar with a very long tail. While it is a good thing to know all these names, we s|)ell out the word neicn, and news is but the world's hapi)enin, «, gathered from every comer of the earth. Did you ever see the sun rise ? Point out the spot where you saw it rise. What do you call this direction? What point is op-posite the east ? When coming to school this morning, in which direction di\u003cl you sec the sun ? If we walk so that the morning sun Th' Xorth Star and the Big Dipper, u-ith the tuHj pointers on the right. shines in our faces, in which .lirection .h-ill T thinL- ,r \"'^ \"'\"»^\"«' '^^« a.o we going 1 Stretch out your arms ^^ B g I i;' :'\\rr;r ^^^^ T '\"7 ''\" that your right han.l points to war, Is the find tS rth^ n^of 1^ e 1\"'\". \" '\" east, and your left ha„\u003cl towards the the ars I e EnJ ''\"V'^V\"\"\" west. What direetionareyounowfacing? sU.rs of thT bo!:; 5 tl/e D ppV\": What d,rect.on ,s behind you ? calle.l the Pointer., becaL they pit It may he very easy for us to tell the to a bright star ca led the Nnrfh S north, .south, ea.st. an.l west in the .lay- or Polart",
         "^'^''' 8 WORLD RELATIONS Sailors often find their position on the sea by noticing the situations of the north star and of other stars. Indians and many other people in different parts of the world use the same nic ins ; and boys and girls should be expected to take enough interest in the sky to be able in a short time to tell the east, the west, the north, and the south even at night. But thei'e are times when the sky is cloudy, and neither the sun, the nioun, nor the stars can be seen. How may one tell direction then ? Have you ever seen a compass ? It is a small box \"... which is a little steel bar or needle tliat swings on the top of a pin. V/hen the needle is at rest, one end of it points to the north and the other end points to the south. Knowing these, how may the remaining points be found ? What would you call the point half way between the east and the north ? Where are the south-east, the north-west, and the south-west ? If I were to go out of doors, how can I find the north ? How can I find it at night, the stars being in the sky ? How can I find it in the afternoon, the day being pleasant ? If you were lost and knew that your home was south, how would you find it ? In what flirection does your shadow fall at suniise ? At sunset ? At noon ? W'hen, during the day, is your shadow longest 1 Shortest ? What time of day is noon ? How can you tell from your shadow that it is noon ? W^hen is the sun highest in the sky? Is the sun higher at noon in the summer than it is in the winter 1 What do A.M. and P.M. mean ? What is the twilight ? What the dawn ? In what direction do the birds go in the autumn time ? What can you tell by watching the direction of smoke from the chimneys ? Questions. 1. How lon^ does it take you to walk a mile ? 2. How far do you live from the school house ? the post office ? 3. If you live in the city, how many blocks are there to a mile? 4. Find out as many wavH as you can how to tell which way the wind is blowing. 5. Draw a map of your route from home to school. 6. As the nee\u003clle of the compass points both south and north, how can you tell which is which ? 7. The shortest shadow made by a post is the noon- shadow ; how should you find this shadow? 8. If vou had the noon-shadow, how should you find the one-o'clock shadow? 9. Find the real noon and compare the clock with this. 10. The sun is near the horizon ; how can j'ou tell whether you are looking toward the east or toward the west? THE WEATHER The air, or atmosphere, is al)out us everywhere. We cannot see it an\u003cl yet we know that it is there, for we can feel it blowing against our faces some-times and t)ften we civn see it moving the dust and the trees. When the air is moving along .so that we can feel it, we call it the tvind. Sometimes the wind is so strong that one can scarcely walk A windmill used for pump-ing water to supply a farm,. against it. Sometimes it may blow so hard as to blow down chimneys, and even lift the roofs of houses. Most of us forget all about the air unless it is moving rapidly. But air is of very great value to us. We breathe it. We some-times make it do work for us in wind-mills. It is the air that carries the clouds, and the clouds bring the rain and the",
         "snow. OCCUPATIONS 9 Air may be warm or cold, wet or dry, quiet or moving. When we are telling of these things we are sjiid to be speaking of the tveather. In the summer we sometimes have and they fill the air so full of specks that one cannot see far. Such storms of fine snow often cover railroad tracks so that the strongest engines cann(jt get through. One should also know the winds. One heavy rams, perhaps with thumler and shoul.l learn how to watch the changing lik'htnmir and winrl TIip«o af«,....o .\u003e, l- .1. • , ,. \"\"b\"'K lightning and wind. The.se storms may often give us a great deal of rainfall in a short timp, so that the streets are full of water and the ground is well soaked. Some-times during these stornis some of the water falls as solid pieces of ice, oj' hail stones. These may do great dam-age by way of flat-tening and even threshing the grain, breaking window panes, and destroying garden stuff. Sometimes we have heavy rain storms that are cold. The wind may blow and the water may freeze as it falls, so that the trees and the telegraph and telephone poles, the roads and the sidewalks are coveretl with a thin layer of ice. Snowstorms come in the winter. If the air is calm and it is not too cold, the snow comes down in large feathery flakes, which soon cover the ground, the chimney tops, and fences with a mantle of white. The unpleasant snowstorms are thtise Tree^ weiyhted dowii after a heavy \u003e:,wu-\u003e,tm^ of the wind from point to jjoint of the horizon and to make a note of the kind of weather following the settling of the wind in either the north, west, south, or ciist. Questions. 1. Find out Home useB of tfat^ mOii that have not been mentioned. 2. DescrilK! some caggg 'vhfiie tht' wind hnji dam; (Innnapi. 3. 0|)en a window in a warm room and find out what hapiHjns. 4. Dfiaciibe the weather to-^lay 5. Wliat happens when wet clothes are hung on a line on a windy- day? On a fair day? On a damp day ? Ex- ])lain in each case. 6. Mention all the v.'ays you can by which you can keep warm in the winter season. 7. How can you tell that there is moisture in the air even when it is not raining? 8. Why is it often danger- • ,, ,„„ ous to sit on the ground nW ♦T\"°l°'' ^''\" ^. ^- ^^'''y do farmers like to fc ,7 '{?™y?'^« on the south side of the barn I 10. W l,y do evergreens get bent over in wmter while other trees escape? 11 Describe some haiLstorm you have seen. 12. Draw the shapes of some snowflakes. 13. On what kind Ta #-^ i*° -^'^\" '''** \"^^e snow-men ? Why ' 14. icind out how snow protects plants. 15. What does ''forty below\" mean? 16. What do you mean by \" nmety in the shade \" ? STUDY THCnn/\\dMtTen OCCUPATIONS A long time ago, when nearly every- wUch o„.e when . |, e„M and wind, one'lS or^^J.^™ .\" 'Z^S Than the »„„w p.nt,cles are very .mall, for . family ,„ get their M. »hel?er,",
         "and 10 WOKLD RELATIONS clothin«frc.m their own land. The timl.er f\u003ee nseful t,. U8. Let us note a fe« of was u.sed to build the log house and even the more important of \"he\"e The raising of plants for niater- ials for food, tlothing, or other useful things, we \u003cfdl auriculture. Agriculture is the work of the far-mer. Mo.stofour food is rai.sed on the farm. In all the settled pjirts of Canada cattle are raised for tomaketheroughtables.beds,andchairs. flesh, horses for work tti^pll'ure' The wool was spun and then woven into sheep for wool or mutton hous for mell' c^th at home^ The meat w.s smoked so and chickens, geese, turko'^'lnd Zcks ! ^.'J'.'':''\"^''.^^^?;. ..^\" •!°'\"^ .P^*^\" \"*■ \"\"r f^r ejt^ ^. flesh, or feathers A fda^Uhu) «r,« on a lary. farm on the ,ve.tem praxri,^. Large number, of meti ore oftei^ employed on a ^yle/arm during the ptaiUxug and harvesting seasons. country people still live in this way. As a rule, our bread, butter, tea, coffee, milk, sugar, oatmeal, and a great many other articles of food are brought to us from a shorter or a longer tlistance. At one time the skins were tanned at ho-ne and the heather was then made into shoes for the faniilj by some travelling shoemaker. It was the .same with the clothing. Now our boots and shoes, our cloth-ing, hats and caps and other things, are made on a great scale i n factories All lands are not good wheat lands. One district may be good for raising wheat, another district for oats, and so on. Again, one district may be good for cattle, while another district may be l)etter suited to sheep. The wood foi- our houses and our Keapitu, and hindhu, the grain by machinery on a large ,vestemfarm does the work of five men in one-hajf/ the time. Each reaper There are to-day many kinds of work furniture, for paper-making and for fire- or many occupxt.ons, all of which may wood comes from our forests,",
         "where 0€CrPATl()N8 11 'jUilbering, or tho cutting of trees, is currieil on. I Loyu ready (., hf Hawn/ i„i„ /nmhrr. Thy aiv l.rouij/if to thr mill hy team* tirjtanted down a rivr. htone i.s (luarried from the poiiiid 'Mnufucturiug Manufacturing is seen when wiieat is changed in tho mill to Hour, and when tlour is changed in the house or in the JMikcry to laead. Manu-facturing is also seen in the Jianging of cotton as it is fcauid in tho field to cotton cloth and cotton clothes. The cotton has first to he picked from the cotton plant. It has to he cleane\u003cl, and then s(\u003e|)jirated from the .seeds Next it is packed into great bundles like hay hales, and sent to the factory, when! it is spun into thread, woven into cloth, and it may ho that this cloth is afterward coh)re(| or printed. In the last place it has to he taken hy trains or hy ships to such paits of the world as I Other things, such as ii-on, coal, silver, require it. and gold, are also taken from the groun\u003cl. From agriculture, lumhering, fishin\u003c' and Ihe coal helps to keep us warm in the othergreat occupations we get most (ff the wmter-tnne and to drive our engines, things we need in order to he comfortahle 1-rom iron we make our knives, tools If we have to huv the.se things from other for the farm, nails for building, inachinery people we have to give them son- «Miing in and many other u-seful things. Silver an.l return. Their goods have to he brought V/^M/lal' ''\" \"'\"' '^' \"\"Tl **^ \"\"^ '\"\u003e'• ••\"•■ ^'\"\"''-^ »«iv« t\" \"\u003ee sent to In sonie parts of the world peoj^le get them. This buying, selling, and tmnspor- I their living hy catching fish from the tation of goods we call Quinmfim; I water, or by hunting wild animals for To change one thing for another is not f their skins or their flesh. Before , ,,i*A\"' \u003c;o'\u003e''t\u003ey was .settled by white HuHT/n» 11,. , '' ^ people, hunting was the great occu-pation of the Indians. Xow hunting is important only in those pjiits which cannot be used, or which have ' )t yet been ojjened to our people for farming lands. Few of the things taken from the ground or the forest are ready for u.se when first secured. Many things have to be done to them while they are lieing made into the articles people want. This changing of the rough always easy. Farmers .sometimes carry material into the hnished product is called their butter, eggs, an.l hay or other crops C'nioaditiy ,/o»i« brotuihtfrom n ,piarry, where it no* cut xulu Mocks. J (uvd onftnt can, and ^/njjjjcd to iu",
         "destitMlmi. ^2 WORLD KELATI0N8 neH8 it must be possible to move g(KMls quickly from place to phice. Roads and streets, if they are goo\u003cl, per- n^Jtthis. Horses iiiVd wti^r^.nu may do for short dist^inces, but there must be some other way of moving '.eavier loads more rapidly if business is to be carried on bi , ,voen persons far apiirt. I'eople and goods may be cariied by land or by water. On land we need railrt^dx where steam, gas, (»r electricity may be used. As tliese roads recjuire steel rails for trjicks toa store where they en get su^.r, tea, as carriage ^:ZrZt^^rl cloth, ami shoes m return. Usually, how- carried by ste^u^Uips .;r by ^dli^^Lr ever, ,t,s easier for a per..on having things These a.^ „.sed oTour lar^rS^d to sell to get nioney for them. Mon-^^ is rivers and on the ocean Tran,portatxon by \u003etage\u003coach. In rmmy hilly and numntai- cms r\u003e-yw,i»lh\u003c' Mm,fCHtch ha. to b. used. Xotice th' ridy^ which aid Ihe hor,e» in yetting a firm footing. In some countries the roads are poor, and everything hjis to be carried on hiuae- biick. In .some other coimtries goods and occasionally people hav«! to be carried on eiusily cjirried about and easily changed for the things needed. We have seen that many people are at work helping to make us comfortable. ......„..„.„ peop.e nave to I We have hundreds of .servant ■ working the backs of native carriers, tor us. felnps may now be can i.g some article of food or clothing for us. Trains may also be doing the same thing. No person can very well live alone. People, whether they know us or not, are, all the same, work-ing for us in many different pjirts of the world. Who these people are, lunv and where they live, and what thoy do, is the .story this book i.s going to teli In ( .n ler to carry on busi- '' 'T'ZTw \"\"\" \"\"T\"^ \" \"'\"'^ *y '^'\"\"' '?^«» »\u003e»»",
         "br^'- MA I'M 13 ]\\vlu'ii WT are lemninK uLoiit disUiit ciuntrios hihI j.lai'es. They arc also of use ii: showinjr wlicther wo havo a n^flit or a wron;,' idea of a coiuitrv. Map rcadinj; is iimcli \"tlic saiiii! as otlicr road'iiK. Instead of letters and words, we liave signs wliicii stand for nioiinUiins, valleys, stmuns, cities, towns, t'tc. These signs we niiist know just as well as we know onr letters, should we wish to see the pictures which tin- map attempts to present. To learn how to read a map well is ahnost as valuable as to learn to read a l»ook well. WHAT THB WORLD IS* We sometimes say or a distant country in which we are interested that it is in a certain part of the world. But Ix^fore we can know nmch alwmt the different countries, their p^xlucts, their people, and their occupations, we must know- about th^ world a» a whole, of which the land about oiu- homes forms but a very small jKirt. Miiiern t«^ ,\u003efKkh\u003e,r»\u003e» to carry th»ir mUtil\u003e »,v-r th- rmujh country and Ihroiu/h Ih- r'vr,. QUK8T1...NH. 1. Why an. freight trains usually i\u003cl\u003c)W.'r than paBsenffcr traiiiH ? 2. Why han t}.\".- irmil wagim tJie right of way over other ris« ? 3 Why are ■ eetric rars taking the place of horne f*\"i jo' ; 'y..?*\"® railroadH w.inetinieH double- what do they do? 6. lhf^mi^Ji^\\n puau? 7. Name the railroads near vour hon.e. 8. What have you ever seen at a freight station? 9. What does the poat-niark on the front of a lettermsan? 10. Tell all that hapr)ens to a •f j'J™'\". ^^^ *'\"* •'■\"\" ^'^'nP it until it reaches ita destination. HAPS If we know the \u003clirecti(m and the distiince from each other of a numiier of places or points, we mav make a dmwing showing how these would look if we could get above them far enough to see them all at once. JSuch a plan or drawing is called a itiiip. Maps may show- a small region, such as a school yard f)r a farm. Maps may also show a larger region, such ,08 the whole of our land. Maps help us to study the \u003clistance and direction, or, as we say, the position of many things at the same time, and „ . _ hence are of very great use ^\"\"•*'«« tra,^mu»an GWc. a horse,",
         "cou,,a^d.mk,y 14 World hklations Tlui worl.l is millyu Kruut Uill oit,'|„lw, mitli. Wo tan move our ttngcr uronn.l iiintio up of rock, water and air, uikIciIUmI the onuiKc in any direction and come the Earth. This j^IoIh* in s.) lai^o tlwit Ixick t\u003c. wliert! we Ntarte\u003cl, hut the nearer there \\h room on it for many millionH of our HtJirtiii)? point is to tlie North or people; mo larye that one could not S\u003cnith Pole of the orange, the shorter is fjossihiy visit everj part of it even if he travelled all his life. The globe is indeed HO large that it wouhl take alxjiit sixty days, or two months, to go once around it, and then we would have to go as fast as tlie swiftest trains and the fastest steam boats could take us. If we were to take a large orange and hold it up so that the stem end is at the tf)p, we may think of it as a small glohe the distance around in an east and west direction. Oranges are so small that it is In'tter to have larger Ixills )r gMm to n-present the earth, (tlohes. like maps, may \\w made of different sizes and may show much or litth- of the world, according to their sade. Whenever we u^e the school gh)l)e. wo must rememl)er thut it is but a model of that wdl tel us ^y^^^ the earth ami not something about .x-0.^t\\^ th« «^rtl» it««lf- the much larger ^^llljll^^fe^^::::^ 'V\\ie horizon is globe on which we ^^f^ ^-^^^^,t*\u003e^ the line\"1h^wing live. Let us think ^^^m^if,.u.^^,„\u003e.\u0026^^ 7^ where the earth of t h e n o r t h a s ^^^^Z^ \\ / and the sky appear towanl the stem X::^ -^ l ^ ,^ .^^^t. Should and the south as \u003eKv,^«^4,Msff-^ we look at the hori- tOWarfl the bios- ^ auujmm »hounny ihe dyfereiU /utriz' u which may ,,,„ ;.. ,o,„e„... N„™t. '.\"»/\u003e-^./-.^~. ^ Zo:;:,„:\"jzi ter where we .stjirt from on our orange- may we shall see a circular linft no earth, if we carry our finger north along matter where we may be on the earth's the surfiice of the orange it will reach the surface, whether on the sea, in our own stem end, or most n(\u003erthem point, and land, or in any other land. Were we to this point on the real earth is called ask the people who have come from other the North Pole. In the same way, if countries what the shape of the horizon we go south from any spot we shall is in their native land, we should always reach the most southern spot, or South find the same answer, namely, round. Po/e. The South Pole is exactly half-way Those of the boys and girls who have around the world from the No.th Pole, looked at a landscape from the tf)p of a By remembering what we learned about high building, hill or mountain, will know east and west on a map, and east and that the horizon widens as we ascend. west, north and south, in our own neigh-borhood, we can see which way east and west are on the orange. Let us now t*ike some spot on the orange to stand for our home on the In other words, the tjiUer we are the farther away does our horizon appear. Now. if we could only .see the earth fro.m. siiy, the surface of the moor., we should be able to see how big a l»di it",
         "is. THE EAKTII SI'INh ON JTH AXT8 THE EARTH SPINS OH ITS AXIS T«» evi'iyoim tij,. oHitl, apiM-ars ro In- in\u003c.tionIt'HH. Tliis. Iiowovci. is „nt the oiw.. TIh' cairli keeps tuinin^r c.nstantly fi-\u003c)in west to »'a.st, niakiiiK a tiiiii m a (lay, or, ,w wo miy, rotah-y in twi'iity-four hours. This is hanl to hclx-ve, l.iit'pvat nu-ii who havi' stiKliol t!i»« oaith, have fol.l IIS tliat this is really the ease. Why shoiihl we not feel this motion ? Have you ever n«lilen in a luniher- waj,'on (»ver a very rough road ? liw you think you wouhl know whether the wagon were moving o.- at rest ? Would thejoumey Iwmoi-o pleaHjiiit were the roughneHHes of the road made better and the wagon set aside for a fine car-riage with rublKjr tires on the wheels and the best of springs under the Ikjx? If ho, can you L'o,,- «« ,jet daylujKl. The ylobe re,,r.,.,u, the earth, the lamp the. nun. 15 the west. Will y.ai |,e m: rpri^ed to know that this is n..t the ease ; Stick a hat-pin, or something that may Im- easily seen, in the school gloUv Stand with the ghiln' in the west aisle of the room, and turn the globe very slowly from wt'st to east. To th(* pnpi' .t the seats, the pin wili c()me into view, |\u003ea.Hs over the front tiice of the „dolK'. and disjipjM-ar again at the lower edge. Conld the pin 8|)oak. it would say, \"The class rewe in the cast. imisschI across the sky, and set in the west,\" or just whatwecontiniudly ■sayofthosun, nuMJH and stars, in their movements iicross the sky. If you were to think of your eyes as the sun, the glolie »is the earth, and the pin as a fx'rson \u003cm the earth, you cjin easily understaml the meaning of day, morning, forenoon, understand why no jolting .should t,ike noon, afternoon, sunset ni^ini^hrTn\";; place m the case of the earth ? What uurht Vr. i 1 7 \"\"\"\"'^''t- 'i\"*' the earth tun, », evenly that no jolting see whv .e Iv ,h., ,? \"\"\" \"\"\"' « take plaee \u003e What a'w e J thi^ .:, l. 71 ^ItTZTLr^^ XT I 1 , ^^^ \"^^'' not be a sitrn that fho ann ?o No doubt you liave thought all along moving ^ at the sun is that the sun rose in the east and set in The earth gets mo.st . light and",
         "its 16 WOKI.D RELATIONS liGHt fh)iii the Mun. but the huh oin whine (in hut half «)f the mrth at ;i tune. .See that this iN ho l»y miun t'lt\" kIoIh'. The half that i** in the Hunlijjht in M4tiil to have (lay, while the half in the xhade has niyht. Ah the earth turns you will tin.! that (.nc e\u003cl^'e in constanJly iJiissinK fnan Hunnhine the Hjune time. Again, that it HneM neaivr and nearer the nouth. and netn ncait'r and nearer the mnth an the winter Ih apjmwichinK. The mm d(Hw nuuv. hciwever: the nun at n(K)n Hhch higher and higher in the sKy as the Hum-mer Ih coming on. and fallH |\u003c»wer and . . , , ,. ,• , \" \" \"\" ■ ■\" i\"i\"iiiK \"11. nufi laiiH lower and mto darkness w nie the o,„K.site cnlge is lower as the winter is appn^icl-ing Thi^ imssmg from darkness into light. Which n.ovement (.f the su a nign That the o tlH\u003ese edges ,H the sunset, or evening earth has another mo. „ iJcles that of edge, and which the morning. (,r sunrisi' spiuninif edge ? You also know that night docM not come on just when the gun drops l\u003eehind the western horizon. There in a short time i)etween sunset and night that we oali the twilight, and a .short tine between night and sunrise that we call the daiiH. The cause of these you may easily enough discover if you are a little thoughtful. But the eaith gets its heat as well as its light from the sun. Everybody knows that the ni^ it is cooler than the day; that the day iHJCcjmes hotter and hotter as the sun mounts the sky; and that it is hotter to be in the sun than in the shade. MU „/ Heat and Cold. THE EARTH icEVOLVES ABOUT THE SUN The ends of the earth are called the p leu. The North Pole is the point aliiio.st directly un-der the North Star; the .South Pole is the opposite end, or the end under a cluster of stars called the Southern Cross. The line passing t!)rough the earth and joining the North and S«»uth Pole- or ends o*' the earth, is billed the e...th's A.riH. During the year the earth makes a ,'reat journey around the sun. in the course of which we have the seiisons, spring, .summer, autumn, and winter. ir. /^.,.. * 1 p u . ' ''' \"\"\"\"\"^'\u003e autuiiiii, juiu winter. In oui study of home geography we This motion of the earth is called its learned that the sun seldom rises and revolution sets in the true east and west, that it Few of the discoveries ever made by rises nearer and yet nearer the nortii as man have gone more .vgainst early h. uan the summer season is coming on, and beliefs than that the earth turns n.. its sets nearer and nearer the north during axis once a day. and that it moves",
         "around t'LIMATE 11 tho Hun oncf a year ; for luithiiiK i'* mm\u003e natumi than (•\u003e Hup|H,M«. flmt f|„. soli.l earth Htan.lH still, ati.l that th,. miu. fl... moon, an.l tin- Htais num- acioMK th.' skv. If the axi« of iho ,.»,.,|, „.,.n. |,.|i);tlirii.'.l »H.th wavH. the south (mkI wouM p, thrtnmU th.' S.,iith..|ii (•r.,M.s. „n.! tl... n.\u003erth cml tln-oii«h or vrrv n.-ar t la- North Star. lloM th.. kIoIh'' ho that its axiH iK.iiitH t.) th.' North Star : turn it H.. that it will rotate from wt'st t.» east Cam- it aroun.l the room ho that its iiiution aiNMit the sun mav U- shown Think of a line now that p«.H «r.,un.| the wirth nji.lway between the |M.leH. This is alH.) an imaginary line, but a conv.'nient one, for were the earth .livi.liMl at thin hne, we HhouM have a n..rthern liemi Hph.'re an.l a soufh.'rn hemisplu-r.. an.l something is L'aine.| wh.'n we can H;,y of ac.untry or a place, \"It is in the n.athern henusphere, or it is in the s(,uth.'rn h.-nii- .sphere.\" The line mi.lwav lutween the poles is «illo.| the er/mfor.^ I'l.ui-s north of this line are said to Ik' in th.\" northern hemisphere or have a north latitii.l,., while all other places are said to l„. in the south.in h.'mispheie or f. have a south latitu.le. Every l).\u003ey an.l ^irl living in the north»rn hemisphere kn..ws that the coM win.ls come from the \u003clirecti.)n of ihe Xoith Pole. VVe-e w.- living in th.- southern heniLspheie, we should .say that th.; col.l win.ls came fr.,m the direction of the South Pole. For a great many years the regions alHjut the poles have been an attraction to the explorer. Lieutenant Shackleton an Englishman, cjiine within 1 1 1 miles .)f the South Pole, and CapUiin Peary, an Ame.ican. actually stood on the North IT Pole. K..th explorers \u003cigr.H« in .leseribing thes,. givat aivas as .vgions .,f i,,. an.l «M..w To thes.- the nanu's \\,„'t.\u003e, CM \u003c.\u003ctp an.l S\u003c\u003e„iU v,^,i c„f, |„„.,. 1^.,.,, j,jv(,n. riiat th,.re is a i.-gioi, .,f gr,.at heat towan! th.' south is iva.lih iK'liev...! when ».' e..ni.. t.. think why i,i,,|s an.l even IH'ople g., in that .lir,.cti..n at the ap |m.a\u003ch .\u003ef c.l.l wearher. Th.- //„/ H^i, »H this r.'gion is ,all,..|. fo,n,s a gr.'at' br.w.1 iMuid alK.iit the ..arth at the e.|uat.)r. Hetw.-en the Hot Belt an.l the South \u003c\u003c\u003ed Cap is the South Tnn/m-ate Hell and betwe.n the Hot |{,.|t an.l the Wtl. ('..1.1 Cap is theA^»,.M T.mpemte III th.' TemjM'iiite iJelts we ha v.- .spring Hmnmei, autumn, an.l winter, wherea.s, \\n th.' Col.l Caps „,. hav\" an uernal wint.'r an.l in tl... Hot lVlt:u.unen.ling .summer In which belt sh.n.ld y.ai like t.. live and why i CLIMATE If heat, and we mav .Js.. s^iy, r infall \u003clecrea.se as «,. go „o,.t|, ai.,| sou ;. fr.„n tlic e.|nat.)r. n.\u003e wonder that .liHerent |)r.).lucts shoul.l b.. foun.l i-. .iJHerent 'vgmns, for pro,|ucts .•..,,uiiing much h.-at and filMiiidant m.,istiir.' coul.l not I x- |».'et\u003c'.l to f luiv.. where the.se were wanting (Innate, then, h,,s much to .l\u003c. with what »\u003c K'own. an.l by .-liinat,' w,. mean the kin.l of weather a regi.,n has .luring a jM-riod of years We know, for instance, that in our own home region, the h(.at ..f the summer an.l the ol.l of the winter never jro beyon.l certain boumls. There are, as a rule, a certain niim»«.r of oloudv days an.; the rainfall is nearly the .s^nie iii amount year after ye^ir. In the",
         ".same 18 WORLD RELATIONS way tiio wind blows from the wost more than from the east, and tliere is iworc fjood than l»ad weather on tlie wljole. liy putting all liiese tilings together, we can descrihe the climate of our home region. The most important feature of climate and of weather, the feature we speak of most, is tem/wnitiire, that is. the degi'ee of heat or of cold. If it is too cold for comfort, we ti-y to warm our hou.ses ; if it is too hot, we .shut out the sun's heat and do everything we can to keep cool. We have seen from this brief glimpse at the belts of heat, that the climate grows colder, as a rule, as one passes north or south from the e(juator toward the Cold Caps. It is possible, however, to get the .same changes in climate by going up a high mountain in any part of the world. The upper air is colder than the lower air. This has been proved by expei-ience time and again. .Snow lies all summer on the tops of high mountains. Men have gone up in balloons and have nearly perished with the cold, even in the sunnner time. Mountain climbers alv-ays take extra wraps with them. This i I fa t the boys and girls should keep in ound i 1 their future study of geography. THE AIR Finally, we must not think of our earth a.s being made up of land and water, and nothing else. Our earth is enveloped in a great mantle of air many miles in thick ness. The highest mountain top is not high enough to reach beyond this air, and no balloon can rise so high that it should leave the air. Air carries the clouds which bear moi.sture for the earth. Without air we should have no dawn, no twilight, no beautiful sunset; without' air, the earth, wonderful as it i.s, would be without the faintest .sign of life. (ii-KSTioNs. 1. What is th.\" different! between the mrt/ia 11(1 the K-orW? 2. Make ii picture of the earth nurroinulfd l.y tlif sliv and tii.' lit-avfiily \\wi\\w in the .-ky. 3. Make a drawin;; showing tiie heat helts. 4. Describe a jouriiev from the equator to the north pole; from tlie\" e(|iiator to the .south poh'. 5 Why should vou sav a eold (■'It rather than a cold heW! (i.\" Descrihe the position of the axis of the fil,,),,.. 7. How much of the earth's surface is un\u003cier the sun at a lime? S. Show on the globe the line separating suidight from darkness. 9. Point out the eastern and west\u003c!rn horizons on the glolie. 10. What is meant by the scale of a map? 11. What way does your shadow ))oint at noon? At sun.set? In the morning? 12. Name the movements of the earth, and state what is the result of each. 13. How does a map differ from a globe? 14. What do up and (hm-n mean? 1.'). What keei)s us from falling off the earth ? THE CONTINENTS AND OCEANS On a fair-sized school globe we may see how the great land and water mas.ses are arranged over the world. The best globe f(»r this pjupo.se is one which has the sea one 'olor and the land another color. Hold the globe so that the eyes may be directly over the North Pole. What does the edge of this circle repre-sent? What hemisphere is shown ? Where is the North Pole situated ? What porticm of this hemisphere is land ? Is the land all connected ? What may be said in this respect of the water ? May we say that the land it/ the northern hemisphere is fnassid ahoiit the North Pole ? Now turn the school globe so that the eyes are directly oA-er the South Pole. The ditigram is that tm page 19. Which hemisphere is this? Where is the South Pole in the diagram ? What may be said of the land ? What portion of the whole earth-surface is water ? What portion is land ? It",
         "has THE rONTINENTS AND OCEANS Th* Xorth^H ll.mU\u003eph^., whu^h contains the .jreate,- part o/ th\" land of the m,rld. been said tlmt water covers niucl. more timii thi-ee-fourtli.s of the world. Turn the school glolm so as to get tlie view sliown ii, 19 of islands, peninsulas, bays, etc. ? The northern continent is oilr own North America, the southern continent is willed South America, an.l l.oth together are talle.l the New World. Find out from your teacher why tlu« name •'S^y,' World- was given. L..ok at the upper figure on page 20 I iHce your .school gl„i„. so that the .same view may 1„. seen. Here al.so are two •lumens,, continents connected l)v an 'sthmus. To the south-east is a .smaller c-ontment conu.rted with the larger of the twocontments j„st mentioned hv a .rroun «'* .sland.s. The largest continent's kTiown as Kura.s.a, the smallest is called Australia wh.le the third is calh.l Africa. Kurasi; \u003es so large that we shall afterward havto 'livi.le It mto a western part, Ku,o,,e. and an eastern part. Asia. Like No/'th Vmeiica. Eurasia possesses a very irre-rular ni».n^o.,,age.a^;r™ir;:;;; z::^^:^^::::rTr^- great blocks \u003c,f land, or .umUtent., con- like S,,u th^\\m t^^^ \"fJ'^'H.an.l, ,s nected by a narrow neck or isf,nnt.. Fin.l s,.uth hen XI \" ^'\"' out if one of these continents is entirelv '^'\"'\"^^PJ'ere you w,ll .see that all in the north..rn hemisphere. How nuich of the other continent is also in the same liemisphere ? Is the southern con- tment directly south of the northern con-tinent ? What .lirection is it ? Compare the two continents and note that thev are both wi.lest at the north and also that they tiiper to a point at the south Notice also that the sea has entered the northern continent in two regions, one at the north and the other at the south-east To what extent has the sea entered the southern continent ? Which has the more irregular coast, the northern or the southern continent? Which continent is . . „„„^^ likely to have the greater number of .rood harbors ? Which the greater number '''' ''\"\"'\"*\"' ''\"-i^pf-;^, r.kicH u laryeiy",
         "eon^posed 20 WORLD RELATIONS The Western ffemisphere, which contains North and Huuth America. Australia, a .small portion of southern Africa, and a i)art of .South America arc to be seen. You will also notice that all these point directly to the South Tole. It would thus seem that the gi-eat land mass suiroundinji the North Pole ends toward the South I'olc in thit'e great {joints or tongues \u003cjf land. It would also appear that the great water mass centres about the South Pole and extends northward in three great stretches. One of these is called the Atlantic Ocean. You will observe tliat this ocean separates the Americas, ui' New \\Vorld, from Africa and Eurasia, the 01\u003c1 World. Notice, too. that the eastern part of South America would tit into the great bend on the western coast of Africa were the Old and the New Worlds moved so as to touch one another. Again, the western extension of Africa would fit into the curve between the Americas. The At-lantic is the ocean petjple had to cross on their way to North and to JSouth America. The northern portion is often spoken of as the North Atlantic, and the .southern part as the South Atlantic. The second great northern stretch of water is called the Pacific Ocean, so named from its peaceful behaviour dur-ing the voyage across it of itw di.scoverei', Magellan. What a great ocean the Pacific is ! It ct)vers half the surface of the world. Notice its shape, and name the continents around its borders. The third great ocean is called the Indian, which lies enclosed by Australia, Africa and Eurasia. This ocean stretches but a short distance n!\u003erth of the e(]uator. It would appear from oiu- study of the land and water masses so far, that the greater portion of the land lies in the northern hemisj)here, and that the south-ern heniisplieie is largely a water hemi-sphere. It would also seem that the land extends a little south of the equator in thrie great points, and that the water ex-tends northward in three great stretches. The Kasttrn 11 ■:m inphere. It contains Euraisia. Africa, and",
         "Australia. THE CONTINENTS AND OCEANS The Atlantic Ocean. It would furt' more seem tliat tlio eastern side of the A jricas w'tml\u003cl fit the western side of the Old World,and that the ncjrthern continents have irregular outlines, whereas the southern continents have a very even coast line. These ol)servati()ns show that the land and water divisions are placed on our earth after sonic well-fonnc\u003e\u003cl plan. There is another thing we must notice. It is this— there is such a balancing, as it were, of the land and water, that no great block of land will be found to be balanced on the opposite side of the earth by a great block of land. If we now examine the surface of each continent, we shall not find the land everywhere level, as it sometimes is on the pra\" iess Starting with the southern point of South America and keeping to the Pacific Ocean coast, we shall find a great, rugged, highland countiy seveial hundred miles wide in •some places, and extending all the way to the isthmus connecting North and South America. This region bears the The Pacific Ocean. name (jf the Andes. In North America a sumlai- ridgc, known as the Rockies, extends from the isthnnis to the peninsula at the north-west of the continent. In Eurasia, another great series of highlands extends from the north-east to the .south-west. Highlands of a similar character pass along eastern Africa and eastern Australia. One result of t!..rse great highland regions, so near th- c(«irt, is to divide the land surface of each con-tinent usually into two great slopes, a shoi-t steep sIo{), toward the nearer ocean, and a long gradual slope toward the more distant ocean. Q\u003c-E.«Tioxs 1. What is a continent? An n^nn ; TK^^^^i'i*^\" ^''^'^I'\" \"^ t\"^' 'Atlantic Ocean ? The Pacific? 3. What continents are separated by the Atlantic? By the Pacitic? 4. What continents have coa.st lines on the Indian Ocean? .5. Wliich is likelv to be the more useful land, a land iiaving an\" ev.n coast- I'rK' 9°'\",^'\\l\"?'^ ,^\"y'\"*^ •■'\" \"\"'■^•™ \u003c\u003c\u003ea.«t-line? \\\\hy( (,. Make the be.stoutlincvou can of South Amenca. Africa, and Australia on the blackboard. /. How far 18 the nearest point in South Anicrua from the nearest point in Africa? 8. How wide is the Pacific Ocean",
         "? 22 WORLD RELATIONS NORTH AMERICA At the north we shall notice a great T\\- ,x gnmp of islaiuLs. Thesse are larireh* ice- Takmg he continents one by one we boun.l. but they help to fill i^ ^ t shall h„,l by lookn,, at this .liagram. or were, the broad nort' em clt \u003c,/ our own continent. To the sea surrounding the North Pole the name Aictic Ocean has been given, as a convenience in nam- iiig this l»ody of water. The great .sea-arm at thent.rth-east is Hud-son ]\\n\\, a ))ody of water that may be very u.seful som(\u003e day to the Canadian prairie country lying a few hundred miles to the south-west of it. The sonthern end of Hudson IJuy is James Jiay, and the Strait leadmg to the Atlantic is called Hudson Strait. At the -south-east of the continent i.s another great sea-arm, the Gulf of Mexico. At the entrance of the (xulf are the |)eninsu- iis of Florida and of Vucatiui, which help to give the gulf shore the appearance of a great letter (i. The bay at the north and ^orth Ami^ca. ft^. an.^made by the teacher on the thegulfat the south X'u.;A;t;;:;c Anjca ,s nH\u003ech more uneven than goo,l thing when von rememhr how ue- v^ould appear from the school glolH\u003e. ful the sea is for ihe carriage of goods",
         "-^1 NORTH AAIEKICA Montreal from Mount Royal. Tljt\" Atlfintif also enters the eastern coast a ]; \\e s.mth of the ell.ow of Lahrador, a \u003crreat peninsula Ivin- l,e- tween Hudson Hay an\u003cl the ocean. This ope.nng, ealle.l the (Jnlf nf St. J.awrenee IS j,'uar(le\u003cl on the north l.v the I.^land of Newfonndhmd, while the .sonthei-n side is formed hy the peninsula of X„va Se.,tia ^ and the I.sland of Cape Jireton. 1 Emptying into the (Julf I.y .-, v,\u003eiv wide mouth is \u003che yreat St. Law-rence Hiver, which diain.s Lakes Superior, Huron, Michi-gan, Erie, and Ontario, five of the greatest fresh water bodies in the world. The St. Law-rence is Canada's chief .sea outlet. Ships from the ocean can .steam a thou.suid miles up the river, and lake hoats can go we.stward another thou.sand miles. It was the St. Law-rence that eiiai)led Caitier, f'hamplain, La Salle and other early exploi-ers to push .so far and so easily into the heait of our continent. It was u{) the 23 St. Lawrence that General Wolfe came to hght the battle that gave Canada to the British. Ask your teacher t.. tell you of the.se men. To the .south-east are the West Indian i^l.-m.i.s. Kin.l three of the larg..st. Con-necting the two Americas is the Isthnuis of I'anama. across which the Americans are l.uildiiiga ship canal, which thev hope to have completed iiy 1{»14. At the north western corner of North America is the iVninsula of Ala.ska Between Alaska and Asia is Bering fcjtrait, a channel about fortv miles in width. ■ The western, or J^icific coast, takes the form of a .louble curve, the northern piiit of which is full „f fi„e |,,ys and good harbor.s. About the centre is Van- c.uver Island, in the neighborhood of which are fine .salmon fisheries. To the south-west is the long, narrow peninsula of Lower California, and in the valley I'etween this p\u003c.nin.sula juid the coast is the Gulf of California. ronfif, . jtud Library at",
         "WaahingUm. 24 VVOHLD RELATIONS lo sum up. Alaska an.l Ul.rador; tinent l.as a climate ranging fn.m an Hudson Hay an.l tl.o (Julf of Mexico ; eternal winter t\u003c. an en.lless summer Vancouver an\u003cl Newfoundland ; Lower In such a cli.nate we are ahie to grow Cahtonna and Honda, all l«ilance each all the fruits, grains, an.l roots known to * q!!'' ■ „. , , , . \"'\"\"• ^^'^ '\"'c »'-^\u003c\u003e »l»ie to rear cattle, 1 he mam H.ghlan.ls of North America horses, and sheep in great numbers areu. the western portion of the continent. What do you now know of the animals NotK-e their width an.l their name. Notice an.l plants of your own continent ' also their .hrection from Bering Strait to The chief countries of North America tlie sthmus of Panama. The eastern aiv ; Cana.la, capital Ottawa : the l^nite.1 Highlamls are calie.l the Api«dachians. States.capitaiWa.shingt..n:Mexico,capiUd 1 hese commence a short .listance north of Mexico: an.l Central America. Alaska is tne Irult of Mexico and run in a north-easterly .lirection towanl the .St. Law-rence River. A third highland coun-try much lower and much more worn than those men-tioned, forms a horse-shoe about Hudson Bay. Between the ea.st- ern and the Hvist- ern highlands is a great plain or lowlan.l stretching all the way from the Arctic Ocean to the (iulf of Mexico. This plain is divided into two slopes by a divide running west of Lake Superior. In the A xlmvt shovel al ivork in Cnlebra Cut. J'luuima Canal. a part of the I'nite.l States. Canada an.l the Ishind of New- foun.llan.l are called British North Am-erica. Central America is made up of several small countnes seldtim at peace with each other. To the north-east is Greenhind, a region over which an enoraicais ice- Whv should it be called sheet is spread Greenland ? Canada, our own hm.l. lies between the Atlantic an.l Pacific and between the Arctic Ocean and the United Stiites. southern plain is the Mississippi River In the earlv .lavs Cana.la was both a emptying into the (Julf of Mexico. In great fur lan.l an.l a great lumbering the northern plain are the Mackenzie region. Thou.san.ls an.l tiiousan.ls of flowing north-west into the Airtic, an.l beaver an.l ..tlier skins were c.llected tlie Saskatchewan-Nelson flowing a little yearly an.l sent acn.ss the sea t.. Eun.pe towanl the north-east into Hu.ls.jn Bay. Ship-ba.l after ship-loa.l of the finest Ihe latter river .Irains the regh.n now timber went in the .same .lirection spoken of as the Cana.han prairie cmntry. Now much of the timber is gone Imt As the northern part of North America the lan.l is bearing fine crops of wheat lies m the North Col.l Cap, an.l tho oats, barley, fruit, roots, cattle, an, 1 horses! southern pirt in the Hot Belt, our con- The Canadian West, or Cana.la west",
         "of NOKTll AMEUICA the lakes, i« filling up fast, and tin- ikl, Hoil of the pmirieH is growing niilli\u003c.ns of Imshclsof wht-at with which to feed tlic hmigrv wofhl. Cua! to wain, our homes and to (Ifive our engines is found in great abundance to the east an\u003cl t.. the west, and gold and silver among th(\u003e more mountainous jwrts of the country. The Canadian pi'ovinces lieginniug at the east are: Nova Sc.,tia. capital Halifax; I'rince Kdward Island, capital Charlotte- town: Xew iJrunswiek, capi-tal Fredericton : Quehcc with a capital of the same name : Ontario, ca[)ital Toronto : Manitoba, capital Winnipeg ; Saskatchewan, capital Hegina: Alherta. oaj)ital Kdnionton : and British Columltia. capi-tal Victoria. 25 and for c-onvenience. it, is considered a separate continent. Though scarcely half the size of .air own continent. KurojM! surpa.s.ses North America in popuhition. wealth and almost evervthingel.se. Kuro|M! is the native home of tlie pe«»ple who have eome to ( ani.da to live. If y„u examine the map you will see .such names as Kng- land. Scotland. Ireland. Wales, France, (lermany, Ilollaml, Spain. Portugal, Kiis- sia, Switzerland, and other Euroj)ean conn ^yifstmitDiti^ QiEsTio.Ns. 1. Make an outline map of North Ainerici from mem-ory. On it print neutlv the liigh- land.i, h.avs. gulfs, strai't.s, iwlamlH, oceans, and i)enin.sula8 mentione\u003cl.' 2. Mark in tho St. Lawrence and the (ireat I^akes, the Mississippi. .Mac-kenzie and Saskatchewaii-.Nelson. 3. The countries and their capitals. 4. The positions of the Canadian provinces and their capitals. 5. Find out on the school map of Canada what and where Montreal. Fundv Bell° Isle, St. John's, Fra.ser, Vancouver Citv, Klondvke. and Red are. 6. What imn-inces are to the fiii- \"east and the far west ? What province is in the centre ? \\V hat province is divided hy the St. Lawrence Kiver ; ,. \\\\ hat are the situations ot Xew Bruns-wick. Alberta, Ontario, and Saskatchewan ? 8 On a map of .Vorth America point out Xew York the Mississippi, Alaska, Yucatan, Bering Strait and taiha. !). Into what hodies of water do the rivers of Xorth America empty ? EUROPE The western peninsular portion of the great land mass Eurasia, is csilled Europe. Because of its impoitance in the world Abbey, U,^,. Th. »u,st widely hioun, church in the Jirituh Empire. tries which you must have heard mentioned many a time. Xext to (au- own land, Europe should lie of very great interest to Canadians. Tlu; coast line of Europe, you will observe, is very irregular. With the ex-ception of some parts of Itussia, all points in Europe are close to the sea, a conditi(»u which, no doubt, has helped to develop the h.ve of Europeans for the .sea and for a life on the sea. Beginning at the north and following the coast, notice the White Sea, the",
         "Baltic, 26 WORLD RELATIONS Europe. the Xnith Sea, Hisciiy ]iay, (Jihniltar Strait, the Mediterranean, the Black, and the Caspian .sea.s. Following the siune route, notice the peninsula at the north-west of the continent. It is called Scan-dinavia, and is the home land of the people we call Noi-wegians and Swedes. Look at the shape of this peninsula. Does it not look like an animal aljout to s[)rin-r ,,ii western Europe ? Now look at the peninsula of Denmark, the hon»e of the Dane. It points directly nf)rth and separates the Baltic fiom the North Sea. The s(juare-shaped peninsula at the south-west is called the Iberian peninsula. It is the home of the Portuguese and the ' Spaniards. Extending into the Mediter-ranean is the boot-shaped peninsula of Italy. In Italy you will see the po.sition of Rome, a city visited yearly by thousands of tourists. The small peninsula which spreads out like the fingers of the hand is the peninsula of (Jreece. The city marked is Athens, once the most famous city in the world. In the Atlantic Ocean you will take note of the mo; t wonderful islands in the world. The.se are the British Islands, comprising (ireat Britain, Ireland, and hundreds of smaller islands. In Great Britain are Scotland, England, and Wales. The city marked at the south is London",
         "; SOUTH A.MERICA 27 that lit the north is (lliisfjow. while thf • ••If in the centre is Liverpool, all plaeert you have often heanl of. Uhile the varions nations on the nianj- iiin.i of Kurope were warring with i-aeh other f(.r a niasterv of the lan.l. the P«'«.|)h'of (ireat Mritain and Fnlan.l. our Mother (•(.•Mitrv. were safe I.ehin.l the •• Wooden walls of Kn),'Iand.\" and free to develop the arts of p,.a,e. No wonder th.it the Mother land I.ecanie so sueeess- fnl in addiii},' countries Ih-voikI the seas. No wonder that the (Jreater iJritaiti. the British posse.s.sions all over the woHd, have hecoine so jrreat that the sun never sets on Ihitish lands. The Hij^hlands of Kurope spread well alonj,' the .south and are most ruj,'\u003c;ed in the rejjion (.f .Switzerland, where they are called the Alps. It is t.. Switzerland that many travellers from North Amei-ica and from Hriiain j^o to spen.l the hot summer months. The important rivers of Europe are the Volga, the I)amil)e and the Khine. The Volga, the longest livei- in Europe, flows into the Caspian Sea. a large inland l»ody of .salt water. The Danni.e an\u003cl the Ifhin'e ri.se in the Alp.s, The Jfhine empties into TAe/amouM Rheintitein CwtUi-, im the Rhine. the North Sea after flowing l.y many fine cities, vineyards and ancient castle.s.' The Danube empties into the Jilack Sea. Calais, the French port nearest England. ( rK.Tio.Ns. 1. What .-u,.! uluT,. are the Alps, t ;.. a,.p,nn, an. the V„lpr.\u003e 2. Fin.l .,ut li.e na,„eR n th,- nty nmrk,.,l at \\hv s,.utl.-«,...t ,.,,,1 of the Hluok .s,.a. ... \\\\ hat Wty is ,nark,..l in ( i.-rnian v, m Franc- an.l in Rus,.ia ? 4. Mak.- an ..ntlin,. o Lur-.pe on tl.,- LlackLoard fn.ni ni.'.norv .^ Ph.-,- on th.8 the following- (iernmnv. Italv\". [),,„„ark Greece .-in.I 1 „rk,.y ; the HIaek, IJahio. North' lUKl M.'diterran.an S..,i.« ; the Voijfa, Rliine a.ui Danube; the British I.sles ; an.l fiv,. large citi.s SOUTH AMERICA Looking now at South America, we shall find the .same triangtilar .siiaj.e noticed in our study of Xo.-th America. Both continents are broadest at the north, and both t^iper toward the",
         "south 28 WOKLD HELATION8 Smith America thi« OMt are ti) be f«»un\u003cl tlu' Hiuzilnut tree uiid the rubber tri'e, lM)th of whitli nrv valuable enough to «ive eniployi;ient to tliouManil.s of people. The country alMnit th(( Ln Plata and the lower I'ai.tiia i.s 'luieh the Hjiiiie asour ( an- adian prairie.s. In this rtpoii you will find jrreat cattle, .sheep, and hor.so ranches, and p-eat fie Id. s of wheat. Buenos Aires (good lireezes) is the pnn- cipjil city. Ott' one of the is- land.s at the .south is Cape Horn. Off the eastern elb«)W is ('a[M' St. Koque. Cape Horn is a rwky promontory annmd which .siiiling vessels must pass in going from the Atlantic to the Pacific or the reverse;. B( tween the The coast-lme of South America, is very Island of Tierra del Fuego (Und of Fire) even, but an openmg in the m)rth-east and the mainland is the Strait of Magellan coast shows the wi.le mouth of the The An.lean Highlan.ls, or An.les as Amazon, the grnatest river in the worl.l. they .ire most often named, are toward Another ..pening i.s .,n the .s.,uth-ea\u003et the Pacific coast. They form a great coast where you will (ind the La Plata wall of rock from two to four miles high or Plate River, uito which flows the ami at least five thousand miles Ion- Kiver Pa-an.... The Amazon valley i.s In the Andes are some of the worhfs largely covere\u003cl by forest growth. In greatest",
         "volcanoes. ASIA Airia wtof S.utl, Anurioa? .\"i. What woul! voute ASIA Asm A stiul.v of tho coast line of Asiu sliows us an irrc^Milar coast. Tlic se-i liou-cvcr. .Iocs not extend. ..xccpi i„ .,' few cases, far into the land. This ,neans Asia is the reniaining portion of the nin. tir'T \"'^\"'\"\"\"^ '\" -^^\"'^ ^''' «\"«\u003e' gmit land n,ass of EnLU L? ill t '\"\"\"'\"'\" ''*' ^''^' ^''\"- ^^ also bi..k of land in the t::;.^'' ^t \"IT .^^It '\"'\"'\"\"^ •\"■ ^^^^'^ \"^ \"'^^'^ ..f Europe. It i.s ,,^^,rnt..lZ^^Z '^ fZ \"'- \"\"'^\"' '^•^\"'' '^ \"'\".^ '- America hy Hering sLit and fnL^W I 1 tc co:f^t 'of 7\" '\" T^^^\"' \"^ -.a .y a .Hd,e of is, .d. .^. East a^rSSnd;::;^:^",
         "^nd^^::^? IK) WORLD KKLATIONM the JH(Nin iMlaiDiM un\u003cl th(\u003e British Isjaniis wTiii til luiliiiift' jNU'h otluT. Sniitlii'in Asia, (II- Asia nn the liuliaii Ocoaii, ami sdiithi'i'ii Kiiiii[)(', III- Kiiro|K\u003e III! jjic MiMJi- tciTaiicaii Si'a. have also features in eoiii- itiiiii, iiaiiH'ly. Aniliia and the IlM\u003eriaii |M\u003eninsiilji : India and Italy: the Malay IH'ninsula and (treece: the luist Indies and the islands \u003c il' southeastern Knni|M', At the north of each cuntinen is the Aretif Uci-fm. \\ •jj^/^' V'*-''t ^ The harbor of Calcutta. The foreign ntfamers are beiruj loaded from rmall native boatt. The peninsula of India sepiirates the Araliian Sea to the west fnun the Bay of liengal on the east. Arabia is sejmrated from Africa by the Ked Sea and from IVrsia by the Persian (lulf, an arm of the Arabian Sea. .Fa|»in is sepjirated from the mainland by the .fapan Sea, while the China Sea lies Ixitween Houth-eastern Asia anri the Kji.st Indies. All the peninsulas of Asia, with the exce{)tion of the one on the far we.st, between the Mefliterranean an\u003cl Black seas, point \u003clue south. Find out the name of this ••xeepti«»n and c(in)|Mire the Kuro|R\u003ean |N\u003eninsulas with those of Asia to see whether the .south dil^•ction is a connnon thin^'. The hi);hlands t»f Asia are of immense area. Spreadinj; out toward the west thev narrow between the Caspian Sea and the .\\raliian Sea and then spread out agjiin toward the ea.Ht. A branch from the .Vsiatie hi),'hlands yoes .south by way of the Malay peninsula. aero.ss the islands tc» i eastern .Australia. The northern ccamtry of Silwria, or Itussia in Asia, is a ^reat lowhmd. Where are other lowlands i. The Himalayas north of India are the hi^'hest and most ruji^jed mountains in .\\sia. Several large rivers may lie .seen emptying into the Arctic Ocean. The Iloang Ho and Yangt.se- Kiang are two large rivers emptying into the Pacific from China. The river marked in In\u003clia is the (ranges, the sacred river of this country. The countries of importance to us at this time are Sil)eria on the north, China and Japan on the east, India, belonging to Hritiun, on the .south, Arabia on the south-west, and Persia. The Holy Land is situated along the eastern end of the Mediterranean. The cities to be remem-bered are JeriLsalem in the Holy L»ind, Mecca in Arabia, Bombay, Madras,",
         "and CaJcutta ill India, Peking.' in ( hina, and Tokiii in .hiptm. Suiitlii'in Asia touclics tlu- iM|iiator. N'tirflHTii Asia lies in tlir Xuirli ('(,i,i Cap Till- j,'icat mass nf Asia lies ill thrXuitli 'I'l'llllM-IJlfl' licit. As tlif j.'irat(st rainfall i« in tlif sdiirli cast, iuilli(ins(ir|H'()|i|,.ait\u003e *\u003cHin(l in this f»arf of the c-\u003c lilt incut. (ilK.xTlu.Ns. I. What do the CliiiK.*,. ,v,,rjj „, •; 2. Why HhiiiiM Vdii fx- I'f\u003c't lMinis(att«r.\"(l|..,|,u- lutioii in norlhiTii ami in intfrior Axiji ? 3. jirjnv thr pattern coiiHt of Acia and locate the coant watiTH. islaiKlH aii.l |,t.n- insulaK 4. Do the hiiih' witli 111,, w.nth (,,ant. •■i. IxK)k at the outline of AKiaclowlyand make an outline niiip fronj n)ein- ory. 6. On this niaji l\u003elace the highland rcjiioiiH. Name the ncigh- I'orinn continentH and mark in the imjHirtant eouiitrie.x, cities, and rivers. Find Delhi, the new capital of India. AFRICA A/rica westwai.l. thus forming with tho southern . Africa is a {K.a.-shape,l continent with X^i^^ r i''\"\"' \u003e*'l\";i.v-shapc,i curve. it-s greatest width toward the no.th nul v u .\"'\"\"*'■ '^^\"''' '^ -^^^r^ttM etHlin, toward the south n a round 1 ''\"'.'^^•\"\"P^' ''^ ^'\"^ M-literraneai, Sea, point which is inueh nearer ^J^^^ Sc^' rlH ^^'''LI''^-^^'-'^- h' ^1- \"'»•• the southern end of South aSci -tcro s . . L T \"\"' ''^thn.us of Suez, is. ( 'o,»r\u003earinK Africa and South tme S t? T . '\"^ '''' '^\"\"'^ ^•'\"\"'- '^^\"\"\"'^^t« we shall find the ..tine unbroken co-^ lirV\" ■ \"' \"'l \"'' \"•\"'^^-^'^«^- The »- Northern Afrie.howeve.e.S:^",
         "^^7L^-ti:Jt/'Z.^ 32 WORLD RELATIONS fmm the Indian an.l the Atlantic Oceans. British South Africa is the country Be ore t „s canal was h.ult all vessels where the British and the Boers fought ha, to ,loul,le, or pass aro„n.! the Cape so h.n^ f..r the n.astery. Cape Town is of (.00,1 Hope at the south. The only the principal citv important features ofi- the eastern coa.st o.^Mrmv ,1.' . • ., ■ .u. the Rcl Sea. sepamting Asia Iron. ^:£ri^^..i''Yt::£^7Z^::l Africa an.l the large island of Mada-'a.scar f,'\"\" I\"'\"\"\"? f''''^- •^- '» «hich, North Africa or The Highlands „f Africa are higlu-st ^\"fu^Ir'^'IU'^J^HM!^'' !? \"7*^1 ^hy' along the coast of the Indian Ocean. These highlands .seem to comt the wJiole of the .southern penin.sula and spread north rtf the equator into three l\u003eranche.s, a west branch, a centivil bnuich, and a north-eaisterly branch. The African rivers ri.se near the e,,uator „ „ ...,,, ,„ ,„^^,„ where we are told that a heavy rainfall to the north and the north-west, it wouhl 5. What 6. What 4. W here is the Mediterranean Kea ? can you nay of tl)e .\\fri(iin climate? do you know of the .African j)eople ? AUSTRALU Au.stralia is tlii' smallest continent in the worl\u003cl. On account of the many siaiids forming a .sort of broken bridge takes place. A\u003e these rivers fall (|uickly in passing from the highland to the lowland country, long .stretches of rapids and numerous waterfalls and cas- CJides are to be ex-pected. The only rivers marked on the niaj) are the A man dritiAin;/ af i, sjirimj in a lif^rrt. ahxfiif nj ijrngs and tr-'ea. seem that Austra-lia is not entirely separated from the rest of the world. Being one of the southern conti- iitMit.s. Au.stralia resembles Africa anil South America in the even char- actei- of its coast line. Vou will, however, note two the northern, or (iulf of Sol ill- til Nile, which Hows through Egypt, and indentations--.,.. „u,uicrn, or uuir ot t .us changes a de.sert into a garden, and Carpentaria, and the .southern, or (ireat the Congo, which, .second only t,. the .Australian Bight. Off the .south-east Amazon. Hows through deej) woo.ls and angle is the I.slan.l „f Tasmania while across grc-at grusj- plains. Near Cairo away oH' to the south-east are the on the Nile are the j)yramids of Kgypt. l.slands of New Zealand l.nilt long long ago as tombs for the In shape, Australia is like an inverted I-gyptian kings. ,,eart, with the apex toward the north an\u003cl I he northern put ot Africa, with the the broa.l end toward the south Some of exception of the land bonlering the Medi- you will no doubt discover that \\ustmlia terranean Sea coast, forms the great is really a five-sided Hgure I)e,sert of Sahara, across which a con- The equator is far to the north, and siderable trade ,s carried on. the ..outh pole far towaixl the",
         "south. AUSTRALIA Par of Anstrali., tho n„rthon\u003e thinl. lies t'.e Hot Hdt. Tho n.,„uin,l.... li.. i.. tho warmer part of the So.uh Temperate Tl.e h,Vj,,a„,l ,.,„„try lies alon,. the T. -\u003e™ ;'^'-'-^ --e- nnu-h of the ^vst. As m the case of Asia, the rains '\"\".'e fn.,n the south-east, so that the nmjonty of the people are to I\u003ee fonn.l i„ e-isten. an.l so.ith-eastern Australia. The Murny. ,.s the principal river. «v.lney an.l Melbourne are lai^^e and fine citie.s hi,7!iland« inH \u003c.hr\u003e«. t *? 'v '^- ^^^ce in the .^ imtralia. across th.' Indian O.vai, •\u003e \\Vh,t America an,l .V„r,h .A.nerila? \"\" '\"\"'-' ^\"\"''^ THE EARTH. THE HOME OF MAN The earth we have .h..s,.rihe.I is the '\"\u003ei'H( of man. \\il tint M- . • 1 1 fie Ian.! an.l water M,a.sse.s, air, the .sun ^tc, are nnpurtant because thev have tci ''With mans comfort or the\\,ppo.site O the various thin.rs u.entione.l. nothing c innate. \\\\ o know the worl.l has several ^\"..ttes ami therefore must have mlny km. s u homes. In the regions of the ^orth Col.1 Cap where plant ami",
         "animd 34 WORLD RELATIONS life are either wanting entirely or ver\\' rare ; where food and slielter and clothing must l)e diflicult to ol)tain ; where the land is covereil for the greater part of the year by the snow and the ice ; where the night lasts for months— in such a region the home must l)e a different home fnmi ours. Think now of the hot and moist Hot Belt, where animals and plants reach their greatest strength an\u003cl height ; where summer never leaves, and where fruit and flowers are always to he had. In such a region man must find a ditt'crent home from that already described. Think again of the Temperate Belts, where life need not be one long fight for fuod, shelter. and clothing as it is in the north, nor yet one of idleness, as in the wai-m, Hot Belt. The seasons of the Temperate Belt bring variety. The spring-time is the season of planting and sowing. During the long sununer days everything is grow-ing. Autunui is the time of gathering, and winter, with its ice and snow, brings a cheer of its own, and a leisure during which there is plenty of time to improve the mind. Surely a home in such a region must be superior to either of the homes already described. Continents, too, have their own peculiar home features. North Americji must be a better h(mie continent than South",
         "America, HOW PEOPLK LIVE L^ THE COLD XUKTIJ LAND for the greater part of it lies in ,1,,. Ten, Penue Helt. and the sea enters ie ;, '\"\"; ' \"-•^' ^•'•'-\u003ey ^'-an is the case oH I -uthen. co„tn.ent. Europe is also i„ the Te.„pe,ate Helt. Asia stretches farther t'.' l.e n. .-th an.l farther to the south than e.ther Europe or XonhVrneriea; Vsia too ,s very co»,j«ict, so that nu.cl, of it' \u003e« at a great .listance fron. the teniperin. ocean. Afnca an.l Australia lie ,nai„ v ■;; tl'e Hot Belt. The.se continents tn^ .- very regular coast-hnes. Fron. vha 'f 7\" -^^.\"1 ••'-'^'anling the continents we s^.ouldl,e.:.eline,It., place Europe an 1 N orth America in the f. .,e- most place as homes of men. The world i.s mans home, InitasallpartsoftheworM Hre not alike, it will |„. nece.s.s{iiy for „j, t„ „t,„,^. separate Jiome pictui-es .so that we may have some J(lea how jjcoplo live. We ■shall therefoi-e trv to pic-ture home-life in tlie north land, home- 1 e m the forests of the Hot Belt, home- Jfe on the .san.ly deserts, hona-life on tlie grassy phiin.s, home-life in the north-ern woods, home-life on the sea coast Hniong the mountains and on the great ^mnmg h„.ds. To assist yon, we shall ■ue to ask you to u.^e the map shown on file preceding page. 35 HOW PEOPLE LIVE IN THE COLD NORTH LAND Parts of Xorth America, Europe and Asia reacli mto the southern edge of the W Cold Cap. In Northern' Europ ,.nd As,a these frozen regions are call^,! fundra... In Xorth Americi the name l^iven to the greater p^irtof the cold north l\u003ciiid IS the iJari'en Grounds. riiere are l.ut tw(, seasons in the north \"\"• • \"•' '«\u003e\"^' -Ireary winter, and a short '•'•■ght sununer. During the winter the J'ln .s never .seen above the horizon. \"'•■%' the summer the .sun n.oves ...und ;'';•\"\"\"' tl'-sky a. short di.staneeahove •''\";■•'\"\"' \u003c\u003e\"/''« aPP'oaeh of summer, '\"\"Is Howers an.l mo.s,,uitoes are in ainmd- ance. Tlu. surface of the land is hilly here .\"'\u003c1 f^at tliere, and everj-where are to he 'ound nun.erous lakes where wild .lucks and geese may he sei-n in sea.son. -^lany north flowing \"vers cross the eountiv fn .spring the.se rivers ovcr (low an.l over the country foi- miles on eacli si.lj. The rivers al).)un.l in fish, and the neighlioHng Arctic Ocean supplies, in America seal an.l M \"\"*; '\"'^^' '■'\"''• *'\"' \"•'''•\"^- t''« Hfe CJ\"\" ;L\"'\" '\"\"■• Lan.l anin.al , '»^' udes the caribou, the nmsk-ov -•-rums fur-bearers in Ameri^:ii the reindeer in Europe nol^iern'? f \"\"\"^ 'l'^^wl,acks. these noitht.n lands are inhabite.1 by Eskimo Upps an.l other races, the Lapps li ' -H.thern Europe. Fishing an^^^u,:;;;;^ 'i'^ the occupations of the people the '\"en atten,ling to the procuring of Z upphes. an.l the women t.. .seig tlt t 'e.se are not wasted. 8o seri.,us is e struggle for food, .shelter, and do h ng use. The flesh supplie.s for,d, the horns are made into weapons and imp, J^nt f'e skm.s are used for clothin/an.l",
         "fo; m WORLD RELATIONS Imt covers, and other things. As nianuracturers, tht- {joople of the north land als(j make liows and arrows, axes of stone, and knives of hoop- iron. The Esknno is at home on tlie sea in his /v///a/% in tlie handling of which and in the use of the har[)oon he is very exjx'it. THE FORESTS OF THE HOT BELT . As we approach the e(iua- Adog train of ■'huskies\" uH,d in carrijiru, fun from di^lant itiland tor heat and moisture iu- pmiitu a/(jiiij //udxdH liiiif. Thm- doi/x nr-' hnlfivolf , find hav-a rniiarkidil,' power o/endurnwe. CfeUSe, SO tiiat great forestS . , , , . '^''*^'^'' portions of South shelter, and the smews provide the house- America, Africa, and soutli eastern Asia. Iiold thread. Tliese fnvfwtu .n.. .. ..... *• ^ i AiiLst loiests aie a mass of trees and Ihe only animal domesticated by the creepers all struggling for the air and for Eskimo is the huskie. The Eskimo can the hght of tiie sun. .So den.se are the.se mise nothing from the frozen soil, hut woods that no one should enter them mu.st. look to the rivers, the .sea, and the without a compa.ss to guide him hack land for the animal food upon which he again to the clearin\u003c'. subsists. 'J'he Lapps are more fortunate. The forests of the Hot Helt furnish foi- they carry on a sort of reindeer farm- men with certain products. Some trees ing. Thev liave. therefore, the animals iicar a .juice from which India-rul.b.-i' is un.ler control for milk and Hesh when- made : others produce dye woods, rj,.. ever these are wanteil. The food of the Eskimo and Lapp must of necessity be largely tlesh and nuist often l\u003ee eaten raw. Tea and coffee aie used in some cases, and toi)acco .seem.s to be liked by all. To ol)tain these, furs must be given in exchange. Of late these people have been a.sking for guns, knives, and othei hunting weapons. The clothing is obtained from the animals slain in the hunt, or from the leindcer of the hei\u003cl. The women pre- pai-e the skins and make them into boots, -4 road cnl thruuyh banyan trees on th-e haukg of iKa (ranges.",
         "J THE FORESTS OF TiJE HOT BELT A captive elephant. v.-.iuu,len.seal,in.two,„ls..,^..,„ai,„.Hnv ^\"c h .1 prefusion of wild Noj-etatic,,, .s,,^.' plan sHs June Ihv„ fo„„,l .s,.ir.-,hle for f„c„| \"the Anmzo,. valley there are several Indian tribes who atteni})t a vt'iy crnde sort of a-ricnitnic. V\": \"\"- ' \"'^\"Jf'^ Htten.l the •slightest effort in .he wa\\ uf preparing the ground, and Indian corn, sweet potatoes manioc, and bananas grow '•''H\u003cIily, but the climate and the rich ground stand in the \u003evay of any stea.lv etfort on t|'e part of the people Mature, in fact, is too ready ^vith an abundant harvesf and man, a naturally lazy animal, has not u, exert him- «elf in order to provMe a iiv.rig. Were these regions i properly cultivated, great 37 quantities of cocoa, tobacco «ugar-can\u003c-. coflee, ..r,-., could '•t^'-aised. As it is. the natives plant a h^sy manioc slips and \u003c'ther plants in what answers to '\"I'.^pring.se; .„„, and then go off into th,. cooler woods to hunt an.l to (isl, whih\u003e their ganl,.,, stuff is growing. How •htterent is life here from th ,t ot the iiuith I.iikI: Wherever vegetation is almndant, there also wo shoul.l expt\"^-t an abun.Jance of wild animal life. (\u003e„ d,^. ^•orders of th,. African forest ••eg'on of the (\"o,,^,,, (j.^, ^.,^. phant, the lion, the zebra •in.l v;u^.skmds of antelope are to';.:;;;. tho ■ \"V\"\"'\"\" ^■'^\"'^\u003e' '\"■'^ the tapir tlie puma, and other animaLs ' To unde,st,„.d the conditions of human '\"' ''\" ^\"^\"^ \"* ^''--'\"fe' away jungles 4 j/tan\u003c ftamioo",
         "tree. 38 WORLD RELATIONS and forest tangles is very great. If a The steppes extend south-westward ganlen is to remain, the owner must from north-eastern Asia to th(\u003e \\tiantic figiit the advancing forest. If a path Ocean in Eurasia. In North Ameriwi through t)ie busli is to l)e kept open the tlieyare situated well towiird the western same constant struggle is necessarv. lialf of the continent. In South America llie inhalHtants of ii part of the Congo thev are fouml north and .south of the foi-est are a race of men and women Amazon forest country. In Africa they averaging four feet in iieight. These are iue north and .soutli of the ecpiator, and tlie Pygmies, a nation of very skilful wood to the east of the Congo W(.,.ds, and in folk. The J'vgiiiies are not an agricultural Australia they lie largelv t.. the w.-st of people. The forest is their home and they the Divide. know their home well. They are expert As a rule, when we pass from the woods of the Ho; licit, where trees grow in altundancf, and where there is little or no gi-ass, we get to a region (jf pjirk-like lands called saraii- iias, where both trees and grasses grow. lieyond these savannas are the steppe lands, where there is grass and no trees, and beyond the .steppes ai-e the deserts, where there are neither trees nor grass. Like the steppe I'egioiis, .savannas have a long season of dry weather in the making of weapons, nets and traps, and death, and a .short season of rain and but in no sense nuist they l)e looked upon life ; and it is during the .short, wet sea- as very intelligent men and women. Being .s(m that plants like grass gi-ow. fond of the products of the garden and the The steppes of the Old World have field, they will plunder the.se, or exchange always been of very great interest. Manv furs, feathers, and other things procured references are made of them in the Old in the hunt, for the bananas, tobacco, and Testament. Can you (luote any of the.se knives of the .settlements. references ? From these we may gather that the Asiatic pasture lands offered a THE GRASSY COUNTRY variety of rolling plain.s, highland country, If you examine the map on page 34, you rather dry toward the interior where the will find great areas remote from the sea. steppes begin to mingle with the desert, These are the great grass plains, or steppes, and beconiing wooded towanl the forested regions watered Ijy ;i uuich lighter rain- country. Western Canadian boys and fall than a forest country requires. girls will understand the character of the Scfvi*^ I a ctii/le rn/n'jp. A bunch of caide, beiiig drive),- /roin uui- raiiijp to ntutther in aearch of butter",
         "i/raziiuj. DESKKT LIFE scenery better if ti.ey will but l(,„k at tlu- piuiiie surroun.ling them. Tlu\u003e Canadian pnune c.untry is u steppe coiintrv TJic pnuries liave not a Iieavv rainfall.an.l tlie Kims ,|„es „„t cover the ^M..,.n.| com-pletely ; some refjions l,„,k to b.. ahnost \u003e*houl(l man re(,uire to make liim pertectlv iiapj)y ? •' Tlie Hfe of the shepherd and tlie henis- I'liin IS one of constant inovinjj from place to place, as ^rass and water are needed. A wanderniK life means a tent, and horses lay gathered during the summer, or '^n\u003cl \u003c\"■ I'anen ; and the f\u003c.rest line 'is 2 t ''''\"'™^ T \"'\"'\"''^ '\"' ^^'\"^- '\"\"' '\"\"\"•^^'^ li.r to the north. '\"'^-^ \"\"^ '^ \"\"t to carry the herdsman and his family •Spring-time on the steppes is a seison , u''\"'!':'\" ?\"\"\" \"\"^\"''\"\u003e' «'\"'« the stock of great beauty, grass an,! W; \"h;: ' 'i^'::'''' \"'!''^' -\"^-^'^ -\"' -ther A-d ft-om ing up everywhere. Sum-mer bi-ings a .scorching sun that browns the land.scape •scmiewhat, while autumn sees the grass well yellowed, the trees casting their leaves, and nature genei-ally pre-paring for the winter with its frost and its snow. The animal life of the steppes is largely confined to grass-eating animal.s, parti-cularly the domestic cattle, horses, and sheep of Ameri-ca ; and horses, cattle, the camel, the goat, the ass, and the sheep of the Old Woi-ld ^ o.r:t:p;:7if:-^Svir:;t ^rri; ;. ■- ^\"- - — - ^'^.rtzx- ri:rr .^ ^\\ i — ^--a have nected with the cire of Hocks a/id he ;. EropeTSl ' f \"T\"\"^^\"'^ \"'' occupations that help to put people out .ZT ^^'\"-'' '\"\"■'^«- ^^'^ttle, of sympathy with a fernmfg. c m m -c U but th T^' ''\"''\"^ '\"\" '\"\"\" established, or business life, and cause them to ! p^ ^ .7 ll '\"' T\"'\"' '\"^^■'^^\"' ••'^\"^^'- these pursuits as wanting in free,lom and c^ni^^ \" \"'\" ^-/\"'^'-■^ \"^ the mderxmdence. This position is nitnr-d Z \\- '\"''' ''''\"'•'■\"• t»'e rancher when we come to think how m el f^oX mlXt \"f '\". 'T'' '''''' ^''« -•'^^-» and herds contribute to the we be „ ! 1 '''\"''' '''^ ^'^\"^'■^^' ''f^ \"»t.ide of the shepherd people -the wool t '' ,T\"' \"^' '^' P\"\"\"' \"^^'^' tl'^",
         "telegraph 40 WORLD RELATIONS UMually men attaclu'd to n free life in the f«iin\u003cl al)out natural Mprin^N, alonj; the open air. l)anks of rivcis that may never reach an DESERT LIFE \"\"^'\"' '\"\" ''\"'' ^^'''\\ \"\"'''\u003e' '\" ^'\"\" ^\"\"''•^' and III any part wliere water may be Looking; a^'ain at the map on |jjif,'e :M, reaeiied l»y (hiviii\u003c: wells. y(»n will .see the locations of a mimlier Tlu' ve\u003c,'etation of the desert i.s divided of rainless, hot deserts situated on both into what we may call tnie desert vegeta- .si(hs of the e\u003c|uator, and alfeetin^' more tion and the ve^'ctation of the oase.s. or le.ss all the continents. De.sert plants are usually prickly or Deserts are caused by cold, as in the thorny shrulis, cour.se gras.ses, etc. The case of the ttindras. Deserts are also oases jjrow the wtmderfiil date palm, the cau.sed in hot eountries by a want of olive, and rice, ni o i s t u r e. T h e de.sert soil in both cases may be very fertile, and usually is, but a frozen soil is valueless for the rearing of plants, and a parched or dried soil is no better. Hot deserts lie far away from the .sea and out of the reach of rain- bearing winds. Hot de.serts are CamelH umdfor travelling in denertK. The only animal life adapted to a desert country is the camel. Ontheoa.se8 cattle, sheep, and goats may be reared. If we look upon the Saham as a great sea of sjind with fertile districts north and south of it, we shall under- stainl how it is pos- .sible for man to make the desert his dry areas where little or no vegetation home. Settled life is possible only on exi.sts. Life in one great ..sert region the oivses, and as these are not numerous should serve to give us a fair idea of nor large, human life in the Sahara is what it means to make a liome under not counted by millions. Communication such circumstances. The desert we shall mu.st be kept' up between the scattered take as a tyj)e is the great Sahara, which oases and between the fertile lands north occupies the greater portion of northern and south of the desert. Caravan after Africa. The surface of the Sahara is not cjiravan passes backward and foiward uniform. In one district it is sandy, in across the hot .sands. The owners of another rocky ; mountains bring in a little these caravans are merchants who find variety in a third, while a fourth may be it profitable to gather the resins, gum.s, a plateau or high plain. Wherever in the ostrich feathers and ivory of the .south desert water is obtainable, the .s;oil is so country and take these to the north. In rich that a remarkable vegetation is the exchange the merchants give cotton, result. Such fertile spots, or oases, are beads, knives, and other",
         "things. The real .Iweller „f the .le.sert lives a wai.dennK life an.l is ..nfru^,t.,| either i„ aetnij.'a, eaiiiel .liiver. a deseit rai.ler. or else ,.s u-yiiij,' to eke out a very uivii'^iv exis?-iice l)y raisinj,' \u003cl\u003c)mcstieate.'i aiiiinais on the poorly j.'rass\u003c..| lai..|s of tiio desert. edges. True, these pi'\u003cti)le have nuieli in the date palm and the camel. Their country does not exact nnieh in the way of clothing or shelter, and on the whole the people of the desert njay he .said to have a somewhat similar but still a much less troublesome life than that of the shivering people of the frozen noi-th land. THE NORTH EK.N WOODS THE NORTHERN WOODS South of the cold north lands are the temperate forests of the northern henn- 41 '•*■. The uncleared forests are largely in our own country, in north-eastern Kuro.Kj and in norihcru Asia. The occiifKitions of a forest country are tljos,. of hunting, trapj.ing. and l.nnl.Jring. Ihe annual life of the northern woods is fSiirly.nbundant, and ■splu-re. On the map, page 34. von will see that much of North Americ;, nearly ail ol Kurope, a great deal of Asia and I)firts of South America ami ofAu.stralia are covered, or were once covered, with a growth of such trees as are shown on this page. Much of the surface shown on the map as torest-covered, has been cleared of its trees, anrl agric.ilture of all kinds is now being carried on where the forest used to the furs ol.tained by tlu\" hunter and the trapjier uiv much \"light after. Among the most eommon animals are the heaver. luink, inuskrat. several kinds of fox, the wolf, and the bear. In Canada the hunt-ing of animals for their furs is usually carried on by the Indians and the natives of French an\u003cl Indian blo.,\u003c|. The winter catch is taken to one of the many Ilud.son's hay trading po.sts and exchanged for guns, blankets, traps, nets, tea, tobacco, etc. Lumbering is carrie.1 on in the winter '\"•'ntlLs as a rule, for then the ground is covered with snow which helps to make work in the woods much easier than it e\u003c^uld be m the summer season. In the late autumn or early winter, gangs of men go to the hush where trees are elled, cut into log.s. and hauled on sleds to the nearest river, so that the .spring floods may float them to the saw-miUs down the stream. A innler gcen\u003c- in Ih- northern",
         "ii-mMh. 42 WORLD RELATIONS ...H.I., i.«„ ,.„„.,, „„ „„ .„ j;,Ti '„:,:';„z^' '^if; :'„r\":;; lH«r,l». ,,N„,„« m,ll.s .Ir,™ tl... I,„„r,l.. I,,,,,., „, , „» ,,lai„ a, L , ^i I. 1 ..11.1. ,1, ,.„.,„ „„,.. ,„„„„f„,„„^ „ „i„„ ,„„„, „„„i,. i„i! I, ,„ , ' '°- \"\"■■ '\" -h. /...». d«.ri„B», ,„„. i, i„ .h. i„„\":;ve!;\";i',;:,\u003e ;;:;. .\"'nZTi I'l\"\"\" easily workt'd, better I\u003eiiil\u003cliiig8, greater coiiiforts and a more lei.-siirely life followed. The limiter's time i.s **pfnt in wanderiny from nlacf to place, and in \u003clcstroying animal life lie cannot ••\"•place. With the larmer comes the sav-in;; up of material, till- addition of more bunciu-s an.l afterwards burncl The e-ise -.n.l I • • '\";'**,'''\"'• \"^''I't'i. easily handled and the logs dragifed into heafis by oxen or horses. After THE FARM LANDS gathering the small chips and other riili- V,. . i i l.ish and piling them on the hi, ,,,^ \"\"t,;\"';^. \"^:\"\"V^''\"'\" 'i\"--l? heaps are bnrne.l and the Hrst planting k ^w „.. , / ^'^ i:\" ^'\" '\"\"!'' '''\"'' iH'^^un. In the course of a few vears the amNh ' ^^ t-v H I'T ^\"\"\"' greater number of the stumps will have „ jfc '\"'„ h u 'r ' ' '•'''^'• nitted enough to permit of their removal, Z\" t' U.um i tJ { \"\"'T but the larger stumps may remain in the ea th smi e an JS \" T''\"\"'''}^' gr..und for a long time ■ and it is onlv l T , ^ \\ ^\"■\"'\"^ Muantities affer long y.rs ;i.at the settle it^ lUe^^^ Se V ^hif^if tS lalK« -saving farm implements. palm, the manioc, fronf which we get fhe hou.s^es of the forest pioneers were Uipioct, the pineapple, sugar-cane Indfan built of such materials as were convenient, com, tea, cofiee, ric^. and Zny^Z A lar,/.fnmb.r mill. Thoumnd. of log» are hr,^u,h, her. by rail nawed auj ,\u003elnned, loa,M .„«. boats, and earned ,o all ,he princij^ Ze",
         "PT valiuilt|(».Kj\u003c|,s. Thr OHM'S nf the (IcsLTt yi«'liltii(Mlaff|wiIn), tl'f (tlivc, wlu'dt, Hml corn. In fciiipcratt' iv- gioiiM \\vlicit\u003e the HeaMdiisiiiv marked aii\u003cl tile laiiifiill not too iiiviit. most catcf'iil Jiiiiiiiii^liHH ti' Im- \u003cI(iii('. The IJiairies of Canada and niiicli of the ciiiintiv to the south V of w licit. \u003c.at.s, harh'v ■soiitli of this i('j,'ioii adapted to the Krowinj: of corn. Most of Kiirofx' has l)een cleared for Ifi'iieratioiis. aiK the land is eare- fulh tilled. Kiirope, north of the li' ' lanils. produce , vaiioiis ^'raiiis; .southern Kurope i.s better adapted to f'-iiit. In South Aiiu'iica. alxiiit the i\u003c'pon of the La I'litta, much wheat is raised. Here also, J)ut nearer the Andes, the vine is cnltivated, a feature al.so to he noticed in southern Africa and sfuith - ea.stern Au.stralia. The more we FlhUINO 43 \"fildv the value of agriculture, that is. two to/our pounds o/berrie» a year Man does not depend entirely upon the land for hisfiHwI. The rivers, lakes, and the .sea are al.so explored, and fish",
         "procured. 44 WOHLI) HKLATIONH Miii\\ liflp t,, .h|,„„ till- chiinictj'r of the \" 'l\"'-\u003c'nKaK\u003c'i. Kisl.JnK ..ri tl... of«,n «\u003cNi IS not for iiii-n waiiiinK in c-miniKi' ^|^\u003cl.('^nl■l. a,v \u003c-o„staiitl.v expos,..! to 'lan-.T. Thrv must ,„.r ,|„i,.k|v „|„.„ „„ •'\"•••rp'm-v ,,iis...H, No „,„„|,.r ,1,,,, ,|„. Uivat navi...s of the woiM are icciuited laip'ly Croni ihc fi.s|„.,. folk. MOUNTAIN LIFE Fanners and lanehers have eliosen the plains lor their ho,n\u003c.. Other people have liiow into the monntains: for example. OH- the eastern eoast Of Xew.o„n,l|..n.l firMM'i\"';' '\"\"•\";!'\"!\"^ ^ ''\"• '•^\"\"'P'^'. :- ^'^ ''-^- a re, here the Ana; l' S s fsti; i:;;.;. TT\\ •\"\"' \"^ I.S not very .leep. an.l where L'reat ..i.n.hers i.. . ' '*\"' \" \"'■\"'\"' «.»-e...lfi.sh fee.l npon the eap i . ■ . \"\" \"; \"'\"\"\"•• \"'\"' \"\"' \"\"•\"\"^\"■» s.nall Hsh fonnVi.. these ..s' \"T'T '\"\"• ''?\" '\" *'\"\"'\"^' ^'\"''•' «''\"'\" \"'\"' «shi„K ^'n.un.l,s have l,ee„ s Pf . 'i ' '\" \"\"\" '\"\"''\u003e• \"''''•'\" »'»'\"' '\"'V tin-ee h.mdre.lea\" si\";\" i :'',:;\"■ T\\ 'r^^\"^'\" '''^''\u003c-'' \"!'• \"■\"' --. \u003c-.. on the lianks is so h- lo i, \"..;v..n.h.r that hij-I.Ian.l people are oM- H.le at anchor^, • r : ^:l tTiJT:: t T '\"\"' \"''\"^ \" '\"\"'\"^\"•^ \"'\"' ^\"- -.a.. ..oats to Hsh with hii ';:;'!;:' :;:L'';:s;i:r ^\" '^\"\"^ '^' ^'^^ ^-p\"' On tlie western coast of Can ada, tlie rivers are tlie spawn ing groun.l of tlie salmon. As a result, this re\u003c,'ioM is noted for the tnunber of I\u003eeople enf;age\u003cl in the eatch- ing and caiuniig of sjdmon. Off the Alaskan coast are famous seal rookerii's, which used to tempt many vessels and scores of hunters every year. The.se are l)ut a few of the IcKJalities adapted to the great fisheries, but they will give .some idea of the number of people employed and also ^ \"''''*^*\" •\"''^^ \"' S,^lzerla,ui. Cow. are pastured m, ,h.\\,onu uopen, and cheene u made in the",
         "huts. MANlFAr'n HINU my MANUFACTURING I'('o|.l.. must .lo inoiv f|,,.,„ |„„„ ,i,|, an.l fiiiiii. I'(.u,.|,. „„iM ,„,,|4,. ,|.i„j^,, ,,„. Seen^ in a farm kitck»t, H/umnm, a hand chum. 45 II- taki' (}rt.al Hritain. (;,,...,t Mrjtairi •ia\u003e alHiii.tanr cmI, (Jivat Itritain .an al-o takr Ihr raw niatciiak of tli.- worl.l l.v li.T own sl.i,,,. T|„. |{,.i,i,|, „oik„..-ii are skilliil, an.l tlir fiiii.s||,..| K\u003c»t»\u003cl« may he hciii ovti flit- world elioaply. TRADE 'J'ladr arisen wiii-ii Jiirri r«'- quirc suinctliiii^' they caiiiK.t get at lioiiic. Iiiil may p't hy fXfliaii-iii;r x'liit'tliinjr (.jsr f,,\"r this. him lent tliiii;;s are »''\u003eini\u003cl ill .lifU'ii'iit rcjrii.iis. To ;:atlur tlii-sc things iv- Miiiivs what Ml' mav call « and to-day mamdiu'tujing is a si^r,, ,,f the -iicatncsis of any toiiiiliv. No iiiaiiidiicturiii}; lon- ecrii will succei'd witlidiit niw material near at liaii\u003cl. Cheap driviiiu power, that is. cheap coal. j:a.s. or water power, is another essential. A third necessity is an ea.sy and cheap outlet for the {roods to the markets of the world. As an example of a great manufcctiiring centre, let i ! i ■' \"'*\"'\" •^\"\"' '■» «",
         "^^g^^ir^i^eJtSmS. 46 WOKLD KKLATI0N8 Carriage by means of animals is nUm and often expensive. It is also unsuitable for perishable goods. In these days things move quickly, so we have great lines of steel crossing continents. We have branch lines joining these. We have bcwts on ffayiv^ in fJte Swiss Tyrol Alps. The man has to i-arry the hay half a mile to his home. our rivers and great freight and passenger boats on our lakes, seas, and oceans. It is by means of these gi-e\u003cit railway and ship lines, and by telegraph lines over land and under the sea that the world's tnide is managed and the separate con-tinents bound together. Questions. 1. Describe an Eskimo's home 2. W hich 18 the bett«r life, a fanner's life or a hunter's life? Why? 3. Deserilx; home making in the forest and home making on the prairie 4. Descnbe a journey fr^m X,.,v York to Tokio by nay of the Horn ; by v ay of the Cape of Good Hope ; by way of the Mediterranean. 5. Through what continents does the equator pass? How does It divide each continent? 6. What do we get from Asia, Africa, and Europe? 7. What have we to give Europe? 8. What means of transportation have you in your district? KEVIEW QUESTIONS 1. Make on the board a diagram of the new moon, the moon in its last quarter, and the moon ll^. it would be seen a little before sunrise. 2 Make a diagram showing the earth, sun, moon* ana s ars. 6. On a circle representing the earth, show the poles, the e.juator, and the jwaitions of the .North btar and the .Southern Cross. 4 Make a diagram showing the positions of the earth, sun and moon at the time of (a) the new moon ; ib) the full moon; and (c) the quarters. If the students cannot do this, allow them several weeks in winch to make observations. 5. The Little Oq.per or Little B.-ar swings about the North btar, the star being at the end of the Little Bear's tai . l-ind the stars making up this cluster ; make a drawing. 6. De.scribe how one may obtain the noon shadow How niaythisshadowbe used tofind directions? /. Make a diagram of the earth and Show on It the poles, equator, and belts of heat. 8. Where would yoii look for snow at the ecjuator ? L ?^ in'\"'Ji*,J'^ \"'8^* '« **\u003e** *^^t for dew ? for frost .' 10. Why is there no dew following a cloudy or a windy night ? 11. On which of the following things would dew settle :— a painted board, an unpainted board, a dustv road, a grassy path, a straw hat, a stone, the iron on the pump the grass under a tree ? 12. Ha kettle of water u-r , \"\"o* \"J^? T^'y ^°\"8 the water disappears, \"hy.' 13. Pitchers into which cold water is placed are said to \"sweat\" sometimes. What causes this ? 14. For what reasons could we say that the air takes up water? 15. What is the difference between dew and frost, and between a mist and a cloud? 16. What makes a brook- or a beach-stone smooth? 17. Make a diagram showing the difference between a water-fall a rapid, and a cataract. 18. In which hemisphere 18 the most of the land situated ? 19. What ocean les about the North Pole? What continente touch this ocean ? 20. What continents lie to m .f 'l'*\"'i ^Y'^K^ ^^^ '^^\"^ °^ (\") ^^^ Atlantic, (b) the Pacific ? 21. What continents are entirely in the Northern Hemisphere? In the Southern Hemisphere ? 22. Through what continents does the equator pass ? 23. What continent is divided into EuroiH- and Asia? 24. Draw from memory outlines of all the southern continents. Place on these the Eciuator, the Gulf of Guinea, Cape Horn, the Gulf of Carjx-ntaria, the Andes, the bahara desert, Australia, the Indian. Pacific and Atlantic Oceans, the Amazon, Nile, La Plati and I ongo, and the Cape of Good Hope. 2.5 What and where are Hudson. Florida, Japan, the British Home Land, Sahara, Mexico, Vancouver. Korea Italy, Baltic, Red, (ireat Australian Bight, New Vork, London, the Mediterranean, India, Russia Kgypt, Madagascar, Bengal, Horn, Suez. Buenos Ayres, Saskatchewan, and Bering? 26. Describe a. dinner in the tundras, a dinner in the northern forests, a dinner on the grass lands, and a dinner m the",
         "Sahara. PART ri. THE",
         "CONT^VEXTS",
         "i A STUDY OF THE (OXTIN ENTS North Ai OUR OWN CONTINENT tion is Asia from Xor h l\":^!- -t 'Vi!!^ '^ .^parates these c„„tine,.ts ? Pui^ tout tl n, \u003e\"\" of ti.e Nortl. Pole .,„ the .„m W.\" P\"-'\",\"\" this p„le? How is tl,?. ^' * \"\"■\"\" '-■\"•^■''••'* ■^' the AtlHnf,-,. ; * r.u'opt. What ;.'reat arm of 4 West IndLl \\Vi ■ \" ^'\"^ \"\"uation of the J \"^.Y\"\" America. America was made kimurn t .1 I worU hy Christopher a,Iumbus. Why ZTit'not 49 How North America was Settled. After tluj discovery „f the Wost L.dios by Colurabu.s Spanish and Port u,nieso a,lven- fi\u003ee.s and explorers poured into Central and Southern Anieriea in great numir unl ennehed themselves by plun.lering the -t.yes of their gohl and their s.W As tin, e„tran,^.s to these regions through the West Indies were fe,v and easily gumhMl Span, and Portugal held the la,.;! •ebelled one by „„,. and fonne.l themselves uito independent eountries. To-.lav neither Spain nor Portugal owns a foot of Ameri,.an ;f ..1, ye the names, languages, and eustoms \"■nam to show the eharaeter of the people l\u003ey whom the colonies were founded! th« t,'^?,''\"' '\"\"^ ^'^'■'\"-\"^' «■♦''•« '\"''king the south their own, Fran.e ami England were trying to secure a footing iu North Amenea. Xewfoundland was settle.! by «ome English sailors in 158:j, and in 158^ Si. Walter Raleigh tried to settle the country about Chesapeake Bav, and name,! the settlement Virginia in 'honor o the V irgm Queen of England. From that time large numbers of jH^ople continued to eave 1 ntam and to form new homes for ';;;:r.tr '\" ;^\"\"'\"'\"\"' ^^ ^'^^^ ■'^^^ttiement af ei settlement sprang up along the eastern sKle of our continent. The most famous of these settlements .n Ifi \u003e0. The Pilgnni Fathers were English people who had to leave the home land n waj. They .sailed ,„ a ship called the Mayflower,\" and after crosing the At- This was the first of six settlements",
         "on I !»• Ccnciluie tVitt fttm. SOUTH AMERICA",
         "EOUATQW A 8Tri)Y OF THE rONTlXKNTS , . 51 tins i.m-tioulnr coast, and, lator ,„, i|,.. v,.,..! v • * -'\"•!« of tlH's.. ..am. U ,;,... ,lv', / '' ,\"\"7'.\";\"' •\"\"\"*\"\"\"^ '\u003c• 'Kv. In the \u003e-rti..M,..nts w..,v r..n„..no , ! .;„.„ \"'''\" '\";\"'\",■'- \"^ tin. Indian .nl... '\" -1- \"\"• \u003e-.,!\u003c on ,h.. lanns ' \" ' ' \"\";■'\"'■•' \"\"^ '•'\"•'•!•\"! \"\" f'\"\" years, until \"1-i\"^ 'HU ti, ..,nt,.v uv i,.v ,: . t ' -'\"'V?^ ;;-.-\" ''\u003e• \"-' British nn.l.-r \"^- '\u003c\u003e-\u003c% \"s onr ...vn- land of '■. i , :.;\";'' ^^ \"' \" '\" ,!\"\"'\"- '•\"\"' ^I-'t'.V after \u003c;-■»-• 1-1 -ih.d „, „,.. St. Law,';;;;: ;: l; ;t \"\" ■\"\"\"•' '\"\"\"'\"•' \"^■•\"\" \"• \"\"' '1.0 site of Montreal in i:,:;:,. i„ „i„s t,;,.-, '\" ■• ■• - in ih(.,s \"lis VH.forvirav,. I!ri,„in prartieallythe \u003c'i'a'\u003e'Plai'i foUM.le,! gnel,..,., rh',. ({il.ralhu ..Manada. \u003c\u003etlier s^ftlenn-nts u,mv lonnd.-d Ironi year to y.-ar. and the whole St Lawrence hasin wa '•iii-efully explort-d. If was not a very difJienIt task to do this, as the river St. Lawrence was the natural hijfhway in-to the heart of tlic continent. On the other hand, the En,ir- lisli settlers having no fr,-,.at rivers by which to penetrate into the country, had J'/'iiuM ,,/ Ahriihni,, Whole of the f,;vaf Xorth A.neri.-an '.-on- '\"\"•'\"• \"'\"' \"\"^^- \"'at pea\u003c-e had .-ome, thousands of emi- ^'rants came across I lie Atlantic. The ■'''ttlenients pros- I'fivd, tlie French- \u003c'anadians were liappy, and tlie whole land settled down to a l\u003erosi\u003eerity that the continent had never '•efore known. Ft \\- e r y t h i n ^ was j,'oinf,' on well, until the homti \u003c-ountry decide\u003cl to tax the new land in order to to content themselves with the slow i, i . , \"•'^^' 1'\"\"' '\" \"'-'It'i' to l.t-c\u003ecess of cutting, awav the res wih '' , '\"•' ''\" *'\"'\" ^^•''\"■'' '-^ '-«\" \u003c-ovore,J the pla?n between te Itl^ ic i;\"'\"'\"'\" 7 '\"T'\"*^ \"^\" ^'\"' ^^•'\"•^ '\" 'l- an.l the highlands of Eastern .Wri;t^Xr t^^ 'IT •\"'\"\"\"\" ''^''\" \"\"'\"\"'^^^ ^'l^ -\u003eTaeenturvtheEnglish-sne'kn ittU •' f, I ^''\" ''\"■' ^\"''\"\" ^'\"^\u003e- ''\"'1 \"\" ^-\"i'-e wore ..onteni to sta^ at 1 ,;t Jn \" ! '1 T ff ''\"\"\" \"\"■'\"\"\"\"^- ^•\"' '' ^l^ farms, and let the re:t of the wo, I . \"**'\"'\" '''\"' '' \"\"•■^* tfifortunate l.usi- wl.ile French exp .r r 'eV iV^ If\"'.\"'\"' \"\" ^*'\"' \"f\" *' -- 'he loss of «\"'l .-laimin., then, all for Fran -em d he f l;'\"-! .States de.-lared for indepen- ^ 'i---l'. But France had ij^ati^^ h t\" lu ' f \"\"'I '\"^ \"^ ^'\"'\"'''^'^ \"' ''''' K.vat gap between the (.Canadian lake . ml bvUr '\"f,;\"' \"\"\"'^'^ •^*'*\"-' «'■'»'\u003e' the niouth of the Mississippi with f^M^^^, a Iv ^^' !'\"\"\\\"\";1 ^''\"^''^ \"\"^^ \"^I'-wn herself s.'tt.e.nents.as L. Salle, thiVre,;;*;:^;::;:^ zr\"\" ''' \"*' '\"^^^ '\"^■\"' ^ •\"\" ^'^'-^ 1'^';' adnsed. Ha«l this been \u003clone, France Coast Line Wl. . -.ht have been a ,.at power on the eo^T^ ^^^ ^J^lrl;:^.,-':;:-",
         "mt;^ 52 A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS with thttt . South Aniori.-iif North Aiiu\u003eri.'u ; s more coust in proportion to Its SI. . .an liny oth.«i- continent except Euroiic Tlic two most important sea aims are Hudson Buy and the Gulf of Mexico. Tlie North coast is irre-boiiud for the greater part of the year. There are mantr islands in this region bearing the names oi some of the brave men who risked their hves in attempting to explore this dreary sea. The largest opening is Hudson Bay, so named after a Dutchman, Henrv Hndsoii, who discovered it. No one knows how Hudson .lied. He was cast adrift by his crew an\u003cl left to perish. Hudson Bay comnuuiicates witli the Atlantic by Hudson Strait, a channel locked by ice for more than half of each year. As much is said to-day regarding a Hudson Bay railroad, it will be well to bear this ih mind. Neglecting tlie great north land of Green-land, we shall, if we pass eastward, come to tlie peninsula of Labrador, with its bleak, rocky coast. At the elbow is New-foundland, guarding the northern shore of the Gulf of St. Lawrence. On the southern side of the Gulf is the peninsula of Nova Scotia, one of the provinces of our own country. South of Nova Scotia, the coast i-uus to the south-west in three great curves ending with the peninsula of Florida at the northern edge of the Gulf of Mexico. The Gulf coast swings away to the west and south towai-d the peninsula of Yucatan. Blocking the eastern side of the Gulf and s.paiating the Atlantic from the sea known as the Caribbean, are the West Indies, be-hind wliich the Spaniards were so long •able to withstand all attempts to drive them out of Centi-al and South America. Tlie Pacific coast forms a sweejting double curve extending from Alaska, the north-western shoulder, to the Isthmus of Panama. Studv this coast carefully, noting the irregular northern half, the islands skirting the shore, and the great extension known as the Penin-' sulk of Lower California. Surface. A study of the map on Page 50 wdl show two highland regions. Notice vvhat the deep yellow, the lighter yellow, and the green stand for on this map. Th.. larger higher, and broader of the highlaii.! regions IS near the Pacific const, and the. lower shorter, and naiTower along the Atlantic' Besides these, a third highland region, nowhere more than a iiuarter of a mile high, and consisting of very old mountains worn down by the storms of ages into round-topped hills, is situated around Hud-son Bay. The most imj ortant feature of the western highlands is th, range of the Rockv Moun-tains which slope eastward gratluallv and meet the western slope of the Appalachians, the principal mountains of the eastern high-lands. As both highland regions run in a north-ward direction they form a ])arrier to the winds from the Atlantic and the Pacific oceans, but no obstacle to the winds from the Gulf of Mexico and fi-om the Arctic Ocean. Again, the inlaiul slopes meet to form the Great Central Plain, a huge area shut m on the east and on the west. This plain in turn is divided into two parts by a low ridge which crosses the continent from west to east in the latitude of Lake Siipei lor. The presence of this ridge causes the plain to slope northward toward the Arctic Ocean and Hudson Bay, and south-ward toward the Gulf of Mexico. The Great Central Plain is made up largely of plain and prairie, and it extends from the tundras of the north to the swampv lands about the Gulf. The jirairies cover the regions watered by the Saskatchewan, the Red River, the upper valley of the Mississippi and tiie h.wcr valley of the Missouri. The i.lains, being higher",
         "and A ITVDY UP THE fONTLXENTS dne, lie^between the pnUHe e.\u003e.....,^ an., Between the Appaladiian M,.,uitain.s a.ul the sea there i. a low stnp of, rounds:;; 900 ,h s ,„ l,„gth hy 200 i„ width, one of the njost r.op„Ious an.l wenlthv regions of the \u003c-ontinent. ' \" The great lii-hhmd of the west, to which heua,neConHl,evashasbeengiv;n,,;:,^^^^^^ 1\" Alaska and stretches in a double curve ■southward to the Isthmus of Panama. It Tt'rr.f ''': \"\"''^'' ^\"^ *^'-°^^- ^^-«'i- whe^ Tlf ' \"'\"^ '\"'\"''^'^ '^-^ *^''^\"^-t -i^^th On the whole it is a serious harrier to the westerly M-inds, robbing them of their supply ot moisture before the Central Plain Is lencned, manj different mountain chains, the Ro.-kies cade 7'Tf' \"'' '\"\"\"'''^ ^'^^'^^■•■^'^'^ «\"^' ^\u003e'« Cas^ cade farthei- west, and the Coast Range along he Pacific. These mountain ran^\"-! naturally enclose great plateaus a mile or more m height, the principal being the Great .1 **«« ,H Mf VanwUan R^nkie,. Has.n, ,n which the sun.lus water, not amounting to very much, must be got -id of b.v evaporation. As a result we have such a body of water as (Jreat Salt Lake, which should give you a very good idea of the ••haracter of „,„,.!, of this region The Ro,.kies are a serious obstacle in the ^ a. of easy communication b.-tween the east an\u003c the west. Fortunately thev a e l\u003e\u003e-oken here and there by water-gai.s or nver valleys, so that railroa,ls conm -ting the two snles of the continent have beef earned across. In our study of the surface of our con- ment we have omitted a verv important allej. We have said that the northern \u003e\".-t.o„ of the Great Central Plain slor.ed toward the Arctic, and also toward Iln.lLm «aA. At he western en.l of Lake Superior you will observe dotte.l lines passing o t^ north and to the south of the lak. a'd en..los.„g the great valley mentione,!. I„ entiam-e to the Great Plains, and",
         "formed 54 A STUDY OF THE CONTINKNTS us wo have already statwj, the natural eutiuiice to the interior of the eontiiient. The principul feature of the valley to l)e noted at this sfap' of our work is the presenee of a ehaiu of live enormous lakes, whose waters are carried ott\" to the Atlautie by the niii^hty St. Lawrence. No other lake system on the face of the earth can compare with that of the (}reat Canadian Lakes. Climate. In the map on paj;e 50 you will notice a dotted curved line, the Tropic of Cancer, runninj? from west to east across Mexico. There is another line, called the Tropic of Capricorn, corresponding to this, south of the equator. The.se are important guidinj: lines in your study of geojjjraphy, as they represent the most northerly and most southerly jioints of an overhead sun. Nortli of the northern troi»ic, the noon sun i.s seen toward the south. South of the southern tropic, the sun at noon is seen toward the nortii. The Tropii's of Cancer and Capricorn roughly bound the zone or belt of heat which encircles the earth at the equator, and to which the name Hot Bch or Torrid Zone has been applied. North Ameri\u003c!a lias a ver\u003e' varied (climate, l)ecau.se it lies in so many iieat belts. The Arctic circle surrounding the North Pole shows you wheie the North Cold Cap i.s situated. The Tropi\u003c' of Cancer i)assing through the centre of the (iidf of Mexico shows that tiie southern end of our con-tinent extends into the Hot Belt. The remaining portion — in otiier words, the gieater portion of North America— lies in what is called the North Temperate Belt. From this you will readily understand why our continent should have nuiny dilTerent climates, ranging from gieat heat at the south to extreme cold at the north. Place the school globe so that the North Pole points away from you. Looking at the northern hemisphere you will aea half the equator, but less than half of the earth lines running parallel to the equator. This nu'ans that our winter season has less than twelve hours of suu- ligiit per day. It' yon will now turn the globe so as to permit the pole to point toward you, you will see the earth as it appears diu'ing our summer season. The equator still has twelve hoiu's j)er day of siuilight, but we in our northern homes have much move than this. As the sun moves northward, or, as we say, r'nes liigli' and higher in the noon-day sky, North America gets more and more sunlight and heat, and winter gives place to summer with its long days and short nights. Tile climate of a continent is also affected by the winds which are able to cross the continent. Now, the low, (Jreat Central Plain is open to the cold Arctic winds and also to the warm southern winds from the Oidf of Mexico ; and this is the reason why north winds may go so far south as to freeze the fruits of Florida, and warm winds so far north as to cause plants to grow anil Howers to blossom ai\u003eout the shores of the Anttic Sea. This is not all, for the warm south winds carry moisture up the Orcat Central Plain into Canada, a point that should not be forgotten. What difterence would there l\u003ee were there a bar-rier of mountains acro.ss the «'(mtinent in the neighborhood of the Arctic Ocean ? As the Cordilleran and the Appal ichiau Highlands run from north to south, tiiey cut off much of the moisture which the Pacific and the Atlantic Oi'eans would otherwise send to the interior of tiie ('on- tinent. The Pacific coast is well watered from Alaska to San Francisco, and there is ample rahifail along the Atlantic from the Isthmus almost to the elbow of Labrador. Asa result Pacific Canada has fine timber areas, and the prairie country an abimdanr^e of grassy",
         "areas. .V5 A MTl'DY OF THE CON'TIXENTS Drainage. The liverH rti\u003e\\viii« from tho Aiipulai-hiaii Hi^lilaiids aiv niusfly sliort, bwauso tlif j.lain whidi they liavo to cronH iH liiit a iiaiTow plain. Homo of th«\u003e rivers of th»\u003c Pacific coast ar« wortiiy of n little attention. Amon^ these we niuy mention the Yukon, Fnisei , Coliim liu, andt'olorudo. In t!ie summer titnc ilic 'ukon has 1,0(M» miles of navipthle water, 'i'lie upper Fraser winds througli deep valleys hcfoiti reachinjj the plain. Tim Columliia rises near the source of the Fras.i-, and Hows Ih-st south and then west to th\u003c! Piwitic. Tile Colorado flows for miles through a region devoi«l of trees an\u003cl j^ra.ss. In one part of its course it flows through the Orund ('afion for more than 2(K) miles. The hunks here are too steej) to be dimlted, the lH)ttom is dark and gloomy, the valley is so wide that it cun- not he hridged, and the loar of the rushing waters is deafening. The rivers flowing toward ejieh other down the long interior \u003elopes forming the Oreat Central Plain, mos.ly join to form some of the greatest river systems in the world. plain, the Missouri from the north-west and the Ohio from the east flow into the gi-eat central stream, the Mississippi. The Mississippi has the most important basin in the world. Draining the country from markets. . id in winter as well as in summer, the greater jMirtion of the system is in operation. Vessels can as\u003c-end the Missouri to the K(H'kifS. Vessels can also pass far up into tlie country of the Ohio. Along the route are the wheat fields of the north, the corn lands alM)Ut the mouths of the two main tributaries, and the rich rice, sugar-cane, and cotton lands of the s«.uth. In the northern iK»rtion of the (heat Central Phiin are to be found two great river sys-tems, the Mackenzie and the Saskatchewan. The north -flow-ing Mackenzie Is of very little com-mercial value, as the lower part of its course flows through a most desolate region and suffers from severe floofl.s every summer. These floo\u003c]s are due to the rapid melting of the mountain snows at theheailwatere of the river. The river being still ice-1)ound in its lover course, overflows the banks and inundates the country. Con- necte\u003cl with this river are several very large lakes, namely, Athabaska. Great Slave Lake, and (Jreat Bear Lake. The course of the Sa.skatchewun is from ( 'ijoi-iuli, l',tn„„ i,i,m Mow. Xotr the ijreiit i\u003ernk» iihiih hiivr rrfiiifri/ llir (irtimi of the air anil thr ii-alrr. - --.- ...vy .-'u\u003e.:\u003eaM\u003ei..^Ljic;n 11,11 1.-^ 1 I UUi „ Af/!.„\"!\":'f' '\" l\"\"'^'\"\" .?^ ^*'*' \"^T^ *•' ''\"-^^ \"•''■•••'*** *'»« !\"•»''■'« •^'oui'try of ' \" ' ' Western Canada. Two rivers c(Mnbine to form \u003e main stream which empties into Tiake Winnipeg, the surplus waters of which are carritMl off by the Nelson into Hudson - . Bay. The Red River, really a part of the north to south, it has a wonderful variety Saskatchewan system, empties into the ot climate and a great range oi pi(xlucts. southern end of Lake Winnipeg Its course leads easily to the European Tae St. Lawrence is the principal",
         "Cana- A MTI'I). OK TFIK OOVTINK.VTS ''■\"\" '■=*■\"••• »' »\u003e*»\u003c''•\u003e, ..nirari.-,. t., ,1... ;•;\"\"\"••\u003e a.Ml tl..- ..,„M „f „,.. ,.,„.,,,i„„ *\"■•'\"';'' ''\"^\"^- 'Hi\" S,. I^,wr..n. „. \u003cl\"vHly towar.1 Knn...... I.„t ,|,.. ,1,..., |,„, '■\"'■♦\"',\" \u003c•••\"« Imrks. If ,s i )„.,„„| ,• ,, ,., „„, '-\".ntl.s of fh.. yea.-. Tl... (iuif ii.tovhiH, It ..nt.Ts ,s oft..,, t„iruy. J'oi'tioi.s of ,1... '■'\"\"\"\"■I \"\u003eV full of ,,,,,i.|. .„. ,•„„,, ,„„,.;, '■;\"\"\u003e■ '■\"\"\"'^»\" -i'y. .V..l«i.l...a,..|i„K \"\"\" m\u003c-nlli... ..„ v....,.is ,,.„ p, a 'tH.ns,.,„l ,„il,.s f,,„„ tl,.. M.a i,„., ,1, ,„. ;;\"\"'\"• 7\"' '\"•*\" v..ss,.is ..a„ „,|.l a„other tllollsall.i ,„iI..S to tllis .list,!,,,.... Tl..- St. Law,-..,,,.,. ,.,a..ti..ally ..............ms with J.nk» .Su|H.ri.„., tl„. l.i\u003e,s,,.si l,„.lv of f.v.sl,vvat..,-i„tl,..wo,i.|. K,.,„„„ „;,,.,.,j i'ud of this lako (h.. St. Maiy Uiv,.,- Hows into J.ak.. Hm-o,,. whi,.], „|s., ,.,.,.,.iv,.s th« wat.Ms of Lak.. Mi..hij:a., l.y tl,.. Strait of Ma...ku.a... Lak.. H,„„„, at its .so.itl,..,-.. en.J, IS .•o.„„.,.ttHi with L«k« Efi« hv the St. Clan- Kivor, St. Clai,- Lak... ai,.'l tl..- I\u003e.'t.o,t Riv.M'. Lako Erie is ,.o„,...,.te.I with Lake Ontario |,y tl,., Niapim l{iv«.. lh.j nv..,s and hik.'s n„.nti.,n,.,l alnr/e uro not, howev..,-, i',v.. f,„,„ .,l,stacl*.s to iinvisjation. Tl,., t-apids on th., St. Murv hay., to 1,« ovvivon,., hy a .louhio .-anai l^akH 8t. Ciair is v.-ry shallow an.l f,v- •lu.-nt deei...nin\u003er „f tl... .•hunud is ntves- xaiy; l.nt tla, ^ivatest fall is )),.tw....n Eii.- an.l Ontario, tl,.- En., lovel being son,., ;!((() ,-.'t ahov,. that of Ontario. The Niagara liivvv .swet.|,s down this .les\u003c-ent first hy lapids for about a mil.., an.l th..n with one mighty leap of a h„n,l,-...| ..„„] ^i^ty feet and with a g.eat roar whi.-h .-an be hear.i I for miles away, it plutig-.s over the edge of the preeipioe fonning the wori.i-fa„,e\u003cl iaiis of Niagara. One hun.lre,! tnilli.,,, tons of water pour over these falls evrv iiour, and .some \u003c,f the water is made to furnish electric p.nver by means ..f which street cars are ruu, houses p,„v:de.l with light and the uachiuery of many factories 57 \"I ii.'ighlK.ring .•iii,.s o|H.rHi,Hl. T»\u003e over- '•'■'\"\" th..s.. fails a ..anal has U^ou .-iit from liak.. Eri.. to Lak.. Onlari... Til- St. Law,..,,..,. |{iv..r l..av..\u003e Li,k.. Ontano as a b,„a.l st,...an,. in tl, ,„se ''I \"'\"'■•' »\"•\" ''\"■ l-aiilir,,! \"Lak.. ..f a li-\"-and Na„.|s\"a.„ls..v..,alloMg,api.ls 'I'-wn whi.-h lli.'M..am..,shaN..|osl,.H,t Vegetation, [n the tun.Ira .vgion. .„• the ' '\"'\"tiy l.v.ng to the n..rth-east of a line .•o.meeting th.. nmuth of tl,.. Ma.-ken.i., vith th.. ,...nt,v of the western shore of U'l.lson Hay, the lan.l in sea-son is gav with 'lowers, moss..s, li,.hens, „n.l ,|wa,-f vegeta- ti.m ot many kinds. The .summer is ^arm -....ugh t., ,l..velop these but too short to feT\u003c.w the giains an.i roots which we have f '\"!!..{ g\u003c\u003e,„l fo,. „„^„ j^,j,j j^^j^^^ ^^^ winter th,. tun.lras are o,,., g.-^at bleak \u003c1-\"T, white wil.I,...n,.ss burLl In Z^ and swept by freezing",
         "winds. 58 A HTl'DY OF THK CONTINKNTH South of th»» tuiidriut is t\\w foivnt c?ouiitiy. TIih ••hit-f fvcrjnt'eii tn\u003e^ of Hi« northern whirh oxt.'mU fiiithor Houtli hIoiik tho fouMt wcmmIh mv tli.' iv.l mi.l whit., pino ait\u003cl tli.' thuii iu the intorior. Tho ovpigi i\u003eeu treei* of Bpiuce. Other trwH jiiv th.* I»iivh, \u003cmk. uikI iim|ilt* whi\u003c-li cust fht'ii' Ifiivj'H ill th\u003c' iiiuunin. The tna|)lt' not only NuppHfs ii fine wtMxl, Imt from its Slip niapio synip an\u003cl niapit' siipii- ai'*\u003e niiiilt\". Sotnc of the wt'stt'iii forest tret's nrt' of an cnorinons sizf. tht\u003e jfiunt CaU- foriiian trot's ami sonic of tht« triH's of Biit ish ('olunil)ia tifiii^ familiar to us in |)ostal caril iiictiii-jw. j^ , . ,f, , British \u003c'oliimliia siipjdn's tho |\u003erairif th.\" north pass iiit(. the pu,.|n\u003e aul liiially dweller with the pine ami the (•♦nlar with into the mixeil \\V(kk1s of th Tioie soiitheni whii-li to hnihl his shelter, forest edKe. The (Canadian foivsts still The grass-lamls of North Ameriea have cover inueh of Quel\u003eec. New IJrunswick, already been referiv.l to when we were sp.'ak- Ontario, ami Hntish Columbia; ami the in^ of the phiins and prairies ,.r ihe (iivai numerous riveis of these provineos are Central Plain. The plains me liiijfe areas useful not only f.-r floating the h»Ks to of rollinjf jjrass-lnnds stivf.'hiiii,' from the the mills hut also in supplying the jiower head watei-s of th,. .Ma.k..nzie 1o Mexieo, by wliieh the r.iills are driven. Ottawa, On them the aii- is dear and l)raeing, th\u003c' on a river of the same name, has the water Mi].i)ly fair, and the grass li.ji. Thes.. largest saw-mills on the eontiuent. In the are the givat North Ameriean pastuies sup- winter season men go to the forest to fut the logs whieh afterwards art\u003e hauled over the snow to the river banks, where they are |iiled uj) until the rising waters of spring release them and earry them \u003clown stream. The lumber business has Immmi of very great value to the country \u003c|uite ajtail from the value of tlie timber. Lumbermen cleared the land for the far- mers following them. They made the A /umKerramp. first roads and built the first bridges, two porting millions of eattle, shwp, and horses; very valuable conveniences to those who and capable of supporting as many more came to till the laud. The prairies lie to the east of the plains",
         "ami A 8TI'J)Y OF THK roNTINKXTs pr.Hlu.-..| millions .,nM„|„.|, or wJmt lit * .\"'\"\"\" \" \"\"\"\"' '•\"■I\"\"\"\". I. nn.| ,|.. •limiity. Mouth of th.. \" \\Vh..,it Mt\" in till, rpjcioii uhout til.' nionHis of (|„. ()|,i„ Hii.l th,. Missoiin. liKliiui ••orii i.s ^T^,w n ill iiiiii„.„s« • immtiti.-H. South of flm \"\u003c'oi|i I...JI •• i„ ,i„. |,,„.^ \u003cliiMi|. \u003e,'iuiiii(iM lM\u003er.l..iiiiK th.' tiull of M..xico, li,..., xiijfnr - i-mi.. „iul ,.\u003c.tf„n «r.'ih.' inaiii priMliu-tions, ••ott..ii hfiny thti most iin|'\u003c»i\u003c\"iit. OranK«'M ainl piii.-appi.'s jrrow w.-!! in Klori.la ; oi(in\u003e,'..s, jjiap.-s, Knv:Iish wuluuts, and pniii.'s an\u003e pro.|u,.tH| in hir;.'*' iiuaiifiti.'H in Cali. foniia, (JH tli\u003c' wfst coast orth.. I'nito,! State.; jH.u-h.-s «n.i ,.,,,,s KTow to Kivat p..rft..-tio„ i„ BHtish \u003c„!,„,.- bm; «P|.l\u003c's an. ,Ih. ,,nn..i,.al fn.it -rop in Nova N-otm au.i M.tario, an.l wild fruits are found ahm.«t ..voryuhero in ('ana.Ia and the ( nitcd States \"-• \u003c'-\u003cl for ,1... i,„^,^,i^„. ,„. ^,^,. lower lands. Animals. In th.- far north we have, a '•••KK.n ot fi,r-l.,.arin\u003er ,u,in,a!s. T'„. winters \"'■\" \"•• '\"\"\u003e^' ■\"\"\u003e ■-\u003e '-'I'l tin.t .1., uniuials ;■; •■\" 't 'f-^ \"-\"'-i''^' \u003c\"• '-M .o ,,,oteet I lli'ltt li.il.. ... ' ^ I '•p-rves „. tl... world, rur.lK.arinK ..wmals Indians and whiles, n,ak...-,lM,sin;.s.,', „i w.ld-.rness ar\u003c. to he found the „• ,,.,„. '.enn,sk--ox ,he,.aril,uu,andnHn,vspee\u003eo,: '\u003e he ox. I\" the more southerly portion \"t the forest ,.onntry are various kinds of d«.r,fhelH.,r,,heheav..r.the!ynx.andth.. ;\"-\u003c\"•\"• ri'.- prairie has the l.adifer and he eoyote, and the p.verument ...,-k.s have the remnant of the o,..- nmrK-^.:,s bisuu covers on.-fifth of North Atneriea, is at iZ^^t '\"''\"'\" ^^\"f '^\"\"•\" ^^^ ^^^^ present little Unter than a .lesert. Much n e' * '\"\"\"•'' \"\"\"\" '\"'''\" \"' ''^'\"^J\" Mucli m the summer season. The prairie ha« the Thr. ,.l„l,,,J„r l^„, .,,■„„. ^,,,.,,.. ^,„,,.",
         "_„^ 60 A KTlliY OF THE (\"ONTINKNTS priiinc rliickpu, and the easlcni woods liave still a !'('\\v of flic once plentiful wild turkoy. In the Hockifs of the north-webt the l\u003ei\u003er- honi slippp nn\u003cl the giizzly l»oar are hunt«'d. Tlic livtMs and swamps of the south alionnd in allij;ators. Studs aiv found off the Alaskan p«'iiinsnla. The cod and the hcrrinfi occur in great nnnilicrs off eastern Cana(hi, the I'onner on the Newfoundland bunks and the latter in the (rulf of St. Lawrence. The various Canadian hikes and rivers ahound in fine fo some. Salmon asce'id Fraser and Cohimhia rivt spawn. Whales and wa in the Arctic Ocean, dredgeil from the muddy shores of (\"hesap\u003cake Buy. While North America has not given the rest of the world any really valuahle domestic ani- nuds, the grass - lands of our continent have ln'conie the home of milii()ns of the most useful domesticated atii- mals of the Old World. Occupations. The occupations of Noi-th America have already been suggested. In and winter in tiying to g\u003c't enough to eat, enough to wear, an\u003cl something to shelter him. In the forest country hunters, trap-pers and hnnbennen are Imsily at work in season. The work of the hunter and trapper d\u003cK*s not appear at first sight to 1m\u003e very important, but it was fhefurtraih' that nuide the Hudson's Bay Company wealthy. It was the fur trade that was so attractive to the early French settlers. I'eople in noi'thcrn countries re(iuire furs, anil furs are more and more ditlicult to obtain. On the other hand, the lumbernntn's work appears to be of very great value. Kvery village has its lumber yard, where shingles, planks nnd iK)ards may be purchased. Carloatls of hnnber are constantly moving fi-om British Cohuidjia toward the i\u003erairie countiy. Lake vessels move over the lakes hulen with thousands of feet of timber. Sawmills are situated wherever iln're is easy aci-ess to good tiinU'r, and an easy outlet for the hnnber. Largo cities in the east have their furniture fac-tories, their sash and dooi' fa\u003c'tories, and a dozen other places where lumber is nuide into the things jM'ople nee«l. The prairie o\u003c'cupa- tions and the occupations of tlio fanning coiijitry on the borders of the northeni forest.s, are those connected the tiuidras the Eskimo is engaged summer with the rearing of cattle, hoi-ses, sheep, Willi",
         "liirf-ei/t. apait l)y tho pov«'nim,.uts ..f \u003c„ir \u003c.«»iitiueiit, aii.l ..ffoi-ts ar.i l.eiiij? Tiia.le to toacli him to look to tliH soil more an\u003cl to tli.' ImntiuK ground less for liis living. Whil.\" tli.\u003e pvat majoi-ity of the Indian A STFDY OF THE CONTINENTS gl pigs, or the raising of main or l)otli Th^^^ ;„ i« «H.eupations a.e ^v^II known low ^ '^''''^''' languages, and ranging all the elate them as we sho^\"' Wl .T\"\"-'; \"\"•V'\"\", ''''' \"\"'\"^\"^^ ^^'\"'^^l \"\"^ \"' ^a\u003e- na.an to the Cunudi n tlst t! . e •. ' ^\"r T' ■'\"*'\"'\"' *^ ^''« \"-'•\" »'• 1^- Imrvestf Wl,„t wil t is ,1. \", . , ''\"'^\"'^ *\"''*^'* who dwelt in .-ities and of Camuh. r H\u003cr w uX ;; ';^ ;; : '\"-^^f -; \"^neu,t„ra, pursuits. Lan.l f * ' ^''* ' ^''i'^y »'\"-• I\"'l\"\"' IS on the re.serves set In the \",.„n, I.elt \" corn is grown and hogs are rais.^l. I„ the \".-otton belt\" the wool has to be picked from the i,od, cleared fn.JU s..eds, an.] then sent perhaps thousands ot miles away to the mills to be woven into ootton yarn and spun into i'ottou falirics. Hi)uce will not allow Us to mention all the industries of our continent. We could speak of the thousands of men at W()rk in the gold lands of the Yukon and of ^'\"^Hinu ■•^iliinjn from a tmji. \u003c'aHf(.rnin. the coal fields of the noi-th-east- ri„...v ^f fi . -•n States and Canada, the tol.ac. il,m . ZZ th ., \" T •','\"\"''\"\" \"\"\" \"\"^^'\"-^ tions s,mth of Chesai,e. ke H-,v tl,. « , liunters, the Aztecs of the Mexi- of the Atlantic auTe ^it^rZ Z/T^Til T ^\"\"\"^ ''' \"^ ^™*-' nuumfactm-ing carried ..n on n' i , .. . 1 ^\"*'' '^''''''''\"\" '\"'\"'\" ^'™\" I\"-^- -\" •\"• \"-■• --\" ■\" •-\"--- :7ir;:;i;:tr:;il;:;:;:;;:;'L\u003ef :':;: ^•' \u003c-ouId also speak of the n.-twork of railroads, some of them going across the e\u003c.ntiiient, the hun.h-eds of ocean and lake vessels, the telegraph aii.l teh-phone lines all necessary to can-yon tlu^ enormous busi-ness of the North Ameri.-an continent The People. With th\u003cj exception of the hskimo of the f.HKh-us, the whole Nortii AnuM-icaa continent was once occupiwl by Indiaus. These were of many tribes, ^i^exxk. nvers as we now use them. NVith.T had ma. e mu.-h of a sii, ss in the taming of wild animals for food or f,,,. w.rk Yet Loth peoples excelle.l in tilling the ground, roa,l making, t.-mph' building, and in pic-ture writing. I„ other j.arts of North America there are evi.len.-es of ,„onnd« mines, and rock cities, all pointing to a won.lertul a.lvanre among some of the native American",
         "peoples.",
         "i* In hi8 hunt for wealth, Cortez, the Spanish leader, and his followers plundered and de- «troyed the Aztec \u003c-onntry and burned every record they coul.l find in oi-der that the peo{.le might for^'et their own religion and take the foi-eigij religion insteail, Ameri.u is largely peopled l.y the descend-ants of the early colonists sent out by the various Euroi)ean nations, and by immi-grants who have come more recently fi-om across the Atlanti\u003c-. The population is gieatest along the Atlantic coast. Why ? English is the general language spoken, but Frencii prevails in Quebec, and Spanish in Mexico, Central America, and the West Indies. Why ? Within i-ecent years there has been a great migration of people from Europe. Some of the new-comers have settled in the cities and towns, but gieat numbers have made their homes in the rich farming lands of Western Canada and the Western States. In that iwrtion of the United States bor-dering the Gulf of Mexi. o, and also in the West Indies and in Central America— in other words, in the regions whei-e a hot chniate makes it difficult for Europeans to canyon (!onf luous lal)or— there are gi-eat numljei-s of colored people, mostly descended from slaves l)rought from Africa in order to work on the soutlicrn plantations. The early Spaniards who came to Mexico and to Central Ameiica married with the In-dians; and their d.'scendants, known as Mexicans, are now the most powei-f ul pcoi)le in these regions. QUKSTION.-:. 1. What was the first part of North America visit.-.! l.y white men '( 2. Why is huntinif important in tho „..rtli ( What animals are hunt.HJ\u003e J. tiiid out wljat y.,u .-an of the HudBon Jlay Co' 4L Who were the first to plant clonics i„ eastern Uana\u003claf In the eastern .St^ites? .5. Make a meiiiorv map of North Ai„..,i.ra an.l mark carefully on it (a) the ,-na.t wRtei, ami peninsulas .t.ferred to in the wxt . [o) the highlands and the lowlands ; (c) the ndge separating the northern from the southern A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS fc '*i.^ V u, \"?■■ ***•\"\"• ^- 0» \"-\"ther map tun.T™l Z'*^'*\"^'' ■\"\"' '°'^'*°'l-\u003e »»«« rive™, the uitSl^r ' \"\"\"'T ^\"\"''-''\"\"Is. and «^ test »uit«l for oranges, apples, cotton, and corn. 7. Fin.l by using the map scale how far the mouth of the Mississippi 18 from the mouth of the Mackenzie Nt.wf..^.,„an.l from Vancouver, an.l Bering StTah fro... HonHa. 8 On a small outline show the tu.ns of he wi„.ls most common to the cntinent. 9 _ DesclH, a northern forest, a southern cotton field a sugar hush. chI flshi.ig .,„ the «a..ks, and rounding up cattle .m a western ranch. 10 What thTthnl \"\"^i' ^l\"ir'-\"'\"'^P\"'\"^ in di«Ht..m to the thr.-e c.«ists of .South A.neri.a f 1 1 In what Name Z \"\"\".7\"^!' ''\" '\"\"'\"\"'^ \"\"'\"\"*»•\" --ange? Name thes.. }■\u003e. What South American river is Sti'\" *\",»!- Mississippi in p.„itio„ and \"n the riv^orS^urh'^f ''\"'?''^'\"''\"*\"'•■'»«\"*• '•■'• What nver \"f South America is nearly in the same loca-tion as the Hi. Lawrence? How^loes it .liffer Z the St Lawrence? 14. What month is the month of coldest weather in Argenti,.a ? 1.5. If wheat J tTthe\"r'\"T '■' \"\"\"\"\"'\"'• ■■' -hat m^nth 16 WhS I'Hrvest come on in .South America? 10. What continents are sepanited from North America by the Atlantic ? By the Pacific? 17. What ,«rt of North A..,..ri\u003c-,i lies nearest Kurope? Asia? !«. Desc-ihe a .kv wUh Hrap ^;j, •\"' \"'' V\"\" '\"«^'''\" '\"\"'*^ \u003e\"'»ti..g seal off Alaska; and dr.vmg logs on a C.ma.lian river CANADA Canada our own land, stretches across the northern half of North America. So wide IS our country that it takes the greater part of a week to cross it by the fastest trains, and It is .so long that weeks would have to be spent on train, canoe, and dog sleigh were one to travel from Winnipeg to the mouth of the Mackenzie. Canada is so vast that one might spend a lifetime wandering over It without seeing it all. It is almost as big as the whole of Europe; and the British Islands, the mother-land, might easily be packed away into a corner of one of the great provinces. Canada is so roomy that there is plenty of space for millions of P«op!o, a.l of whom may make a good living provided they have no fear of soiling",
         "their 64 A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS History. South Amenca was explored and annexes] bj- Spain and Portugal; Cen-tral Araencji by Spain ; an\u003cl North Amoiuu largely by Biitain, France, and Holland. Tlie St. Lawrence Kiver was the entry which the French exploretl, and the St. Lawrence Valley l)ecanie the site of the earliest Tiench settlements. Quebec was founded hy Cham- plain in l(i08, ai;d his countrymen made their way up the river to the tJreat Lakes, then across to the Mississippi, and down this stream to the Gulf of Mexico. The Dutch had settlements along the Hudson River in the present State of New Yoi-k, but these Indian* of tlie Ttimpthean Tribe settlements soon passed into the possession of the British, who from 1587 onward had made colonies at several points along the coast between th\u003c' St. Lawi-ence and Floiida, and had, in time, come to o\u003c'cupy the low-lands between tlie Atlantic and the Appala-chians. CJonfiicts between the British and the French took place, the result being that Canada passed forever from the hands of the original settlers into the hands of the British. British settleme:,;.' giadually occupied the Ohio and Mississippi Valleys. British set-tlements were also made across the lakes in the countiy now known u«i the Dominion of Canada. In 1776 the oiiginal colonies rebelled againstthe mother-land, gained their inde[iendence and formed a nati(m of their own, the rnitcd States of Amenca. Cana-dians, both French and British, refused to join in this conflict, remained loyal to the British flag, and at the close of the rebellif)n were joined by many south people who, un-willing to join in the revolt, gave up their jill and came to live in Canada wh\"re they were known as the United Emi)ire Loyalists. The Loyalists sfftle\u003cl in Nova Scotia, New Bmuswick, and Ontaiio, and ])efore many y\u003c'ars had i)assi\u003e\u003cl great num\u003e\u003eers of people from the British Islands came to make their homes in Canada. The present provinces of No /a Scotia and New Brunswick, originally united under tlie name of Acadia, were acfjuired by Britain in 1713. Cape iiieton Island, now a part of Nova Scotia, and Prince Edward Island, still a se[»arate province, became British in 1763, together with the great region com-prising tiie St. Lawrence Valley and the region lying north of the (Jreat Lakes. The Central part of Canada eai-ly passed mto British hands, for toward the close of the seventeenth century the Hudson's Bay Company was formed to trade in the fm-s from the forests and plains of the interior. This company held the land for u[)ward of two hundred years, or until it was sur- i-endered to the Dominion. Manitoba was created a province in 1870, and Saskat-chewan and AHierta became pro\\nnces in 19f)5. British Columbia was settled much later than most of the other provinces. Possession was taken of the coiust portions as eariy as 17{)0, but there was little immigration until the discoveiy of gold about 1855. Canada at fii-st was merely a number of scatte!-wl settlements, widely separated. In time provinces were organized, and in 18(i7 four of them, namely Quei\u003eec, Ontario, Nova Scotia, ai.d New Brunswick were",
         "united under one Governn,.„t a,..l culled the Don„n.onofCana.l«. To-.,ay tho Island of ^.•^^fom,dlan,l and a narrow strip alu-.y tl... Bu.sh term.Myi,, th.. north of o„r ......i. nenftlmt are not indu.Ld in th,. Dominion. As Canada is a British CV.Io„v, our sov.Mv,jrn ,s tho sovereign of tho B.-itish M»p.re. Om(!overnor-(},M..ral. who lives at Ottawa, the capital of our eount.-v, is the sovcr.MK.i's representative. Canada\"collects her own taxes, spends her own mo.iev. an.I 'N m taet, mistress of all her own resJnrces at.d one of the world's freest and (.est conn- tries. Position and Coastline. With the ex.ci- tiou of Alaska to the north-west, and Xew- Nmndland to the oast, Cana.la occupies the \"..rthern half of the (Vntiuent of Xorth An.enea. ('an you niention anv disadvan-tages . I ne t.. such a posi.iou ? In what ways woul. Cana.la l.ei„,p,„ve.l were our counti-y one thousand miles or so far\u003eher s\u003c.uth\"' W ouid anything he l..si, d,, vou think • The (_ana.han coast bor.lers on tlnve i^reat o.-eans' Aame the.se oceans and locate each The \"asten, coast is not far from Euro.w., „„, natural maiket, an.I a pa.t of the west coast IS quite near the eastern coast of Asia ■ 1 onit out any advantages that should conie from such neighl«.-ship. South ,.f Cana.la IS the. splendid English-speaking country of he Lnited State.s. AVhat results should attend this fa\u003c't ? The coast- line of Canada is very irregular Ih.\" n.,rth coast is ice-houn.l for the givater part ot the year, but magnificent harhoi-s,,,, the two more important o.-eans give everv advantage to trade. Some of the Atlanti\",. harbors are closed f.,r a few months each winter by ice. The Pacific harbors are always open, an.I these harboi,. are l\u003eound to be.-ome more and more valuable a= the .country is developed and as our tm.le with I the lauds across the Pa\u003c;ific is increased A 8Tn)Y OF TJiE COxVTINEXTS 65 Many large islands lie off the northern -astof Canadn Of what use are these! Acwfoun.llan.l guai.ls the (Julf of the St l.twren,.e on the northern si.le, while Ca,,e li.eton an,l Prm.-e Ed war.! Islan.l guar.1 its southern side. .At the entran.-.- of the Ht Lawren..e Hiverli..s the I.slan.l of Anth-osti.' rhe .-hief islands on the Pa.-ific coast ar*. \\ an.-..uver an.I the(^uvu Charlotte Islands .uar,hng th.MM.tran.-e of Hu.lson Bav, the \u003c anadian Me.literiane«n, are tl... p.Miinsulas otMeyillean.l Labimlor. Connecting this Stnit ' '\"*'' '''^^^^'\"'♦i^'Ofeaii is HiuLson N.-utoun,llm..lis separa.e,l fn.m Cana.la ^ H.-1 le Isle Strait, an.I f,„m Cape Breton .sian.l by the Strait of CalH^t. The Strait of Cans., separates CajK. Breton from tl... peninsula of Nova Scotia, while (^u.-en Charlotte S.,un.l, (Jeorgia Strait, an.I th« Mrai ot .Tuaii .le Fuca .separate Vancouver Island tr.\u003em the main lan.l of the ..outinent. ^ he important cap.\u003es are-Race on New- foun.llan.I, and Sable .,„ Xova Scotia Surface Tlie surface of Canada may be eons,.le,.e.l as falling into five well-mai'k«l dnisions. Th..se.are the Acadian \"git: he St. Lawrence lowlamls, the Lanrentiu a K'hlands, the Central plain, an.l the Moun tani region. As these features will be the easier underst,x,d when we come to c-onsi.ler he .separate proviices, it may be bett.-r a h^i. step t.\u003e think of rho Canadian sui-fa...' i^bng into three g,.at..gions, an eastent ■\"••i of 1..W mountains, a great central plain a.Kl a w,.stern area of high mountains ' tamula has one of the great mountain \u003c-l;ani.s ot the work!, in„„ense highland\" with huge s,iow-.\u003eappe., peaks and migh'y gla.-.ers Jt has also thou.sands of .Jare ;--otteitile plains, andthegi-eatestfr: out ide of the tr.,pics. The structure of the and Ls sunp e and a few minutes' study of he map w,ll .^^ke it ch-ar. Beginning ft the east there is a region made up ot'",
         "a 66 A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS suceet^sion of uneven ridgee, divided by river- valleys, lakes, and swamps. In the southern parts and in tlio valleys, especially in that of the St. Lawivuee, there is a fine rich soil and a heavy giowth of timt»er. In the region exteuduig from Labrador westward to the Great Liik»'s and northwaid to Hudson Bay there is more or less forest growth and con- sideralile waste land. Nfxt come the Great Central Plains, the region of the prairies. This is one of the finest giuin-firowiiig areas in the world, and as yet only the southeni edge of it has been oi»ene\u003cl up by the railways. It ranges in elevation from about 8()0 feet at the east to over .1,(Xin feet at the foothills of the Rockies A ijlaoirr in liritUh Coliwi/jui. The third division is the mountain region, some four or live hundred miles in width. This is a vast area of parallel mountain ridges enclosing deep and fertile river- valleys, and coutuining numerous snow-clad peaks, immense glaciers, mountain lakes, waterfalls, and canons. Climate. The Canadian climate, like the Canadian surface, is varie\u003cl. On the west the warm moisture-laden winds of the Pacific are chilled by the mountains and made to yield the abuufhint lainfall of the British Columhiiiji ociiiHf aui\\ to store, up viist sup-plies in the many glaciers of the (Canadian Rockies. The eastern section, or that part of Canada occupying the St. Lawrence River basin and the Atlantic coast, has a great range of temperature and usually an abun-dant rainfall during the summer months. The central plain rises in three great steppes from a little east of the Red River to the foothills of the Rockies. The first stepjHj is the Red River valley. The second covers the western half of Manitoba and the eastern half of Saskatchewan. The last steppe extends from central Saskatchewan to the Rockies. As these steppes represent an increasing elevation or altitude, tlie tem-perature will also vary with the elevation. The Alberta steppe, though the highest, has its winters modified by the Chinook winds, warm south-west winds which come over the mountains in the winter and the early spring, and tuuke it possible for stock to gi'aze in these regions during the entire wintei'. The whole of this area may be said to have an extreme climate, that is, a cold climate in winter and a warm climate in summer. In the far north there are practically but two seasons, a long, dreary, almost endless winter, and a short, brilliant sunnne •. For eight months of the year all vegetable life is hidden beneath the snow, and the only traces of animal life are often but the footprints of the caribou, the fox, the musk-ox, and the polar bear. Drainage. The princit)al Canadian river is the 8t. Lawrence, which drains the five great lakes. Name these. The St. Lawrence valley is not broad like that of the Missis-sippi, hut it exten ' far into the land, and in this way provides a splendid highway for the country ; while its deep and broad lakes are among the gi'eat navigable watei*s of the world. It is said that more freight is carried upon these lakes in the seven or eight summer months than is brought into London, Englatid, in a whole year. An almost endless fleet of all kinds of vessels moves over these iidand waters,",
         "carrying thou8aud8 of iKx,i.le, millions o£ tons of coal copper and iron ore and general raerohandi^' millions of feet of l.„„ber, and millions^f bushels of wheat and com A strange feature of the St. Lawrence River channel ,s seen in the pi unpcs taken between the head waters and the Gulf. The St. Lawrence Lusin is really fonne.l of three great terraces or steppes lyin^. one above the other. The uppennost ternu-e is Lakl Supenor whose level is some 600 feet alK)ve «.atoftheaulf. From this lake to Uke S\"or/'r'^r''^™-'^'-\u003e«i.sadro; of 20 feet. The sec-ond drop to the level , ;^7*' ^*''*\"\"» i« \"l\u003eout 300 feel, and the las drop between Lake Ontano and the At a„t.c Ocean is about 150 feet, this drop takmg place m a series of rapids The principal tributary of the St Law-rence IS the river Ottawa, lyin^ between the provinces of Ontario and Queic \" Ihe Mackenzie River has alre.vdv been descnbed. The comn.ercial in.j.nL, e o th\u003es unmense stream so far has been con- North. What ,ts value „my Ije in the future no one at present can foresee, svsten. JJT^'«''«^«» \u003e^ the great river West K I\" IT''*\" '■\"*'*•'\" ''^ ^h« Canadian West. Saskatchewan is an Indian word meaning a rapid stream, and it is well named Rapuis near its mouth and sand bars along the channel interfere with the navigation of the river; but a grow ng country and a more careful attenfion oJ the pait ot the government will help t^ i^ttriror\"\"^'-^\"^^'^*^^''-\"^- mZ\u003e ^^ ^^^' '\" *^« P\"\"\"Pal stream in Manitoba. This river rises south of the Canadian boundary and flows northward through the fertile Red River valleHnto the soufhftpn on/i «* T .1.- TTT. . ^ '\"\"^^^ A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS 67 IL 7«ked Assiniboine, which ri.^8 in th^HH. ^;;^*^'* ••*^''° «\"d joins the Red at nW J «f„^^ \"'.•\"I'eK. Being a north-flowing the dfficulty mentioned in connection with the Mackenzie. What is this T ( Wted with the Saskatchewan system are the 8o-calle\u003cl Manitoba lakes. Lake I „Tr w\"\"P*'*\" \"\"\" ^\"\"^^ Winnipegosis, wfh .^^\"\"'r^\"^'^ i\" turn is coint.ed wth Lake ^V.nnipeg. The common out-let is the kelson River, flowing into Hudson The Manitoba lakes run parallel to e.icl. othei, have as a geneml mie low shores and are leaked upon as the deeper hoilows at the bottom of an old lake called Agassiz, whose watei. flowed southward into the Mississippi River. Those who seem to know the story of this lake tell us that a g.eat glacier covered the whole northern portion ot the Great Central Plains, th™, the southern edge of this ice-sheet at one time reached the mouth of the Missouri, of ice ba.T«l the natural outlet of the Red River valley and cau.sed an overflow to ake place down the valley of the Missis- sipPMuid that when the ice finally disap-peared the lake subside.! to what we now •see about us in Manitoba Plants and Animals. The tundra region of Canada^ with its low shrubs and its mosses, hchens, and wild flowers, is com-monly spoken of ns the Barren Lan.ls, a region stretc-hmg from the Arctic coast to the forest country. The Canadian forest area IS a great belt running right across the country from ocean to cKsean south of the tundras. The best timber comas from the section, where the importance of the St Jjawrencft anA ;*„ ... tu , — '-».,„c ivou niver vallev into aa»ti^„ u , •-'uwwy eastern he southern end of L,\u003ekeWim\u003eip\u003c..p\"^ S!^\"' \"\"\"I !\"» imporUice of ,he St *e we,. .,. K«, «,., ,.^,.,.^, . - .rzr tji -r.r sr",
         "j.,1 68 A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS valuuble ('aiiiidiau fur-bearers are found in more or lews abundance. Indeed, the earliest stoiy of the ( 'anadiau West is the story of tlK\u003e t lade in fui-s. To-day tlie whole country is covered by s\u003c'ores of truding posts, each tiie natural centre of a fur disfiict, and all in toiicii with certuin central stations from wliicli the furs are most readily shipped to Europe. It was tliesc «'arly fur tradei-s who first «\u003ex])l(ii-t'd north-western (Canada. \u003c'ana(lian fuis and forests are iM'Ooinin.s: scan-erand scarcer, and thinner and thinner. The careless handUiig of fire and the presence of great transcontinental lines of railways r ntt Scene in Britith Columbut. have helped to lessen the forests, while sense-less slaughtering without any thought of possible extinction has killed off the buffalo and sadly redu\u003c'ed the beaver colonies. The same thing may be said of our supply of lake fish, and of our game animals Vnd birds. We have been using up two of the most valuable resources of oui- land veiT thoughtlessly. Something, however, is being done on a small scale to preserve our animal life and our fish. Forest preserves where animals may find a safe retreat have been set apart heie and there. Fish hatcheries, by replenishing the supply in our stream.- and lakes, have done something toward checking the wasteful slaughter of fish. Both the East and the West have splen-did fishing grounds. Tod, herring, and lobstei-s are the most imiH\u003ertant i)roduet8 of the eastern coast waters. In the west- em rivers salmon are num«'rous, and fine halil)ut is caught off some of tlie western islands. Agriculture, Lumbering, and Fishing. Although agriculture is the chief occupation of the jteople of (,\"ana\u003cla, oidy a very small part of the land is under i-iiltivation. In the north and north-east the climate is too cold; around Hudson Bay the hard rock is un-favorable ; in the west the mountains largely prohibit the cultivation of the soil; never-theless vast areas remain which may he brought under the plough. As the railways extend and workei-sai-e sui)plied, the amount of cultivated land will increase. This will be greatest in the region covered by the prairie i)rovinces of Manitoba, Saskat-chewan, and Alberta. In the end the most of the land l)etween the Great Lakes an\u003cl the Rockies will iMVonie productive. Whei-ever the rainfall is light, improvements in the method of cultivation will make n]\u003e for this delieiencj*. (Jilts aie grown wherevei- wheat can grow. Fruit, especially apples, is gi-own east and west. Almost everywhere daily farming is carried on, cheese being an important i)ro- duct, and gi-eat numl)ers of both sheep and cattle ai-e reared on the drier western plains. The forested jmrtions ajnount to nearly one-third of the total area \u003c.: Canada, and in nearly all these, lumbering is an industry of veiy great importance. The shallow waters of the, Atlantic coast jneW gi-eat (piantities of fish, cod being par- ticulu, \"y valuable. The Canadian lakes are well stocked with whitefish and other fishes, and there are large establishments in British Oolnmhia where .«almon are canned. Mining and Manufacturing. Coal is found in great quantities in Nova Scotia,",
         "Western All...rt.., «,ul i„ British Colunil.iu. Iron ore «mimHl«mrth.M.oali„ iK.th Nova S\u003c.otia amlBntish Col„,„l,ia. What will tl.is moan to(aim,hi.' (}„|,i is vvi.lHy .listrilMU...n.m IS .spenally pHwhiftiv,. i„ th,. w.-sfMi, hi-h- lan.ls „, the region kiK.wn as th.\" Kl.,i„nki. Manufartiirin^ is yot i„ i,s i„,a„,.v. Th|. savvuiK \u003c.t f i,„l„.,-. f h,. ,„„ki„s; „r w.MMh.'n arthh-s, the inakin« of pajM-r p„|,., ,h.. ,„»»„- t«\u003c-t..r.. \u003c.f i-ather an.l l.-afher k,„„1.s of oott..,. ami wouihm ^i Is, and the makinir oi n.a.hin.Mv of various kin.ls, ar.- at ore- sent the industries ofKr-atesi in.,.ortan.'e \\\\ hen iM.o,.Ie lived ni..st]y in small viMa^es as they did m early times in Canada, everv tami y prndu-ed most uf th,. f,,„i ,„„i ^.,„„;. lUK that wi,s n....ded at home, ami few thine, had to he b..ii-ht from others. Th.' farmers m.s..d «rain, veiretables, sheep, eattle, and hoKs The wo.nen drie\u003cl the fruits, ,„a,ie the hutter and the cheese, eured the meat for winter use, an.l ,„a.le .-L.thing from the wo.,1 of the she..p. As the .-.mntn- has \u003clevel.,pe,l, mu..h ..f this has h,...u ^^veu up, and o.^aniz.'\u003cl in.lustries ar.- now supplvin-r what the fanner's wife at .,„e time n,ad,; f.,; the househoi.l. Certain regions have In^n found iH-tter than ..thers f„r a.^rieulture, or forgraziUK, orf.,rnianufaet„rinjrorfor other ooeupat.ons. Eastern Cana.ln is I.eeomin.' more an.l m..re a mauufa\u003c.,unn.- regi.,,,\" the praines are Letter suited to a.-rioultuiv a^d to stoek-raising: the wooded .listricts ot British Cniumbia an.l Northern Quebec to Jumlterinfr, and so on. Hut th.. stores nf coal ami iron, and the -vesen.H. ot so ,„uny rapids an.l falls pro- • mg at ..n.-e the materials an.l the j.ower It to a time in the near future when \u003c auada will take a place among the great manufacturing nations of the worl.l Transportation and Commerce. The .lr.)W7i- e.1 e„ast.« ot «tstem and ^^estern Cana.la affoi^d many fine harboi-s. The western shores are ice-fi-ee, but the only two po.ts A HTIMJY OF THE CONTINENTS «9 whi.-h hav., as yet lieen .leveloiKMi aiv Van- .•ouv..r ami Vi,.foria. On the east, the mouth \"t tlie .St. Lawren,.e is I,l,M-ke.l bv i.-e in the winter s..«s.,n, an.l Halifax, a\" line oimji. Iiarl«,r, b....om..s, f.,r the winter, the prin.'i- pal .\"ast.Mn |M)rt of the D.miinion. For the remain.h.r ..f the year, however, the great \u003c'ntiy isth.. St. Lawrence. \u003c'\"ii\"\u003cla is w.ll situate.! for the ex-.-hange \"I K»\u003c-U with other parts of the worl.l. \u003c'oods h.n.hMl „u „ur .shores are readily ;;\"'■';'; ■';» ;\"\"l ^^\"••^t by the St. Lawrence, the Oreat Lakes, an.l tl... numerous ( 'anadiau \u003e\"'l»«y lin.-s. (;.,o.l,s for .-xport just as ■■•'\"'lil.v lin.l .-onveyan.-e to lake an.l o..ean IK.rfs to Im. ,.arri..,l to th. m..tner-...,untry iH' I nit..d S.at..s, Australia, South Africa,' \u003c hiiia, and Japan. ( 'ana.la is a piospemus an.l growing hm.l, alfin.lot law-abi.ling ..itiz,Mis. The Cana- • lian p,...p|,. hav.. the nam.' ..f b.'ing stiir.lv iva.ly to .lo har.l w... k, an.l willingto .lepe.i.l uix.n tli.'ms..Iv..s. The .-ountiv has mvat '■.'sou.c,.s in fish, farm pr.,.lu,.t's, ,„inerals, and timh.'r. Sin.-e the .,j,„ni„j, „,, „f AVestern \u003c 'ana.la tlie .-ountrv has b.-.'u settle.lso rapi.lly with pe.,pl.. from Eastern ana.la, th.- Cnit..,! States, Europe, and even with p..o,.l,. f,o„, a.-r.,ss the Pa.-iti.-, that tar-s...Mng Cana.lians beli.'ve that in a few years theiv will b,- „H\u003ere j.-ople living west tl.»neast..fLak..Sup..ri..r. East.'m Cana.la 18 growing rapi.lly in the line of nn.nufac- t.mng i)H-W,.stwilIneHltop,uvhasea great many things, but wh..re ? The United State, to ti... south has many things to .sell that prauie Cana.la req„ir.^s. The United States iias aLso railr..uls le^uling into our eountry. Euro,^ als., wishes as great a market hei-e as ,\u003eossible. With whom .shall we .leal f It we wish to build up our own -ountiy and make of it a givat nation ; if w.' wish to b.n.l together Canada to the E^t, and (anada to the West, we shall do all we f-an to make it easy for the West to",
         "trade TO A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS with the EjiHt. Thn ffi-eat Catiatliaii railways rannitiK from the went to the eant have b\u003c\u003een built for tlte piirpoHe of biiniuig East and West together, and tiiey have RU(\u003ece«Mle\u003cl in this letter than anything else could. The Tanadian Pacific, the Canadian Northern, and the Ornnd Tnink Pacific have done and are doing much to maintain the one-ness of (.'anada from the Atlantic to the Pacific. We shall now make a special study of each of the Canadian provinces, and shall learn what the people of each are doing ; how com- mer«'e is carried on, and why some parts of our cotuitry are likely to lie better settled than other {uirts. Qi'KSTloNK. 1. Make a map of Cana\u003cla and mark in the lltickit'M, tlio LaurentianN, thn Ci'iitral Plain, the thnH\u003e great river syHteiiiH, the lurKest islandH to the east and t\u003c\u003e the west, HiKlwin Hay, .rames Bay, the Gulf of Ht. Lawn-nce, Labrador, the nameH of the Great Lakes, the nine proviiiees, and the positionH of Alaitka, the Unitttd States, Iceland, and Greenland. 2. Why are the pruvinceH uf Canada Htriinj; out along southern Canaila ? Which is the largest and wliich the Nuiallext of the pnivinces f 3. Name from memory the provinws in onler, beginning with Nova Seolia. 4. Do the same, Ix'ginning with British Columbia. 5. Which piMvince is the fifth from the tast and the fifth from the west ! 6. Whii'h province lies midway between east and westi 7. Name in their onler the lakes of the Mackenzie River, lieginnitig up the river. 8. Name the Manitolia lakes, beginning with Dauphin Lake ; with Lake Winnipeg. 9. Measure the distance from Halifax in Nova Scotia to Vancouver City in British Columbia, and the distance of Winnipeg from the mouths of the Nelstm and the Mackenzie. 10. Describe a trip by boat from Fort William on Lake Huperior to Montreal. 11. What and where are Ottawa, Halifax, Winnipeg, Great Bear, Yukon, Fraser, and Belle Isle ) * THE CANADUN PROVHTCES When Great Britain, our mother-country, lost the Uuiteti States, Canada remained British. For a long time there were several separate colonies or provinces, each having its own government. In 1867, on the first day of July, a union of provinces took j)lace and the Dominion of Canada was formed. To-day there are in this union the provinces of Nova Scotia, F*rince Edward Island, New Brunswick, Quelnn', Ontario, Manitoba, Sas-katchewan, AU)erta, and British Columbia, each having a local government to look after the affairs of the province, and all having a central government at Ottawa, the capital of the Dominion, to superintend the general business of the whole countiy. Ii«'sides the provinces there are what are calle\u003cl territories; such regions as the Yukon and the North-West Territories, areas at present munnge\u003cl by the government of the Dominion. * Pupils at this sUige should be given a fairly complete account of the character, resources, etc., of their ouii prorinee. A map on the bluckboanl is suggested. /inti»h loari/iip* at anchor in Halifax harbor. Nova Scotia (New Scotland). The pro-vince of Nova Scotia is made up of the j)en- insula of Nova Scotia and the neighboring i.sland of Cajie Breton. Cape Breton is sep-arated from the peninsula by Canso Strait, and almost divided by the long Atlantic inlet known as Bras d'Or Lake, i.e., arm of gold. Nova Scotia proper is sepanite«l from New Brunswick by the Bay of Fundy and from Prince Edward Island by Northumberland Strait, and joine\u003ci to New Brunswick by the Isthmus of Chiguecto. This province is about 320 miles long, by from 60 to 100 mile.s w^ide, and is, with the exception",
         "of A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS H i the inland proviiio*. to tho north, the Hmallext of the proviuceH. The coast line in 8oine 1,500 miles lonjf, ami contaiiiH a great many bays and harl)orf\u003c, tlie majority of which are vei-y iiMeful for navigation. A watershed nun through the whole length of Nova Sctiu. The slope fa.ing the Atlantic is in general i.H'ky und infertile, and itH hroken nn-ky uplands are covenni by many small stivains and lakes. The sloj^. facing the Bay of Fun.ly and the Onlf of Ht. Lawrence is on the whole fertile. Thin sloiK^ consists „f ,,,|lin\u003ef hills covere\u003cl with hardwoo\u003cl. In the north, these hills arc \u003c-alled fl« CnlM-quid Monntains and they extend from the isthmus to (ape Cunso. Xortherti ( 'ape Breton is mountainous. The southern part is low and level. No idea can be fonncd of tiie In-auty and the fertility of the interior from the b.)ld and barren api)i'ar- ance of tiie sea coast. From the long an\u003cl narrow character of the province it is easily seen that there are no rivers .,f any ^reat size. The Nova Hi'otian streams, however, are many, their mouths as a rule fortn gi-eat haibors, and their swift currents i»oint to the presence of abundant water power. The princi{)al livers are the Annujiolis flowing into the AnnaiM)lis Basin, an aim of the Bay of Fundy, and the Shubenacadie flowing into Minas iJasin, also connected with the same bay. The interior contains many fine stretches of agricultural land where cattle, hay, oats, apples, and potatoes are raised for the markets of Great Britain mm the United States. The land bordering the head of the Bay of Fundy contains fertile areas j pro-tected by dikes which enable the farmers to iiTigate these sea meadows and yet prevent them from being drowned by the high tides. The chief industries are farming, fishing. n Nova S\u003c'otian ships and sailors are found in every great world port and on every great ftea. Tho Annapolis Valley in Nova Kcotia produces some of the finest apples in the world. In this locality fogs and north-eastern storms are k.'pt \u003c.tF l.y forest-covered hills, ('old and late springs j.revent extra W(mm1 bring formed, while the r^hort autumn sea.son prevents a waste of sap. The dry climate is favorable to the ri|)emng ami handiin- of the fruit, and the mark \u003c of the Unihl .States and Oreat Britain are always open and eager to ol»tain the crop. Coal and iron are found on the main land ami on ('ais\u003c Bn'ton Island, and in both places are either on or near navigaiile water. Tho island Held is about Sydnev, and the peninsiUar field along NorthlimlsMland Strait and nf Pictou and Spiinghill, where the coal seams are from twenty-five to seventy-five feet thick and the coal of excellent qiudity. Cod, herring, and lobsteis are the most important fish products, but shad, nuickerel, and had.lock are all plentiful. Tho chief fishing centres are Yarmouth un\u003cl Lunen-burg, whirh are never frozen, and which are conveniently situated for e.\\jK)rting tiie fish to Brazil, the West In.lies, an.l to Euroije. The Nova Scotian fisjicries jield from six to eight million dollars' worth a year, and employ 14,000 boats an.l ships and over 30,000 men. What a fine Marine Resen-e when we shall own a (^anadian N avy The chief manufacturing industries are :~- Sugar refining, tanning of leather, the mai facture of furniture, agricultural implemeuts, boots and shoes, cottons, wooUens, and the gi-eat iron and steel products of Sydney, Glasgow, and Londonderiy. Nova Scotia was first settled by the .••,,. , 1^' — ^' i-.\u003c^»u, ,.:i,-\u003cMin, y/as nrsT, settled n* thft aming,lumbenng, and manufacturing. The French, and fonned a part of the ^Uon fores s supply an abundance of timber, and described as Acmlia, that is, pie u MUn ship building IS earned on at many places, its conquest by BriSin in ITlf^eat",
         "num 72 A HTl'DY OF THK CONTINENTS Ih\u003e!-« of S«'ot.'li, Iri»«h, ati\u003cl Kiurlisli H«.tt|prH fl\u003cMk««l ill Kiiil jCHVo it tilt* imine wliicli if now Im'uis, viz.. Nova H\u003c'oiift, or Ni-w Scut laud Oil til.' .•iixtfiii const of ('a|M' Breton Imlaml aip tli»\u003e niiiiN of til.' onct\" famous htroiiKhold of N»\u003ew Fraiii'«\u003e, the forti»-sH of Lotii\u003ehun;. In the Miiias Masjn wo have the I.niitl of EvaiiKeliiie. Directly wont h of Cajie llretoii is a low, Hainly ishiiul, Sahk- l»lainl, iiott^l for its wild ponieH ami it^ damjerous jM\u003esi- tioii. Many vesHels iiave Imm'u wrecl\u003c»Hl on JtM coast, an\u003ci men are Htationed on the isijuKl to jfivo iii\u003el to any that may he shi|iwrecke\u003cl. Halifax, tlie capital of tliis province, is situated on Halifax harlMir. Lines ..f steam-ships comie\u003c-t it with th.- mothei-hmd and with the United States, while the Inter- colonial Railway connects it with St. John, QuelMH', un\u003cl Montreal. The lieauty and safety of Halifax harlM)rare well known; of comnxKlious size, well sheltenMl from storms, oiHMi dnriniuf the entire year, deep enoujrh to float the largest ships built, and lai ire enoujjh to shelter at one time the greatest navy in the World. Tli.\u003e city stands on the western side of the iidet, and i.s built on tlie slopes of a hill. It is strongly fortitii'd and ganisonwl by a leKimeut of Camidian troops. In the summer time the inlet is alive with pleasure boats. The city is beau-tiful when seen from an elevation, and pic-turesque when viewe\u003cl from the water. No wonder that Uh 40,0(K) inhabitants are proud of this splendid entrance to a splen«lid country. Other towns of importance are Sydney, noted for its coal trade and for its iron aiid steel works; Yarmouth, noted for its fishinj? interests and shipping trade; and Truro, noted for its Normal School and for its rich farming surroiuidings. He- Brunswick. New Brunswick, lying north-west of Nova Scotia and south of Quebe\u003c;, was originally a part of the French Acadi.. In 171.'l the country pjissed into the hands of the British, and on the conclusion of the revolutionary war l)etwpen the lJnite«l States and (heat Britain, the United Empire hoyjdisls. who rather than give up their Hiitish c\u003c.nii,.etiou ajid Inn-omn citizens of the United States, left their New England homes anil wtthnl, some in New Brini\u003ewick and some in other provinces of t'ana\u003cla. Thi\u003e province is roughly s.|uare-sha|HHl with (Quebec on the north, the State of Maine on the west, the Bay of Fundy on the south, an\u003cl the Onlf of St. Lawrence, or its western arm. Uhaleur Bay, on the east nn.i half the north. T/ie mifei/iont at St John. X.lt. The surface of New Brunswick may be said to l)e one of rolling i.Iains and hills. Theie are no mountains. The southern .side is protected l)y ridges of rock some :i() miles wide, and from the south-west corner a similar roi'ky ridge stretches to the northern bay. The.se two lidges foi-m an immense V, and l)etween them the countrj' is a wide. Hat plain. This is a i)rovince of large and numerous rivers. The St. John, the Rhine of America, lises in the State of Maine, and after a winding course empties into the Bay of Fiuidy. For some 20 or 30 miles above its mouth the river flows between wooded hills,",
         "** K.r \u003c.f A STCDY OK TIIK fONTrXKNT.- »N.M hliiffN iiii.I fin., iiplaii.l tarm-. B. vni..l D, tliis twif.' the .lj«t mitl till' IiiimI'.' on «'itln.r h'uU- hiiI II.'.'. tlif iKiiiks n?v low Iwi .,»■ hiit.'l uniiiiuii (»\u003c.v.iiim.'iit lia.« piovi.l.'.i .* imrii- iii'' . Itiri in',i»'«f f,. (IinmI- 1111.' IllK'll wat.T. .\\I..Mit ij-J.'i toil, U.ll.'l- I'-ii.- I.. st«M'k tli.« iifi)flilH»iiii\u003er frinii th«' riv.'i's Mimitl 74 f»M't Ijitfli. I^iijf,. ^t rin' f..llii\\viii\u003er iiiiiifiul »r..|||.-«{,a„.| Kall^. i„ ....nM,!,.,-,,!.! Hiir.' known t( \u003er»' ^tfanu'is may um- ih.. friifon. inilfs from tin- Hav. \u003c|iiatititi.' \u003c •..»!, iroi .*\u003ct. .lolin UM »ar up as ih.. city of Frwl or to a jH.int \u003eoni.' H4 mil.-s tV.,ni tli. Th.' lt«-Mti\u003e{on.-lM' an.l the Aliiami.-lu ll I'\"! OS, .III Tl i(.ii\u003c\u003e •s tfianit.'. liin.'. and uypsum, I. tit i K'M.- nr.' mini ■! f.. any j;iviil .-xtt'iit. ic?v ,\u003eiv m.v.'imI larv'\u003c'.'..tfon ami w.K.I|..n ••astwaid. Ihc latf.T into tli.- ( \"W mills lM'\u003ei.|.w loiunli L Ah till. inontliM of tl ki-'ii.... and tin- fonn.'r into Chalfiir IJi les.- an.l ..t' the .ill • iilf ..f Sr. to.(l tu.-i i.'s, nail fact.xi. i'( on.' I t..ni!\"ri. I\u003e,'\u003c'- nn»i.'r.\u003eiHNtr.'anisi.xpam| into lin.\u003e 1. av. ••'I\" iKMi. ami U'ufl all rmtniituc- ton.'H .•otin... !,d witli WOO.I, .-..ft on, ^voo (Jam.- nlxiiimlM, un.l at har) M'l-s ..t'\u003e,n\"«'\"t a.lvantam' to \u003e1 y^un.l |rast.,rM\u003c-tliii.|, f tho provlii.'.. is ^mmI limit- Tl lit' livers. iini.ortan.'.M.f tli.'s,. rivers may 1... iva.iilv nn.l.'ist.MMl. It' most r..itil„ umis aiv tlic lan-js alon;: iv..|-s. Why so f Tli.Miplan.lsar.jp.iit'i- ally f.-rtil,. an.l «m, crops ..f |,av an.l ont^ aiv i.r.Hlu.'.Hl. jriu-li .,f I la. land'.-otisistsof amj.s and i.uin.ii plains of no vuluoto tli.' sparsely wttlm I, iippiiif,', the itii.'jj,.,„i, .1, wi!. I-., th \u003c\u003e mon.s«\u003e, r-nrilioH. Iicir, farmer. The interior is hut hnt in he*i from the \\\\ 'K^ vvl mil prevail on the ..oHsts. Th.. rainfall is al.un.hmt an.l tl «no\\v li.'s deep in tl H' winter tim.', pro- \"■iiiiK. vi.lin.,' k\u003ckm| facilities r\u003c\u003er him) Th.. chief industry »( New IJrunswi.-k i,\u003e ajrrieultiire, tli •' principal .-ropH hein^' 1 lav. outs, turnips, potatoes, carrots, peas, and »)arlcy. Ther.. Imun \"'X.-elleut pustuiair... fin.. I.iilter an.l chcse ar.. mad.', and .-attle- reariii;,' re.-eives eonsiderahl.? attention. Next in iinjwrtance is lumlx'rinj,'. The iiiiddl.^ and northern p.irtions are h.'avily timh,.nHl. The pnn.-ipal wo.k1 is spru.'e hirire .(uauiities of whi.-h are sawn int.i luinhcr un.l sent to (Jreut lirituin an.l to the I iiite.l States. The rivers supply uhun.lant wat.-r power, and the numerous saw mills cm som.' five nuUi.m dollars' worth of lumber eveiy year. The fisheries emi)loy 5,000 iw.uts und 10,(MH) men, und jield from four to five million dollars' woi-th of salmon, cod, ma.-kerel, heri'ing, and lobster; and the' '/'//( rvi//,,, /,,(/, Finitiiii, ., yjt. Ixaver, marten, mink, and other fur-Warinj; animals are ph'nlifnl. Nearly all the stivams and rivers provi.le p,,,,! fisjiim;, Ui.' salin..n ht'iiij,' the most important fish .aimht. Fre.h'ricton, th.' capital, is sitiiat.'.l on the nirht-haud si.le of the St. John iJiv.T. This \u003c-ity has a history datin- bu.-k t.. th.» latter part of the s.-venteenth century. At prvsent Fiv.l.'iicton is an important railwuv .-entre. It IS also the centre of a large lumber tra\u003cle, h;i^ valuable .-otton and l.'ath.'r manufa.-- tories, extensive canneries, and is siirr.)mi.le\u003cl '\u003ey a rich fiinninj? country. St. John, the lai-fjest and busiest city in New Brunswick, is situated at the mouth of the St. John Ifiver. This is the",
         "principal 74 A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS port of Canada, standing fourth in the whole Empire, eo far as amount of shipping is con- corned. St. John con fains numerous saw mills, factories, fouii(h\"ies, and pulp mills. Among the sijjhts worth seeing are the fur- famed reversible falls, wliich are spanne\u003cl by two bridges. At low water the nver flows throujrh a narrow gorge and over a ridge of rocks, forming a \\vat«'rfall scvei-al feet in height. When the high tiile of the Hay fills theharl)or the sea water flows back through this goi-ge, forming a caseiule up the river instead of down it. Moneton, the second largest city in the j)rovince, is tlie eastern terminus of the Grand Tnmk I'acific, and the headcjuarters of the Intercolonial Kailway. Chatham on the Mirainichi, and Woml- stw^k on the St. .John, aie other imiiortunt towns. Prince Edward Island. I'lince Edward Island was called St. Jean until altout the year 1800, when it received its present name in honor of Prince Edward, Duke of Kent, father of the late beloved Que\u003c;!i Vi\u003c'tona. N()rthumber!an\u003cl Strait divides the island from Nova Scotia and New Jirunswick. This low, beautiful, and crescent-shaped island fomas the smallest province of the Dominion. The re\u003cldi.sh color of the nw-ks and sand on the shore, and of the soil in the fields, makes the rich vegetation look all the more green. Both soil and climate are well suited to fanning and the irregular coast line to goo\u003cl harlKirs and good fishing. Under the strait, between Cape Tonnentine of s\u003c)Uth-eastern New Brunswick, and Cajie Traverse on the island just opposite, a submarine cable is laid, an\u003cl conununication with the rest of Canada is further maintauied by lines of steamers comiecting with tin) Canadian Pacific and Intercolonial railways. Fuithermore, a jKJwerful ice-breaking steamer esi)eciall\\ built for navigating the strait in winter, plies between (Jeorgetown and Pictou. All the inland rivers are necessarily short, but the land being low, the tides flow far iidand, thus making sea-ni-nis of all these streams and adding much to their useful-ness. Fanning is the chief occuimtion of this \" Garden Province,\" and wheat, oats, barley, potatoes, and turnips are grown with great success. Indeed, the three provinces men- tionetl are a\u003clnnrably suited to butter-making and for preparing live animals for export. Cattle from the interior of Cainida are always the better for a short stay among the sweeter grasses of the Atlantic provinces. /\"'itrt JiUwai'l, near VtutrlutUtown. befoic Ix'ing shipped across the sea. Fine hoi-ses, cattle, shee}», and hogs are raised, and the breeding of black foxes has of late years btM\u003en remarkably successful. The fisheries are said to be the best in the Gulf, for the shallow waters about tlu^ island are the feeding grounds of 1, jiuu-kerel, hening, lobster, and oystei-s. The chief manufactures are those having to do with the preparation of preserved meats, cheese, condensed milk, and the jnaking of starch. The people are descendants of English, Irish, Scotch, and French settlers. The Prince Edward Islaixl railway, owned by the Dominion, luns from end to end of the island, with bi-anch lines to all important",
         "points. A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS 75 Charlotte^.wn the capital, is situated on the valley is fairly level and fertUe and is the north side of a fine hartor at the month lK\u003eundod on the north hv a low mn^e o ^JdfvTltllT.'\" \"f^^T\"^? ^^^'- \"^\"\"''\"\"^ '•'*\"^' '''' Laureutiau. which H«n, i\\ . / *\"\"' '•\"' '\"■''\"^ \"■\"*■ ***'•\"*\" ^•'•^ \"^■^'•- \"bout 20 miles bolow Quebec p ante, streets and hnesnrroundi„p\u003c. One city. Th. ,..„.,. y to the north of the i7 ot the largest pork-pa-kni^ establishments Lawrenc-e vall.v is eovere.l bv manv lake u. the l)onnn.on ,s locab.l here. and strean.s. the bepnninp. of rhe i w li.\" Ot er towns are Simuners.de in the west, tlow into the St. Lawrem-e „,,, Ottawa fn.m and Georgetown ni the east. this direction of?be'r;, .V\"\"*'\"\";;,'. ^'!' '\"•-\"•'^f P'\"^ '»'•« 'i'l'\" l'n\"-ip\"l tnbntaries from the south- of the Donnmon. t hes J\u003eetween tbe Unite.! east are tbose draining the fertile, triangular States and New Brunswick on the south, plain between M.-ntrcal and Queb^^n my and lu, son St.a.t on the north, and the Richelieu, the St. Francis, and he stretches fron. Ontano eastward a tiiousan.l Chaudiere. It was down the Hichelieu that miles to the Gulf of St. La.n-ence and the fierce Iroquois came to attack the vou\"! n ' . '\"■ *v. , , , \"'\"^ '''\"''^ *''■*■\"\u003c* «\u003c'ttlement.s. This\" riv.M- waTienT^ l'\"\" IT \"'/•'\"'/''' ^'\"''\"'''•\"' \"'-^^ ''•\"\u003e'*\"'' \"» important part in all the nas set led by the Fren.-h. wh.. gave it the troubles whieh arose between xNew France mune..f(anada. Fran..eh.dafine..ppor- an.l New Enghu.d. Its position is thT tunitj ,n North America but lost it. The fore worth studying? well. North of the adure, however, eann..t be laid upon St. Lawren.-e are the Saguenav the St Urt,er(,ha,npan.,MHisonneuve,Fr,,ntenac, Maurice, and the Ottawa. For th'e last sixtv La Salle, an.l Mont.-abn, n.,r upon the in- nnles .,f its .-ourse th.. Saguenav ll.nv's tepal nnss.onanes wh.. kept pa.-e with these b..tw..en ..lilfs whi.-h rise fn„n a thousan.l to pioneers. an.l,h.lthe.rutn...st to sulxlue the eight.Hnnun.lre.lfeet abov.-tin. biacl^^vate s greater part .)t th.- new \u003c-.\u003entinent in the interests of th.- iiome ian.I. The fault li.-s at the door of tlie Frencij kings an.l tli.'ii advisers, who were usually t,.\u003c» niurh interested in Eun)pean atfaiis to tr..uble theins.'lves greatly over Ih.' \" fifte.'u tli.)u- san.! a.-r.'s of snow,\" as Canada was pj... tured. The s«»utiiern porti.)M ..t' (^u.'bec i-; lii,. iiiore viibnible. Iu\u003eiiig siinnted in a b.-tter ' liniiil,., and iiaving lli.' uobl.- St. Lawr.'n.-e wiih its many tribntaries flowing a.-ross it. of the river at their ba.s.'. This chanm-I is without sh.)al or r.)ck, i- very d.'cp, and aiiout a milt! wid.'. TIi.mv is no ian.ling- pla.-e until Ila-Ila liuy is r.'a.-he.l. The river rises in Lake St. John. These northern riv.Ts cut Ih.'irway throu-li the Laurentiau rang.i an.l .yflen form waterfalls where thev d.'sc.'iid to th.' riv.'r plain. Among th.\u003ese falls ;ir.\u003e the Chaudi.'re ..n the Ottawa, and the Shaw.'iiegan on the Si. Alanri.-e. The St. Lawrence proper is the t;r.\u003eatest Si ,.4i f .1 ■ \"■ ''•'\"\"\"■'' \"f 'he province. L.-aving ( (ntario it N..uth ot the nver,a spur of th.- .Vppala- expan.ls into Lake St. Fran.-is an.l I ake ;■ r\"%*-'.\"\"'-^ *f\" '\u003c\u003e \"\"' \"-^ -^- '-k\" S'. 1-uis. an.l bel.\u003ew the mouth .'f the \u003c hamplau. an.l passes to th.. norih-east Kiehelieu. into Lake St. P.-ter Vbove a.Moss the .-ountry m a .-hain .,f rolling hills .Montreal are the La.-hino an.l oth.'-r rapi.ls known as ,1... Notre Dam.. Mountains, an-l ov..r..om.. by a system ..f .-anals 1 el. w \"M t.. t..rm the table land of the (Jaspe Montreal the nver is blue an.l clear the i ..mnsu a an.l the Sln..ksh.\u003e..k M.\u003euntams. scene.y on each bank line, an.l tlu wat r North ot the nver, and east ..f the Ottawa, deep enough for the large t ocan st..",
         "m 76 A STUDY OF THE COXTIXKNTS ship. From Quebec the river jrrHdually widens into a Im^re estnuiy over 150 miles aeross. Tije river islands are Montreal, Orleans, ami Anticosti. The Freiu'h-Canadian inliabitants of Que-bec are known as habitants. These are a quiet, \u003c!ontente(I {H'0{)le, with no great ambi- tio:;, but quite pleased with their lot if they can make enouj^h money in summer to keep them fairly comfortable during the winter. Everywhere one will see the old-fashioned habitant vnllasies, and the ehurcii with its tall spire. The p«)ple retain many old French customs, and they iue fond of danc- .1 rif.w nf' f/it' i'ittf ar ijntiltti' I'foin the t'irt ing, and of singing the old French songs. Time and again they have given evidence of tiieir devotion to the flag which now j)ro- tei'ts them. The French settlements co sist of narrow strips along both ba?iks of the St. Lawrence and of other Quel\u003eec streams. Tht- English settlements of the Eastern Townships, as southern Queliec has been called, are nnicli like similar srttlements in other [wtrtions of the Dominion. The Quel)ec climate, in conseciiience of the grciit size of the province, is iiarunilly varied. The sumniei- heat in the St. Lawience valley oft\u003c'n exceeds 80 degrees, so that wheat, oats, cori\u003e, tomatoes, and grapes are successfully grown. The long, hard winter l)egin8ia De\u003c,'emiw'r, when heavy snow covers the ground. Every river, even the St. Lawrence itself, is frozen over. The Queljec winter has, however, many advan-tage's. The air is dry and bracing, and there is i)lenty of fine sunshine. Indee\u003cl, the winter season here .and in (Janada generolly is the season wiien the Canadum people set to work to enjoy themsi\u003elves. What with skating, snow-shoeing, hockey, football, tobogauuing, curling, and sleigh-riding, the winters are thoroughly en.joyed. Is it any wonder that Canaila should \\m a land of beautiful women and brave men f Agricmlture is the chief occu-pation, the nuiin crops being hay, oats, {)otatoes, peas, and beans. The hay is shipped largely to the I'nitwl States. Thoroughbred sheep and ca 'tie, jtarticularly in the Eastern Townships, ar\" becoming more and more valuable. Quantities of l)ntter and cheese are made, a large number of li\u003c n-ses raised, and thousands of gallons of prime maple syrup matiu- factni'ed. ToIkicco is grown in some parts, apples arc largely ex-ported, and excellent )\u003eliiins grow in several counties. Th(\u003e forest wealth of Quebec, is enormous, and the timber-trade conu'S next to agricul-ture as a source of wtMilth. The most important wckxIs are the red and the white pine of the Ottawa and the upper Si. Matu-ice valley. Other woods are m.iple, spruce, birch, an\u003cl cedar. ^Umost every district has still supplies of timl\u003e«r, and the whole Ijaurentian |»lateau is a v;isr forest, uf useeillii-rfor timiter, or for papei- pulp. .\\'nt oidy has Quebec euormous forest aieas, but there iire also a great nnmbi-r of rivers which furnish the 'vater-p'\u003e\\ver to carry the logs to the 8«w milk, drive the saws,",
         "asd turn the maohiues which can chaujje the rough wwmI into pulp for paptT-rnuking. Early in the fall gangs of men start for the luniljer shanties; huts are l.uih where the trees ,u-e to be cut. fnese men are dividotl into various comptaiies, each f)f which has a special work to ,lo. Some fell the trw's an.l cut the timiks into logs Othei-8 drive the teams by whi.-h these logs are puUwl to u central spot or hauled to the nearest river. The swa.nps and the ground are trozen hard and there is an abundance of snow, so that great loads mav be easily • bawn. When the spring floods\" come on the river-men get to work and tl... |„.rs are floate\u003cl down to the nulls. A h^g^bive .M)metimes numbers tens of thousands of Ings, and c.v.Ms the river for mile.. When the logs rea.-h the mills th-\\ „,e eaughi in huge bo\u003c,ms and kepi th.Mv until the saws are rea.ly fur them. Thes.. lugs are pushe.l toward an endless ehain wlii,.!, irrips them hauls th.-m uui ,,f the water, and feeds them to the great \u003eaws. Th.' makinsf of p,dp-w.MHl, ;,„ indu-trv unknown a \\■,'^^■ y.-ars airo. is now of g.vat iinportanee, and (,»uel,e... with .;s tine spruce f\u003c.re\u003ets and it. unlnnited water-iK)wer is ready to take full advantage ..f its ..p.^.r- tunities. Throughout the province there are man v «iw mills. Hour mULs. pupei- mills. aU run oy water-power. The lea.bn- industries are the manuta\u003c'ture of boots and shoes «amed on at Monirval. St. Hvacinthe. and t^uebec; iron at S|,erl)r\u003c«.ke and Three L'lvers; sugar at Montr..,!; hats and furs at (Quebec and Montreal ; woollen, at Sher- brookeaud Vulleyfield: .-otton at .Montreal •.H ^alleytield an.l I'uper and paper-pulp at llnll and St. Ilyacinthe. The total value of the mannfaetured products is o/er 35() millions of dollars a year. ^ Quelxv; i. also i-ich in raineral.s. Asbestos from a eomraercial |)oint of view, is the most A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS 77 vahu.ble. This mineral is composed of hbres that can be woven into .sheet.s like o«.arse c-loth. Fire will not burn it an.l heat w'll not readily pass thr\u003c.ugli it. It is used for the covering of boilers an\u003cl steam pi,^ 1\" the niannfacture of fire-proof paints and tor other purpo.se.s. It is obtaine\u003cl .■hieHy ■'» Mcgantic ( -ounty. Near Ottawa are beds \u003c\u003et bhu-k lead or graphite of supenor quality. What IS done with this mineral J Copper is tound in the Eastern Townships, and mica, uow ot sjKvial importance for electrical pui-poscs, is fouiKl in the vallevs of the \u003ciutin.'au and the Lievre. tributaries of the Ottawa Riv.r. The St. Lawrence is the main road of « anada to the European and other eastern \"UMket.s. Great steamshi,.s move up and down Its water.s, an.l lighthou.ses and numer- \"11- buoys mak.. its navigation .safe .-ven at Might. The provin.-e is al.so well si,pplie,l with railways. The [nt..r.-olonial eonneets M.mtival an.l (^u.-be.. with Halifax an.! St •'..hn:tl,e\u003c},,,„d Trunk .joi„s (^„eb,^e and Montreal with Ontario; the Cana.lian Pacific links (^,ieb..\u003c- piovin.-e with the entire West • an.l th.. (}ran.l Trunk I'a.-ific wbL-h will .TOSS the St. Lawivi.ce at (^lel^,, will unit.- the northern an.l s..uth.-rn parts of the pro- vm.... as w,.ll as the pn.vinees to the east an.l t.) the west. \u003c^)uebe\u003c, \u003c'ity, the capital of the province stan.ison the left bank of the St. Lawrence' where th,' river begins to widen to form the I'l'Mith. The situation is a m.ble one He Ore ,t was .seen by white men the In.lians ha.l ..hosen this sit,. f..r a h.m.e. ami ha.i built at th.. l\u003eas,.of thegmit r..ck a village known as Sta.la,M)na. Naturally, t herefoiv. this phu-e hocame the .-hief .-entre ..f Cunu.lian civil-ization. The gian.leur of Queljec lies Hrst lu Its situation, an.l in the splemli.l .-ita.lel crrnvning the cliff, and making it the Gibraltar .,f Ca.mda. QuelxH-. is th. lest «'ity m the Domini,. n, and one of the",
         "oLlest 78 A STUDY OF THE CONTJNENTH in North America. The city consists of the Upper Town covenng Cape Diamond, and the Lower Town 8pi-ea«l out at the foot of the rock. The harbor is deep and large, and, like Halifax harbor, there is room enough to float the greatest navy of Ihe world. For many a year, guebec was the largest city in Canada. Large ocean vessels can now pro-ceed fui-thei- up the river, and as the country further west became settled, the natural place for the commensal centre was j)ljiced as far up the river us these vessels could go, namely, at Montreal. C^uebee, however, is the givat timber market of eastern Canada. I'l'irr \u003cl Aniun Si/imie, Mimtmil. and possesses extensive iioot and shoe factories, shiji-buihling, and other industries. Owinjr t.. its iiistoric associations, heinitiful situatioii, easy communication with the out-side \\v.«il\u003cl. iv\\ fine healthy climate, this city has hecdii'.' i. t'av((rite resort for tourists. Montiiii!. ;i much l.-irifer iiml ;i nioie ini- poitani .itv thiin tlie cupitai, and indeed the iar.i;es! i-ni iuisiest city in file whole Dom-inion, .-stands on aii island in ih.- npii.T St. Lawrence. 'j'jiis city was founded by Maisonnciivc in 1G41. and for years the .settlers iiad to till their Heids I'lnder the eyes of sol.jiers ready at a mouienf.s notice to defend them ai^ainst prowling Indians. In 1692. at a point s(mie ten irriles from Montreal, Aludeleine de Vercheies, a \\-ouug girl 14 years old, with the aid of a few persons, defended lier father's house for a we*»k agi*.i!!st a larfe band of Indians. It is difficult to under.staud such things to-day when one sees a city of 500,0()(» people, splendid buildings, busy factories, and ail other things that go to make a modern city like Montreal. Situated on the east side of Montreal Lshuid, at the head of oc.-an navi-gation, commanduig the greater part of the trade of westeni Canada, no wonder that Montreal has gone ahead. Its Jna!iufa«-tori.~. include rolling mills, sugar refineries, tofiw-c.. factories, l)Of)t and shoe and ral)i)er fa.-tories, and many others. Its commercial greatness, itsgi-eat wealth, its tine situation, its splendid parks, and l-eautiful \\m\\Aw buildings all combine to make of Mont'-eal the ti:,'.t city of Canada. Altliough a thousand miles its- land. ilouTreal is ;j(M» miles nearer Livei-po»l than New York is. To its .lisjidvantag- tfee* •St. Lawrence is frozen over in w liter, aad then its communication with Eurojw is by way of Portlan.i on the coast of the State of Maine, or l\u003ey Halifax or St. ,b\u003ehn. Three Rivers, near the trii)le niouth of the St. Maurice, carries ou a tiade in iron and liimlHM-. Near Three River.s. Count Frontenac estal)lisjie\u003c| iron forges, an\u003cl the manufacture of iron has lieen carrie\u003cl \u003cin there ever since. Hull, o|.j.osite the city of Ottawa, is an important lumbering and manufacturing centi'c. Power is supplied by the ( 'haudiere Falls, and matches, wooijenware of all des-cription-, wood pulp, p.iper. etc., are inann- t'acturc.l and \u003c-anied t\u003c) all points in Canada. St. II va.'inthe, :tO miles east of Montreal, has leal her. woollen, and other factories. Sheriirooke, situated on the St. Francis, has splendid water power, -rood railway con- nectioiis, and extensive cotton, woollen and hardware works. Valleyfieid. at the foot of the (,'otcau Rapids of the St. Lawrennf. ha.s inifmrtant cotton, pai»er and other",
         "mill*. A STCDV OF TIIK (OXTINEXTS Tlie power geiiei-ato(l ut I.acliinH an-l at Chainhly provides lij;!,, ,„„i „„„,„. ^^^^^.^^^, foiMoiitival; tli.. .Mnntnioiviicv Fulls supply the HHi.io for (^.i(.l..... \u003c'ity, anil tl... Sliaw.-n\"- Hjriiii Falls furnish tli.. pow.-r u.s.mI in t|„. ojMTation «.r iiniMH-tanl pulp \\vuik\u003e. Ontario. Ontario, tin- lar-rst Entrlisli- sp.'akiiiK inovinc... tli.. wvaltlii.-si. th.-'iiiost p.\u003epiilou\u003e, rank- nt'xt t\u003c, (^.,.'l in m/,,. and .'xt*»n(l.s from tin- (Ht.i«a un th.- ,.,,,t a thousand luiU-s w,-stwa.-d f.. .Manitoba. and from Lak.' Eri.' on th.^ south, innn\" than one thousand miL's M..ifhward to Hudson Hay. There are in i-aliiy tw,. Ontanos, fh.- New and thf (H,l. Sontii.'rn. ..,• \u003c )|d ( )ntari.,, is a t!ian«ular-siijip,.d ivu'ion Kins; hftwetMi' the Ottawa River and Lake XipissJufr, on the north. Lake Huron on ti... west, and Lakes Erie, Ontari.. and the St. Lawr.-n.-e on the south. Nearly ail this area is fine lann- ing land hut the iH^ninsular [)ortion sur- romnled by Lakes Huron. St. Clair. Eri- and Ontiirio is espe.-ially worthy of the nam*- of the tianir,/ of Oiihino. Northern, or New Ontario, is of a different \u003c'haraeter. Witiiin the Laurentian country thf land is a mi.xtnre of worn-down ro.'ks, numerous small lakes and peaty swamps, and fertile valleys. Between this reirion and Hudson Hay is the (inaf C/m/ Mf, a eountiy w.-ll .overed hy pine, spruee, and poplar w.xmIs. and seeniingly well a(hipted to purpos.-s of grazing. Ls not thi.s region too far lo the north ? Of very great imiiortance to Onfitrio is the wonderful chain of waterways known as the (Ireat Lakes, and the many \u003c-anals l.uilt at enormous expense in order to ovtrcome the obstructions mentioned on a i)revions page. The Rideau Canal extends from Ottjiwa to Kingston. Why was this eanal built f The falls iu the Niagara are overer)tne by the great Welland Canal which connects Lakes Outario and Erie, and was built at a cost of some twenty-four million dollars. Through the .-entre of the shalh.w Lake St. Clair a chani el :m feet wide an\u003cl l(i feet deep is kept open by drcd-ing. Whv should this '\"' \"\"•'•'«\u003e'\u003ciry ! The rapids in the St. Marv's Uivcr arc av.-i.Icd hy two canals, one on the \u003c 'aiij dian side of the riv.'r, aii.l the otiier on th.'Aineri.'anMd... These are the important caiuds now existing, but other camds n.ay h«\u003e ailde\u003cl in the near future. R.'cently i't has been sug-ested that Lakes ffuron and Ontario might very well l,e linked togetlier •'.V a canal. W iiere should sudi a eanal U- l\u003elacwl, iuid of what \\alue sh*,nid it l)e to the \u003c'ountry ? But (he (}reat Lakes are not the only lake-. To the east (.f (Jeoigian Bhv is tiie region of the iMMutifnl .Xfuskoka lakes, a chain of inlan.l waters .lotteii with rocky islands, and surrounded by forwts. Here iij the Slimmer sea.s.m hiindre\u003cls of city p.M.ph. gather, the island eonui;es are again occu-pied, the shores and i^'itches fi^.quented by I'uthers. an.l the si.ifaceof I he lakes covered with canoes, rowboats, an.l pl.'asinv sieumers of all kinds. Betw.vu these lakes and Lake Ontario is another group, the Trent Valley lakes to whi.-h the same .les.-ription ma'v be a])p 'ed. The .•liniirte of Ontario in the wei.f. the north and the east is much the same us that of (Quebec. Southern Ontario has a much milder and more fuvorabi.' climate. Many of th«^ {leople are d.'sceii.hints of the Tiiited Emi-ire Loyali.sts, but most of them aiv eith.-r settlers from the British Isles or descendants of British settlers. French and Oenuaii communities are found in various l.K-alities, and what remains of the once numerous Indian tribes may now be found on the various Indian re.s«'rves. Ontario owes its wealth to its wonderfully fertile soil, to its nearness to the great Canadian lakes, to its immense timber areas, and to its mineral resources. Owing",
         "I 80 A STUDY OP THE CONTINENTS to tlio ea«e with which the hiud can \\\u003et' tiilwl Mild gruiu jjrowii on the fn\"»'tit central piuin of CnniKla and tlie I'liitiHl States, the Ontario fanner has turned his attention to Wetter paying hihor tiian tiait ol\" \u003e;rain pow- iiij;. Still the proviiiee |\u003erodnees laip' \u003ciuan- tities of wheat, oats, harley, ami |»eas for home use. Better resnlts haveattenih'd the growing of fruit, the making of Itnlter and cheese, the raising of high ehiss farm stock, and the raising of turkeys, geese, ducks, aial jtoultiy. The western part of Southern Ontario is perhaps the choicest jiortion of Canada. Afniitjiiriii ill Koiit/irni Uiit'ii'io. Tills great penin.sula contains the lavi-^er j.art of the Ontario p\u003c)pulation, the ' ; -c important cities and towns, the best de-veloped industries, and the finest faniis. In the Niagara district, hetwecii Lakes Ontario ;ind Erie, in fact, in the whole norlh coast ..f Lake f:rie, we have the h.'st fruit-growing legioii in the wiiole J)oini?iii\u003en. and Western Canada w.;nld lose nnudi wcr^-tlie tomatoes. gra[\u003ee\u003e, .strawU'rrif's, pem-hes, plums and f\u003eears, which thi- gard.-n supplies .^^ l\u003e\u003c;un- teously . cut ofi'. Ass.K-ialed with fruit -grow - ing is the canning indu.sfry. Originally a tree -covered country, the pioneer hud t\u003c.\u003c'lear the land of its first huge .•ovenng of plants, a task we can scarcely realize to-day. The southe- n part had many valuable wood tnvs such as walnut, oak, hard rauple, hickory, elm and others. Trj* to innigine a settler having to \u003clestroy beau-tiful walmit logs because he couM not sell them and re\u003c|uired the land to give him space to plant his ciops. These line forests have all lint di.sapi)eared and the work of the lumberman '\\* now conlined to the more nortiiern and newer jMirtions of the province, those about the Cpjier Ottawa, (ieorgian Hay, and west of Lake Superior. With tin single e.xi'eption of coal, Ontario is rich in minerals. Natural gas, jietroleum. salt, nickel, silver, and iron are abundant, (ias. petrolenm and salt are fotmd in the western iH\u003eniiisula, the first near Lake Erie, the sec(nid further inlaiul, and the third north of the second. Of what use is each of these minerals and how i-; eadi olitained f The Canadian cobalt and silver district, in which the new mining town of Cobalt has sprung uji, is situated in the Nipissing country alKiut a hundred miles north of North Bay. These valuable metals were discovered by Indian hunters, but white people soon profited by the disco veiy. The Indians, who were accustoiiuHl to paddle along the shore of a small lake, left their canoes and searched for a mineral substance from which they made bullets. Some white men learning of this, investigated the move-ments of the Indians and at once staked out claims. Such is the story of the disi-oven-. At all events, the early French e,\\plorer^ knew something of the silver traces of this region, and this knowledge possibly came from an Indian source. From the nickel mines of Sudbury th'' world is furnished with most of its supply. Nickel is used in making cooking utensils, and in a nund)er of other things. Copper is found in the area extending from I'arry Sound to Lake Sujierior, and iron hi the counties north of the eastern en*: \u003c/f Lake",
         "Ontario. A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS TheOiVHt Lakes attonl fh.. „i„.t ,.xi,.„. sivp fivsliwj.tor (isl..'i-i,.s in tlio woW.i. Tli.\u003e JTiii. ipal fish tak..ii i.iv I.-ik.' tr.Mit. in Lak.'s Huron and Sup.-iior, and linrinj,' in Lakes Lne and Ontario. The (jsli.Mi.s are ahout e.)ual to those of (^uehe-, an.l cnplnv over ■■!.0(K) men. For years the pvat druwhack to lii,' de-velopment of Ontario mannfaetnrin\" was - due to th\" fm-t thai tlie (•\u003c«,! had all to 1,,. iiitported. The eountry is, forinnatelv, wvH snppiie\u003cl with anotlier source of po«-,.\"r. tliat obtained from iiumerons waterfalls. (U\u003e'nt plants for .h'veloi.ing elo(.-trieal power ai-e huilt in various parts of the piovinee, •'speeially at Niagara and at Ottawa; and sinee the use of s.ieh jiow-.-r has be.-ome general, Ontario lias made great advances idongthelinesof manuraetnringagricnltMra.l miplements, wagons and carriages, furni-ture. i\u003eianos and organs, JK-ating apparatus. inachin.\u003ciy, eleotrical api.aratus, paper, etc.\" Besides its great watei-ways. Ontario has many gr-eat railway lines, .(niongthe fore-most of these are the Canadian Pacific, the \u003c'anadian Northern, the Afichigan Central aud th.' (Jrand Trunk. The development of abundant ele.'trieal power has also led to the buildiug of many electric railways now con- : uecting the larger eeutres of the' province. Toronto, the capital of Ontario, and the • seco»'l city in size in the Dominion, is 81 situated on a flue har»)or on Lake Ontario. The streets aie long, broad, and well planted with trees in the residential portion. The |K)pulation (\u003excee.i.s 4.-)(),(KM». Toronto has Its great university, its splcndi.l eitv hall, Its parliament and other pul)lic buildings' Its beautiful i.arks, and its line statues to the makers of Ontario and to tiiose who fought its battles. The (^necn Cifv. as it is called, is one of the most beautiful on the •'onfinent; the citizens are proud of their eity, and it is the chief mainila.-tnring and drstributing centre of tlie province. Ottawa, the capital ..f the Dominion, and the -econd eity in Ontario in population, is situated on the Ottawa liiver. Ilij^h up on a bold clitr W) feet above the ,iv,.r stand the gran.l pile of buil.iinir. known as the House ,,f Parliament. Away tn the east IS K'idean Hall, ihe (ioveruor's residence. In the opp.)site direciion are the Xnnows, wInMV the river is spanned bv a l)ridge c,,n- u.-etinjr (»ttawa and Mull. Hev.md this bndge are the \u003c 'haudiere Falls, where the iivei- phin-es over a rockv ledge. The power of this ,.;,t,,,.,ict is used' to drive a host of saw mills and factories, run the electric cars, aud supply light to ihe city. Hamilton, the third cit.v. is 'situated on BuriinirtoM Bay at the west en.l of Lake \u003e UtH ()!•.,.:..,",
         "iMk 83 A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS \\[ Ontiiiio. Th« oity is clean, its streets are broad ai)d wt\u003ell sliiidwl, au\u003cl the limestone ri\u003ci\u003ejrt' to the roar, the \" J//*«w/rt\u003cw,\" forms a suitalijo settinjf. llainiltoii is the larscht centri' of the Niai^ara f\u003eeuiiisiila, hikI, liecaiise of its nmiierous metul industries, it has h.cii (•all»\u003e\u003cl I lie ('(uidd'mti lihmiiiiihaiii. London, on fh\" Thames, is the centre of a fin'' iitf'ifidtnral flistrii-t, and is the seat of We^tr-) II rnivfi-sity. It hits many import-ant factories, and has jjoo\u003cl railway fa\u003c'ilities. Kingston, situiiti'd where Lake Ontario mer\u003er \"s into tiie St. Lawrence, is tiie seat of Queen's I'niversity and the Royal Militarj' Coile^je. We\u003e;t of tiie city is one of the Dominion penitentiaries, and one of the provincial asylums for the insane. Bnintford, on the \u003crranil River, is sur-rounded hy a licii cnuntry, has fine railway connections, lias manufactures including machinery, agricultural implements, and stoves, and is the seat of a provincial in.stitute for the blind. Peterborough, on the Otonabee River, which furnishes electrical [\u003eower to operate its factories, manufiw'tures ele\u003c!trical ma-chinery and appliances. Windsor, oi)f)08ite Detroit, has several fiourishiuir industries connected with the manufacture of tobacco, salt, wire fencing, etc. St. Catharines, on the Welland ('anal, is the centre of a fine fruit-gi-owing distiict. (rueiph. west of Toronto, is the seat of the Ontario Ajjricnltural College and the Mac- donaid Institute. Belleville, on the Bay of Quinte, an arm of Lake Ontario, has an institution for the traininj; of the deaf and dumb. Niagara Falls, on the Niagara Rivei-, has deveio{)ed on account of being the centre of gi-eat electrical plants. Fort William and Port Arthur, situated on the north shore of Lake Superior at the head of hike navijiation. are growinj; as the West grows. Abundance of electrical power is provi«led by the Kakaf)eka Falls on the River Kamiiiistikwia,and immense elevators, large floui- mills, and various manufactories are in evidence. Strafford is a railway centre situated in the midst of a fine fanning distinct. Chathain is situated at the intersection of the Orand Trunk, Cainidian Pacific, and Pei-e Murciuette railways, and is the centre of a rich agricultural distinct. WoodsN)ek, the centre of a district noted for its diiiiy products, is an important mauu- fa\u003c'tiir'u\u003cjr city. St. Thomas is a railway centre. The Michigan Central has its woi-kshops here. Sault Ste. Marie on the St. Mary's River ha^ great iron and steel plants and pulp mills. Beriin is a b»isy manufa\u003c'tuinng centre, turning out leather goods, pianos, wood-working machinery, etc. The important towns in Ontario are the following : — (yornwall with large cotton, pulp, and pajHsr mills; Owen Sound, with its fine harbor anil important manufactures of cement and agricultural im})lements; Sarnia, the site of the tunnel under the St. Clair River, conntHjting the railway systems of Ontario and Michigan; Brcn^kville, the centre of an important dairying district; Gait, an imp\u003c5i\"tant centre for manufac-turing woollen goods and edge tools ; Coilingwood, with its great steel ship-building plant and grain elevators; Oshawa, with its malleable iron works and the largast carriage phmt in Canada; Lindsay, an important railway centre ; and Keuora, a summer resort, on the Lake of the Woods, with its Hour and lumber mills. Manitoba (A Spirit in the ]Vest). The Canadian poi'tiou of the Great Central Plain of the Americati continent is occupied by three great provinces, Manitoba, Saskatche- \u003eiir,",
         "aE^-sriab»K3?^. ■STIiJV OK rriK (ONTfXKX T8 wiin, nnd All\u003e»\u003erfn, nil I simila r smfuoe aiid hist nivin- a M,„„.wl,at class, ilies.. peopl,, w.'i \"V. HlKisoii Hav 83 ••' t-M-xiHTiint'iit oil the iuv« stiul, WHH uaim..l iift.-r tli.. mif. nafe Henry Hud KiOit. AJi/.tit til.' V. '«\"\u003e\". wl xplniv.! it ii •i-fii- Wii FJiitish tia\u003ci Hwl ■ar Iti7() a ('oii,,M„iy of tli.. furs of wild W-i.-ultunil jH,ssil,iliti..s .,f ih.' laii.I uJM.iit \u003em\\»'g, ami wore to ,\\,, thi^ in tli»« fa\u003c't* of umit o[\u003e|.osition, for famiiiiK aii.l collcctiiuf •'IS .•alliii« theiiisclvos tl sonV Hay('..iii|Huiy.\u003c)l,taiii...l tlio K !.• V. ly well. Bv aii\u003cl hv tl aiiii»inls\u003cli\u003cl not (it I'a.ji other iiiir s If reports ,,f the penmssioi, to tnnl- in tiiis part of .\\.,,tl, .,.„i Miilal.ility of the coiintiv for f America. For n lol-i- th years this conipany has .| business in ••oll,.ctiiijr( 'i,,iiiiliaii t 111 two hiiiidrfd took I 'lie a verv nrunuff xniiiion oss.'ssion of the rejjioii over whi.-h the iiallyl.-akedoul. In IHTdthe !\u003e\u003c . , ■'\"•-• Tni\u003cl- Saskal.'h ing l.osts ot the eoniimnyare hM-ai.-d here for, 1 )ii\\'e .•onipany held swiiy, an\u003cl out of it Manitol ewaii. and .\\ll«-ita h ilXC •a, been md there, lonjf dist inees apart, over a wild n ajreiit at each of and lonely rcjri\"n. A these posts keejis a store of suppli,.s i,, (.^ iriven to hunters and trapp.-rs in .xr.hanp. tor furs brought in. At Fort (Jarry (W'ii,. iiip«'K) at the junelion of th.- Assiniboine and the RM Kiwi-s, one of these trading posts was pla.v.l. Xo other s,K)t could better eonimand so jrreat a len\u003ertli of river and lake and prairie. Another post was lilat.'ed on the |»ivsent site of the \u003cMty of Kdmontou, and other posts ut convenieai centres throiijrliont the length and breadth of the land. Travellinjr agents, usually iT.- yi ir=^ There are thivc systems of siirv.'v follow- mak.. .I,« journey. .Sl,i,,s of the .-..inn,,,,,- ™,„„i„i„.. l.iH • T , \"'\"'\"' wim tlie supplies for the nosts On itiu ;.. ♦;,,. « . . \u003eo,ios, a.s ~.. ,,,:,i..„. ,, !.„;;..;;■:,:; rr x,r~s-.';,:-,r.'-; Hudson Bay, the only roa.l by which the Pnnious to the v -a 1 M f '' '\"•\\. pranie eountiy was reache.1 in those far- Ma.ut..ba rinked t ^Pri n.r F r^l a way days. These were the so-called .SV-MvVA: Island in size Ju in Vhi I'l SHtlrr., who were afterward to take such a Dominion oZruu^ Z ex^inul h^' new land. A fanning, and not a huntuig Hudson Bay, and an area almost",
         "the^me 84 A 8TITDY OF THE CONTINKXTH M timf of oa\u003c'h of tlio Mwt«r pi-oviia'»«« of Th»' »cr»«at nx-mviiiK hrnly of nil tli«\u003ew\u003c waters 8askiit.h.'\\vaii and Alh..ita. in llu.lson Bay, Imt l»»fo\"ro U^iiiK (liHi'har»f«d III shiip»\u003e tlie pi-oviiiie in lik** a keystone, into th.* Hay, th«se watei-H ar»\u003c first collated aHuita)\u003elo foiTO. when one thinks of the by Lake Winnip«'jr, an inun.'iise ln)dy of poNiti..ii uf Manitoba witl\u003e ivsinn-t to the fivsh water whose l.-nKtli in 2H() miles and I'ast.'in and we^tt-rn \u003c aii.H. To tiie west, whose greatest hivadtli is 65 miles. The alonK thi' whole line, is Haskat.-hewau ; to larger northern jMntion of this lake is i-ut otT tiie .•ii-.i Ontario and nu.ls..n Hay; to the from the southern Ity the narrows or straits south thf Slates of Xiirth Dakota and Mill- eontainiiiK nmny islands. The southern nesota; and to the north the jfreat uiior^an- part is shallow, h.-inj? load^nl l.y the silt ize.hv\u003e\u003ci.)n .•idled the Xnrtli-\\\\VstTerrit..ri.-s. brouK'ht d..wn .•onlinnally hy the muddy Th»' Muiiil..l.a of (.Idcr .l.iys urcupifd the Rwl The p-iieral i-uurse of this lake is in first and part of the s »nd prairie steppes a north-we^t and south-east direction, and or h-\\;\\s. In the K«'d Hi\\er valley, wlii\u003c-h there is consideraMe ditfereuee l«'tween the runs north and sontli. are the Manitol.a eastern and the west.'rnsiiores. What is this lakes the lower end of the Kivcr Haskateh- differeiic.' .' Lake Winniis'u r.H'eives the ewan, and the northern .-nd of tlir R.mI. Saskat.-hewan from the west, the K.-d from The ad.l.Mi portion (.ft h.' j.rovinee is as y.-t the south, th.- \\Vinnip.'« from tlie south- a land of pos\u003eil.iliti.s. .\\ u- knows all east and the waters of the lakes to the west. ^'\"'^ '' itn\\us. Thismu.-h w.. inayd.-p.-nd The Saskatchewan enters the provinee to upon, how.'ver, it is a rejfion of nnna-rons the w.-st of the town of Le Pas, passes east, lak.'s an\u003cl water-.-onrH.'s ; it is said to he and after lalliiiK over the incline kn«iwn a.s w.'ll turnished with waterfalls and rapids, (irand Kaj.ids, wiiere a plunge of 4:1 teet is which will mean the development of mn-ded nuide in less than three miles, Hows on into electrical jiftwer; it is fairly Well tiinJjered ; the wider einl of Lake Winnipeg. These the hunting is p)od; and there are many rapids are the jfreat barrier to the easy navi- fertile valleys where some form of ajfricul- gation of thi.s stream, but this obstruction tuie may 1..' profitably carried on. Besides uo doubt will be met and overcome when ail these, the addition of a sea-coast points plainly to a time when the grain products of the prairie lands will be carried by rail to Hudson Hay posts, storeil in great elevators, and linally shipped tlinmgh Hudson Strait to the Hritisji markets. The secoiul prairie steppe \u003c'ommences the need is real. At present one sees an immense amount of electric j)ower going to waste. Some \u003clay in the near future wc may be using .some of this power to do much of our work. The Ked Kiver rises among the hills of Northern Minnesota, l.'J miles from the sourct with a range or series of rang.'s of so-called of the Missis.sij.pi, and about T'JO miles from mountains taking a north-west «'oiirse from the .sou;hern end of Lake Winnipeg. The the United States boundary line. These As^siiuooine, the pniicipal tiibutary of the hills bear the numes of iVmbina, Riding Red, drains an area 4()0 miles h\u003eng and 3()(i and Dm-k Mountains, and the Porcupine miles wide. Throughout its upper course. ^^^\"^- or as far as Brandon City, it flows through « Manitoba lies largely in the basin of the deep, wide valley. From thi.s point eastward Saskatchewan-Nelaoji system of lakes and its banks are low and its valley narrow. It^ rivers, the plan of wlii\u003c-h may l»e easily chief tributaries are the Souris, the Qu'- understood from the accompanying map. Appelle, and the Little Saskatchewan.",
         "The 8ouriNriM«\u003eMiu.\u003c«oiith-«\u003eaKt Kuskafi'lu'Wiui. unci .ift * niakinjf a l«t.i|. tlin.imli Stul«« ..f North l\u003eak..fji. I •■•'•uiUhfoCaiiHdniiiid ji.iiiM tilt' AsMJllilioilH' Cllsl ot' ItraiKloii. 'rin'(^u'A|,|».|l,., 11- \u003ew a small stream L'tHt !llll«'H lotijr. (|,,\\VH thliiliyli „ vallfva mile wiilt'aiiil t'lom a liiiii\u003cln'\u003c| to fliici' liuii- «lr.'\u003c| tVi'f ill \u003c!..|.f|i. In iliis valley ai.' .m'v.'i;iI Leautit'iil lak.-. Til.' Litil.. Sai«kat- cla-Wiili rises aliiMiiji: llie Hiiliiia .Miimlaiiis ami joins the As^imlmirie lo the west of Uraiidoii. TJK- Wiiinij.rj,' h'iver is th»» oiillet of |,ake of the \\V\u003cmm|s, a liihi ni (I llioiisaiiil isliiiiils, situated iH'twtHMi Ontario, Maiiitol.a aii\u003ci Minnesota State. In the eoiirse of this liver are iiiaiiy rapids an\u003c{ smn falls, some of whieh an heiii}; used for the |»ur|.us( of supplyiiijit lijrlit aiK I\u003e\u003c)wer to \\Viniii|,e^'. The Manitoha lakes eom- prise Lakes l)aiii\u003ehin. W'in- iiipejr\u003c»sis, .Maiiitolia, and Winilipej;. The Mossy Hiver is the outlet of i\u003euuphiii Lake. Lakes Winnipegosis an. I Mani-toba are ..onne,.te\u003cl l,y the two Waterhen KivPi-s and Wafrhen Lake. The ..verlhnv ot Lake Manitoba is taken bv the Fuir- A STl'DV OF TIfK ro.VTINENTS .Manitoba has what is .-alled a r„Hti\u003e,n,U,l '•Innate. The winters are ,-lear. eo|d and (Vop Lake, whi.-h in turn is etnptietl info C ,3 ^'\"^ ^nmm^n: are h..t, Lake St. Martin bv the Partri 1^ ('loo , ^ Tl '\"'\" ''\"^'^ \"\"'^ ••\u003c'f-eshing. Kiver. Lake Martin .Irain to L ke 1 1 ^ 1 1 s'\"*;\" \"r'\" ™\"\"^' '*' •\"\"'^^ Winnipeg by the Dauphin Hive.-. tl^^, \"vith th ™ '/\" J'\"' '\"\"\"^* monms. vv ith the exeeption of .■\u003e fow",
         "days ••aOCOfV RESOWTHM TBT CHAKT (ANSI ond ISO TEST CHART No. 2) _^ APPLIED IN^GE I ^C* '653 East Mom Slreel ^^ Rocheater. Ne« Vork 14609 USA %^ (^'6) *62 - 0300 - Phor\u003e, \"^ ^S (\"6) ?88 - 5989 -",
         "fa. 86 A STUDY OF THE CONTIXENTS now and again the skies are wondeifnlly blue, and the air dry and bracing. No province in the Dominion provides Wetter conditions for work anil for play, and of both Manitol)ans take tlieir full share. Only a small i)art of tlio western fanning land has, thus fai', been occupied and cul-tivated. Keccutiy, many thousands of im- tnigrants have been (oinin;; to make new homes on the prau'ies. Some of these people come fiom the countries of Europe). Othws have come from the UnUed States, being at-tracted to our country by the cheapness of the land, Its fertility, and our excellent chmate, and government. It has been estnnated that the great agiicultural teriitory of \\V.\u003esterii (^auada, which was once regarded as nearly worthless, will yield enoui!;!) food, when fully developed, to support a population as large as the present poi)idation of the Uiuted States. Both the .soil and the climate of Jlanitoba are favorable to agricidture, so that the most imi)ortant industiies of the country are connected with farming. The principal grain is wheat, and Matiihha \\o. 1 Hani is famous the world over. In addition to wheat, oats and })arley are grown ; Indian com for garden puiposes is successfully raised, and a considerable acreage of flax is cultivated. Root crops and garden stuffs of all kinds are grown in large quantities. The larger fruits such as apples are being experi-mented upon with much success. The small fruits such as domestic currants aiid gooseberries and wild strawberries, high bush cranben-ies, pin cherries, wild plums, and raspberries ripen eveiywhere After threshing, the wheat and other grains are taken to town, stored in high buildings called elevators, and afterward shipped by rail to the flour mills of the province or to Fori William and Port Arthui. Mixed farming is becoming more and more general and dairy farming and cattle raising are receiving more attention. The Manitoba lakes abound in whitefisli, liickerel, and sturgeon. The annual catch is large an\u003cl a profitable trade with the New York and Chicago markets has been estab-lished. Much of the nortliern country is covered by spruce foiesis, and large numbers of luinbermen are employed in the .saw mills ;it \\Vinnii)eg, Selkirk and other jilaces. Manitnl)a is not rich in minerals. Lime-stone for building i)urposes is found in abundance at Stonewall, Stony Mountain, and at Tyndali. Lime kilns are kept l)usy burning the limestone into cpiicklime. Oood gypsum is found north of Lake St. Martin ; and many brick yards give e\\ndence of excellent brick clay.s. The manufactures of Manitolia ar\u003c' only in their infancy and are largely those coii- nect\u003c\u003e.l with the chief industry of the province. Almost eveiy other village has a flour mill. Machine shops for the manufacture of farming implements are establisheti at Winnipeg and Brandon, and goo.1 sand for the production of glass is obtained at Beausejour. At the present time there are four great railway systems operating in Manitoba— The Canadian Pacific conne\u003cting Wiuni[)eg, Portage la Prairie and Brandon, with branch lines to many other important centres ; the Canadian Northern, with many of the same connections; the Grand Trunk Pacific, and the Great Northern. Wiunijieg, the capital and chief commer-cial centre of the province, was, thirty years ago, .simply the Red River Settlement,'con- sisting of a walled fort at the .iunction of the Assiniboine and the Red, and a straggling line of farms fronting both streams. To-day Winnipeg has a pojuilation of ir)0,00(). Numerous railway lines radiate from it; electric cars rush along its streets; sky-scrapers are beginning to lift their heads; the stores are fine, the banks palatial, and",
         "the A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS 87 public buildings in keeping with the hoi)eful spiiit of the West. Foil Garry was well placed for trade in the old days of the Hud-son's Bay Company. Winnipeg is equally well situated for the growing commerce of to-day. The city lies in o uaiTow neck be-tween the Manitoba lakes and the Interna-tional boundary line. To the vvost is the great and growing prairie countiy broadening to-ward the Rockies. To the east are the older provinces of Canada, with theii- wealth and their goods awaiting a market. All trans-continental lines must pass through this point. Winni-peg is the seat of the Manitoba Univer-sity, the Institute for the Deaf and Dumb, the Noi-mal School, the Legisla-tive Buildings, and the Agricultural College. St. Boni-face, the distinctive-ly French city of Manitoba, issituated on the Red River, opposite Winnipeg. population. So called because it was at this point that the traders in the early days portaged their goods over the praiiie between the Assiniboino River and Lake Manitoba. Portage la Traiine is 56 miles to the west of Winnipeg. In it are the provin-cial Home fo' Incurables, and an Indian Industiial School. There are many othei- important towns wliich are w ell worthy of passing mention. All of these cater to the wants of the surrouniling communities ; all have a num- Brandon, the sec- A jmrtiim i,f the City of Winnipeg. ond city in the province, is situated on the south bank of the Assiniboine, some 133 miles to the west of Winnipeg. It is sur-rounded by a fine farming couutiy, is the centre of importaiit railway activities, is the seat of Brandon College, a provincial Normal School, an Indian Industrial School, a Dominion Experimental Fann, and one of the provincial asylums for the insane. Portage la Prairie, on the main lines of the Canadian Pacific and the Canadian Northern, is the centre of one of the gai den spots of the province, the Portage Plaiii.^ It is situated a little to the north of the As-siniboine River, and ranks third in point of ber of elevators ; and all have some distinc-tive local feature. Birtle, to the uortli-west, is in the valley of the Bii-dtail River. Rnssell, on the uplands, has a good farm-ing countiy aVjout it. Minnedosa lies on each side of the Little Saskatchewan and is suiTonnded' by hills. Virden, south and west of the Assiniboine, l)oa.sts of its beauti-ful lawns, tho home-cliaracter of the town, the fertile farm lands, and the sand hills to the east. Boisscvaiu is suirounded by splendid farm lands. Delorai ne, near Turtle Monntahi, points to the same fine sur-roundings. Killaniey has iti, beautiful h:ke. Souri.s, on the Souiis River, is",
         "an 90 A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS 1 i 1 ii-iportant railway centra. Manitoa, Morden, Gietim, Emeisou, and Dominion City have fertile lands contii ng to their comfort. West Selkirk has a govemraeut flsh- hutchery, a t'old-storage plant for fish, lumbering interests, and an important river- port for vessels plying between Norway House at the foot of Lake Winnipeg and Winnipeg City. North of Selkirk, at the south-west comer of the lake, are the sum-mer resorts of many Winnipeg people. Port Nelson and Port Churchill, on Hudson Bay, may some day become important seaports of the Canadian West. Neepawa, at the northern border of the lieautiful Plains, and south of the blue-roiored Riding Moun-tains, is a town of cousiderabh* size. Dauphin, on the Canadian Northern, west of Dauphin Lake, is .surrounded by a very fertile far.iiing eountiy. This is one of the most promisuig of the northern centres. Le Pas on the Saskatchewan, Carberiy to the east of Brandon, Carman, half way between Portage la Prairie and the boandaiy, Melita, Hartney, Elkhorn, Binscartli, Glad-stone, Beausejour, all these are piomineut Manitoba centres, contributing to tha .'ur- rounding farming areas, and growirg as these areas grow. Saskatchewan (liaphl lUvcr). The prov-ince of Saskatchewan is tiie middle one of the three prairie prorinns. On the east is Manitoba, Alberta is on the west, the States of Montana and Noith Dakota are at the south and t'ae North-West Territoiies at the north. Ij length Saskatchewan is about 750 miles ; its breadth vaiies from 4(M) miles at the south, to about 250 miles at the north. Saskatchewan is midway between the sister provinces east and 'est with respect to surface and to altitude. Its average height is about 1,600 feet, and its surface is slightly more rolling than is the surface of Manitoba. Its rivers show deeper channels, and groups of scattered hills give the prov-ince considerable diversity of surface. The second prairie Pteppe ends about half-way across the province, while the third, or Albertan steppe, continues the rest of the way. The chief elevations of the southern portion of the province are situated on the edges of the second prairie level — those to the east being the Porcupine Mountains and the Pasquia Hills, and those to the west the Dirt Hills, the Coteau, Bear Hills and Eagle Hills. Other detai-hed hills are Moose Mountain, Touchwood Hills, Wood Moun-tain, and the Cypress Hills. North of the North Saskatchewan River the land is more diversified. Wooded areas become more corhmon, the timber is larger, and a glance at the map will show how well the countiy is watered by lakes and rivers. Comparing the south with the north, the lakes are few and are outside of the general drainage. Many of these lakes are alkaline, and some of the more important are Johnston, Last Mountain and Big Quill. At the head of the Churchill, a river flowing through Manitoba, and emptying into Hudson Bay is a chain of lakes, chief of which is Lake Clear. To the north ai\"e portions of Athabaska and Reindeer Lakes, and all of Lake WoUaston. With the exception of the alkaline lakes, all are usually well stocked with fish. The province slopes easterly, or a little north-easterly. The Hudson Bay receives the greater amount of the drainage. The northern part lies in the basin of the Mac-kenzie, and a small strip to the south forms a part of the Mississippi basin. Tho ohief rivei-s flowing east are the Souris and Qu'Appelle; the North and South Saskat-chewan, rising in Alberta, and flowing into Lake Winnipeg; and the Churchill. The Battle River and the Red Deer rise in Alberta, and flow into the north and south branches of the Saskatchewan",
         "respectively. A STL'DV OF THE CONTINENTS Saskatchewan, hecauw ..f its situation in the iut.'iior of tlie continent, and heeaiise it is in the temperate zone, lias an exti-etne climate. The south-\\v..st.'in |.ait of the province comes under the iiiliiicnce \u003c\u003ef the Chinook winds. The winter season is usually steady and the snowfall fairly heavy. Hi)i,'h winds are not common in winter, but when they do come, severe blizzardy storms are the lesnlt. The average rainfa'll, perhaps a little less than that of Manitol)a, is between 15 and 20 inches and the bulk of it falls between Aj.ril and September. The climate on the whole is much the same as that of Manitoba. Croj)s develop rapidly aiid the ripening process is helped by 'the long, bright sunshine and the dry weather of t\\w haivest season. Like Manitoba, Saskatchewan is a great agricultural country, four people out of eveiy five being engaged in some foim of farming. This fanning is usually carried on on a large scale, and steam and gasoline are commonly used. In general the soil is wondei-fully fertile, and, with the excef)tion of cei-taiu alkaline wastes peculiar to all the prairie provinces, yields large crops of grains, roots, and grasses. Threshing is done in the open, and the quality of the wheat is No. 1 Hard. Barley, oats, and flax grow well ; the yield of domestic hay is lai-ge, and the low places of the prairie furnish great (inantities of excellent native hay. Natural-ly, most of the farms are still south cf the Saskatchewan, but the open stietches to the north, whei-e the soil is good, indicate the gi-eater farming operations of the near future. The park didrktx, or tree-covered lands, ai-e not as easily broken as the open prairie, and stock-raising is at present best suited to these areas. The south-west corner of the province was for many years looked upon as adapted to gi-aziug and to this alone, but a better ki.owledge of the conntiy and the introduction of drti-farniing, \\n 1. d, where possible, of irrigation, have ••hanged even this region until the open rami, xs, disappeaiing and the homesteader is taking possession. Ranges still exist, but large holdings are bec\u003cmiing less and Ws possible. The south land is almost entirely open prairie. Patches of brush and lijxht timber grow south of the North Saskatchewan. North of the river s,.lendid timber is found ai d the lumber industiy has become a veiy important one indeed. The timber is white and black spruce, jack pine, tamarack, and birch. The centre of the timber industry is Prince Ali)ert. Sheep ranching in Satkntcheivav. The northern lakes aliouud wUh a good quality of whitefish, pickerel, pike, and sturgeon. The fishing takes place largely in the winter .season. After the province is supplied, the suipl.is is shipped to the south and to the ea-st. The fur ti-ade of Saskatchewan is still important. Prince Albert and Battleford are the prmcipal fur centres, and the chief furs are those of the otter, beaver, mink, wolf, bear, and musk-ox. Tho Souris district in the south-eastern part of the province contains lignite coal, which is mined in paying quantitie.s. There are flour mills in almost eveiy town, and pressed brick works and cement works are common. Three railway companies operate lines in Saskatchewan. The Canadian Pacific",
         "main A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS line uiul the Portage la Prairie-Wetaskiwiu branch cross the f\u003eiovince. The Cauadian Northern and tho Grand Trunk Pacifi(! main lines run almost parallel to ea\u003c'h other to the nortli-wt'st. All these grout trunk lines have numerous bianehes, l)iit there is gi-eat u\u003c \"d of other roads l)y whieli the northern resources might b«H!ome available to the southern portion of thti province. Itegina, on tiit; main line of the Cauiidiau Pacific Railway, is tlu\u003e capital of Saskatch-ewan and the distributing centre of u wide stretch of country. Its schools, churches, and other public buildings are excellent. (Jitij Hall, Reijitui. On the banks of a partly artificial lake are the New Parliament Buildings of the province. The city is well paved, owns its own utilities, and is the hoadquartei\"s of the Eoyal North- West Mounted Police, Sa.skatoon is an important railway centre on the South Saskatchewan. The facilities of this centre for distribution could scarcely be improved, and its growth from a village to an important city has ill taken place in a few years. Around Saskatoon is a fine farming district, and here is located the Provincial University. Moosejaw, on the main line of the Can-adian PacMtic Railway, is also a railway centre of great importance. The countiy surrounding this city is well settled and noted as a wheat-producing region. Prince Albert, on the north braiK'h of the Saskatcjhewan, is IxiautifuUy situated, and is the centre of the trade in lumber, fish, and furs. E'ower is Ijeing develojted from the Saskatchewan rapids east of the city. The surroun\u003cling coiuitry has a deep black soil of great fertility. Indian Head, on tiie main line of the Oan- adiati Pacific, east of Regina, is one of the oldest and wealthiest towns of the province. U.'r(, is situated the Dominion Govern-ment Experimental Farm. Swift (.'urrent and Maple (Jreek are the most important towns west of Mcnisejaw. Estevan, Alameda, Oxbow, and Caruduff are growing towns in the rich south-eastern part of the jirovince. Other Saskatchewan towns are — Weyburn, Areola, (Jarlyle, Wat- rous, Outlook, Yorkton, Battleford, North Battleford (now a city), Kanisiu-k, and Melfort. Alberta. This, the farthest west of the praiiir itriivi, rs, lies between Saskatchewan and British Columbia, and extends some 750 nnles from the United States Iwundary to the North- West Territories. At the south Alberta has a width of 200 miles. At the north it is double this width. Southern Alberta, or that j)ortion of the province lying south of the north branch of the Sas-katchewan River, lies largely in the third prairie level. Outside of the mountain district, this part has an altitude ranging from 2,000 to 4,(X)0 feet. Th. surface is more dee[)ly cut by its rivers than is the surface of Saskatchewan, or the surface of Manitoba. Why should this be the case? ' roups of hills, such as the Hand, Beaver, blackfoot, and part of the Cypress Hills occur as in the i?eighboring province, and coulees run back at right angles from the rivers far into the prairie land. The mountain area covers a strip",
         "about A yTFDV OF THE CONTINENTS flS sixty niil««H wide in the s()ufh-w»»8teni pari of Ihf pj-oviiicf. T)n' »')isti'ni sloji^ of tlic KockicM ix (ilinipt iiikI tlio siiifaco is int'irn- lar. Till' clii.f !iioiiutaiii-|M'aks arc iJifiwn. Hooker, aii\u003cl .Mun-liiM.ii ; and tin' ='npn;!:iiit mountain clianneis or passi-s are the ( io\\\\\u003e- nest. Kiekinjr Horse. an\u003c) Vellowiiea.l. Tlie first and seeurid of tlx-e enalde tlie \u003c\\JM{. to reach th«\u003e Pacitic. Tlie reinainin^' pass is the j,Mte\\vay of tlie ('anadian Xi.rtiiern and the (irand TrunI-- I'acilie to the s.inie p,al. The Dominion )nis reserved hirjre areas in the Mountain I'eiridn for s^aine and recrea-tion parks. Tlie ejijcf reservations so far are ]{o( ky .Mountain and .laspei' I'arks. The foiiner, sitmited on tlie How Kiver. contains two important reso.-ts, vi/,., La\u003c;«an and Banff, and is noted for its heantifnl scenery and for its hot si»rin«s. The latter IS on tiie Athaltaska not far from the Yellowhead Pass. The country to the north of tiieXoriii Sas-katchewan is, for the most i)art, an nndulat- iiiK plain. (Jronps of jiills, similar to those in tlie south. aji[)eai- iiere and there. The interior, or the lej^ion l.nu^ b«'t\\veeu the Peaee anil the Athaliaska rivers, is well wateretl, and when properly drained, will become valuable farminj; lands. There are no lakes of importance in the south. The few that exist are simply shallow basins which rise and fall acc.i-ding to the wetness or the dryniess of the season. The lakes of Cetitral Albeita are more inipoitant and will become, no doul)t, of consideiable value as summer resorts. The northem lakes are mostly connecte\u003cl with the general drainage and form a part of the Athabaska basin. Southeru Alberta is treeless except in the mountains and along the river bottom lands. Central AUmrta has areas of light timber alternating with large stretches of praii-ie. In the northern part of the pro-vince the tini»)er is heavier an\u003cl the forest areas hirgei, The country north and west of the pear. . and south of the Peace and west of the Sirioky is open prairie. Like Saskatchewan, Alberta lies in three great drainav'e basins— the Saskatchewan- Nelson, the Mackenzie, and the Mississij»pi. The I'eace ami Athal)aska livers drain the northern part. The North and South Sas-katchewan rivers diain m(»st of the sontliern pan. The Milk Ki\\ -r flows aloijir the southern margin of the province, and linally .joins the Missouri iiiver in the State of Montana. The chief tributary of the North Saskatchewan is the iSattle; those of the south iiraiieh are the How, the Ked Deer, and the Helly. The climate of Alberta is usually spoken of as extreme, but the range of lein|M'rature is not as great as that of Saskatcln-wan and Manitoba. The summer seasons are not atteinled by exce-sive heat, the nights are cool, and the winters broken by the Chinook winds. The rainfall is from KJ to IS inches annually, ami the greater jiart of this takes l\u003elace during the months of .Mav, June and July. Alberta is a great agricultural land, with interests suited to the rancher, the stock- grower, the dairyman, the grain-grower, the iiTigator. and the market-gardener. The country .south of the Canadian Pacific main line, and to a lesser degree for ii hundred or jnore miles north of it, was formerly an exclusive ranching laim where the nature- sowed short grasses supplied food for the stock sur .jier and winter. For some yeai-s this region has been gi-adually invaded by the settler and the land changed to a grain- producing ai-ea. Here is ■ \" e dry-farming is followed with marked success. A few small ranch lands still exist, but the growing of winter wheat, spring wheat, oats, and barley is general. Sugar beets and alfalfa are important crops on inigated fanns, and",
         ";|« 94 A HTUDY OF THE CONTINENTS Btock-raisinfc on the various farms in bectom- ing of gi-eater and ttrvater coiK\u003eerii. Centrnl Alberta is a refcion devoted to choice dniryinK, henls of cattle, and good horxen. Wintei' and npriug wheat and barley yield well, and oatn ». .»w to gi-eat perfection. Northern Alberta ha*4 its agricultural future bel'ore it. The lunds of the ui)per Peace liiver valley are being settled, good roads will follow, and gi'ains, vegetable^*, antl Ht(M'k-tVKHl nil! be grown to the northern lK)undiiry .if the province A routui-up o/hor$ei on the Canadian prairie. SawlogH of spruce, pine, ond bireh are Hoated down the Saskatchewan to Edmon-ton. The northern part of the pro' .nee in the area east of the Athabasku, and between the Peace and *he Athabaska has rich timber limits producing spi-uce, balsam, birch, })oplar, and jack pine. Large parts of the province are underlaid with coal, which is found a few feet below the surface, and fi-equeuiiy \"crops out\" on the banks of creeks and rivers. Coal mining is largely cairied on in the south at Taber, Lethbridge, Frunk, etc., and large 'toal fields have been discovered recently in the district adjoining the Grana Trunk Pacific. Gold is found in the NorVh Saskatchewan sands ; oil wells have been sunk both in the south and in the north ; and gas for fuel, light, and power is found at Medicine Hat. The most imj \u003eortaut fur district of Western Canada is in the northern interior between the Peace and the Athaba.\u003e«ka rivet's. A lai^ge herd of wood buffalo to the number of several hnndrwl ''Ar freding grounds in the north-wen tha province. Fishing in relatior local supplies, in the centre and in the nortu, is becoming more and more important. Stern-wheel steamers ply on the Atha- boxka, Peace, and North Hai^katchewan. The Cuniuliau Pacific, the Ci.ua\u003clian Northern, and the Grand Trunk Pacific connect all the chief Albertan centres with each other, and with the rest of Canada east and west. Edmonton, the capital, is situated on the North Saskat- cliewun, about two hundred feet attove the level of the river, i'he site is one of great beauty. The vost lands which spread out in every direction from Edmonton fomit'd, a short time ago, one of the last of the great Canadian fur preserves. To-day Edmonton is the entrance to a new Alberta which will rival the old as a farming and ranching land. This imifortnnt railway centre has great wi. ^ale intei'ests. Its industries include flour and lumber mills, a meat-packing plant, brick \u003e ards, \u0026c. H is one of the largest fur centi'es ii; the country, the seat of the pronncial government and the Provincial University, comn\\auds the basins of the Mackenzie and t\\n Saskat-chewan, and shares with Calgai^ in con-trolling the mining and lumbering of British Columbia and the movement of trade from the east. The Dominion Goveraraent has formed two great parks in the praii-ie area east and south-east of Edmonton. These are largely for the accommodation of a herd of 800 buffalo purchased in Montana. Calgaiy, the largest city in Alberta, is situated iu a valley between the Elbow and th'j Bow rivet's. A centre where m^ny lauway lines meet, Calgaiy, naturally, has large wholesale houses, and serves as",
         "a A STr-DV OF TIF\u003c: CONTINENTS a •liMtributw for the soutli, tho wwt, «,kI th.- north. Th« rify is well l.i-ilt .,f I.k-uI sund- Ht.\u003ene,,.o.itaiiiHthe |.mviii,.ial Xonniil S«-hool ttii'l IK the houd.imirtoi-H of „i,.. ,,f f|,.. 1,4,.^,,.^,' imjfiitiou oi;. ems ou tli.' foutiiieiil. LethbridKe, ou tlie Bellv River, i« a dmsio-ial point ou the Crowsuest Kailwjiy Near if is a Dominion Exix-iiraeutal '^nii, (luh eoul in niiued here, and fh.. iiii\u003erate\u003ci lands of the vicinity prodnee ^nin. iooN. and other emps nhiitMlnntly. !» Parliament Bui/Uinrfu, Edmonton. Medicine Hat, or the \"■Hut,\" is situated on the South Saskatchewan a little east of the Crowsnest junction. Fonnerly this was, a great rauehing centre, but the ranching chani 2T has disappeared ami the sim-ound- iiig counti-y has develoi)ed into a gi-ain- growing and mixed fanning land. The presence of a generous sup]ily of natural gas should add greatly to the manufacturing iiiterests nh-eady quite iniiM)rtant. Wet. kiwin, on ilie Battle Kiver, about forty miles south of Edmonton, is the centre of a fine grain 1 id stoek-gi-owing countiy. Red Deer, the largest town between Cal-gary and Edmonton, has mills and brick-yards, and a farming regici -nuch the same as that about Wetaskiwin. Laeombe, twenty miles to the north, is im- poi-tent on account of the excellent quality of its live-stock, and its fine grain and gi-asscrops. .nnjsiad. Olds. ..f,... „,-„ ,i„i,.v centres. \u003c'-\u003cotoks aii.l High Kiver are ncte.1 for their winter wh.N.. and tiie' • horse-.. \u003c 'anmore i:. a mimng .-entre. .Maeleo-!, on the Old Man Hiver. has great sf(K-k interests. Rayni..,,,!, s-nith of I.ethl.ridge, has a large sugar retineiy. Other AllH-rtan towns are - Fort .Saskatehewan. nofleld, Ed-,)n.Camrrme, 1 mcher Creek, and Al'igrafli. B:iti8h Columbia. Bntish Columbia is the third province in size, being ♦'x.-.-edetl b- '•oth Quebec and Ontario. Oiiginally \"a part of the Hudson «ay country, it was u«\u003e\u003cl foi- years only as .t fur presen-e, and «paisely peoi)le«l by trappt\u003ei-s and Indians Hold was diseoveiiHl in 185«, and with this discoveiy there was a rush of miners and speculators, and tlie Dominion recognized it as a province in 1H71. For a long tim- British Columbia hml no railway connection with the eastern i)art of Canada. The only route to tliis land was l)y the Horn, or overlainl by bHcklM\u003eai-d and canoe. The openuig c '1 the Canadian Pmific did everything to develop the .-ouutiy, .md this railroad lia\u003e been foi'owed by other trans-continental lines, such as the Cana.lia,. Northern and the Oraiid Trunk Pacific, both of which aie now under construction. The total length of the Canadian Pacific main » hue IS some 3,000 miles. With its numerous oranches it has 10,fM)0 miles of steel irom east to vest. People often siiy hard things of the j-ailways of our land, but they helped moi-e than anything else to make the Canadian West and P-itish Columbia what they are to-day. British Columbia is a province of moun-tains and plains. Between the Rockies and the coast there are lofty mountain chains, deep gorges, and broad open valleys. Close to the coast is the Cascade range, pene-trated here and there by the sea. Off ti.e coast is Vancouver Island, which is th'3k}/ wooded with pine and fr in its #.",
         "^ 96 A HTl l)V OF TIIK COXTINKNTS nurtli..ni |»iu-t. Kvcry wxllwnfpiwl WHutiru x|i\u003eiM. fliiontflioiit fh»' pioviii.-.. in thi«'kly wimm|,..I, ami IJiitwh C.lmnl.ia lia-^ .•on,- to \\h\u003e liHikf\u003c| n|Hiii as |M)SMfs-iii!; tho Hiicsf \\V()(m|..i1 .-oiintiy in Ani.'rica. if not the voiy HiM'sf in tln' wliolt. woil.j. T\\u'vi\u003e ait» oihcV thinjfs than tinilwr. Biifi^li Cohiinliia has abunda'it \u003c'«ml on fhf i-huidi ami llii'oii\u003eth- out jiortioii.s of the Rorkit'H. \u003c»ol(l. Hilwr, and copiH*)- aiv nUo minfil. Allot hiM )fi-('nt Hoinco of wealth Jit-K in the fishcncs. rialil)iit i- fouml ott\" thf (iuH'ii \u003c;huHottH ImIuikIm, aii\u003cl salmon iu th« Fra«('r, Sk.'..na. ami Xass Hvmis, and in th\u003c\u003e The fr'orye. Virtorin, B.C. inlets aloiii,' tlie coast. Wht*n tho salmon are iaiKlod tiioy are han(il.'\u003cl by Chinese, who clean them and chop them up with woiidtT- ful rapidity. In 1807 the salmon-canning factories along the rivers of British Colum-bia shij)ped forty-cijjlit million cans. Kiieh an indnstiy must l)e a great l)ooii to any proviiiei\". B.itish ('oluml)ia can never l/e a vfy great grazing or farming country. The provinc.', however, is already notetl foi- its pi-oduetion of fruit, i)articulariy pears. Victoria, at the south of Vancouver Is-land, is the capital. It is said to l\u003ee a thoroughly English city. Vaucouvei-, the tenuinus of tho Canadian Pacific Kail « ay, is the metropolis of Western Canada. Lines of HteamMhipN plv betwtHMi \\'an- coiiverand the conn tries across the f'acilir. Prince Ifupert, near Port .Siin|.son. in the north-western part of the pmviiice. is the PiiciHc terminus of the(}raml Trunk Paciffe, which enter-* the coast lands through the Yellowhend Pasi in the U.M-kies. New We^t- minster, on the Praser River, ll' miles from Vancouver, is the centre of the vialmon- canning industry on the Kramer River, the distributing iwiint for a line farming country, and the headquarter-s of n large lumber trade. Naiiaimo, on the east coast of \\'ancouver Islaiul, is the wesiern coal city. Nelson and Rossland in the Kootenay country aie centres, the one of important mining, liiinlwring, and fruit-growing activ-ities, the latter of huge de|Hisits of iron and copjter ore taken from the surroundinjr hills. Other towns are Rovelstoke. Kamloops, Trail, and Fernie, the last mentioned lieing famous for its production of coki-. Away to the north of British Columbia is the Yukon country, alwut the centre of v^ .L'h is the now famous Klondike region, to which such a mad rush for gold was made a few yc-ars ago. Dawson City, on the Yukon, is the principal centre. gch;.sTiON«. ]. N,im« thm- j-reat CHiimlian Imr- l»i\u003eiH. -2. riieCHiiu\u003cli»rifo».stisvfivirrf\u003c?uliir Wliy are tliPie not iiieio Ii.uIk.im .' X Which is the Ix'tter liarl\u003eor, Moiitiful or Vaneonvci f Why ( 4 Make ficiiii Miciiory a iixip of Canada, and ph\"iee on it tl,,. nine provnices and thin- capitals. 5. On anotlici map of Cana.ia mark the aivas Ix-st sniti-d for unuiiv wheat jjrowing, fruitn, luniU)rin«, (ishiin;, and inanu- fa.tur\u003en;^, fi. Make a map of the St. I^iwrenc-e htt-Mii. On this map print the nani.-s of the Great Lttke«, the coniiectinsf rivers, tlic places where canalH aie re.iu.red, and tlie lake ports of F.,rt William Hannlton, Toronto, Montreal, ami gitelK-c. 7 Com-pare winter life in Vanouver with that in Montreal 8. On a map of Canmla place the Cana\u003ciian Pacific and Oraml fr,,nk P;v.-iH. miiin li,„.s. On ti,,- lost mark m Vancouver, Calsarv, Hejfin,., H.-andon Win-nipeg. Fort William, OtUwi, and Montreal. 9",
         "Find A HTl'DV OK TIIK rnXTINKNTS i outhow thew) linfN K,.f H.r.M.^h ,1,. U.^kif. 1(» How wouM you «..t f,. rt„„..,,.„ „. M..|(,.„,M... AuMmm/ 11. ^M„..,.„.|«h.,,. ,„,,(■,,,. |,,,,,„, y_u... .. ClmrJotte. ( ,.n«., Mt. .|„l,n, „,„| ,|„, Kl.,.i,l.k.. ' '- ^ I\"\"\" '»'•'\" '''\" '\" M,i,.il,.l„ with far,,, „tV .„ Hon.l. w..„..rM OntHrio. 1,1, \\V|.„. ,,.,, „„. i„,„.,,„.„ H-,t »,„• tl»; C'\"\"«lmn K«,(| , What !,«, ||„. F^ist f.„- th.. W,.,t r 1.-.. ()„ „„ ,„„|i,„. „„.,, of vn„r '-WM prov.r.,.,.. nmik it, th.. ,„.„„., .,f („, ,.|| th.- ,.„- por.^..t Uk..Hai,.l riv..,.s ; (^,, ,.|| ,„,„,,,„| .....u,,,,.,,,, . 0;) th.. m«in I11...H of r..il«.. ,,/, th.. h.,;..., l\u003e,„„ch in....; (..) the .•hi..f proM ,.,| t.l..,,h,„„. !,„.„, ^,■^ th\u003c. ,iti..N no.l .,„«t ii\u003e,,...,t«nt to«,m |,l Ov,,r whnt r..il«„ys w,.„I,| yo,. I.Hu. to Ko to K-t fn.„. you,' hn„„. tOHI.yof th.t..«„s„„„„.,| i„ vo,„-,.„s«,.r ...|.,..»t.o„ ir,f 17. f„, ,.„,„,«„, ||;.ii,„v, ,„„„„ fh..«r*.«t ,-. yo„ wo„|,| hk.lv ,,„.s th,o„. H milwHyjo,. .v to th.- I'a.iC,,., \" \\h, Th,.,-,, „,„ t«o nt,..H o„ L.k.. N„,Kri„,- k„o«„ a, th,. t«i„ nli,., ,„'',.'..\"■ '\"\"\".''^ \"'\"' ''M''^'\"' «'\"■ t-M,., I»i., .-.tips. I J. \\\\h..,'.. ,» [■•,.h.,„l si,„at.-,n ■:» Koiwhut, it n..t..l( jJl. Why ,. ftsh.„tf tl:.. .-hi.f i„.|„-„v of .\u003et\u003e\\vf()iin.llai,il ' NEWFOUNDLAND NowfouiKllaii.l is 111.. ,,|,l..st colony ill th.. British Empiro. As y.'t it li.is ii,,t Jo'i.i..,! 1 1„. Dominion. Tho lirokfii .-oa^t lin.. ..f .\\..\\.- wuiirUun.l sn\u003ejy:..sts many jjoo.l hai hois. T Island is scpai-af...! fnnn l,al,ia\u003ci..r iiy I!. Isle Strait, the s,.\u003eanii'r route from M.nitiv .■ and Queb«! to Kui-oix.. To tho sontli-cust is tho Avaloii poniiisiilu, the hom.' of tho ninjority of thii island.'i-s. T)i.' iiit..iior is well W!)fMlc\u003cJ and full of i-ivcrs ami lakes a capital pla.'O for tho hniitor and trapiM-r. The climato is not so spvcio us is that of (^uelvc. Why not ? Foi^s o,.,.tu- in th.. sprinjf and ..urly suninit.r on a.-coiint .,f tli\u003c! nnnicfous i..».lx'i-j\u003e;s bi-oiijrht \u003cl(»vvii from th.\" nortlH.rn rx-caii hy tho An.tii- .•iiii-..nt, a cold .stroam in the oi.oan. Tho |H.op|i. aiv stronjr and hardy, tho r.'snlt of an a.-tiv.. life and an in\\-iKoi\"atui« dimat... Why so many iHHjpJo should lov to liv.. in such a fojf-coverod spot is ..asily uiisworod. There \\» abunlant woalth in the waters alwut the island. The sea almo.^r swanii.-. with cod, mackerel, herring, and salmon. To the south-ea*it ai-e th,* N..wfoinidlaiid !»7 lijiiiks. a trmif plafoau on tho f v uf tliH -a. an,! this l.„nk is ..no of , li.hosc ■liiiiu: K'i'.'ini.is in tho worl.j. Kl.'..ts of (ishihif Louts c,,m*. h.'iv from F-un,.... fho I iiiioil Slut. .s. an. I N\".,vu .S,.otiu, us woil as frnin th.. islaii.l. Th.. .s..al (ish..ry com..s next in im|K\u003ertuiico. tli.. Iiuntinjr proiinds l,..ii,i; \"'•• i'-- (I\"\"- al..m' tl- ..oust .,f hid.rador. St. ./../,..,//.„■/,.„, x.„.,.„„..ii.„„i. Th...... h..w..v..r. ai.' not tho fur .seals, hut a kiii.l ..f s..al that is vuliiod for its oil. .St. ,l..hn\u003e. th,. 'apital, stun.ls .,i, a |i„e liarhor on th,. ,.ast oust. It is tho of tho tishinn: tra.lo. foiitre THE UNITED STATES Th.. low plain oast of th.. Aj.pahi.-hians was th.. lirst part sottl..,! hy white mon. ll..ro th.. .-arly settlors mud., their )i)m,.s in the most .l.'siruhlo sp,,ts near tlio .-..ust. Lat.-r sottl.'is spr,.ad farth.'r inland, and small towns grow up lapi.lly. In l..ss than thr.... hiin.lrod yours after the country was lirst dis..ov..r...l. thiit..on ,.oloiii,.s had\" heen sottl...! al.-ng th,. Atlunti,' eoust, all helonging to Knglun.l. Ill 177tj, tht.so colonies hogan tho war which made thoni a new nation. From this small hoginning the United State.s havo gi..wn to he til,, large and j\u003erosperoiis mition of to-day. What are some of the groat features",
         "w^.-h 98 A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS Harvfiting wheat on one of the great Jar m» of Xorth Dakota, have helped to make of the American people a gi-eat nation ? Fust, there is the character of thei\u003eeople ther^selves. The Americansmay be considered as among the most inventive and the most progressive peoples of the world. But even inventive }H'\u003c\u003eple must have had a good chance. Their countiy gave them this chance. Let us see what this means. The United States occupies the centre of the Noi-th American continent, and is there-fore free from much of the severe winter weather of Canada. How may this help ? It is compact in form and covers an area extending from Canada to Mexico, and from the Atlantic to the Pacific. It is well situ- ate\u003cl for tiade, for on the Atlantic side the coimtry is withui a few days' sail of the chief Eui-opean ports, while on the Pacific it has easy access to (Jhina, India, Ja[)an, and Australia. Between these coasts is such a wonderfully ] productive tenitoiy, and the commerce of the covmtiy has gi-own so rapidly, that the United States may soon stand as the first conuneivial countiy in the world. What are some of these products ? Between the Coidillei-au highlands of the west and the Appalachian highlands of the east, is the wide and fertile valley of the Mississippi. Into this gi-eat stream the Missouri from the north-west and the Ohio from the north-east empty. East of the Apjialachiau range is the fertile Atlantic plain. Beyond the Rockies to the west are the Pacific states, with their mild climate and theii- fertile fields. Like Canada, the United States is a land of many homes. Its plains and its valleys aiv dotted with towns and cities, and the whole laiul fi-oin east to west, and from noi-th to south, is bound to^a-ther by a netwoik of railroads. To the north-east, in the states bordering Lakes Huron, Michigan, and Superior, and to the south of British C;olumbia, are the fine forest lands of the United States. Wliat industries will likely be canied on in these parts ! The Appalachians are rich in (•(jal, iron, and petroleum. Petroleum was (Uscovered about sixty yeai-s ago in the state of Pennsylvania ( Penn's woods). Your teaeher will tell you about William Penn and his dealings with the Indians. Since then hundreds of wells have been l)oretl and tht' oil refined, and either ship{)ed by rail over the countiy or taken by iron {tipes to Philadelphia and sent abroad by ships. Pennsylvanian hard coal is taken by the boat-load up the lakes from Buffalo, and from Cleveland on Lake Eiie to Fort William, and afterward by trains to Wumipeg and the West. Without coal and iron how could we provide the machmery so nee\u003clful on the farm ? Pittsburg, m Pennsylvania, is the greatest iron manufacturing centre in the New",
         "World. A STUDY OF THE CO.VTIXEX TS The New En\u003cjluii,l .States, that is the states to the north-east, ai-e larjjelv Kiven to raamifaotuniiK. Tliey a.e also situated near the Canadian iisliin;,' jjiounds. \\V)i..iv are these, and what (isii uiv the ni..st valu-able ? The oyster beds about CliesaiK.ake Bay make Baltimore an imjiurtant centre How are oysters taken ? \\'irf,'inia and other states are noted for tiieir (ine tuba.vu plantations. What is a tol)a\u003c-.M. farm like ' Who do the woi-k ;' Where d\u003c.es th.' tubaeeo go? St. Paul and Minneapolis are the 99 Otilt uses of this remarkable plant. In the i-ollmi,' e,\u003euntr\u003e' to the west of the j,Tam areas, a re-ion extendinj; from the Mississippi to the Rockies, and from Canada to Mexico 4(),()()0,()()() hea.l „f cattle find abundant pasture. In the hi-hei- and drier plains of this repon pvat llorks ,.f sh-ep are reared. Soutiiei-n Calif(.i-nia is desert-like, excepting wheiv the mnuntain wafei's ai'e conveyedover the lield.s. When, this is done, p.'aches] grapes, oranges, English walnuts, prunes, and early veg,.t,il)les of every sort are grown in abuu'- oentres of the oreat w),....t fLii f m -t,' ••■•.io ,m ,.\\ei\u003e sort are grown m abuu- The .olton Irit lies bet vee , . itZ \u003cM , .' \"' \"'\" \"\"\"I\"™\"' •\" \"\"\"\"li 1 int nanon I.Ms. 1 he Chi- tion was very small. Then gold was found. nese have n.-e and the llighlandei-s of Scotland have oatmeal, hut corn is a North American plant: ami corn h;ts luad.' Iowa. Illinois, Missouri, Nebiaska, and Kansas wealthy states. Year by y.-ar the output is and a hundred thousand settlei-s entered the country during the following three yeai-s, many of them coming in pi-airie schoouera across the countiy from the east. In those days gold was ex(.r\\-thing. Thuigs were ^•owmg greater, until corn is „ow the pai.l for in g,,l,l-,lust;' Tii^^e w;rm:p2;e greatest crop m the world. Corn meal is to keep \u003c,rder; everv nun. gtxaX h is o^ Com cohs are used as pipesand as fuel. ( 'orn oil is used in the preparation of a cheap kind of rubber. Com stalks and corn grain make good fo(Ml, the former loi' cattle and the latter for hogs. Perhaps you can mention acters— thicN-es, toughs, and gamblers— had come to the country with the immigrants, and ther.* was a period of lawlessness and crini.\u003e. Hut the better classes of the people quickly establislied oixioi', and applied to the ■S^s%.-'.^ :^ :^^ ;,^^i*£'^ ;»-•*** \"^ '^itifi^ • ^ '^^K^^^r W „ ''T/'^^ T\"\" \"\" '^t\"'\"^ '^'■' '•^^' '\"^'^A «\"7««^' '\"^ other in Ua vxxdprodnft, and !\u003einer the zntruJucnau .,/ ulMfa/ul/^,,, i„cr»„in., „umMr, of dieev^ for market yearly.",
         "Ht IfM) A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS l! A view of Wa»hinifton fn ivifton fri)iii H'dn/ii Ill/tun Monument, twjkirif/ toward the Capitol. On the right can be teen the Smithnoiiian Inittitiitiim anil the diiildinr/H of the Dejmrtment nf A(iricultnre. aiithonties at the caiiiral, Washiiifrtoii, to fonii tlio s«'ttl(»iiit'iit into a state. Wasliiiigton, tlio caiiital of tho I'liited States, has iicitlier coiMiiKM'ce nor maiin- faftnriiijf. 'i'lie eity is. liowever, all tliat the iiatk)ii iiitt'iidcil the eajntal to he, namely, the most hcaiitifnl city in the eoiuitiy, a city of fine I'esidenees. splendid streets, and lovely pirdens; a city free fmiii stray iXo^s and all tiiinjj;s favoring dis- ordei'. Here tlu\u003e repi'csentatives of the people meet. IIer(\u003e also is the \" White House,\" the home f)f the President. Where is Wasliington situated * Why was not a more central site sele\u003c\u003eted ? New York, situated on Manliattan Island at the mouth of the Hudson River, is the gi-eatest commercial centre on the continent. Is it well situated for Eurof)ean trade? Are there great mines and great manufacturing centres within easy reach ? Is the situation such as to command the (rreat Lakes and the Mississi))pi Valley f New York has a very great ])oj)uIation. (jity propertj' is very deal', hence \" skyscrapers \" are quite common. What are these, and what is gained l»y such hnildings ? Study the pie- tui-e illustrating a laisy part of New Y'ork city. Boston is tile oldest of the gi-eat cities and the second best poit in the country. Which is the l)est f The jK'oj)le of Boston look upon their city as the chief e(hicational centre of the country. The imjMH-tunce of Phiia\u003clelpliia is due t** its nearness to the Penusylvanian coal",
         "fields A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS A 'jtimpM ovtr the rwf» /« the eommerniil ferfion of Xew Yort Cltu Th. / ' \"\"-J-^\"*\"^™^^^^* bu„n.„ „, ,,re„t tl,,t .en, tall /,.\u003cil,/u,.,. hJe te,e,eted%,e M J',, '^\"T '\" \"'\"\"\"'\"^ \"\"^ t.e,„\u003e,.ir .t..,-ie, .„ height, th. k,,he. .::ii^'LiK:,x:::t:^ i:^. '\"\"\"' \" Here is situated tlie riiitod States niiut, the place where Amenean gold, silver. aii(i eopjier money is made. Philadeli-liia is a veiy busy cit.v. Thousands of opei'atives are em])loyed in wearing woollen clotiis and wlieat of the north-west, the eattle of the plauis, tlie coi'ii and hogs of the south, and tlie timber of the states on the upper lakes. WHiat is the situation of St. Louis ? In makmg,.lothmg. Thousands mor. aro bnsy what way is the site favorable CagrZ buildmg siups \\Vnnit is shown on the centre? W\\,at products naturally S map that may help t us «ty t St. Louis .' In the earlv davs St. liui Ta. .?;\"r. \" ,:r,:i • \"j\"\"'-^' -^\"^\"^ ^\"^^ ■'^^^^^^-^ «* *»- lowest poim on the .c ports. On what lake is it situate\u003cl ? Where .' L»'ss than a hundred yeai's ago Chicago had not a inuidred of a population. About foity yeai's ago 25.000 houses were swept away l)y a g}'eat fire. To-day Ciiicago has a i^opniation of over two millions. A city having sucii a wondei-- fnl growth nnist be advan-tageously situated foi' ti-ade. How has Lake .Michigan helped Chicago ? All the great railroads from the west, the south and the east must pass this point. Why .' Tiiese i-ailways give the city the control of the Atniiij the Chknqo Hirer. Chicmjn hat fi/tji mil' A ,,f llllilll\u003cK.le,flltlll ir'Uu-U if distrihiiteil the fiei'ihl Imm/jht by the railrtyuh. whei-e a bridge could be placed. As a result St. Louis is a gieat railway centre. New Orleans, situated on swamiiy giound at the great bend of the southern Mississippi, is the chief centre of the sugar-cane, rice, and cotton fields. New ' )rleans also conmninds the shipping of the liver from source to mouth. Huffalo. Cleveland, Detioit, Jlilwaukee, and Duluth aiv all gi-eat lake ports. What is eaeh likely to l)e noted foi- ? If There are few more beautiful cities than",
         "Salt ' ^ t I 1 t K): A STUDY OF THE C0NTINKNT8 Lake City, the Moj-moii centre of the world. What do you know of the Mormons ? The city lies in ii valh-y, siiiToundod by snow- capiKHi mountains. A few miles to the noith-west is (ireat Salt Lake. Meadows, vineyards, ganlens, and orcliards aie to be seen to the nortli and to the s*)uth, all due to the snow waters which are taken from the hill sides and curried over the fields. San Fianoisco is the larfjest city of the Pacific coast. South of it is Los Angeles, the \"City of the Angels.\" San FiancLsco 'JVif tiunnnticevt tvlcano, Popocatepetl, ii« sren from tlir riti/ of fiieh/a, Mejrico. does most of the manufacturing and ship-ping for the Pacific coast. Here ships that have crossed the Pacific from Australia and from Asia can be seen. Here too are to be seen ships that have rounde\u003cl the Horn, from New York and from Europe. There are more Chinese in San Francisco than in any other city on the American continent. .Most of these have come to make money and then go back to live a life of leisure in China All are industrious, an\u003cl all live on next to nothing. Is this a good thing for the United States ? Do vou know whether the Chinese are allowed to come and go as they please to Canada and to the Unitetl States ? San Francisco was partly destroyed by earthquake and lire in the year 1{M)6. Since then it has been ivbiiilt. and no doubt will soon again take its place as a gi-eat seaport and business centre. Alaska, the jwuirsula of north-western Amerii-a, was bought from Russia by the United States in 18(57. Owing to the \u003c'Hmute and the difficulty of travellhig, it is as yet but jMU-tly explortnl. Hi -sides the gold found in this region, Alaska is of interest for two other reasons. It has many glaciei-s among ihe mountains, some of whicli I'cach the very edge of the sea, and are visited by inmdreds of summer touiTsts. Its coast waters are the home \u003c \u003ef the f ui' seal. Alaska is also of interest be- cau.se of its two high mountain peaks, St. Elias and McKiuley. The native }jeople ai-e Indians and Eskimo. Sitka is the capital. 1. On a map uf the United States place (a) the Cordilleran and Appalachian higii lands ; (h) the Columbia, Colorado, and Mississippi Rivers ; (c) St. Louis, San Francisco, New Orleans, Washington, New York, and Kansas City. 2. Out line the Great Ljikcs ri'gioii ; name the lakes and show the exact situation if Chicago, Kuffalo, Toronto, Cleveland. Fort William, Duluth, and Detroit. .3. Why is the summer short in Alaska t 4. Give an account of seal - hunting off the coast of Alaska. 5. What harbors on the Pacific coast used to send out the sealing vessels from Canada and from the United States I 6. Compare a winter in Florida with a winter in Quebec. 7. On an outline map of the United States, show the wheat, corn, and cotton belts and the ranching lands. 8. Give a reason for the immense growth of Chicago, New York, and San",
         "QUESTlONiJ. Francisco. 9. Locate Milwauke.., .St. Paul, Hu.lv.n River Seattle HHWHii. H..nululu. 1..,: U\\Ji, Capes CkI a,.,l Hatu-ras. I^. Angeles. .S,.h b.k- City, Denver. Pikes Peak, and BaltioK.re. MEXICO Which is th.. longer, the western or the eastern Me.xi.'un coast ? Wliat i.eninsiUa is at the norlh-vvest ? IJow is this sqwrated fi-om the rest of Mexico .' Wheiv aie the Gulf of M.-xieo an.l tlic pminsiila of Viieatan situated .' Mexici. is th.- most iiui)ortant country of .southern Xoi-th A nieiiea. Th. ni^h in a warm region (How do we know this ?), Mexico has a varie.! ciiniate, hecaus .i givat part of the country is a high plateau losing over a mUe in iieight. The low coast ivgions on the east are very hot, and oalins, lui.hei- trees, and valuable rosewood aiid mahogany are abundant. So also ai-e sugar-cane, coffee, and the vanilla l)ean. ^^heu Mexico was discovered )\u003ey the Spaniards it was inhahited l.y Indians, some tribes being fairly civilized. The early Spanish settlei's mingled M-ith the native race, and their descendants arc now A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS 103 woo, I, and logwoo.l. From logwood is made a valualae .lye. (Coffee, sugar-cane, bananas, tohacco, and maize grow almost everywhere. M.)st of our bananas come from this ! jcality. The larger number of the people of ( 'entral Ameiica are Indians an.l negroes. The tropical climate causes many food plants to grow without mn.-h labor, a condition that produces a lazy p.M,i,le. Why .so f \\Miat d.)es tropical mean ! Hi-itish Honduras is a small area covered ^nth valuable forest.s. To avoid the un- iM-althy moist heat of the coast, the few Eun.jM-ans i.pair to the hill-countiy in the uitenor, where the climate is cooler and drier. THE WEST IlfDIES The West Iii.lies are a series of islands between th.. Atlantic Ocean and the Carib-bean S..a. These islands are arranged into thr.-..gron].s: th.- Hahamas, the \u003c}i-eater An- till.'s, an.l th.. Lesser Antilles. The Bahamas aiv noted for their sponges. The Greater Antilles comprise Cuba, the largest island, known as Mexicans. Mexico City is \"the Haiti, Jainak-a! 'an.l Prert«rK/ca*^''jamS capital. Wliat is its situation ? belonging to (ireat Britain, produces fine CENTRAL AMERICA ^^^, I'i.-apples oranges, sugar-cane, n * 1 * • . , ^' *\"\"' ''^'ttou- Jamaica is often called V?™ ^'\"''\"'■\" ''' \"\"' \"\"oi*' ^^'Pn to the \" Land of Wood and Water \" The Les British Honduras, a p.,.sse.ssion .,f Great ^er Antilles remained for a long time in the IJntam, and to .six ivj-ublics. (iuatemala, po.ssession of Spain. Now the majoritv of Honduras, San Salvador, Nicaragr.a, Co.sta Rica, and Panama. All these countries, with the exception of the last, are Itut poor imitations of the rni*c.l States of America. This whole countiy is .subject to earth-quakes, volcanic eruptions, hcaxy thumler- stoiTOs and almost annual icvohitions. The intense heat and heavy rainfall make the the islands beloii; situated on Vu. West Indies. 'ireat Britain. Havana, the chief city in the guKfTioNS. 1. At What time of the year should one visit Mexico an.l the \\V,.st Indies? Why? •2 W here is the Pana.na Canal ? 3. Find out any-thing you can alx)ut sponj;es and sponge gathering. „_ ^ -^•\"»\u003c^ \"\" '''e H'iti'^l' posse£.Hions on the Ameriorr, climate very unhealthy, but also make the ^\"aro'n • in a\\''eMt.\"rl'' ^'•'\" T \"\" ■* ^\"«\" nchsoU yiel.1 a most luxuriant vegetation. t^SZ^^^ i^™ ^ItniTX^rcL^aL;:? iiie people find the highlands and the west ^\"'^'^^ '\" -^lex'co. 7. Who is President of Mexico? ^'^ast more healthful than the ea.stein coast. If Meli!' '\"\"*'! h*^ n\" ' ■, t ^\"^\"^ \" '\"^P \"^ ^^^ G\"^'' The forests yield valuable mahogany, rose- r,LXnt Z'tit.'^'^\"''^\" \"^^ ^^^^-^ \"* *^«",
         "I IW A iSTUDY OF THE CONTINENTS . » 1 i EUROPE How many ciiiitiiu'tit'^ iiii' ^liowii Uon- 1 Nhiiii' llit'in. Htiitf tlif (liifctiiiii-i of Africii anil South Aiiu'rica fioiii Kui-o|)\u003c'. Wlmt is tin' name of the si-a U'twefii Kuropi' and Africa ( What thi-rc conti m-ntH loiicli on this M'a i Point out the An-tii- CKraii. In what \u003cliri'c'tion is it from Kurojif ( What \u003ci('i'an lies to the west of Kuropc '. What two lar^r islands liea little oH' tho wtstcnu'oast f What |)i'niii sula lies to the northwest of these islands? Wliat is the shape of this jx-ninsula .' How is it separati'd from the British Isles ! What sea does ii enclose ' What is the name of tin M)uare-sha|ie(l (icninsula to the south-west ; Point out Italy anil Ureeee. What Kreat highlands aie.shown in soutluni fiuroin- ( In what (lii-ection do they run I In what din-ctions should the riv' is of Eu-rope nni I What is the direction of the main highlands of the Ameri-cas f Wheie are the great plains of KiirofH) situatid! Of North America? (Jo ai'ouiid the coast of Europe with a pencil. What can you say of the letigth of the coast for the size of the continent t Europe is so situ-ated with refei-eiice to other lauds tliat its i\u003eeoj)]e haveexeelleut fhauces to inauufae tuie, and to do ou; '- jiess witli othei' coiitiueuts. It is the most eeuti'al of the jjreat hiuil masses of the world, and it has an eiioi-mous eoast line, with uiuuy iuliiud seas and many peiiiusulas, so that there is iio woude)' that its jieopie have taken such a place in the world's commerce. Eu- rojie contains aliimt one-(iuai1er()f tile woild's jieo)ile, tmd these on the wliole live Ix'ttei'. ai-e more learned, and have risen liijjher in (•ivilization than the inhabitants of any other continent. Situation. On the map on page 105 you will notice certain curved lines running fi-om light to left across the map. At the Ths jtontitm of Europe mi i/r fh\u003c- eontinentl. ends of these lines yon will ol)serA'e the Hgm-es 40, .\"\u003e0, CO, ct\u003c-. These are Hues of lafifiidi' limning east and west and marking the distance of places nnrtli of the eipiator. All points on the line marked 50, for ex-ample, are at the same distance iiorthw:ird. If yiHi will now turn to your map i if North .\\merica you will see just where the line 50 runs. There is also a dotted .ine through noithern Europe marking the position of the Arctic circle. What does this line mean f Voii will now see that the greater portion of Eiu'ojie lies in the .\\oi-th Temperate Melt, and that liut a small part is situated in the Noith Cold {'n\\\u003e Coast Line. The coast liin\u003e of Eiu'oi)e may he studied hest from the map. Let us supjK'se that we are on an imaginary Jimrney, aii\u003cl that our journey commence.s in the White Sea. \"Wheiv is the White Sea J The shores of this sea are low and marshy. Passing into the Arctic we sail round Nonh ('a|)e, the most northern [loint of Eiuojk\". This cape is ahout a thousand feet high. From .May to July at this point there is one long day, the sun all this tune never .^hiking below the horizon. Next we shall skirt along the Atlantic side of the Scandiiiavian Peninsula,, wheie we shall find a coast very much like the Pacific coas! of Canada. The Atlantic has foimd many entraiK-es into the mountains of the jM'uinsula. These are called Fiords, and they tire very beautiful. Their sides are st«H»p and dark, their summits are snow- covered, and here and there waterfalls",
         "dash",
         "M KM) ,*»! A STUDY OF THE (J0NTIXENT8 down the i(H'ky walls. I'aHHinK hIomk, we almoHt jHTiKMidieulorly to \u003ei he^ ht of 1,400 shall i-ouikI the Naze, or im\u003es«\u003e of the \\miin- feet. On the water Hide it has Ijet-n eut into Hula, and enter the Baltit^ Sea through what a \u003efi-eat nunilM\u003er of imssageM and gallerien has l)een ealled the Arm. ^Vhat two jjiilfs provided with iK)rt-hoIes throiiKh wliieh a ai-e 8ituate\u003cl at the noHhern end of this sea ? thousand heavy jyunx nmy i\u003eoiut. Retiuiiinjj, we simll ajjain poss ai-ound the (Hbraltar was taken liy Sir (Jeorge Rooke peninsula of .Intland (Denmark), i-i-oss the North Sea, and pass throujfh tiie S' tit of Dover into the Enjriish \u003c\"hanuel. As we cross the Hay of Hiseay we shall probably find some rouyh water, for tljere is no shelter from thi\" Atlantic hei-o. Next wo Iforth Ca/ir. Xifiinii/. T/if hind i\u003ef ihr miihiiiihl nun round the Il)erian i)eninsula and «'iiter the Mediten-aneaii Sea tln(nij?h the Strait of Oibraltar. You will notiic on your map at this j)oint how near Africa and Europe are to ea«'h other. People at one time wei-«' afraid to pass beyond thestf points into the unlniowii Atlantic. The Strait gets its name from u lofty i)romontoiy, the Koek of Oibraltar, which stretches out into the sea on this i)ait of the peninsula. This rfx-ky }ilace l)elongs to Gn\u003eat Biitain; in fact, it is liritain's only possession on the mahilaud of Europe. It commands the entrance to the Mediteiraneau and has often been called the kei/ to this gi-eat sea. On the land side the roek rises m 1704 and, though once In'sieged by an enemy for iIuih' yeai-s, has remain(^l in our possession ever since. In ancient (hiys the M«Hliterranean was the most im|K)i1ant .sea in the world. Along its shores many of the great nations of his-tory n se into glory and wink into ob' vion. The Mediten-an- ean separates and yet eon- ne\u003c'ts EurojM', Africa, and Asia. It is dividwl by the Italian Peninsula into two regions, an eastern and a w\\stern. The \" blue sea \" is i , term often applied to the Meditemuiean. Leaving Oibraltar, we shall coa,st along the grt^at \u003c'urve betwci-n tln\u003e Il)erian and Italian peninsulas, r.nd pass between the toe of the Ijoot and the Ishmd of Sicily. What is the name of the Strait sejMirating these ? We shall sail to the south of Sicily to the little gi'oup of islands of which Malta is chief. These islands have belonged to Britain since the year 1800. Thty are (juite small Imt are yet of thi' utmost importance to us. The whole sea- fr :)nt of Malta is strongly fortified, and poweiful guns look out in eveiy direction. British men-of- A'ar, needetl to patrol the Mediteri-anean, have their hcadciuarteir. liere. \\\\niy this point is st) impoi-tant may be readily seen when you think of our very valuable possession-s in the Indian Ocean. Name any of these. Look closely at the shape of the Italian peninsula. What sea lies between Italy and the east ? Notice the peculiar slnipe of",
         "the A HTL'DY OF THE CO.VTINENTS jo\" IH 111.' IIIOHt H\u003c,Utl,..,ly ,M,i„t of KlllO}).'. L„.,k now tt th« 8.'ii to til.. ,.j,Hf or (JiwM'.' Til.' Greeks t-alk i it fl,.\u003e Ar..|ii,K.|M«o, ,„■ ,nu.f Nea, hut w.^ ii„w H,,,,jy tl... nam., to tli- gi-oup of ishiii.ls. uii.l we ,.„1| til., s.,, th. a.v V...,. hoautifui, a.-., f, fn.,:;,!^ a^ I :*:;:':^::!\"r \"'*•\"!':■'! -''\"^■\"•— • aivwiT hoautiful, aiv fiv.. fn.in snow an.! frost, an.l aiv „ot...i for th.-ir (lowei-s ,,,..1 fniit. W.. wish now to (.nt.'r th.- Ula.-k .S..a VV.. shall liii.l the current in th.. I)an|„ii,.l|,.s Sti-ait .juit.' strong. To what small s.'a \u003cl.).'s this Strait l.'a.i.' Th.. Bos- phorus is th.. ..ast\u003c.rn t'ntran.'.. of this s.-a ami the outl..t of the Hlaek Sea. Notic.. the little penin-sula eall.Hl th.' Crimea. ^Vhat is its situation .' It W'as here our s.)l\u003cli('is did so many ! lav.. (le(.ds in IH.\").\"). Your tea.'hei- will tell you of the Ci-imean war. The jfj-eat inlan.i sea. the ('asj\u003eian, was .\u003enee, it In supiK)se\u003cl, e.)nnecte.l with the Mediteriaiican. Now its suifa^-e is much th\" north side ar.' w.mmI.'.I hills. In the eentiv li.. hi^h.'r hills. KaHher south lie still lii;rh,.r luiip,., ^Ii.-re s..m.. ..f the IH-aks ivaeh a li.ijrht „f nearly thr.-.. mileK, Snow h.'s for..v..r ..n the hiKh.'st mouutair,-' .111. I ♦!... I. ;._K II ^ 'J'/ie riH-k iij \u003cl,l,rallni; whivh \u003e/,„irth the fnli;i,ire t„ the Mediterranetm Se„. .... ■ ■■■■■ ■! « nil j4iii.-it.|-s, Wliat ar.. Kladcrs f ()„ which si.l.- «|-.. the Alps the steep.. r .' Thes.. ranj^'.'s of mountains have many passes, hut for railways many tunn.'lM are nec..ssary. Two of tlu-s,. m-e the longest iu t ... woiKl, the St. (foth- anl, [H nul,..s, „,„| ^l^Q Simplon, liM ,„i|^^ JQ length. Through these tuiiii..|.s trains mn imrth and south. One nf the lasses is calle.l th.. (Jreat St. Bernard, a pass not easily eros.sed by foot- travellers in the \\ mter wIk.ii it is .-over...! with snow and ic... Here the monks of St. Lseruard hav.. huilt a monastery where p..oj)le can obtaiu shelter at night. The nioiiks have also train...! their famous .logs to search for wanderers. At the western .\"iid of the Alps is gr..at .Mont Blanc, the white mountjiiu. lower than the latt.-r sea, and the water is very salt cwept wliei-e th rivers enter it. n,- ^ •.-, — ' Q„_r„„„ . Climate. \\\\ hat portion of Euroite li^a Surface. An e.xanunat.on .-f th,. ma,, will north of the Arctic ..i,-,-!.. ' W l.t ' show that, with the ...xception ,.;• a portion elima.e of this ,v io ' ,„ ,1'' ,;,/''! otthepeniu.sulu.\u003efS...m.linavia.th. n.,r,hen. heat is the .r.'^t.; art . ml » I ami .asteni paitsof Euro,.,' are an i,nme„se this part in t. Ider „■ i,. lowland plain with g.-ntl.. slopes and grea, porti/.n of this' hell • \" \"™'\" areas of fertile soil. rpi,.\u003e ... • i- ■ ■ mipoitunt. The Alps 1„. m hve countries. What ..ffc-t hav.. the Seandinal-ia,. Afn,,,. C^ you uame tliese t They .,o not t^.nn tains t Do the maiTlS^ ^ ^^'t^^; a single chain, but a senes of ranges of a win.ls .' AVo„ld you say that Eu^o^",
         "hlsa p-y",
         "' A 8:ri,v OK THK Oo.VTINENTS ffoofj mi.ifnll • Kast.-ii, K,in.|». Lrin^ U\u003ev mlaii.l an.l .■x|K.s..,| t.. tli |,| nu.tli win.l*. hits l.nt « i.i.M|,.ial.' niinlfill m, t|,.. „|,„|,,' II.'iv aiv f.. 1,.. r.,iiii.| I.mmN tlmr iiiv |,alf.l.-...rf m rhara.-f..,-. - ■ ,, ,.,, .„,,p|i.,, ,.;,„.„|,., with ram south of Ih.. main hi-hlancK ' Toiin.l,.|-staii.| th.'vahi-.,fth.\u003esonth-xv..st '^'\"\"'■^ '♦ '»* 'I \"-'ii-y to ^t„.„k- of ih;. iinlr Ktmiiii, n nv.'f tlowinj, nno^v ih,. Atlai.ti.. ()\u003c'»'«ii. Th.' iiiovciii..|it .■aii\u003eiiiir \\\\if^ ^teaiijr\" riv»Tisfii-Ntol.M.m..|..inh...oaMof \\V,.,Ht..ni Afn.-a (s..«. inai.). A warin ninvnt .toms..^ tho Atlniitic-. strik.'s th- .•asl.Mii ,.|l...w of South Am.Tica ami is \u003c|ivi\u003c|...|. Tlu' north.Tii lK)rti(.ii of th.\" . tiv.iiu Hows al..iij; th.' uotth- ea.st.'ni \u003c-oast \u003c.f South Amm-H.sm. aii.l .Mitris the (iulfof -M.'xico after \u003cTos\u003e.iritfth.'Canl.- lK\u003enii S.«n. Th.' stivani .Mr. l.-s ulwait th.' Oulf, ami after passiii« lH.|w..,.n Florida aii.l Ciibii fh.ws otr to tin nortli-..ast in an .'v.-r- wi.loniuK riv.'r. Th.- pi.-vailiii^ south-west wiji.l .■.■irri.^s heat froui th.\" warm wat.-rs of Mh' Atlauti.', an.l jm-v.-nts i,.,. from hl.wk- injf the harlM.rs. Th.' .-liMiat.' ..f W.St.. in KuroiM- is sii.-li that tlu\u003ejK'o},l.',.nn w..rk ahn..st.'v.'ry .h.yin th« year. Why .-annot our |..-..|.l.' .'l,, this ♦ Rivers. AI..st of th.' rivers ..f Kuroj).' How cither t\u003c. the north-w.'st. .)r to ili.' south- wist. Wliy is this ? A-ain, n.'ariv all th.-.. nv.'!s\u003car.'navi^'al)l.' for -r.'at .listai s. sin...' their courM-s li.. so lar-..|v tlirou-h l..w plains. A.l.l.Ml to this th.'r.' ar.. nianv ..anals. so^tliat tra.le l)y wat.-r is n'a.lily ..arri...I on! TIm^ rivers of Kurope ar.' .-asilv l.'arn.'.l if you study th.' maj.. Th.-r.' .-ire thiv.' thiiiKs, however, t.\u003e l.e r.'iii.'nilier...l. Th.' fii-Kt is tJiat the p-eater inniil...r of tl,.\u003e liv.-rs flow eitlier to the n.)rth-w.'st. or tf\u003e th.\" south-east. The so\u003c'oii.l is that \\ho inajoiitv of these rivers rise either ii: * ■. ■ or in the Valdai plateau, a ])hitear to the east of the houtlierii en.i of th. .utic. A third feature is seen when the outlets are studiwl. European livei-s empty into the White, UK) '5\"lti.'. .\\orth. .\\I...lit.'rran.'an. Mh^-k. or ( 'm- I'un. s,.as.„rid int.. th.- Af'antie 0..ean. The Alps ,„■„ Ui.^u. the Val.lai hilN „r.' |.,w. The Alps f,,..,. s,.v..ral M'as. Th,. \\nl.lai hills »re '\"'■ ••\"\"1 'I'\" x'a. Th.. Alps h„v.. a h.'uvv ;;''\"'■\"\"■ »!\"■ Val.lai hills „ lijfi,, ,„i„,.„,i I he riv,.rs nsn.KJn tl,.. hills ar.. |.,nir..r an.l sJow..r than thos.. risnir in th.' ,n..untain-. ' \"■ '''' '\"\"I \u003c!\"• l\u003eannlH. ris,. „.,„,• ,.,„.), -Ill-- in th.. Alps. Tl... Volira ris..s in the \\ i«l.l.-.i plat. .an. Th..s..ar..th..KivaI..s| riv.'ix Th.. riv..rs (lowing into th-- Whji,. Sea shoul.l r..,nin.l you ..f :.ur .^a.-k.-n/.i... For s..v..n rn.mtl.s ,,,..1, yar this s..a is fr.,/en. I Ins pr..v..nts th.- riv.-rs tl..win,f info it fr..m '\"■iiiy ..f niu..h us.' f., fra.l.'rs. Tli.' Kalti.- ^'''^ '' i^'''^\" niMni..'r..f riv. rs. tin' Vistula •«'in« th.. m..st imjK.rtant. .Nam., tw., l.u-^e fruits m this S..H. Th.. n..ilh.'rn ..n.l of the Maiti.. IS often froz..n f..r tlnv.. or four months in th.. y.-ar. Th.. Russians, how- • •v.-r. have a munU'r ..f strong and heavy st.'am.'rs whi..h ar.. abl.' t.. hr.'ak th.-ir wav thn.utfh. Th.' Kll„', tl... Whin.', an.l the I ham.'s .'inpty into th.. .North S.-a. Where IS the Tham.'s ? The .\\orth S.'a is, lik.' the Haiti... shalL.w. it .-..ntains a fam.Mis -ul.- iiK.rfr,.,! san.ll.ank. ku..wn as the Do^^er IJank. a .-apital tishinfr spot. Th., KIIh' is u (Jerrnau riv.'r of v.'ry j^ivat valu... Tlie lihiii.' is ..n,' of th.' in..st important riv.'rs in Euro]).'. U'lier.. do..s it ris.. ? This riv.-r flows thro;.^'h the l.usjest j.art of the eonti- uent. its sprinjTs ar.' found in tlu' jjla.-ieix of the .\\li.s. It is f.'.i |,y many an i ,..,I,i stn.ani as it Hows ah.ntf t.iwar.i an.i int.. the h..autiful i.ake \u003c '..nstan.-.'. it enters this lake nui.ldy. It leaves it el.-ar and phuiKes .lown tli.^ tp-i'uU^st fall in Hin-oj..., the S\u003c-haffliaus.'n. It th.-n tarns to the north and finally enters the North Sea On the lihine are Imh^s earning p-ain wine, and nier.-han.lise for all parts of the worid. Down th.' Rhine als\u003c5 pass rafts of tin.l.,v from the forests of Central Euix)pe.",
         "I no A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS will show UK m**' tlozeuH of Ono of th»'HO Im ancient cftxtloM WVJ'llil COOtUI-JPH IT Rath«\u003er ntrange thin, in it not, vhoi: we come to tiank thtti EurojM' wiw old iH'fori' the world vvvr honni of Ainerii-a f Evidontly timbor iM lLM\u003ett\u003c'r hx)!^^! uftor iu the jld laud tbuu it in with iix. A voyajp' Mp tho Rh. many thinipt. Wo tthall great citu-K in tho valloy. Colo^io. We shall mh- whens tho barons of afto lived ^vith their 8ol- iljers, piouud down the (MMM' )M\u003eoiilu about th\u003c\u003en\u003e, and ])orhapB roblMMl th\u003c« uci-cliauts goiuK tip and down tho liver. Almost every hill could tell a sto y. In some hilla fauK'H wei-e said to live ; in others groat dragons were BUppositl to dwolL We shall aljto see (iue viiioyards lining both banks of tho rivor. Evoiy Iwolliiig . \"\u003eU(\u003ce has its gl•a^)e-^'iuos, and tho hill- sidoH jiro gi-eou with tho same vine. Duiiug the growiuj.; season men, women and even childi'en (lie at work weeding, hoo- ujg, or piokhig. Wo shell see the givat rock on whioh stands (iermau foili-esa of Ehronbreitstein, CiJinjnf C'll/iei/nU. Thi» i-iithnlrnl, lirijuii in the year IJIfH, wai cunijfletea i» IHHO. tho tho strongest jMiiut on tho Khiuo valley. Tho rook is four hunih'od foot above tho river, and tho fcliC'ss on it can give room enough to a luuidrt'd thousand soldiei-s, should tlioro be any occasion to roquii-o it. Another imiK)rtaut city is Strassburg, ^vitli its fine cathetb-al of red stone. This cathedral has a clock which not only shows the minute and the horn-, but also tc-lls the year, the month, and the day of the week. At twelve o'clock twelve apostles circle about an image of the Saviour. The hourw are ntniok bjr a skeleton and the quartern by an angel. Farther up stream at a i\u003eoiut whore the river courses between narrow banks, ww shall MH\u003c the echoing riM-k. Up farther still is the famous Maus Tower, on an islaml iu the river. Ask yotu' tojR-her to tell you the tUn-y connected with tliis. Into the Atlantic, the Heine and tho Togus rivers flow. On tho former is Parin, xaid to be tho most Is'autiful city in the world. Tho rivors flowing into the iModitorranean,or into its conn\u003cH;tiiig sous, ar« the Rhone, tho Po,nnd the Dauu)N\u003e. Tho D .nuU) is tho St d largest river iu Europe, and was at one time one of \\lw two great tradts roiiios from Asia to Em-opo. To-day tho Danube is use\u003ci as much as ever, but not for conveying g\u003cs\u003eds from Asia. It Hows through rich laiuLs. Cities and towns hav(\u003e giown up in its valloys and along its banks, and tho rivei- is the natural highway for tho trade of this region. Near the headwaters of this rivor, several miles to tho north, wo shall find Nurem-berg, with its old-fashioned houses and its .lucient wall. To-day Nurenil)erg is known far and wido for its manufacture of toys of all descriptions. Indeed, there is no other city where so many toys aie made, and no place where toys can be bought so cheaply. Continuing oui' journey down tho river, we shall sbcrtly reach tho imut opposite Salz-burg. Iu tho luountaius ntur SaLiburg some of the finest salt mines in the world are located. To see the mines we shall have",
         "to A NTJ'DV «»K TIIK CMXTINKXTN §0 down mniiy fi-ft into tl ^f latlti 111 It' \u003c'Hrth by iiiPunH j^ ,|„. | of ladtWH. Wn Hhftll th.'ti hnv.. fo^n'thiutitfli (pvnt lonK hnllwavH ni' nut ..r Hn|f ,\u003cM\"k. until wi' filially rtwh fh,. m-,.„f h„|, i^Jj,. j,,' th\u003c\u003e Vfiy hoart of tli.' n tiiins. This Ink.' Ih l\u003eitt«\u003er with .mUt. Th.- Ink.' wat.T is ....n- • hict.'ii through pi,M.s throiitfh lli.\u003e jri-oiuui anil \u003clr)wn tho Hiih'M of ih»\u003e nionnttiin t.. nvont panH, wlM\u003en\u003e th«' watt-r is .•va|M.nif.'\u003cl un\u003cl tlif H\u003c^1 xalt tiMftl on Honii\u003e Knro|«.an taMt-x pHMMinvl. What a ItiiNV stivani th.' l\u003eaniilN\u003e is. Hon the ruftN of tiinJM.r anil th.' I..ii«t\u003es loa.liMl with Kiain. What shonl-i th.'s.. t.'ll you of tho riv.M- valley ! lint u ■• must huny on iMiMt Vienna anil Hui;a|..st to tell you of tholoweiDanulM'. The low.. r i)aiiu)\u003ee pawHeH thronirli a great area winiewhat like .iir woHteni wheat lamls. On nil Hi(le8 are to he se.'n ileitis of golihMi nvaiu. A wh.'at country means (lom-inilN; hut what stranp' mills ai\" these on the river .» Tw. boats are ani'liored in a line across th.' stream. Hetvve\"n these a \u003e;ieat water- wIkh'I is tixeil. On.' of th.' boats has ihe inillin); maehin.'iy, an. I the jiower comes from the inoti.m of the water. Farther down we note great herds of eattl.\" and h.)ises, droves of piirs, and II.H-ks of slu.'p By an.l by the DanulM' In'jrins t.\u003e show majiy rapids in its course. Unv and there the riv.T rinis iln-.twjrh di'f|. jj.niris in th.' mountains, and at th.- Iron \u003ciat.' (s.-e ^Map) the str.'am breaks thronj.di th.' moun-tains and ..nters the j.lain. This is one \u003c,f till' most danifni'iius siM)ts on tii.- riv.T. ami hundnils .\u003ef ;;.,\u003c». I boats hav.\" l)...-n wn-.^k.-.l here. A cainil at this j«\u003emt has r.'m\u003c.v.'d tht'daiiKer. From the Iron \u003cJntethe DanulM' flows in a janeat curve and empties into th.' Black Sea. The Don Hows into the S.-a of Azof, an arm uf the Black Sea. The \\'olga •iiifest river in K uni Wfk'i ., . ,, \"l\"^- Wtwn- ilooH If riM. . n,,w c,,,. ,.,.„„, „,„ „^,„j^. ^^^ ^ j^^ Its .|ourn..y towa-ds the ( aspmn S..a the river M .ws m a givat double curve. l\u003e,^.ri\\^ ,!,)« '•\"••V... Th.. Vol^a is cntiri'ly in R.u^sia an.l \u003e..rv..s Uu.ssia as a conveni.'i.t highwav the pnHluctsalM.ut the Caspian Sea am'l 'lie iurn-ultural pr-nlucts „|„ntf its vall.'v III\" \u003c aspmn Mu.j cntiivly surr..tm.|...| bv land. 1. not as valuabl,. an outl.'t for su.-j, \"liver as the Bhu'k S,.« w.m.M hav.. Imvu How so .• Plants and Animals. «»reat foH'sts «t one '\"\" v..r...| lartf.. ar..as of Europe. The mu«t imiHjrtant f.Mvsts t..-day luv th .m,. ,,f northern Russia. th.\u003es«. of th.. .'^•andimivian jH.ninsula. an.l the forests of |M.rti..ns ..f \u003c'..nnany. Th..se forests ar.' I'liwly of pin,.. ,„ik, elm, 'i\u003eh, an.l lin.l..n tr.H.s. The inoiv iiorlheni w\u003c«kIs exten.l to the tuii.lra . ountiy with its moss and lichens. Ui the Bonthern ountries, su.h an Portugal, Spain, and Italy, th.. mor.. common tn.,.s are th.. oliv... th.. l..mon,and the orange. Spain ami l'..rtu!;al also jr,,,«- th,. famous .-ork oak. from th.- b«rk ..f which botfl.. stopp..,s. ,..,rk limbs. ,.t,.., nr.. ma.le. In parts of s..uth-..ast,.rn Eur..|H. grass is the \u003c'hi..f ....vring of th.. groun.l. Whv sh.,ul.l not tr..\u003c.s grow in su.-h an ar..u ? \" Alm..st .'v.'iy Kurop.-ar. country gr.nvs wheat, oats, an.l barl..y. and fruit is abim.lant. Th.. m..st int..r..sting aniimds are the Cham. .is of th.. liigh,.r Alps, an.i the r..in- .I....1' ..f th.. tundras. Find out all you ••an about tlvs... Europ.. is so w..ll-cultivat.'d thai ni.'st of th.. wild animals luiv.. dis- upiH...ire.!, ami it is only in the i;u.s.sian ami othi.r gr..at f. .rests that it is possible to hunt w,.lves, iM-ai-s. ikH'r, etc. Many of the ^vil,^ animals of Kussia, such \u0026s the wolf,",
         "Ixjar 11-J A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS siihlo. )iii(i onnin(\\ arc Imiitfd or triipj)0(l, for tin- sjikc of tlicii- furs, wliicli iirc sold at Inijjt' fidis iit viirioiis K'ussiiin cciilrcs. One of tlifsc is ticld iit XizliiH-N'nv\u003c::orod, on tlic^ N'oljlii. For 1\\vo nionllis of tlic year, tliou- sands if ]ico])l(\" ^alli('rfrr)ni all jiai'ts of Asia and EiH-opt' to dispo.-c of all kinds of pio- duci'. Wlicn llic two Mans licforc tli\u003c' lioiisc of tilt' irovcriior of tile jilaci- arc jiullcd downi it is a sifiii that the fair lias ended. The jieople then return to their homes and the ]ilaee remains deserted nntil the time of the ojieliinit of the lieNt fair. The domestii' animals reared hi Ein'oj\"' lire largely those we have found suitable lo oiu' own continent, namely, cattle, sliecji, hoiscs, pij^s, and jioullry. It is said that the K'nssian Kmi\u003eire owns half the horses in the world. It is also known that our best cattle, sheep, and ]ii\u003e;s have come from the British Islands. Spain is noted for its horses and Jiiciino sheep. K'«indeer are the beasts of burden alioiit the White Sea, camels about the Caspian, donkeys about the Jleditcr- raneaii, and horses elsewhere. JJces arefouiKl in the central and southern countries, and silkworms in Italy, southern France and in south-eastern Sj)ain. Over half a million jicrsons are emiiloyed in Italy aloiii' ill iaisiii\u003cj silkwoi-ms. The countries liorderiiin- the North Sou share in tlie fisheries of this liody of water. The I)o'::t;er liank will remind you of what other Hank ? Here the codfish are ■•au'flit on hand lines and the catt-h dried, salted, and sent over the contiiieiit. The People. Loiifz;. lonfj ago there was in Asia an agricultural people called tln^ Aryan, or vohic family. These peojile were attacked and driven out of Asia toward the west. In tuni they drove away the jieople fomid along the shores of the Mediterranean Sea, but were again driven t'ai-tht\u003er to the we.st of Em'ope by new invadci-s from Asia. Tlieir dewrendunts, called Kelts, are to-day found in Wales, the Highlands of Scotland, and the West of Ireland. The jieople who drove tho Kelts out and took their jilaco in southern Kin-oite were called the U'omance p\u003cH)p]o. Their descendants now live in Portugal, Spain, i)arts of Fi'aiice. and in Italy. After the I.oniance trihes. aiiotiicr horde, the Teu-tons, a ract\u003c of tall, fair people, came and settled in north-western pjurope in the countries now called Norway, Sweden, (Jer- niany, Ilollainl, B.-lgiiim, Switzerland, and port ions (»f the Mritish Isles. While the Teu-tons were settling, another Aryan tribe, the Slavs, spread out across Kussia, \u003c{recce, Ser\\na, Bulgaria, an\u003cl Mont^'uegi'o. A war-like tribe of the yellow type settled in Turkey. The .Magyars, an Asiatic race, settled in Hungary; and the Finns, another branch of th(* yellow race, st\u003ettled in northern Eu-rope. The great race of Kurojie and the gi'eat rv.ii' of the worhl to-day is the white race. With this glimpse of Eurojie as a Avliole, let us now study the different countries sep-arately and learn m\u003c\u003cro of the iKHijile and of what they are doing. GREAT BRITAIN AND IRELAND The I'liited Kingdom of (iieat Britain and Ii'cland is the name given to the region commonly known as the British Isles; but this long name is often shortened into the Uiiiti'd Kini/iloiii, which we shall us(\u003e. Th(» I'nited Kuigdoni is mad(\u003e uj) of tho large ishinds of (Jreat Britain an\u003cl Ireland, and about five thousand smaller islands near their shores. Though small in size, these islands are the heart of tlu* gi-eatest empire the world has ever s(H'n, an empire which has been built up liy Englishmen, S(-ot\u003c'hinen, Ji-ish- nieii, and Welshmen ; it covers about one- fifth of the land surface of the world; and it has under its rule one out of every four persons of the whole human race. The four races mentioned did not",
         "always r 114 A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS 1 live in hai-moiiy. Indeed, the Britisli Isles were for (-(nitui-ies the battleRi-ound of English and Welsh, fhiglish and Irish, and English and Scotch. Ireland hccainc a pai't of the British dominions in 1172, but tht» complete union took itlac(\u003e in 1801. Wales entered in 1282, England and Scotland came under one sovereign in ]\u0026)'.], and the parliaments of both countries were united i)i 1707. Now all these countries send nieml)ers to a cnui- mon parliament at London, and ail recognize a\u003c'ommou sovereign. King (Jeorge the Fifth. The riiion .lack, the national Hag of the United Kingdom, lias been formed out of the flags of England, Scotland, and Iri'land, and now waves over all our fortresses and on all our ships of war. ( )ur mei-cliant ships carry it to show that lliev are British ships, and many of our schools lloat it to teach our children that it stands for fair play and even-handed justice. At jMiace at home, Britain started out to build an emj)ire. (Jther nations, notably Portugal, Spain, France, and Holland, had already taken to the sea. Columbus, acting in the service of Spain, had discovered a New World. Portuguese sailors had pushed their ships farther and yet farther ilown tiie west coast of Afiica. Bai- tholom«'w Diaz had at last rcmii.led the southern end of Africa in 148(5, and King .lohn of Portugal ' ul called the Cape thus rcmnded, Jio CajM' of (lood Hope. In 1407 Vasco da (Jama round- ' the CajMi and reached Imlia, tli jyland of those (hiys. France and Holland had followed Spain and Portugal in the business of getting new lands. In th(! course of time England also became interested, and s\u003cx)n had a good gi-ip of Ameiica and a foothig in India. But England had to win th(* control of the seas before she could fe(\u003el free to devote herself to the s»'ttlement of new countries, in 1588 Drake helped to defeat the Span-ish attempt to concjuer England by senduig a great (leet which they called the \" hnincible Armada.\" Since then the Spanish mivy has been but a sm.ill thing on the waters of the woi'ld. In the seventetnith ctMitury Admiral Blake destroyed the Dutch tle«\u003et, and in 180.\"), at Trafalgar, Nelson ovt'r- came the fleets of Frani-e ami of Spain hi a crushing victoiy. These three men lived for England, loved their native land with an intense d(\u003evotion. knew her, believed in her, and made her greatness their own. The United Kingilom has since been the mistress of the seas, and has thus been able to extend her dominions by purchase, l)y treaty, by settlement, and by",
         "conquest. What the Britisli A STr7)Y (»F Tni- roXTIX bt' ivudilv unde IlilVV IllfJIll^ t()-,l| KXTS ly iri.iy tn.iii Ivin.rs End t„ Jc 11.- '•-tood if y.Mi tak.\"tli..s,.l„„',| \"\"• H Klol.eu,i,lI,\u003e,.at..Cn,.a,|a. Australia. S,.,„l..m An,.a Tn\u003cJ,a,NWZ..alan.l.an,lal.„M.lr..d oth..,- ,l,stn,.ts, all „r whi,.|, I,,,,. j,,,,„.„ n.H .M- tl.. sl...lf..,.in. ..a,.,. .,• .jHtainV •••« xh.ps ol war. Take fl... .i„l,, „.„)„ aii.l pla,-.. It so that tli,- liHrish Nl,-. arc ill th.' ccnti-f of Hit' he 111 isjilic ic. Nearly all the laii.l of the worM is ht'if shown, and Hiitaia is at the centre and alile to reach almost \u003c'veiy jiait l.y sea. This is one reason of iiritain's progi-oss. L«^)k at the maji of EuroiM-. The Mother Conutiy is separated from all the petty quarrels of the main-land liy her water- fTiiardfHl shores. She stands out from the continent and re- '•cives the best tlie SOU! h-west winds can hestow. Afs a result Ireland is the \"(Jreen Isle,\" and (freaf lii-itain is also noted for her lovely jr,.p,\u003e„ fi\u003c'l«ls. The 'clunate fljiides, thi\" Til I'M OGimts House? Fin.i •i.^L,;'£c:;;.;Silr\" ' -\" ^- .S\"..theni and eastern Enj,da„d is a hroad, l\"« .lam with o,.,.asionalran-,.s of hills I, southern Scotland is another lowland ,v^.ion •\"\"'\"'•''■\"■\"'I'\" iujr Scotfish cities. The mountains of \u003c«reat Britain are iio- whtM-e very hijrh, Imt they skirt the w.'st- crn coast and thus Kct the heaviest sliare of the I'ainfall of tlie island. The most iu;rged ])art of the island is in northern 'Scotland, the Scot-tish Highlands it is '•ulled. Here are many }\u003eeautiful lakes or lochs, which make tiavelHng through this jacfiu-esque land very ])leasant and •■asy. The larger portion of tlie high-lands is now divided into great private hunting estates, on which deer ami other Ji:anie animals are allowed to nm wild. The coast of Great ;.''■ the of the British Isles is such as to keen ■111 it« P. -f ■ • , The coast of Great '-■'-•s opeti sttmmer and Jin ' \\ j t^ ^Z\" ''\"'\" \"• '■\"'''^' \"\"•' '^\"\"^— ' l-'''\"it its people to work at leas I,, , „. '\"^ \" '\"'' :\".'^\"\u003e' «\"^' ^'^'^-^•-- The mos !\" -vry year. The surromidin ^ s^^ L 2l uT^ \"\"\"^f \u003es \"atun.lly in northern Scot- '\" M, and the tnines of i'T.Jl ''\"\"'•\"'\"''•\" ^'»' J'\"\"l is bordered l,y a great s.-otiand yiehigtj^:^::,.; \u003e f;; :^ ;;;;; ;::•: .tir: r ^'\"-'^ ^^''\"'^- ^^*-- \"Oil. '\"*'' •\"\"* isapj.hcl to thegi-oup of islands along the The rivers are all short, the longe.st being H •\u003ew l-^ ( ' ^*''','*'\" fP\"™**^' ti.,.n tlu- continent? pa-st SO f The lower vail. ■ys",
         "of f lit) A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS « veitil of tlu'Hf rhei's liuve betu drowned, so tl»nt they aiv navigable and fonn fine liar- boi's. What d\u003cM's drowned mean ? The Thames mid tlie Clyde are examples of such valleys. The chief (K'\u003c'ni»ations of the jM'oj)le of Great Hritahi are a^jricnlture. •irazinj;, min- inj;, tisliing. miiiiufactni-iiiji. and commerce, and these occupations arc found wherever conditions jire at all I'lvorable. (Jreut IJi'itain feeds one anil one-half million horses, six and one-lialf million cattle, twenty-live mil-lion slice]!, and a great nndtitmle o'i ]»i\u003crs. Gi'ain lands have lieen steadilv growinu; A lliiihliniil cotUme in Srof/nm/. pniallei'. for various i-easons. Now iiear'y all the wheat comes from abroad. Name , coimtries in Ameiica that have wheat to si)are. The fam(!us old English forests conld not now shelter a Kobin Hood and his band of robbers, 'i'iic growing cities have changed the chai-a\u003c'tci- of iimch of British farming. Thei'c is great demand now for fresh milk, good butter and egg.s, and garden stutf, and many of the farmers are trying to supply this demand. England is still noted for its apple, peai-, jdum, and cherr^' orchards, and its fmuous hop fields, Hcotland still leads hi high class oatmeal and tmnips, and Ireland in butter and potatoes. SJjeep are found all over the c(Mmtry, but ▼mrlicularly on the downs of f]ngland and on the highlands of Scotland and Walaa Cattle are mnnerous m the lower and milder j)arts of the country. Southern Scotland and northei-n England excel in hoi\u003eies, and the cod (isheries of the Dogger Hank not only sui)ply food for the table, but also blue- Jackets for tlic wAvy. Most of the land in Great Britain is held by a few noble-born persons who rent it to the fariiK'rs at from five to twenty dollars jxH' acre, a stun sufHcient to biiii good laud in the ('ana\u003clian West. The owner of an es-tate l'--cs in a tine mansion surrounded by a beautiful ]\u003eark. llis woodlands are jirobably well stoe , i with game bii-ds, but these are not for his ten-ants' shooting. What can you see in the pictui'e of a home among the Highlands of Scot-land .' England is a beautiful land to live in. Everything looks so fresh and gi-een. Moss covers the roofs of the barns and i\\y mantles the farm houses. There are line orch- anls and beaiitiful tlowei' and vegetable gardens connecte\u003cl with each English home. The hedges and the loads look as if they had always been there, and numerous ])aths across fields show how fon\u003cl the ]M'ople are of walking. Great liritain has many places noted in histoiy. No matter where you may be in England. Wales, or Scotland, there is sure to be some interesting spot neai' you; it may be a battlelield, or a ruined \u003c\"astle. or some-thing else. It is little wonder, then, that thousands of wealthy American tourist.s find Great Britain .such interesting ground to travel over. But Great Britain is .dso one of the world's workshops, and it i^ th' wc shall speak of now. Groat BriU can make an\\-thing fiom a steel pen to . man-of-wai- and from a shoe-string t^\u003e",
         "the A STCDY OF THE CONTINENTS its fmo''.^iZI;„I!'i,;:;!;;\";:;;^;;^.;!;^^f j^^^ i-\u003e^ the woouen o^tre of th. ^m. nnd „-oii huv. .|,.n.. Muu-h t.. ph.,.,. H,iHi . h ,„^\"VTf\"'\" ''^\" '\"^'P'^' ^^« ''^^ ' Hcnv Bnti.sh,,oo,lsn,-,.,.l.s„ rHial.!,. l^^\":,: ' . H \";\"^\"\"-:'\"-l \"•^- .ShHTidithe,. is «„ \"niKirtant tliinjr t., ivn.,.,..!.,.,. ' \" ' ■\"\"\"\"'\"•\"'\" \"t ^tono suiti..l f„r jjrindinj. ,„„.. ;■••\"•\" \u003c'i-^K\u003cnv ,,. within\". tvr,..il.: \"•\"•••\"\"-.v. Th..,oa,..M.,h..,-,...„t,.,.swh..,v L'\u003e,„1,)„, tho Nv,.,i,l-s j,,eat,.s, ,•!, v Ou ,,,.-, '■;',^\"' ^'\"'■^'^' ■^'\"\"'S ^-liinawa.v. au.l s,.,.,...s „f ■ - ' '\"\" •\"\"•■\"\"\u003c'\"th..s..„f,.,.,.s..nt.f„,w,.wishv,.uto IvIlttM'^iilii.ifl.i...^ i* I I - * Atlaiiti, iifcltHl with tlic .,,,;,„,„. . (ii.|,M,,„ 1^ ,1 , ■■ ■'\" \"'-\"iMiyoiitc) Scottish cott.-n _ _ \" '^\" ''^'\"\"''\"\"\"K-'t i^\"n.'l\"n amlK,iiMl,,u-h. ••cntm Wh.-n , ^- ' ~ - ''\"ikIom is as laip. as'Xnw • IfH's the rtiw^ ^ , V..i-k an, I ( 'hi,.aj,'o put to- the small hiiiii,.ii ^^—^\"'■'^^^^^^^2^^^^^^^'^^^^''=^m '\" li'uijf ov.-i- to tlic iron-(.Ja,J \" ^^■\"'* ' •\" ^'■\"•'\"'\";; \"' '\" ■'^■: ^'\"\"\"/ AV«,,./.«,,;,\u003e„„Z,/ ;,„'\"X^ t)\"' ••itv, an.l the l^^ttleship. '' ' '\"\"-■■ ^\"^o- foj,^ wl,i,.h ,is,. The cotton eo'itre of Eiifflaud \u003e M-m, .h- ^ , tVom tIi,. Thain.'s -i.«.e,.. K.w„„„,. ,•,,.,„\",„.„„;'; ,r; \",\"'■■'■'■;■'■\"• '\"'-''\"■ \"' \u003e-\" Tzr:\"? *? \"™^\"-\"' \"\"■ \"\"\" ' '\"'i \"- -•.'.'; \" ::\". '\"■;■■'%\"' \". \"\" ui .M/e to Loudon. Aftt-i- ivadiin..- tl,.. «,, , ^ ,\" ' '-\u003c\u003e\"d(.u is the '-';'\u003c1 a-l shipp..d .,y ,.aii t.. Ma„..h..s tJ^:.Z''T \" 'T\\ \"'\"' ^^■''\"'■^■•- '\"• \"iM' It is taken thetv ,h,„uj,h th. Mun , ^--'s s-I'l'ly the fish markets, ^l..'ste.- eanai eonneetin, ^^...l^Z^ ':'\":;.;r'^\"^r;r '\"\"'\u003c'-\u003c' ^\u003c- \u003c5 •Manehesten This citv is th-\" larjre t manu- En .L., U ' v '\" •\"•'■'il-.s f,.„„i f-tut-ing eeutre in tl.. w,.,.id. ai^l h ' , ^ o' ' ' Vl ^\"^\"'' \"\"' '\"'\"\"' * \"\"lu.tiy iscotton. Ma^eh.-s,..,. has .\"•;;.; h\"\"'\"- , '\" ^^-'-^^-nster '^go\u003c.«lw. -st^ply. It has ^...., shipping ''ZjlJ^Zj::^ \"'• '\"■•■'•^' vumiections with the pn,;,.ipai .-onntries of a..,,uaint...| ,^en wit. I \"\"\"T '\" -''* '-ewofld. It has also th.. moist atmospliere In lie Tow,. • t r . '\"\"\", \"\"\"\"' '''\"''^\"■'^",
         "'m 11?^ A STl'DY OF TIIK (\"ONTIXKXTS I i\u003cM\u003eiii wli.'iv tln'Ciowii J.'wols iiiv .•arct'iilly cfiitiiil plain \u003c-«)ntniiiiii\u003ef many small lakes, \u003erii!if\u003cl('\u003c|. We siiall cross the Thames oil tlif swamps, and jicat hojrs. Tli.- coiiiitiy lies famous oil! Lo-MJoii Hrid^f. tiir Itiisicst of in tlic patli of the watt'i-iailm Atlantic tiic score of hinliri's spaiiiiiii\",' tiic river, wiml- hence tlie wonderful ;;reennesH of No wondei' that London is annually visited the pasture lands. The land is divith'd into liy so many (H-ople fn»m other couiitrios. great estates and rented out often in small parcels to tenants. There are thousands of Irish faiins coiitainin;r not more than an acre of land each, a very smal patch oil which to pay rent and rear a family. On the larifer farms, j)aiticiilarly those of central Ireland, the land is cultivated like a jjardeii and the peojile are very prosperous. What can you see in the pic-ture of an Irish kitchen ? Potatoes ajid \u003c Mitf are still the most valuable uf all the Tnsh All liith fiii-m, kitchtn tvith Ha open iinifn ill which jiriit in Imrnril. Ediidiurjrli, situated near the Firth of Forth, is a very beauti-ful city an\u003cl is the centre of Scot-tish culture and leaniinj;. \\ Sunday in Fdinliurgh will show you how well the Scotch keep th(\u003e day of rest. You will find ]K» Sunday newsjiajiers und no street cars running;. The churi'lies are tilled and the streets almost deserted. It was here that John Knox, the reli^lious reformer of Scotland, lived and did \\vhat lie could t( J'hr KlUiirvi'ii LiiTteK ill Iri-lniiil, t'liiiuiix fiir f/ii-ir linmiii ami much rinitcil hit trnrtliei'n. make his country lietter. E\u003clinl)urgh is one crops. Irish pastures sujiport lialf a million of the jrreatest hook-makiii},' centres in the horses, iietween four and five milliou cattle, world. Crossiiijr the Forth is the great four milliou sheep, and a sjreat many pigs, liridsre made of stone and steel. This lindjje Tlie jiotato is the staple food of the Ii-ish, is a mile and a half lonj^ and is one of the and the crop is so important that failure world's wond«M-s. Tueans fanune. In 184(5 a jiotato blight de- Ireland, the Emeralc! Island, is ii mass of stroyed the crop and cause\u003cl a million of mountains and rolling land, with a low people to die of",
         "starvation. A STr-DV OF' TIFK (UNTFN-K.VTS 'Ml' iiiay .•I '\u003cUtVV Tl...rn,,n.so,,,.. |,,,H,,i,„u,,,,,, j,, ,„,.,.^,^^, Whil.. m,ssi„i: th n„t,v u- .||..,i| ,,fi..n '\".'V '\" l\"'-^ \"\"■■\"iirh unv,„ i,„„.. liii,., \"ith ,.,.af. ,., kin.l .'rt,„ru|,iHM. .lui, with \"\"\"■\u003cl'-''ist is tli- \u003c;,.::f. (•;,„..« ;,v. a ,.,v„ M.nss of !„,.,. M..n,. |,il|.,. ,i,i„^ .,- ',. \"\"■ ^'■\"- ''li.'v ,•„.. ... ,.1..^.. il,,.,i '••■■•'\u003cl'ly W.-,lk-„„tl„.;;,: iUHl ti,.,.,. i, „ .,„,,. ;■'!'''''''■''':'\"''''''''■''' •''■■•''inar,v|l„.tu-,,,,,.i, Insl. an\u003cl n s,'„„is|, .,..,,,1. Tl... S..„t..hMuin iiKivod t.) \u003c'o,„,.,„-r,„s |.n.vi,l,.,l th-.r.. u-.'is ■, •••yma.l. Tl.is th. Iris), ;.i;„,f |,„ii, ,„.|„f,.'r \u003cl\u003c'f\u003c'.itin},' liis rivjil. h,' tl,;v^v fli\u003c' liiilKt' into tl].' M.ji. Dublin, tli.M'iipit.-iinfln.jiUHl. is « V.TV /ill., city. \\V|,;,t is its sitiiiitioii t In |)„|,ij„ oil,. Tiij.y Olltuill S|.fci|,|,.||S of iiisiijiicc. haiul-niiulf. Ijir.. of vr.iy '\u003cri't'jit vnlii,'. OiJ(\u003e iiiJiy iilso's.... tlic ffiiMoiis Ph., .nix F'iiik. sni.l to he the finest in the world. Hellast. sitiifitt.(l on ,•,), ..y- celU'iit hiii'l,,.!-. is the .•lii,.f njaniifafturinjj city on the ishm. U9 tl \"-'-. Ih..s,„-f,„... ishiliyinth .stand 'v.'l touani tl,.. w.'st. Asa wh.,|.. j.Vnn.-o ••'\u003e ■•' Nv.'inn. ,n..ist ,.|in,„t.., ,, f..,.ri|„ soil '\"\".'■' \"\"\"''.V l\"-pi.'. iill of uhi.-h ai.l in I'l.-.k.n:: l-'ran.',. ,-, v,.,y w..,,lfliv l,,n,|. |„ ;;'■'•'\"■■;• ,\"'\" '■■\"■'■'^ ■•I--.' small, liu, most ot ■'\"\"' ''•■'\"\"«■ I'-tl onnn..i, |....,,,|... j, ,|iis ;'. -'\"\"' \"\"'\"- ■ '•'• n.M'th.'n, an.l ....ntral ■'■\"';'■:' \"•'\"^'\"- \"\"•^- \"\"•! l-aik'y an. rais,.,|. '\" \"11- r-'irion s„oar-lH...ts. ,,.,tato,.s aial \u003c't)i.'.r,,,,t..n.,,sar.. .■ultivat...i. an.l li,,.. ,,,- ■■''•■\"•■l--fMl.|.lc'san.l,...arsan..,in.v...vsi.|.. ''/»;■„,/,»,/ n„t„ ,,„ „ l,l,,i,/i,i„, ,11 \"I III ll.lf„\u003el, ],;iit,„l. ™lls am esixvially tin.', for th.. linn, niojst vin..v ,, ' '\"\"\" ^'■'*'' ^'\"■'^••\" \"\"d ^n.1 ,^ this locality is „..„ ,i„.,, , . „,, : t;'t,;\"\"\"'^T^ \".vas .n. s..att....d iNear the mills a.vth..l.|..a..hi„^Oi..Ms „,„,, \"\"\"\"\"'\"'\"^ f'\"' -\"\"\"t.-v whi.-h the cloth is sj.iva.l. This lin..,; ,..„„- man.ls a hifrh pri...\u003e in all j.arts of tj,,. „.,)il,l an.l Iivhm.l has I,,...,, i,ot..,l f„, ,|,„ |,,,,\" sue hun.h-cl yvars f..,' th,. ,naniifa..f,iiv of all kinds of linen ciotl,. QuKSTiovs I. Kia.l |.,M.ls K.d. [s|,. „f M,,„ the W „sl,, Jinstol, a„,| tl„. (),k,„,^. j,,,,,,,)., ., „ , ; H n,ap „f tl„. Britisl, J.1...S ,u,d n.a.-k i„ 7,/| 't,,,. ronnt,',... ; (A) the ,.„ast wnt,.,.. c,-.,„.s, aa.l M, .. 0) \u003che rham..s, N.,,.,,,, Cly.lr. a,„l Shaaaon : (r/) ,|„. H.shlamls „f .Vutlaa,! an.l ti,.. KiJla,-nev lake. • (.) the principal cities. ;!. Whv is easfrn Oivat J^.i'tain ' nerthun w.-stern Crat B,\"itain! I. M,.nti,.n s..ve,al things tliat have helpt,d to make the H.itish sNcrssful . , , .■• fndc...|. Fi-ancA ^-is th.' uo,.i.Mn the p,..,,,,,H.,n of ;;;;:; \u003e\"^nly..v..,y,.n.. has wine with his meals' ;;;;:',::;■\" ?\"\" ';''\"'''•\"\" \"- -^ i^\"...... of HI.' tast.. .it fills hfjiior. I'iiiis. th.. cai.ital of Km, '\u003c\u003e many, th. th.. woi'lil. faslii.)!! FRANCE ■anee, i.s, according '\"\"'St beautiful city in It IS th,. c.ntiv of Eur.n,..an \"'\" \"'-t an.l l.nycrs fr„m all \"ar.ons ,., there for fi-,.. fashionahl.. .h-.-s. ^'oods. Ih.' str..,.ts are wi.Iean.I .-Wn ;\"\" '-utiti.l sha.l. fr....s j,row al.,n,. tl 1' '•\u003c\u003enl\u003cn;anls. .Ma_rseil|..s. ..„ the coast, ^t the on.l.,fth.' Rhone vall.'y. is tli..great,;^,o\" 'SS ou tlio Me.iiT.MTan..an Sea. The .-itv is hnilt The Fmich ..oasts fa,.e in tl,m..lirections ^hrU. ■ il !''!rt IT'^ \"\"■\"\"^'\"' ^^'^'^ mat are those an.l of what a.lv - .: ' ' ' '!\" ''\"\"' \"' *'\"' '\"''^^- ^\u003e\" th.. antafre may .)f a jTrntt church, stan.l top uiff on a rock above",
         "fir 120 A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS ~1 ^C^ I. \"I\" Lvuking oxer Parif. Noticf the neuen hridijeii rro$iin\u003c/ the Stine, anil the Eiffel I'uwer in the diftance. thnt \"made in Germany\" are words known to ulnioHt oveiy- Ixxly. Ajjiiin. Gonimny in well sitiiiitod in Euroiw. Alxnif if aro niitions with whom trji(l»\u003e miiy Im\u003e caiTiod on. To tho north is thf .M'a. invitiii); foicigu com- HH'icc. ( Jonnuuy lias some fine nvcrs. Name oii»\u003e of these. Into what iKxly of water does it empty ? All these rivei-s «U\"e nangablo and manyof them are ('omie\u003c'ted by '-unals, so that Uennaiiy is hi-oii\u003e;ht int«i dose touch with its own centivs and with thecoimt ries 1 leyond the sea. A countrj, however, may have all these thinjjs and still bo an infeiior country. The (lenuans are like the English. the city, is a huge gilded figiu-e of the Virgm, They have a talent for tnule, they ai-e veiy which glittei-s in the sunshine and serves as indu ^rious, and al\u003eove all they are thrifty. a landmaik to those on the sea. So great is the trade of \u003c}ennany IxHioming that the countiy has trading houses in every GERMAifY part of the world. The Germans are fond of T\\liat two seas V)order on Germany ? their homes, of art, and of music. They Which is the l\u003eetter for Germany ? The Ger- are big eaters and drinkers, but thcij\" l)eer man Hmpire is made uj) of twenty-six states, is light and their food is plain. of which Prussia is the largest. r~ The greatei' part of (rermaiiy is one gieat fai'm divided up into small fields which are kej)t like gardens. Thei-e are a\u003c'res and acres of \\-iii«^ai\u003cls, pas-tures, and grain fields. Wheat. oats, rye. and baiiey. sugai- lieets anil |\u003eotatoes. and gi-eat herds of fine cattle are among the farm products. Hesides possessing a rich soil an\u003cl a favorable climate, (Jer- many lias rich mines of coal and iron, and as a result the oountry has gone into tnanu- ,. ,. _,,. ,.„./,,. . , . „ ^ . , _ Jierlm. Thtt avenue, \" Unter dtn Linden,'' i* uiie oj tlie tanutut ttrtett ractunng on so large a scale qftht",
         "world. A STrF)Y OF THE CONTINKNTS 121 Germany ha« iilsf» wlmt i\u003e sjil,! t,, i... .1,,. . . 1 .■ , ■ lh.OHt KkIv of s..l.li,.,s in ,1 . .; .,\" V . ;\": ''\u003e•.'•\"•'-■ \"f ^' \"7\"\u003c«' Plantaticns. »r,.un y\u003cHU.gU..n,mn must s..,v in ' ' ^' ^\"\"'.^\"'•J'*- \"\"•' «\"\u003clm\u003e-.is. TItiv an- a .J y..«r f ;: !;:;:;;?;:;; '■\"•';r\"\"'^ \"\" '\"•\"■ -''r \"' ^''\" -^•^\"\"\" • '•••ii .\"n.i..„,. si..,.i.,..,. ..,.,;',',: ;:.: ;r.\"\";:\";M' \"/\"^-\"--\"\"-'^ -\u003ci -v.T ....asiont.Mloso. (J,,.ar fortili '.. .s v' ^ .• \".'\"\" '\"\"''\"•\"\" ''\"\"\" .Mi;fl.t atta.-k. (Jn-af m'... n-.f-sva. I n ho l\"\"' \"\"\"\"\" . ^'';' ^\"'^'i'^''^ I''\"- '^\"l.v \"\"'Xt (i-nmii, navv ..„...-, ,1 ^'■\"'\"■\" '\" \"'\" l\"\"'l\"'-'i\u003c'\u003c' «»f win.-. Tho ct'iituiy B.'rliij \u003c.ity. til.- capital ..f tli.. Kinpiiv, is situutwi ill a sandy ami latli.'i Wulllilcss part of tilt' rniiiili y. Hofoiv 1,S7(\u003e, til., year th.- (i.-'r- iiiaiis tM)ii(jin'if.l till' Fiviich, H«'rliii was l.iif a small .ity. Siiict' tht'ii the Ot-niiaii States fiHv»' u'liteil into the Kiiipin-, mid lioiliii has lic-n madt\" tli.^ fHpitul. Hci'liii is now one of tht' pvat.'st cities on the con - tineiit. Tlie city is wou.I.t- fiiiiy clean and orderly, for the (•ermiuis are noted for dojn;:.' tilings proiM-rly. Should juiy one throw torn papers on the street a iioliceman woul.l soon ask him to jiick up the piec.'s. Even tho dojrs are watche.l. \"' \"'\"\"\" and no dog must 1m^ on the sti-eets after ten o'clock. \\V\u003c.ul.l this he a good nile in some of .mr Canii.lian .-ities ? TJie great seaport .)f this conntry is Ham-burg, near the mouth of th.- HII.e. almost .'Very j)art o| ihe hin.l. il.'ily IS a farmiiitr .•.•untrv. aixl much of ■fay«.\u003e*ie-!V\u003cv /( /'.'',/»,, K/„„n„,, ilir ]'„„tl,r,,„, liiiili in .': Ji.(J. TIk rinent 't'll milk III It'iimiii iiivltitecture. th.' land is owne.l in larg.' tract.s and lot on sliar(\u003es. Th.' p.'asaiit farm.'rs .)r farmers of small ai-eas liv.' in small houses consisting l-tTliaps of l.nt tw.. rooms, a kitch.'ii ami a ITALY l).'.lro(.m. Th.' furniture is of th.' poorest wi . sort, and oft.-n the onlv he.l is hut a heat) Wlmt great inountmiis fuv ti) tho north of It«lr( ,-f ^f....... .1 .1 \" ,r,\u003e . ' What mealies to th.M.Hstf What i.lamlii^s oft the ^ '\"'' \".\" \"'\" \"\"\"'■ ^''\" ^'\"\"1 \u003c'f' ^hose p.'..ph' is ott.'ji as m.'airrc as their dwellings, and in soin.- parts of th.- ..mntry grt\"at \u003ciufiiititit\u003es .\u003ef .•hestnuts tir.' eaten, either I'oas\u002bed or gi'ound into a ch.-tii) nif'al. Jiut wliat ilo y.m know of the silkworm an.l tho nmllH-rry trees ? Italy has a large . W ,.„ ., ,^ t\u003cX' of the hoot ( How is this inland s.^parat«i from Italy t What sea lies to the west,' What is the naiiip of the larger of the two islands lying to the west? If wi! travel from tjie Alps f.) southern Italy, we shall find a most iigi-eetihle cli-mate and d a very fertile soil. We shall ind ustry ill silk, which is grown",
         "and A ST V UF TIIK CONTINKXT8 H ■'Jft^ -'-'-'^tiJ^^V \"*V mill it N\u003cK)ii coiHiiD'rnl the whole )M'iiiiifiiilii anil afti'i- « jinl aililiil nation aftt-r nation initii Roin*- iMi-atni- tin- nii\u003e- tivxN of 111., woil.l. ami tliH fonlii'ot' all that was jrit'iit in lift ami in Icaininjf. In time Ihi' Kiupiii' w.!* .Ifstii.ynl. I.iit tlii'ii' ail' still to Im\u003e .stvn inanv 'liiiiyr-'tliat n'iniii(lu-ot'|{,,ni.''*H • iii.-ii'iii H:!Viifn.x\u003e. U,,ni n- taiiis the \\'ati\u003c-iiii. tlir |.iil; of th.' Pop,', ami til.- liiM-st • ■liinrh in tin- worjil, St. I'.-t.TM. it is ffo\\vii;Ml with ancient, ■ «^^M^^^^p iiioniinii'nts ami with in.'niorieH Tkecil,,,.jya,J^$,„;il,th»m,„.k,«,n-\u003c\u003e«^ntth \u003el\u003c-nn„\\'e»un,i, i^ ,„.,.,l. \"'' 'hi' JflVat pi'opi • xvj.u olli'i* _ .. , , liveil thiTi'. \u003c Mil' niav sm' nt m«nuhi..„m., at home Whou tho 0^,., I^une the minsof the (olisetini/tl '^;;L^ *h , m-o plue.Hl on tho mt.llKvn- t.wn show Kfrnmls tho worl.l has eve,- .! , h«t(.,. the eaton-, liars, or so-ealh^ silk- was here that the Ho.nan jn'opie ..aine ,o see ThmM.H.,H.,is are simply small rounil houses women, ami even liel^.less ehihlren we.v where the eatennlhu. retnain until they thrown to he .nan«le.M,v wil.l .eaJt/ . t come on as moths After the cc..cK\u003ens atv heathen Ko.ne miKht hav.: .so.nethi.K vl. en then unwoTUid ami the thn-ail woven into eloth or wouml into spools. A hunilreil years ago there weie nine separate States in the country now called Italy. A great Italian leader by tlie name of (Jaiihaldi .succeeiled after many •itruKj.des in putting an end to this state of atlairs, find Konie has heen thb eapit'il of a united Italy evei- since 1870. Komo, the Kternal City, is situated on the liver TIImm- in western Italv. The race which The Gr,u,:! rv,„..,/ {-../,... The RiaiU. I.ruhj. ,. ,/,„„.„ /„ M* back- l/rou,,,/ under the rooj oj which are merehaiiW itoret. founded the cilv was",
         "stro- A STIDV nv THE (ON nXKN Ts aiv th.- .•ata.-oi„l,s ^n-ar .av..* „n.| imnnnu^- ways ,-nt ....f ..f ||„. u,.-k. Wl.af .1,, v..,, Tnf|„. n..rfli i. III., .iivuf Kln,..i„... mil, Its stal.'ly l.ni|.li„-N art fi-.,,Mi:.... ,i.;.| pi.-f uiv pill.Tips. Kloivn,-,. was tlf l.iitli- ••'\" '■ \"\"• s''il|'i-r nn.i |,iini,.r, Mi..|,.M.| Ainr.'!,.. th.. |..H.t |»,,„i... i|„. ....iinr .Mm.ii.-u ^••s|.il.M-i. an.l ll,rii\u003etr..ii..„i.T (iaiil..,.. s,,|,',.. oflli,. «:n.at.-l ni.i, il,,. \\N,„|,i I,,,. kiiMW,,. Ntlliki'. \"II thr M... lit. nun. nil. i\u003e l,..aiili- *■\"\"\u003e■ I''' •'• \"^'i- it 1^ III- l.riulM 1,1,,.. sky. ha.'k ..r it aiv t|,.. ii,..:,iitaiiis; h.-fniv it IS tlif |..\\,.|y l!ay ..f Na|.|.v. „ii\u003cl ,. jitti.. to til.' M.iifli is til.. Iiiiii..ii\u003e. V.:]. ;,„.• ..r \\ ,.sn- ^''\" ■ -^ 'i\"'*' \"i\"iv tiiaii I. Slid v.'iiis ajT\" viii..yanls .•..v.-iv.l tii.. si.L.s ..f Vesuvius. Hii.l iM'auiifiii If..inau villas n..stl,.,| at its has.-\" ]'S.l Til.' |,!aiii ..t' Hiui»niiy has |„.,.„ ,.,,11,^1 fj,,, Kiiiuaiy ..t' Kiir..|.... What ..iIi.t irnuaifi.-H iiiis Kur..|«. .' \\Vh,.,„. ,y... aii.l l,aH..y aiv \u003c'\\tfl|s|,,.iy,-uitlV,l|...|. i.l,,! llulli..Ms,,rsh.i.j,. ••)«ltl.% iiii.l la.-saiv rais,M|. Ausin„.|||,„i,,„.y \" \"Iyl''-'lsits„wh , |.|... ita!s..h..||.st;. t'''l !h.. iiati..iis ahva.ly m.-iiti..)H..I. \\Vla,t ■ II-.' ih.M' .' AiiMna-lluiii.aiy lia\u003e a v.-ry irii-at fi..iiti.T '\" ''''''I\"!. Ii.'i p a liiiir.. armv is ii...-..ssary. Its...ast liii,. i- hut in.%iLri-.. aii.l its |H,siti..ri s\"Mi.\\Ma.l iiijai..!. In spit.- ,,f all this. th.. • •\"iintiy has nia.l.. vivat |.i'..!,'i-.\"ss. ViWiut. th.. fapital ..r Aiistiia-liuiipirv. IS at ..n....f t.i.. -i.-at .•..ntin.'iital.-i-oss i-..a.|s. lli'-ni.M.tinii |,|a.-.. „{ ..i^rht jrivat laihvavs. iiiKl IS. u.'Xt I.. I»aiis. tia. j;„v,.st ..iiv'iu Kiirop... On,, lum.liv.lan.l thirtv niil.-s li.w.T Tw.. fashi..nal.l....iti..s. P..n„«.ii„n.lil...u' V '''''?'''':\"\" '\"\"'\"'\"■'\u003e■ \"\"'\"^ '\"«\"'■ r..tort.a..no..ntai,..:;...:;;::i;.,i;:;;;. : : s ;r''i;,;:i:;::T'?''\"''''7T''- \"^^ t«nt.ln.a\u003entntMan,..,-. \\Vith..ut wavnin. th.- ./ ,; .., ' ^J'\" ' *\"\" '\"^^•\"^' tnountain i«,u.v,l „„t v.,|,.ani.. ash..s MH.it...l ., , \"^ \"'\" ''''''■ ^\" ^'»' sight. L..„, y..a,.s aft... a ,...asan i^ « \\;;'Z ':TT\\r '\"i ;\"7-^.'\"^'\"-»- « w.-ll .stn..-k his spa.!., a.'ains, a statu.\" '''^ ^\"'^ ^\"\"\"^ \" f'\",' \"•'\"I'l- Foroi^^ht huu- This I., to th.. .ua.ov..nn;:; ,'. ,«:r^i 'm^ZT^ri \"\"^ T\" \"\"\"^\"' \"'\"^ tlmt th*, tn,v..|U.r t..-,lav .-an hav.. , v.mv . \"'\"\"Mian.-... I„ om of the At the h.'a.l of th.. A.lriati.. S.-a is \\-..„i.... ' \"^\"\" , \"\\ *'\"' '''■•^\"\"\"'- '^ '^'\"\"ll Tho city is huiit ..n a. t a hn,;. ... I i ^Z.^:^ uTr \"'\" '\"' 'r \"\"\"\"-^ \"'^' What ♦•l.st\u003e ,lo i.slail.ls .•OIU1..CI...I l.y lMi,|fr,.s. ||,„is,.s ....v..) the islaiKls, .-anals f.nm th.. r..a.lways. uii.l gondolas the calis. AUSTRIA-HUNGARY The doubl.^ stat.. ,.f Austna-Ifuiurarv is. in. lie than a w»'(.k at a tim.. you know of (Jaiicia ? RUSSIA I^iissia (•.)iitains hull' ,,f th.. whol. of Kui-..j.... Th.' frrf\u003eatfr jiart area this with tho .....'pti.. of Russia. ,h.. ia;...st ..u^\u003e ..x,.ns.' is:;..':; . s1;;;:l::j I). .oimtn- „. KuroiM^ In this ....untry w- shall ally .|..wn to th.\u003e four i'as W la'.\u003e hml many stn.n^v ton^nu's an.l as many All th.- l.or.i.nnu' seas ,nav he looke.l nou different ,K...pl,'s as th..,..' ar.' .litf.'n.nt la„- asinlan-l. On., is .'ntuVlv so a ' \" f^U ^•^7;'^^'-l'y-\u003e-\"-'tl-tthis most imp..,.,ant of th.' resf- are ...... ..;; ^ a laml ot two .,-eat plams an.l nua-h with th.' .n-ean hv nam.w passa..'s o monnt\u003c«no„s \u003c...nntry. Ou thr u.'st ar.. th. un.!,-, ,h.. ..ontrol ..f Kuss.a, llow^s t]S Alps. Across the centre are the Cai-pathian.s. an ohsta.-l..",
         "f m A STUDY OF TUE CONTINENTS Is (j •■ ^ \" w;5;.,,..:':'''\",,,;:,,:\";::;'::,:,,: ;;;:;;;;,;t,,:,:*-' ■■' ■' «...-i.\". fi-oMi thu whori'M (.f t|j,. Arvti.\" (uv suutli. \u003e*\u003c• fliiit a viiii.'ty (.»' .liiimt.. may In* ...x- jKMl.'d. Tlu' Miiriiim-r i**'i\\h„u of .•.•iifial Uiis- Miu \\h niiirh tl„. ,*«„„. „« i„ Mu„j,„,,„ „ vlvur Hky. H loUK .lii.\\ . n huiiii MUnnutT. ami In th.. n.iur|,|„„.|„HM| of Moscow, cfMU »ml iivu aiv fu.,11.1. Salt is foiui.l on il,..' m.rtJi-w..Mt slioiv „»• i|„. Caspju,,. ami coal oil \u003c\u003e'» '11\" s..|.;i,.wfst cr)as» of f|„. same '*\"\" ^'* \u003e^\"'' '•* »li\" flow ,,f oil that the soiithciii KiLSMiaii lllilllNuls ||S4\u003e coul oil to lire their cri- As liiiiiherini^, mining, ami furm- itiK \"'••' the most iiiilN)rtant rN'eii|ia- tioiiH of thia coun-try, only a very lew of the KuMsiun people live in cities .iikI lar;,'e towns. Russia, in fact, is a great farming nation ; so great, tliiit if all the ir we travel 'fron, I e re te ^ f' ' \"' \"'*'-'' ''\" '\" ^'\"•\"\"'\"- \"\"-i\"\" tin. Bl..k L: : . ',.,-\": *•;;::';; ^\"■•'\"\"■■^ »••'• -^ village p ,e, an.l the most tinulras in evm- res h- , ike tl n'\"\"\".\"\"\", '\"'\" \"*\" ''\"^^'\" '^ ^'ill\"«.'-Ku.sia. our-own A... :^ , X w ..^ l;' \"\" 't' \"'\"\"; \"\" ^\"'\"^- '-'\"\"*^ •\u003c\u003e to «o through a tnagni«cH f 's ^''\";,\"^-. «»\u003c! is .livi.le.l an.ong the drcHls of n.ilfs in w m an fo thl .\" \"\"\"'\"\" ''' \"'\"\"\"' I\"\"'''\"''^- «'\"^\"''l part f.e from the^ltra^t^S l^M ^l!;: l^\"\"' ^'T ^\"'L'^'^^' - mil ..f III.. f..i.ost ...mnliT »■.. „,i.., . ■ . u .•raiiilry. hi\u003e pl«,e '«\" K .1 1 .-h ,;;;;;i,.r„,;n;;:„„: l \"'\"*\" \"■\"\"'\"' \"\"' ■■»' \"•• \"\u003c■'« '» are cultivated m great (luaiititios. This Waisaw Afo^.. ,.- i w. » di.i-^.1 u„ ii, .1 ..,.„„ ,„,„ „„„, „, i^^it-iriwi-xir^t-T™: rpfre.ohing summer night ./ iirir iiliiini ih\u003e Hiitrr",
         "triiiit. A HTI'DV OK TIIK rnVTINKNTS and .St. PofPi-shiiitj iimnuta.-tni ott„n aii.l linon cloth. M.,H..,m ha^ it„,..r.,mt „•..,, -11(1 sUvl far; ,n..s. Ma.,„t„.tinii.tf i. „|... wim.^| ..II in th.. liMMi.'s „f th.. |M..,,.|... .,„.|, ▼lIlaK.' lonkillK aff.T M.liif s|HM.i,i| li,,..; ,; may In- tli.- inakii.ir ,\u003ef |{„hsj,,„ 1,.„,|„,,.,' ,,r tli«' making: \u003c.t' funcitinn^. Kora Iniijf li„„. |{iis\u003eia wa^ \u003eluw m rail-way l)iiil.liii\u003er. \\mw \\Vai\u003e,iw an.l .Mum-uw ftiv irtvaf ii.ihvay .•.■ntivs. 'I'ra.lr l.v wnl.T is fam.'.i..iiiii tlM'siimMiii.liiif;^,.,,^. „'„.|..iii|„. I2ri IJ-L'i id i» „ |,ii«y \\v..ikv||..p t.M). at.. I 'li.T. niv iliiMiwin-U ..t «..i,irii iiti'l tfiiN \"li- 'I., nufhiiijf l.iii iiiak.- hm.'. Hiii^m^.N I- fli-' '-ai-ital. N.-ar HniN..,.U j^ ,!,„ '\"\"\"'■'i\"!'l \"f Waf.-il..... ttli.T.- th,. Kivnrh ini.|..i Na|H.l..oii lt.,iia|.art.- uit.- .|.'f..at...| hy \"\"• »\"\"i'- iin.l.'i- th.. I\u003euk.' ..f WVlhi.tffou Ml IHU). HOLLAND h«H .K.„ trying t.M.l.tain sn..). a ha.h.., ..v. al v.. 1 v,. \"\"\" \" '';*'' \"\"\"\"«'' Jian n...... wh.. h.i.l th. .......h.ti..,. ..f s,. hnai th. I.^dr!.; ha-. L, ' ri: at^^ Pet..|-Hl,„,K », th,. w.khIs un.l swa„,,.s n..a.- a l„ntf liifht \\,.,v |,v a. r. ... 7 the Malti. S.a. Th. Mha-k S..a .kI.i. an. fann Ha-v ^ it a a h.^ ^.^ ' , Z, ^ g.-l hnt th.. ou,I..t is Kuar.i..l by T„,k..y. th.. ..st ..unlet. s.K.ts i, /.. ^ , ,. \" \" *^\" \"' What . h.s ..utlot .' Russian t.-.Tit..,,- has L.K.k at th. ,.la,. .,f Kun.I. Noti.e the h^n a .I,..l rapally ., th. .as,, th.. ho,,., jm-at tn.n.l in th.' l)„t.h .oast TIds i^ bemw fhat a .l.-snabl.. ,,„rt .,n th.. I'a..ili.. .all..! th.. Z.ii.l.r Z.v nJ-LnTi' f . n w...., .. t^...n.i. This was s,.„.,«,.i ,., „... «at..,. .U^t. t: \" ! ' ..^t;^': bt« Hu.s,H„-,a,\u003eata.s.. w.,.. wh..n I'.,,-, .hain. This an-a was ..n... ,.„ . .^ , ! Arthur was ,ak.„ fnnn tho Knssians. fa.n.s. hut th.- .-a hn.k.. .1,. n t . k „ I St I\u003e.t^,-sl,u,x IS tiu. Russian .apiu,!. tl.K.. ,h.. .ouutrv. .h-ownin^ h.ua n 1 f What IS Its situation .' M..s,.„w is au ohj..,. ,«...,,!... *«iiHK Inin.li..!. of eapitai. Fiml .\u003eiit what you can ,,f .\\a|«(- leon's tlijrht from Mom-ow. Warsaw i\u003e t)i.* capital ..f Polaii.l. a .•ountry one.. in.l..p..ii- d.tit hut now .h\\-i\u003cl.\u003cl aniouji Austiia- Hunu'ary, Russia, and (ionuany. BELGIUM Bpliriuni li.s l,.'tw...n Kniiic.an.l Iloilaiui, »ii(i has oft.'ii I1....11 cail...! th. ••HiiflVrSfat..'\" Can you piv. any p.asou for siicli a nani.- f H.r.. a«raiii. w.. in...t with small farms, with Til.. \u003c'aMls_oi' Ilollan.l if j,la..\u003c\u003e\u003cl end to .11.1 woul.l stivt.-li a .-oui.!,. of thousan.l iml.'s. As w.. jro thiv.utfh Ilollan.l, w„ shall soin..tim..s s.... ships sailing as it w.ro thn.ufjh th.. .r, „ ,i,.i,,^ ,„ ^,,,. ^^.j^j^^^^. s..iison tlu.s. .lit,-li,.s ur. us.'.l bv skat.i-s, .ith.r for busiia.ss or for i.l..asiir.. \" Look at til.- fiirur. on paKP 126. Tli.iv are four Diit.-h f.'atun.s in this j-i.-trnv you should n'ln.mlKir: th. canals, the flat ., ,. , , . . , ■ - ''\"\"\"♦'T- *ho win.lmills. aii.l th.. cattl.- tu.tamih..us..s,l..ttui«th.. lan.lsothi.-kly As it ' su.-h a (lat couiitrv, mos f that .,ue would thmk that th.re was but it b.ing .«.l.,w th,. I..v..| .,f ih,. soa. th. oi.o towii. aii.l that B.\u003el,uiuni. EverylKxly is western win.ls hav,. a fi workinj,'.— men. woin,\u003eii. and child ren. peop! Th,- le nf this si„!;!ll .v.iy farm.'r has hie fanuefs, th. best hi Europe, it \u003eiH!t!y ii'.o tiisv in liis work. Tiu sea, u. sw,.,ip; he windmill to help hi •11.0 111 is sai,l. gi-eat service in helping to ,,unip out e windmills are also of",
         "the ii't; WMt,.,- ihat liatlhM-s „u tl... land aft.-r .veiT ln'iivy t'.ill of I'aiii. Tlic j,'iv..„ pastMivs of llolla.i.lf 1 tlm,,- si'.Mlsof ,.attl... .M,„.|. l.mt.Tis .„a,l,., an.i 1-1 1 luilk an.l Imn.T !i,i,l a ,,,„|v ,„;,,k,., \"\" I'AVAhuul Th.. |)„t,-l. ^.ar,l,,,.s a.v al.o wnrti, s,.,\"iM,«-. Wl.at niaikHs |,av,. tli.v »'\"• v-ir-t .l,|..s .' TiM.ir (low,.,- ^.anions, ,„;- t'.'ul.uly tl..\u003eir tuli,.-. iiya.-inth\u003e, a.„i oflu-r '\"i\"'\u003c\"i\u003e\u003c pliints a.v woi-l.l-kiiown. M;,,,^ \"» \"'\"■ '\"\"'\"-^ l'\"U.-l.t ii, onr sei-d .stu.v. «-\u003c»iuc from tile \\ftli..ilaii.ls. A STri)V OF TUK COXTIXEXTS smtal.l.. lor .lairi-ii,\u003er au.l poultiy-raisine, so \"'■■•t t.ms of ,h,. l„.st l.uttor iu tho world \"\"•1 \"Hlhous of r,.al|y fr..sh ...gs ar. .x,,ort..,l •'v-ry y..ar. Ifth,. p.-o, f London slioul.i ^'lv.• up l.utt-.rin- tln.ir luvad or usin-M )o.unark would U- a jrr..at losor. Co,;;: l-ajivn IS th.. .,,pit,i. What i. its situatLnT NOKWAY AND SWEDEN O'nizi,,;, .,„ the Inwlavdn nf the Wtherh,,,,!^ Tl ■ ^^^^^^^^^^^^^ \" s ' ■ w ; \"■'' v'\" ■\"\"• \"\"^' ' ^^''\"\" •\" ti»- \\' i'-.t lm^c y,.,. ,. say u( ,l,e A.lanu,- cast ,.f Suv- \".ly aii.l „( tilt. Baltic loast i.f S\u003cwe(l(.ii ' Xoi'way is u iMoiintainous ro- \u003c/i'\u003en with many l\u003c\u003eiijj:,naiTow,st('ci)- cid«'d river valleys, the lower portions of whieh are often drowned by the sea for more than one hundred miles in-land. These val- '«'.vs, known as fixi'ds, are \\en- Three thiiifrs uioiv should ))e mention..,! i .-v , , Honh, are veiT na,nely, the storks, whieh sotnetin h d ^Zx \"\"' '\"\"'^' ^\"\"\"\"\"\"^ ''\"'•^--' ^ tlu-if ttests in the ehi.nney to,s, the w\u003c ^^:;;7Z: ^ '\"'\"\"^7 \"'T ^\"^^ ^•'«^\"'' .slKH-s tisod l.y the \u003c.hildren ..n,! even l.v those •'\"'''\"•' /\"^*' ^'' » •'^eatanjiK HtV. Norwe- g.\u003c.w.t ttp, an\u003cl the won.lert'nllv eleln I.r T;V'\"\"\"'r' '^^'^^ \"''^^ ^''\"\"'^ \"' \"\" P-''^ dition of ever\\-thiiifr i„ the wliole \u003c.om,trv ' I 1, ^'\" , '^'\"^ ''^''''^' \"\"I'l'^fit'.'* nvo eon- The eapital of Hoilaud is .^-dled T Le Z / TT '''''\\ '^\" '\"\"•\"^'^ ^^''\"••^' -^'^'- ^'^^ -^1^- f-i'i- \"t the mild, moist, moimtainous west an.l DENMARK ^' ''^^'\"\"- '^^^»'l' fi-'^l' should VOU ,\u003expect I\u003e.'..n,arkhaslH.enealledthe\"Kee,.erof ,, -.^^''i\"-^' •;!'';'\"'/'''' •'^\u003c''''1» i^ the eajutal. the JJaltie.\" Can vou -nve a v rf s / U ^■\"''\"^'' '\"'\" ''^^' ^\"\"'^ ^'\"\"■^ ^^ the \u003cl.u-inK the growin.. season ■ , tl r \"'\"' \"''^'''\"' \"\"'^■'^'^' l'\"'-'i''ularlv lovel eountrv ,\u003ef H , ''''''■ \"-\"' '\"''\" *'\"\"\"'• T''*' l\u003c\u003e^vest is »he fartnin.V onon„o„; numb, o^ ot^ef -h \"o^' \"T ^ V '''■ '\"\"^\"''*' '\" ^'\"'^ -^'-^'■:'-- -.1 sh.\u003eep. The eom.trv ; a wUr^ j^:;^^'^'^^-;^ '^-f '» «-lon is n.ueh wnoi, ,s iiJ^e that of Caiiiida, lumbeiinK Ls carried",
         "on A STl'DY OF TlfK CONTINKXTS 127 intlif'sanHMiianiior. Wliat is this ? Sovoral thousand \u003e.,«-niiiis i.,,, l.y tlx- wat.T-i.ow.M' ot fho Sw.MlisI, stiva.ns jjiv,. ,,« som.^ ideaot this industry. Pino ami fir ,nv the pnucipal trees of Sw.'.len. Stn-kiiuini i. til.' c'ai)ital. \\Vl„u is its i..,si!ion .' In tiic northern ix.rti.m ot the penii,s„i„ and situated more in Kussia than in eitiu-r Norway or Swe.len, is tiie home „f the L;,,,. landers, a peoj.le nmeli iik\u003c. tlie Eslvimo Some of tiie Lapps live in „.„ts ma.le of skins stretdie.1 nj.on po|,.s. uiti, a l,.,le at the top for tiie smoke to jr.. out. Others have huts of st.nie, earth, in faet of anytliiiifr that can he ma\u003cle to stick toj^etlicr. These people helonK to the yellow I'ace. The I.ajips roam ahout the country, for they have to follow theii' herds of half-wild reindeerfi-om pasture to pasture. The reindeer suj.- plie.s them with milk, flesh, and coveriiifi:, and is used as a beast of di-aiifrht. SWITZERLAND This is the most mountain-ous countiy in Europe. Kwit- zerlaud contains the hijjhest '■.•\u003c'iire.,fth.'.\\lps. InSwitzer- lan.l .1 traveller may see p,-aks '\"■tw.fn two .-I, id thive miles ill ii.'i!.'ht. and some of these .ire eoveicd «il|| snow in sinnm.'r as w. .; ;,s in winter. The hifrla-r vali.-ys are the .•hannels \u003c*f the jji'eat jrlaciei's whii'h come down into the forest edjresand even into the I'iistnre lands. Vwh'v su.h cirenmstances, the hijrhei- and more e.\\p,,sed areas are d,.- voted to f,, rests and j.aslMr(,'s, and the more sheltered and lower lands an- iis.-d for jrrowinjr jrraj^ies, a small ((uanfity of --i-aiu, and {rar.len stuff! Switzerland is eiiiirelv inland. What \u003c'ountri,.s surround it • What languages should i)e sj.ok.'ii in various parts of the \u003c'ountry .' Can you see how dependent the Swiss are upon th.-se outside nations ? Will Switzerland he in fav.r of war or ..f p.-ace ? The i)eople are always hu.sy. Their little c\u003c)uiitry is surrounded hy wealthy nations with whom they carry on a \"ti'ade in watch.'s. docks, musi(- hoxes, lacs and nianv",
         "'U V2H A ^TUDY OF THE CONTINENTS other thiugs all luud.' l)y tlifinsolves with the aid of the mauy iiioimtain streams which furnish the power to run the niachiiierv. How is thi\u003e- (lone ? Swis^ farms aiv very ^mall. and some of them are fnr from heinjr |,,v,.l. The eatile feed high upon the mountain sides. Hav SPAIN AHD PORTUGAL The llMTiaii ipfiiinsiila toiutu's several Inxlies of \"■'\"!''■■ ■^\" ;'iL''ii- Wliat mountains semmU^ the |H.Mms„latro,„franre? What lirilish |.osse.s.sion lies III the vnith ! Spain and Portu\u003c,'al are crossed by many ranges of mountains, \\v;th rich valleys anil dreary plains lying Ix-tweeii them. Altliongh i« g.w„ on small patches of land, and has the ...;!: ul^h;^:;;';:^ otten to )\u003ee earned down the n.ountains on that there are verv few harl.ors. On he thol.H.ks ot ,„..„ ,„d won.cn. Even tin.i.er plateau j.ortion. the snnnners are very, hot and tlx' winters very cold. In llie s(.utli, jiarticuJarly the southruast. the soil and climate are Vi'vy favornl)le to fruit-growing, .so that oiuugus. grapes, prunes, and raisins ai'e e.vtremcly plentiful. Spain is a line sheep country, and great Ijocks of M(.i-iiio sheep aic raised. In Portugal the woods contain the cy^Jt oak, from the hark of which many u.seful cork articles are made. Name several of these. More than half of th(\u003e Sitaii- isli population are fai-inei'.s, hut, as a rule, they u.se poo,.' methods. A great part of Spain has to he irrigated. Where , „^ , , ^ ^, . this is done Spain grows the bun.ile.s ot taggots are earned to the ho.nes of vegetables. (Jrape growing is the most lower down. ^ ^, . , '\"'P\"\u003e-taut hi.lustry in both Spain and Portu- Man\u003e tourists go to Switzerland every gal. The grapes are packed hi c-ork-.lust year to climb the mountams and to enjoy the and sent all over the world. Some va.-iet.i,« magniheent scenery. So nuich is this.-ountry are dried an.l made into raisins M-da-i given to this s..rt of thhig that it has come on the south.M'n .-oast, is noted 'for iN A cAaracteri»tir //»«»,- ,„ Sivil.rrl.i,,,!. The ru,j/ -« AM ,l,jw„ 0,, the weight of the rocks. to be called the \"playground of Europe.\" The Swi.ss ai-e a brave, sti-ong, and liberty- lo\\-ing race. Once the countr\\- was held by Austria, but the Swiss struggle\u003cl until the hated yoke was removed. What do you know of the stoiy of WiUiani Tell f Berne, raisins. The Spaniai'ds aiv pnaul and lazy, but brave and very (h'voted to tiieir countrv. Their chief sjiort is the bull-fight. Tell how thi.s is coiuhich'd. Madrid, th\u003c' Spanish capital, is a gi-eat squai-e city surroiiiKhHl by a wall. Its an ol.l-tashioned town, lying under the climate is too hot for comfort in summer shmlo.v of the Alps, i.s the ..apital. and loo .-old in winter. Lisbon, at",
         "the A STUDY (JV THE C()NTIXji|Ni'S F — s'RNi-S 129 nf .l„,„t.r ,„ ll„ l.„;.„;,„,l,l. ' nK.uth of flj,. Ta-ns. is tl„. ,,,i,it,-.l uf P.„f„. pll. Til., tnwii is hllilt ,„, I, ills Cljciivlillt.'- th.- sj.leiidi.l liiirlM.r. IJ^l,,,,, ^v.-is .-.ll l,n\" .I'-stn.y.Ml in 175:, l.y an .•,ntii.|nni\u003c. . I*«.rtiipil is iintf.j r,,r its Mil,. iVuits. its uivai viiirynivls. its ..attl,.. \u003ei„...j,, and l^.u^ran.! Its L.xvly loses. Tlu' I'ui-tujrurs,. aiv sun,.'- wliat like til.' .S|iiiiiianls in ii].i,..ai-an.-f. Km art' Hot s.. larif.'. GREECE .•11 the ivst .,f ?]ni-()|„. was inlialiitf.l by wild lii'asts an. I wi|.|..| nu'ii, (ir.'« Iia.l cities aii.l towis and cultivated t'aniis. Tile ancient (Jreeks w.t.* noted for (lieir heauty and their str. ifrth. They weiv hijj:hly enltured, aud tbey Imilt s.)ine of the finest temples and carved the most heautifiil statu.'s that the world has ever looked U{M\u003en. Tile coast-line of (Ji'eec.' is very lon\u003cj' f.\u003er the size nf the little country. Th.- sui-faoe is covei-ed with masses of mountains, most yatiir/i,/ Wititm-liUt, n i„-tiri„i-r(,r ot which have sj.m-s rim- ,t,,i, „,-,/,,4 iinijr out to the sea. forminjr fi:\u003cK,d harbors. Such suiround- injrs natiu'ally j.roduced a race .\u003ef sailors, and ancient (Ireece was as stronjr at sea as she was \"11 land. On the western coast ar.' a numher of small islan-ls M..f.'d lor years for their [.r..- liuiMion .,f st.)re-currants, Atli.-ns is III., capital. Wh.'iv i\u003e- it situated .' THE BALKAN COUNTRIES Kur.ip.. seems stranj,'.' t.) us aft.'!- our study ..f X.)rth Am.M'i.-a. Wliy aiv ili,.r.. s\u003c. many .■..untri..s in such .M small coiitiii..nt .' The answer is sunpl.. if y..u r..m.'inl,er ih,. numher of dilL'tviit ra.'cs .-..minj,' to Huroj,.- from Asia. Ila 1 this ......urivd within tli.- last hun.liv.l y\u003c'ars. th.' .•han.'.'s are that Kur..|.e would ''\"\\\"' ' \"\" divi.leil int.. a few lar.-i.. c.,mitri..s. As It was, th.. vari..us s.-ttleinenls were well prot...-t...| l,y in..uiitains and l.y th.^ sea, aial so w.'iv l,.ff ai,.ii... N,,w. neith.'r mountahis ii..r s.'as aiv iini.assal.l.' t.. a .•on\u003ciuer..r. Thesmah.-..untriesof the Jialkan penin-sula remind ns .,f the numerous .small states of \u003c'entral Am.'rica. .\\t one time Tui-k.-y was mistress \"f th.' countries i.f this p..n- iusula. Imt Turkish jrovern- ui.'iit was n.,t the kind of rule til., jteople of H,,u- ma'oa, Servia, M.\u003ent..n..jr]-u, aii.l Hulpiria d..sir...|, and ther.' was a separation just as so.\u003en ati favorai.le t-'u- ciunstaii.'(.s aro.s... Th(. Turks are a yellow race which .•ominered west- fin Asia, n.)i1hern .\\fnca, 'tiid the r.alkan {leiiiiisula of Euio]M' many years ago. at",
         "m i;io A STIDV OF THE CONTINENTS ^« In ivliiri.,!, fli,.v i.ro M\u003c.liainin.Ml„ns, that i^ ^\"^^\"'''■'■^ uf .M-ha.mi),..|. a ivli:.,u,is l,.a.K'f '\"'\"' '\"\"I\"\"- wli.. Ii\\v.| ii, Aral.ia m.ai- tlir '■Icsc of tin- sixtli cciitiiry. Ifoiuiiaiiia -rows mai/... aii.l wheat. De- scn\\,t' thf Hoiiinatiiaii .livss tVom thf I)iftiiiv. Scrvia is a mass „f fuivst- flad MKmutaiiis. i'luins an.l (l-s aiv the fhi.-f j.nMhicts. Bnijraria is lar-clv .i.nuii- taiiiuns iMitairncultiiivnti,,, intVi-ioi- kin.l is oam...| „n in tiie sn.itii. Attar of msos, on,. Tl.p rnl,M„f Turkey is ,he head of the Mohaimiieil.iii ivlijji,,,,. and is called the \"Sultan.\" Jlis revenue is ..htained l.v tax- ui^r h,s people, each of whom has to ^^ive a tt'utli \u003c.f all he i^rows. Uow will this affwt tlie Turkisli farmers '! ('\u003c)ijstantino],le. the capital of Turkey, is said to l.e one of the most I.eaufiful (\"ifies III the world. Its site is s.. •■entral that a Wilt city was founded here l.etwe..i. tw,,aiid tl\"v.. thousand \\ears a-... Then, when the Honiaii Empire was ^neatest, the Emperor Constan- tilie selected Ihis city as his capital and called it !.y its present nam.'. Constantinople is situated on a beau-tiful liarl)or ealled tlie Golden Horn. In the eity are niafniifi'-cnt mos- \u003ciues, or Moham- inedaii churches. One of these, Saint Sot)hia. was huilt \"■■- a Christian sCtlMftleB r™- r\"\"\"\" \"''\"\"*^' '\"\"'\"\"'^^ ^.-ititul mos.iues i„ the ;^^^^^^^^ :;dt;;i;: 'tm::r:mX,r;:r;^:^^ -'' \\'' ''\"'\"^-'^ ^' ^^'^'^^^^^^ -■ ^'''- Montenegro is a small ^id';;;:;, ' j ^'^^r^ T' \"\"''' • f \"^ '\"' ^*''\"^- rruHii.il at;/ ;/ Me Balkan Ptm„»ula. backward eountiies in EurojK-, liecause it is badly Kov.'nied. and the -Mohammedans are not favoralile to the settlement of raeos baviiig more modern ideas of i\u003erogi-css. hi Turkey thei-e are vast rose farms. Tli ro.ses ai Questions. 1. What and whov are .MaluKa, Vemcf, Athens, Manchester, and Moscow ] •\u003e Jie- •Ammna at the north, mention the Ixnlies of \"water you would pass through, the capes you would pass, the nver-mouths you would !*e, and the coast cities you might visit on a coa.sting trip from the soutlicrn °n.l of the White Sea to the eastern end of the Black ., , , \"-.\"-. xii.- \"\"\"' n»e YYnite Sea to the eastern end of the Blarlc V lucked when in full blo\u003cmi and «- .\"■»• F;n\u003ci -t what you can of mounUinSS trom then- leaves attar of l-oses, a sort of oil '\" ^'^'tzerland. 4. O , a map of Europe show („) the is extracted. ' f^ ':?'^'' \"' .*\", \"\"* ^\"\"\"t'-'es (no boundaries asked) ; (6) the capitals of the more important countries",
         "' A STUDY OF THE COxVTlXENTS 131 (c) the Alps, SJcan.iiimvian Mountains, Carputhiaii. and Pyrenees; (rf) three iii.pmant rive.-s ; U) the British Isles. 5. What cuntries 'x.rder on (a) the Ualtic. (h) the N,.rth .Sea. (,;) the .M,sliterrane,in Se«( 6. DesiTilie a visit t.. a Russian farniir,« community. What w.,uM von proUhlv ha^e to eat were you ask.sl to stay to dinri.T ! T. l).-snil.e a vineyanl .scene ,lurin« the -n.|\u003ee.pi,.kin« sea.son. ». What huropean countries pr(«iuce wine .heat butter, raisins, silk, and toys ( !». IVscril),. a journey up the IJhine iin.l down the Danuln'. 10 Make a map of the Hritish Isles and show („) the eoast-waters (b) the countries, (,) the principal cities. I I Who i; kin^of the Hritish Knipire .' What is the (lennan huipcrors name? What do vou im.m,, l.v Creater Hntain? 12. Why \u003clo the people „f Holland and Denmark en;;a);e in dairviiii; ( Why aic matches made in Sweden and not in (Jrecce? \" Why are the people of Hungary far rs ? Why is there .so much manufactui-in;; in Kn-land ! Kieat rivers should there Iw on account of these thiw hiKhlan.lsf On which si.l,. „f North Arnencu ere the .nam hi-hlandsf On which side of the And.vt have we the longer sl„,«. \u003e The ste..j«^r slope? The loiijfest nv. ■si The most rapi.l rivers ? What c.«ist openin;; is seen U'tween the isthnms and CaiK- .St. i\u003c^uiii.. / \\i'i.... .1.1 .... . Hoipi W hat do vdii know of the riier emptying intotl!s,,pen,n-( What opening is fomid on\" the south eastern co.isf f What do vou reniemlH-r of the rcHi.m drain.'d into this opening! Iiescrihe the W.St coast. What causes the curve uU.ut the centre of this coast ! On what continent would vou Ian. I were you to snil across the Paciti.- O.ean fr.mi the nn.l.ll,. ,,f the wstern c.«ist f Outlin.. South AmeH.a.,n the l\u003elackl»ianl and in vour exercise Ixxik The jxritioH nf Soiitli Aiu, rii-ii iiiiiiDiii the coiithinit*. SOUTH AMERICA What ontinent is shown her.' I What is its shajH- ? Is it larger or smaller than \\..rth America t What oceans are .separatcl liy it I Whi.h ..f these lies t.. the east ! What continent is seen it the n.ath I What continent lies t.) the east .' What is the name of the isthmus c.mnectini; Xortli and .South Ameri.vi ' P.\u003eint out the \"elbow\" of Brazil, Cajx^ Horn, and Magellan .Strait. What tirpjit hisihlatids lie a!...!i\u003c; the wester i side ! How many highland rejrions aiv to be seen ! Where is each s\"ituated I How many Surface. Kcepinir tli(\u003e mnp iH-fore you, not.* tlmf from ('ai.c IJorii to tli.. I..stlinm,« of I'liijiiiiiii, tli.\u003e AikIi'.s tho iiiiiii) Jii-hlaiids of South Ainericn, ruu in an almost iiu- brokeu chain. From tli.' .southern ond of the mainlan.l tli.-...' liiir),ia,„is ,.,ni for alxmt 2,(»(»0 miles in a sinirie line until the fi;reat \u003c'nr\\-e in tiie western eoast is i-^iached. Fn.m this point th.-y heeo.ne a tloiiblo ehain, an.I at tlie equator u triple \u003c'hain. Throu^'hout th.-ir entire ■•oui'se they are praetieajiy unl.r.iken liy water jrap.s. \"Tl\u003eev rise ahove tiie line of iierjietual snow; con-tain many active volcanoes; and are the scenes of ahnost (hiily earth-iuakes. .Some of tlie pcjiks are four miles in heifjlit. The width of tlic An.les north of the yreat hend in th.'coi.st is .several hundred mile.s. In no other continent have we a w.mII of rock (juiie so lonj;, so liio-h, and so uneven Ji.- we have liero in the Andes of .South America. Note also on the uiaj) two other )iii,diland regions. You will .see a \u003crreat triantrular ma.ss to the ea.st, and another mass to tin; uortli. The former is called the Uraziliau, and the latter the (fuiana Jfiirhlands. Tlio Brazilian IIi\u003crhhinds explain the eastern projection of South America. They cover a lai-ge area of couutiy and are of con-siderable height near the coast. The Ouiana Highland.s at the north, the Brazilian High- lauds on the .south, and the .Vudeau High-",
         "fii A 8TUIJV UF THE CONTINENTS 133 lands on the west, form one of th»\u003c .Teatost fro,., tt. n ^k , , . river valleys in the worl,l-the vaM.:' '? M Sd/ \"Z't ir^';^ !^1^\"'^^'- ^ .» P\"-t far soiifl. .,( t\\ .,; . \"'\" \"1\"»\"Jr to a point far cl^ . ■\"'\"' :;' ^^'-'P'-''\"'\"- The western IZ' uT' ';,\":' \"\"'••\"■•' ••\"\u003e•\"\"«' the desert en Is. At th,. north tl... rainfall is v.-rv h,.«vv At 1 rt'r:^ : \"■, ■■'\"\"•''•\"'\"■\"'« -\"\"'^ -.me fron. the the Lo„ . ■ \".' ' ^r \"\"''\"'•• '^ 'f\"* character S^ the .CKU... ,narKe.J as the Plateau „f Pata«..„,a ( rner valleys in the worl,l-the vail.n-of tlie Amazon. Again, the Brazilian HiKlilands and the Andes of the sguth form another great valley, that of the J.a Plata The Guiana Highlands «„,| the northern Andes form, at the north, the thir.l great South ^nLt:2\u003eio,;Mf^1i;';..r:-:; J-\u003c^-Riv.Vane,s.Thevalh,ofthe highland regions and the t L g lit H iti Ih ' sT\"'\"' ^''\"^'\"\"' ''\"'^^^ J-'«'*'' valleys mentioned, and plaee them ,1 ^^ '! , / ! '''\"'' \"\"'^ '' ^^»5*l'\"''f« *1^« '!«\"«- maps outlined in your exlreise hoi. Z^Z^tj^Tr \"' *'\" ^'\"''^' -^ '\"'^« If .vou will again ♦■xamine the mat\u003e von ,V„ . , , ' '•\"'\"'' J\"\"*^'''^' ^^'^\"\"'''^ ^^e will see two land colors, vello ,., r.r . P '7 v' '*' '''\"'\"^\"'^ ''\"\"\"-^-^'\"\"^^''l^^ The yellow pl.-tures all ti;-|an.l .^ a mi dt Sil^; \"f^ 'T'\"'- , ^\"^ \"' ''''' '^' iu height, while the green shows the 1 2 mi d be S'o . '1 ''\" T'\"^\"'' '^ ^\"'\"1'\"- under G50 feet in height. The ..i.^nin J of Tl , ^\" '''''^^'\" *^'« ^^\"I'lzon woods, the remaming eo,.,r: may he ;:::d';i;m wj ^t a:.;: l!:^^^ T^'\" \"l \"^ the eoh.r-key on the map. A stiidv of the -in,! tl, ^^'\"•'^''\"' '\"^ the largest l,asin -lo'—'i .1 shows lissometS^g^^: ^.^ f^X '''''''''' \"^ ^^\"\"'■•- '^'^^ lan.l-surfa,.e we shonld not forget. Full v ve e I J It •' '''\"'\"'''\" \"'^ ''\"\"' '\"^'• half of the land is below ..0 feet 1 ]^ ' ^Tt Ti'T\": \"^ '^''' ^''\"'- ^ much of the renminder is about l,)...(.,f. '', ro,' '?\"• ./^V'T'-*\"\"\" ^''^' ^\"\"^y too high for human h.-.bitation. ' , '^7\"''^ \"ules ba\u003c.k from the Atlantic w M , If a gf eat inland sea from fifteen to a Imn V .,ul, you ..x,«.ct tl„. ,.|i,„ate „f .Soutl. AnHMi,.,. dred miles iu wi.lth Tli„ ..ro .tl ^ T aH a whole to 1... wanner or col.i.T than that of V,„tl, v.ll .- • ., ^ \"\" f^^'t^ater part of the America f Through what par, of South A.n.rica \" '^ a pathless l„rest. There are so man V ''\"\"^ ''\"■ \"■ ' \"\" ^t^XKims, however, that most of it mav b\". \u003cloes the tH,uat..i- ,.,i^\u003e .' What portion of South Anu-rua lies in tiie Hot Belt, or Torri.l Z;n,.\u003e \\Vhat IS the position of ,h,. Tra,,i.- of Cai,ri.-orn ' How much of South America lies in the south lemperate Zone ; What ,„„tions of the continent ai-e hkely to !«■ covitcI I,v snow \\ Whv ,l„ you think so? From what ilirection does llie\"i)rincipal wind of Australia c.mcf South America, north of the Iji Plata, is under the inlluence of two s.^ts of winds. The Amazon vallcv and the country to the north IS exposed to what aie called the Xorlh-Knst .eaehe\u003cl by water. The funnel - shaj^.l mou h of the Amazon is almost as large as Seotlan.l. I',, this wi,le estuarv for nearlv hve huudivd miles, a tidal wave or waU of vvater from six to twelve feet high rushes at ttie rate ot ten miles an hour. Think of a i-iver whoie current is felt two hundred miles at sea, who.se mouth is so y, , r •■;■•-'\"\"■\" \"'c caiieii uie .lorm-Aas/ UUlKiretl nil es at sen «-h,n:a ,.\u003e«„♦! ■ IrwU., or winds fnm. the north-east, while the wi.I \u003e tl. .. ». ■''ta, WllO.se mouth is SO Mrazihan Hif;hlamls to the soutlwast are under the \"'*' Opposite banks foi\" the greater inriuence of tJie South-KaM Trwl.:. As tlies,. winds P^''* \u003c*t\" the coiu-se are not in sight of each ,.iu .^uum-r.an j rnn.\u003e. As tiie.se winds *\"*\" \"^ '\"\" coiu-se are not IU sight of each I moistun-huien. the greater portion of Other, and whose main stream i\u003c wot^,.» ] i ope of South America is well wateivd. Is ov.e ' ^...,..uJA \"^ \" ^' ^*'\" !* '' \"\"^^'^^ ^^ I 11 an( „., .,„,i,,, tin, jjrcaicr portion 01 the eastern slope of South America is well watered Is the western coast as well wate..-\u003cJ ? What you saw true of North America re-urdin;; the Pacific winds .shouhl he true here as to the Atlantic wind.s, namely that the highlands of the west will drain the air pa.««in\" over them from the east, and that the air will move down the western slopes as warm, dry air. As a rosult the middle coa.' t region of South America is occupied by the desert of Atacama which stretches over a hundred tributarie.s, into each of which scores of smaller streams flow Is there any wonder that such a stream should he said to have 25,000 miles of navigable water, seeing that after the first gi-eat plunges are made in the highlands of the Andes, the remainder of the river drops ^L",
         "Si- 134 A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS t; but a few inches to the mile • Two tribu-taries should be lemerubered. One of these is a streum from the north, the Negrc ; the other foines fi-oni the south, niul is called the Madeira. In the basin of the Nejcio are to i)e found some of the finest Brazil nuts, or \"nigger toes,\" in the Amazon valley. The upper watei-s of this rivei- have their rise in the divide separating the Orinoco from the Amazon. At high water - a red union of the two givat river-systems is said to tak(* place. The Madeira river also effects a union with the Parana of the south, when the low divide separating these streams becomes flooded during high water. In the lower Amazon valley, i)alms, figs, and bamboo aio the j)rincipal tree.s, ai'ound which .enormous creepers twine, and from the branches of which beautiful orchids linng. Wild i-ul\u003eber trees an* also found in this valley, and irom this a very important industry arises, an industry of very great value to people force.1 to use rubber goods of various kinds. Crude rubber is gathered by the Indians here and there throughout the valley. The rubber tree grows best where the land is Hooded a part of the year. It is a large ti-ee, with leaves somewhat like ash leaves and with a smooth bark. The gatherer makes a gash in the tree and collects the thick milky juice in a tin cup or a gourd. In each cup a few tablespoou- fuls of liquid collect. This is all gathered and taken to a place where it is smoked over a fire of palm nuts. The nuts are placed under a sheet-h-ou cone with a hole in the top, and several holes in the side to let out the dense smoke aud let in the air to keep the fire burning. A small paddle is then dipped into the white liquid, immersed m the dense smoke, and constantly turned about so that every bit of the liquid will come under the a-^tj-ingent effects of the smoke. The liquid rubber hai-dens, blackens and thickens. Fresh liquid is added and the process is continued until the mass of rubber becomes unwieldy and is removed by slitting the rubber n a \u003c down one side of the paddle. Crude ru ,ber is made at various places hund-eds of miles up the river and taken finally to Para, quite a modern city, situated near the mouth of the river. From Pa. ■ the rubber finds its way to all the important northern countries, where it is made into rubber boots, coats, bicycle tubes, etc. In the upper Amazon valley the cinchona tree is found. This is the tree which pro-duces the quinine of commerce. Indians gather the bark of tht» wild trees and carry it on their backs to the markets. Planta-tions of cinchona have been started in vari-ous countries where the climate and soil are similar to this part of South America. Why is the Amazon valley not covered with Jjeautiful farms, where the banana, the manioe, maize, the sweet potato, and many other useful food i)lants will grow! Think of the woi-k requii-ed to clear away such a tangle of trees. Think of a region whei-e the sun beats down all day so that even the natives do not care to work during the noon hours. Think of a land having such an abundance of rain that the forest floor becomes one great endless swamp. Is such a region a suitable home for the people we are acquainted with? Many spots in this valley yield the things mentioned, but the valley as a whole is left almost as nature made it, a gi-eat mass of trees and climbing plants, a suitable home for numberless alligators, boa-constrictors, long, tailed monkeys, birds of splendid colors, and insects of all descriptions. The Orinoco is about 1,500 miles long and the main stream is navigable for up-wards of 1,000 miles. On the upper waters are immense grassy plains upon which thousands of cattle feed. These are reared for their flesh and their hides, which",
         "are A STl'DY OF THE (ONTINKXTS 135 shipped larjfely to Emopc and to \\orth „i.., , ♦! ■ ■ Amerieu. ' \"*\" '''\"\"'' '^^ ^'\"'-k \"\"^ \"^•h «oup. The Parana Amerieu The valley of the La Plata is flie ,no^t iniiMjrtaiit vall..y iu S„„ti, America, for Its elimate am] its soil favor the Ki'owth of siieh pro-luets as northern nations have fonnd i.rotital.le. \\Vhi!.\u003e studvinj; this lepon, do not foi-i;.-t that uoifh nn-ans n.-:irt;' the wiuator. wiiil,. ,sy\u003e„//, ,„eans the opposite. 1 . '\"n-cii\\ 11} uie soiiin oi tilt' Ij'i f' 'itii rains lessen, so tiiat the .:ortl.eru j.or tion of the La Plata vallev is much warmer and moister than the southei-n. Indeed, towards tlie far south the land becomes less and less al)lc tu foed Hocks and herds, unl i I, finally, it passes into a (hssert-like country where plan* life is barely enough to nourish such an ani-mal as the rhea, oi' South American ostrich, a bird re-sembling the Aus-tralian emu in many Pii icidars. This bird lurnishes rare sport larg. to the natives, who eliase it on horse- an,l bones are sent. What is done with back and capture It with the ioK a long each of these products N.rth of tht leathern rope to the end of which an iron La Plntn i„ fi,„ 1 j\" ^ ^\"® times around the horseman's head and then KosaH.. o., tl,„ P„.. • .. flung at the bird with the hope of UreJ^ pr7 tTe t in ^^^ Ch s^ of''S Its legs or of winding the rope-end about river. The banks 'of hrrle are hiLh the neck or the legs m such a way as to so that farmers driving in with th h- loads' check its^-unning and thus lead to its of wheat have nothing to do but emptvThe A //''Id torn has a i)..culiar course. Notice the great ben\u003cis as you come down the river. Den-ribe tlit-m. Arc tlieiv many tiibutaries! Name the principal tributary. The Argentine Republic Jruguay.and Para-guay. The greater portion of the Parana vall.-y lies in what iscallwl the Argentine Ke- |'iil»lic, that is, the Silver State. The tart din'ctly to the south of the La Plata an.'l to . . The country to the north becomes more and more wooded until it finally mingles with the gi-eat forest country already desci-ibed. One of the chief gi-asses is the tidi, feathery pampas grass, which grows ' , a height of ight I'eet. On the grassy j)lains inimeii.se lerds of cattle and lorse.s, and great tlocks of sheej\u003e are to l\u003ee found, the sheep lands being toward the south. Whyt The cattle of the Argentine ■anches cannot profitably be shipped alive to Europe, but (luantities of hides, tallow, hoofs capture. From the coai-ser feathers of this bird, feather dusters are made. The outlet of this great southern valley is the Rio de la Plata, or Plate River. This is simply the estuary or sea-niouth of the River Parana, which throws into it bags into a large hopper at the top of the bank and let the wheat slide down a long chute into the holds of the ve.vsels. The faims in this prairie country are large. In this inspect they ai-e like those of the Canadian West. The Argentine every year such an immense quantity of Republic, however, hU its drawbacks sediment that the La Plata water looks borne years are too dry and a shorHropt",
         "m ir«5 A STUDY OF THE t'ONTINKNTS tho result. Soi.iptiitn's tht' Ki'aHshoppcrM are a miisaiiff. Uii tli»\u003e wlioh', tlic funnfrs of th»\u003e AiK«'iifiii»' l{»'|iiil)Iic send jfrcat qiuuiti- ti«'s of wlicat to KiiroiM', use the inont up- to-ilatc jiiai-liiiiciv. ainl yoar l)y your an' be«-\u003c)iiiiii); iiiorc and more wealthy. Toward tlif t'uot-jiilis, in tlu' neighbor-hood of .MrMdn/,a, is one of tht' huxt'st of South America's yrajx' centrt's, and train- louds of the hiscious fruit and many pdlons of wiue art' shipped to Jluenos .Ayres and to other Arjrentine cities. To the north is the country of the maize, the su\u003erar-caue. and the oranjje country for people What a splendid uot afraid of liar\u003cl work: Thesliejiiierds are largely Italian.^, who live with theii- families in snuill, poor-lookint? ..i-ks on the pampa.'. I'he cowboys are the famous i/aiichos, some of the finest horse-men in the world. The fjauchos aie the descendants of Spanish an\u003cl Indian /« r/» ,-,//\u003c-, ,„../ ancestor.s. Many of them wear slouch hats ; each cari'ies a whiji, and all aie armed with knives and know liow to use them. lu the cities the St)anish lauRuajre is commoidy spoken, and .Spanish customs are usually the customs of South Ajru'i-ica. Still there are many foreigners, including large num-bers of British and German settlei's. What city coutrols this fertile valley, and where is this city situated? Why should it be jilaced near the lower end of the valley ? This city is called Buenos Ayres (good winds), and it well de-serves its name, for it is considered among the healthiest cities of the world. The population of Buenos Ayres more than a million. The picture will give you some idea of one of its principal corners. At Buenos Ayres all the for-eign stuff connu),- into the country is collected and distributed by the numer-ous railways leading west, north-west, and n()rth, and also by the Parana river, (n no portion of South Ameri.-a is rail-way progress more advanced than in the Aigentine Hepiiiilic. a fact no doubt due to the level character of the land and there-fore the absence of deep cuttings and heavy emltankmeiits. These railways collect the wool, beef, hides, bones, tallow, etc.. meant for export. The ju'reat drawback to the -| \u003city is the amount of sediment poured into the La Plata. (Quantities of this are constantly set-tling in (he harbor, iiiiil steady dreilg- ing is necessary to keej) the water deep enough to (loat the larger oceau boats safely. Paraguay, a state ■nlirely iidand but ■»^■l//A i,f C'li-ihiiiii. lying for the most part in the valley of the La i'lata, is badly handica])ped for want of railways. The coiuitry l)etween the Parana antl the Paraguay rivers is wonderfully fei-tile, j)roducing oranges of fine flavoi-, and also such quantities of tobacco that even the childien smoke cigars. The northern counti-y, the region marked on the map as El Gran Chaco, is the \"wild west\" of Paraguay. This is a forest country well filled with wild animals, valuable timber, and an abundance of a shrub called \" Paraguay tea,\" which is col-lected by the native In(lians nnd distributed over a great portion of South America. This tea is .said to be very",
         "refreshing, SOUTH AMERICA ll'oliliijl) Scale 'PC *0O »\u003e0 fM 6^ Statittt Xfilet la tn* inch :afi4ml, 0/ cV.iiri(r„„ oi»,, CVlut. Comparative Are* I aoMii",
         "! 138 A 8TUI)Y i)F THE CUNTINENTH hfe niid many South AiiM\u003ciicaiiN f.ikt\u003c no ofli«\u003ei lM'Vfr»j;n for tlieir hij-akfiist. Ill the Clmco ui« to Iw foinul ullij^ators, jinrnars. iM«ccarit«s, wild (lo^s.an.l tlit\u003e curious lii|.ir, with a lu'a\u003cl liko a \\\u003e\\it and a ImmIv m* lar«.' as a iM»iiy. Th»\u003e .ia«uar \\^ tht\u003e Mouth Amt'iican Ifopanl. and thort\u003e ai»\u003c jauruars so hiiK't' and so |\u003eowi-itul tiiat th«\u003cy can carry off an ox. Thf p. ary is a small wild pi\u003ej which will not hesitate to attack even man. Many a traveller in the South American forest has had to dinil) a tree iu onler to Ih» secure from thes(\u003c ferocious little jwrkers. I'eccaries live on roots and fruits and are usually found in small herds. To the east of the Cliaco is the Matto (irosso. or uroiit forest. The Matto ({rosso is one of the jrieat South American hunting groiimls. Ill this rej;iou are to he fc.imd wild animals and even wilder Indians. One sees here the beautiful red and liliie toucan, or hillhinl. One may also see j;reat troops of ionj;- tailed monkeys, swinjrint; from tret* to tree; allipitors are found 'ly the numerous swampy rivers; and herds of cattle in the forest glades. West of the Matto (Srosso, Parai^uay tea jjrows in p-eut ai)uiidan(\u003ee. Brazil. Tiie country of \u003c.'reatest extent in South America is Brazil, which covers the whole eastern elhow of the continent, and is note\u003cl not only for its wonderful Amazon valley, hut also for its coffee and suyar plantations, anil its diamond mines. Find the situation of Rio de Janeiro on the map. This is the jrieatest coffee town in the world. Indeed, without the coffee jjlanta- tir)ns stretchinj; out several hundred miles in every direction, the Qitrcn of the South as it is called, would lie hut a small place. To reach the coffee plantations we must po through a very rugged country, over jilains covered with grass, through clumps of palms and through forests of haidwootl trees; past hauana plantations aud orange and lemon orchards until we nwh the ttxl lands of Hijizil, the famous coffee soil of South America. Most of the coffee is gmwii on large I'lantations, some estates having millions of trees set out. The whole farm is covere.1 withamantleof green, the hushes are laid out in straight lin.-s. and the coffee plants lire in different stages of growth. A great deal of lahor is rc.uircd to raise coffee suc-cessfully, and upon one farm may he found four or five thousand men. women, and children at wr\u003erk. A good tree pr.Mlm-es three or four jiuiinils of coffee heaiis in a year, ami such a tree, if cared for, will live to hear crops for a \u003ciuaiter of a century an\u003cl more. Til.' trees hlossoiu in Decemher and the herries are ready for picking' hy .Vprii or May. What a i.u\u003ey season the pi. -king is ! Kveryhody is at work, soni.- |iicking, others carrying the well-fille.l hask.\u003ets t.) wag.)ns ami .mis which convey them to the cotfe.. macliines. These ar.\u003e very com- ple.v pi.'ces of machinery for r.'moving the th.' pulp ami setting th.- s,.ed. tV.-e. After the seeds come fioni tli.-s.. ma.'iiines, they ar.' scoured clean and most .-aivfully dried iii th.' sun for several we.'ks. After drying, each iM'aii has its tough outer coat remov.'d and also its thinner inner .-oat, In^fore it is rea.ly for shipment. Brazil supplies almost the whole of our continent with coffee. Hio (h' Janeiro (January Riv.-r) is the .second largest city in South America. What is tht^ name of the largest city J Rio is heautifully situated on a won.h'rful harhor. Into this harhor vessels come from all parts of th^ worl.l, and gangs of men of all colors are busily engaged in loading them with sacks of coffee. Portuguese is th.i language spoken in Brazil, and Spanish the langiuige spoken almost everywhere else iu South America. How this came about is very",
         "interesting. A STIDV OF THK (OXTIXKNTS Mis Holin.'Ms (1„. |»,,,„, tv,„ii,u ii,„, ,1 o ■ H,.ani.sh an.| I'..rt.,^„L. ,..„,' ... \"\" '' '^';.\"' '\u003e;(\"■ '\"' ■\"•••■.^' -l.-Tt uroun in ,|u.s '''••«-l\"\u003einKtlH.,r ..,.,l^ u,;i.i.„/ , ,| ' '\"\"•\"\"\" ';'\"'\" ^--I'l- l^i-na UMtuafHl..,. a '•'\"\"''\"•\"«. \u003cl'vi.i.-.| Suutl. v,,,..,!,., I,, ,\"■\"''\"''\"'\"•'•\u003c»'»■'' ''--\"Pfly of wnt.T ,,..,„ u..rtl, ami .h.m.H, |i,„. s.. ,1,,., s,.,„' ,j,;.„, ' ,;'\" ^\"\"^ ■'■\"Y\u003e'\"i A.mI..,, TI„.m. ,„„„,.t„i,m l'\"v.. tl... full ....n„-..| of ,h MMtrv „. ,1... ,\" '\" \"\"\" \"'\" \"'\"\"' '■■•'\"'\"^' \"I-\" th,,„ «•(\u003e.! „.h1 I'„rt„i;„| ,|„. ,•„ ;, ' \": \"!'■ I' l;''-ss,..l u.ln i,.... ,u,.| this „■.•. The Pacific Coast. Ti,-,.. n!v \". ., n\"'' \"\" \" \"^ '\"\"' '\"'\"^ '^ ''-\"•• :!:!!::::^^!L^-\" ■ ■• -- ■'.•::•.- 'i::':;:!:' ir ;'•..: ;:;;;r:;;.:!r ''\"\"■• '■ • '\"'\"\" '\"Hi ,.,.„..„. ()r;,n.'..s irn.,M.s, l„n,an;,s. |..,no„s. ,m.„H...s, ,.i„;,; '•\"•\"' .\"'\"\"\"I\"\".-... Tl, „..n ^r,,,W„ i. ^' l\"\"t..M\u003el.„ly vnhu.M.. ki„.|. 1..,,,^, ,,„i,,i,,. '\"••\"'\"'•\"\"•'\"'•-loMi,,, 111,,... ,|,af ir ,„i.ves \"\"\" .\"'\"' -\"\"I- -M\"sf of ,|„. f,,„.i„^, i, ''••\"\"\u003e•' 'I sM.all way. tho fiH.ls U-i,,^ ....Jti- ^ai.-.l l,v „x,Ml y.,k(.i to i.ln„«li-. Tl,..,v ••\u003e•.\u003c a h-w hu-jr.. fanns ow„..,i l.v ,...,,,.1.. of N'\"Mi\u003el,,,.,.M„,|i,,nl,|.K„]. L,,|„;,.is„i„an„ i;-';'\"'\"\"-i I'.v ti... ,i,.s.H..i.iants of ,i,o;„ '•\"''■\"-swho.M J'iy,,n.o so, ,vm.h..ro„^lv. •..,',- 'l\"-'''-l- \\Vh..„ ,1,.. S,..„,iar.ls ,ook\" I'.-n, ,7\"'\", \"\"■\",\" '\"\"•\"'••-\" \"'..I ,i„y vars n^o 'l-yt.M.n. tha, i, was a lan.l of p,v,.io„. ••\"•t\"K 'li\"yol.l...|,h,.„a,iv,.tf.M,,.|e.sof jrr..a, l,..a,,. of p.M stored ,h..,v. .\\t „ue Pln\u003c-. then, is ,.,., a nanow s.,,p !^ La iMf! 'a 'r\"\"'^ \"*\"\" '■'••'\"''■■'' '\" ••\"''•\u003e• \"^ lyi!,}; iM'twofM th.- s..a wL'c and tho \\„ Tl. i ' . ■ ■ \u003cl-n. Hi,.|.la„.is. This s,,:..., a .He V . ?\" '\"/'T \"^ '^\"\"••\"-' \u003e'»ilf \"f' .n.„l so of ..li.Mu,.. fro.n ,h..s..ai„;ani A : i ' Hk'T'' .1 •'\" T'\"\" '\"' \"'\" '\"•''\"'\"^- '-^ 1,1-eat .loal of this la,..l is h„t a an.lv ?! i-, I ! '\" '\"\"\"\"\" ^^''\"'^ \"-' \"•\"»''' \u003c»'\" the situation of whi.-h ll a ^ b n \"\"'f ^^^ \"\" \"'\" -'1-^ ^..-h ulanci f The pointed out. '•' • •\"\"\"\" .^•■\"'^\"'» I-\"l'l\" \"'•\u003c•■ very jx.lite. Ask a Beginning with the desert as the easiest and'he'will'' i';;''?, •\"\"' V \" '■'\"■\"'\" '^\"\"'\"^ area to study on this eoas,, we shall to„eh \"'.':. ' ''•■ '\" \"''''\"' ^\" ■^^-\"- \u003e\u003c'» the capital Of the count., .a..ed Peru, iJ ;::^ hUlS ^ ^P^;. ^r'^A:;:^ Z^ A 1'i.w of the rill, „,„l hnrh.r ,,/ Hi,, d^",
         "./„„. U(» A STUDY OF THE C'OXTIXKXTS loner been noted for their silver uu.l j^oM. and tliat it is luiich sonjjht after by north- No wondei' t lie .Si)anianl.s were so anxious ern eountries as a fertilizer and for makin)» to eou(|uer and to lioid this part of Soutii Aineriea. If we fjo ))y rail to tlie higher I)Iateau country we siiall jirohably l)efonie accjuainted witii tlie llama, the alpaca, aud the condoi- which are found in fif i'ttrttloi' the larijett flifinii hird iriii'lil. the the higher hinds of South America. The nitrate of potash, which is used for making giiiii.owder. To get the crude nitrate, holes several fed in dc].tli are sunk and the nitrate blocks arc then Itlown up hy Ijlast- ing jiowder. These mines hring many people into the desert for the same ivson that the gold mines of the Klondike have led to the settlement of i)ortions of north-western Canada. Xext to nitrate of sotla in importance are the immense (juantities of guano found on niany of the rocky islands off the west coast of this region. Guano is a mixture of the manure of birds, fish, etc. Pelicans and gulls have made these rocks their homes for ages, one result being that this matei'ial llama is a beast of burden. Tlie alpaca has aecumulated and is now being used as is covered with long silky wool highly a fertilizer on some of the best farms iu prized as a mateiial for shawls, umbrellas, the United States aud Europe, etc. A llama is not much bigger tiian a Chili is a long, narrow, motmtainous sheep; .some of them are white, others black country .stretching about half the length or brown, and all are sure footed on the of the western coast of South America, slipperj- rocks and the narrow mountain The mountains are very high and of paths. The condor is the largest Hying great beauty. A range* of low mouu- bii-d in tlie world. Its home is among the tains toward the south forms with the highest mountain tops. If we travel a little to the south - east we shall reach Lake Titicaea, one of the highest lakes in the world. More wonder-ful still, we may i-ross this lake on a tine steaniei-, every part of which was liuilt in Great Britain. How could such a steamer be placed on this lake f Another featui'e of the desert country is the presence of great ((uantities of nitrate of soda, or as it is called. Chili .saltpetre. This salt i-eadily dissf)]ves in water, hence a desert region is the only possible sjiot where soda mines may be found. Nitrate of soda, then, is a .salt lying under the LiiJce IWriini, on,- of the ftw hti'jr /aken in the HHtrlil (it 'I hiqh elemtioH. main Andes a valley .some .\")()() miles long and :?0 miles wide. This is one of the most important farming areas iu Chih. Rains from the Pa(;ific, and mimutain rivei-s from sands of southern Atacama How it got the snow ca[»s of the higher Andes, furnish there does not matter. The important abundant wa\u003c^er. thing is that it is to be found iu this region, The northern part of Chili i.s dry,",
         "aud, A STI'DY OF THE COXTINP^XTS 141 as we have iiote\u003cl. is valnahl.- for its mi,,,.-, of nitrato of soda. Tii.. ..0,1 1, a I iM.iti.,,, „i the country, in i.ai-ti.-nlar tli». vali-v ,„..„- tion.^(^.r(\u003e^llstll^■a^^■i.^llltlll■ai aiva i,,' wlii..), Cliilinn Cfiitii. cattlp, wheat, and fiiiit aic i-aisod. The southern pai-t l,as a v.'iy ruj\u003e:,t;e(l coast line ttud an abundance of foivst p-owtli, susr- gesting \"le occupations of fishing and of lumber: ,. Valparaiso is the leadin-,' poi't on the Pacific. The harho,- is hii'ge and well protected, but so shallow that vess.-ls cannot load from the wharves. ('arirr\u003ees have therefore to be transfcrcd by means of lif/htn:% small boats wlii.'h (.ariy the goods back and forth between the anchoivd vessels and the shoiv. A railroad is l„.ii,jr built across the Andes between Val].aiaiso and Buenos Ayres. On the comi)leti')i, of this line, a tiip across the continent may be made in a little moiv than a day. How long does it take to make the' Journey e cross Canada ? Close to the southern end of .South America the Atlantic and Pacific oceans are joined by a nai-i'ow, irrcirnlai' strait known as the Strait of Magellan, so named Ferdinand .Mai,'ellan, a Portuguese navi- irat.,r i„ the service of .Spain, left .Spain in September. ].-.]!», with five small ships and crews of !\u003e-,() „„\u003e„. xU,n- crossing the Atlantic, Magellan landed at \u003e| f ii'uK enteivd the J.a I'lat.-i. I'assed throiiifii the Sti'ait and ci-ossed the l.i-oad J'a.-ific to the j';ast li,dics, wheiv 111- wa-; slain liy the natives. Tlii.ve of his company who remained crossed the Indian Ocean, rounded the Cape of (food ll\u003c\u003eiie and finally reached Spain, three years fn.m tlH' date of leaving. Of the five ships, the \"Vic-toria,\" a vessel of 8.\") tons, reached home, and of the 280 men only 1!) lemained. Magellan and his crew endui-ed all kinds of hard-ships in their wonderful voyage. Mutiny had to be met, cold endured, and l\"inger and thirst borne. Think of these first exi.loicson the unknown Pacific, with \"\u003e Vllllr. after Magellan, who fi,.st passed 'through i; fo^l ^;,r r dnce^\" t T\" T' *'\" on the n\u003eemorable first voyage around the and th.! ' I\" ather of ,: ^Zl 7''\"^' world ,n the year ir.U ,.,,, men have endured .s lueh to 'S 4'",
         "ii 142 A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS out the uuknowu spots of the earth aud open trails tlirough forest, mountain, plain, and sea,— surely a study of Geojrraphy should be worth one's while. Fifty years after this memorable voyage, Sir Francis Drake covered the same gi'ound and exi)erionced pretty much the same in-conveniences; but this is a story you should know for its own sake. Perhaps your teacher will tell you about it. Since those eai-ly voyages theworld has been eircunmavigated, as it is called, very many times, and to-day no one thinks the journey other than a very pleasant trip. The Strait of Magellan is much used by steam vessels, and Punta Arenas, or Sandy Point, at the extreme southern end of the mainland, is a coaling station for all such ships when on their way from ocean to ocean. Sailing vessels have to go around Capo Horn, usually a rough trip on account of the constant stormy weather of this part of the world. The lai-ge island of Tierra del Fuego, or Land of Fire, is one of the many wooded islands ofif southern South America. Around the island is a rim of mountains, some of which send glaciers down to the sea. The interior is covered with a rich vegetation and the mountain slopes are well wooded with beech and other trees. Wild fruits abound in season, and many large flocks of sheep gi-aze on the rich pastures. The countries of Colombia and Ecuador at the north are lands of mountains aud high plains. The Andes i-un throuffh Colombia in three high chains enclosing two of the most fertile river valleys in all South America. In Colombia one will see planta-tions of sugar-cane, coffee, and cocoa; lianaua fields and large orange orchards. The cacao tree, from the .seeds of which chocolate and cocoa foi- eating and drinking are procured, gi'ows best in hot uuuutries. Cacao trees ai-e grown from fresh seeds planted In rows about five yards apart. The trees, which often reach a height of thirty feet, begin to bear in the sixth year and reach full fruit-bearing about the tenth year. The pod yielding the .seeds is of a golden color and contains from twenty to thirty- five seeds. In 1881, de Lesseps, a Frenchman, or-ganized a company to cut a canal across the Isthmus of Panama. This company failed, and the new company which was formed sold its rights to the United States, which will complete the canal in a few years. When this gi-eat work is opened, steamers from the United States, CutojHixi, one of the moat famoM jieakf of the Anden. Canada, and Europe to North American ports on the Pacific will no longer have to sail around the Horn, an extra journey of some 9,000 miles. Such a canal will be to the Americas what the Suez Canal is to the Old World. Ecuador is the most tropical part of westei-n South America. Along the sea- coast fine cocoa (the finest in the world), coffee, aud sugar are grown. On the pla-teau the volcano of Cotopaxi may be seen, and to the north of this, Quito, the highest capital-city in the world. This is a city of perpetual spring. One of the most important industries of Ecuador is the making of Panama",
         "hats, A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS 148 the straw of a \u003e^V.\u003c-1^ Somh \\^Lal '!^ r/T'\"\"\"! •'^\u003e-t«'« i'^ «»« of the best iu plant. The stnuv is ,.laLd wJ . u II fZ! T'\"\"\"\" . \" '^\"^\"^'\"^' '*^ P^^P^*^ '« girls between midni,.., and s n\" e ot ,; d t T \"Tl\"'' \"'\"^''^ '^ \"\"\"\"^'•\u003e' ^«\" «^- The North-eastern Coast. ti^ uortb- sih ;^,^Tr\"^\"*' ^«'^^'\" '-\" \u003e-'l' - eastern coast, tl.3 -oas, fnnul Z Cu b 1^^;. ,'''''''\"\" f^'^'^P'^-^^\"'''' **'''\"''»'™ bean Sea, are sitnate.1 h, fJnit \"7'^'^' \".'j;'\"\"\"«' '^I'^-l'. \"»\u003c1 c-uttl., an\u003cl the and VeneJueia. The\";-. ilan;!;^ U^Z li'l'S\":\" ^'\"\"\"'' \"\"'''^ \"^ ^^^'-^' '\"^^ nature into a north..,, part on'iVti„\" S TiT '\"\".'t \"'\"\"\"' '^*\"'\"^\"' *\" \"'\"«''« an inm.ense tract of nu.l,. .lea 1 1 u.ts \".:;::;' \"^T\"'\" '\" r.''\"'\" \"' '•^^''^ and fine nn.terial carri.-d .l.nvn bv the sl'l^ '.w /\"'\"''\"' '^^^^^^ ^\" numerous stn'anis of this .....H.,,, \" rr P '\"\"\"-'\"' \"^ *'^^'««i'\"« \u003e'♦-'\"'■ the Pacific southern poHi..n i c . \".^l 1 \" .-v. ';; :;\"\"^'\";V; \"'7*';''\"\"'\"\"^ \"\"'\"''\"• ^'^ «-^h mountain chains, whi.-l .., \\,^C\"^ ;\" • ^\"'\"' '\"\"^ ^'''^^'\" Balboa so lon^' to hn^.e steps lea.ii ... inl n t ,n t . \u003e \" T' '^''''■\"'^ '^^' '\"'^'^ \"^ \" ^*'^^- ''-\"\"•«- The n\u003ci.thern th^s :': w ., Ju v^^ j^ ^^^IJ't; ^ \"\"\"\"\"7\"' \"'^ \"\"'''' ^\"\"\"-\"' ^l^ but are verv uniu.dthv P..,.,,,. of t.rv ' '\"\"' \"\"'\"' '\"\"'^'''•*\"' «l\"\"'i^i^ g^at vah.e-thriv..s on \" ,hc' i:;,; tri^ ;h:s;:r ^\"^'\"''' ''■— \"^'--yto French Guiana. Su^ar, cotton, and coffee Not liH„„ n grow readily in all the Gnianas. and h fn t.'\"\"s' •\"\";' '5 *'' ^■\"™ Guiana is noted for its s„pposc,lEldora,l„ In.lian tri^^e of ' '\"\"\"■•'•\"^. ^\"\"''\"''^ '^' or Golden City, for which the Spaniard^ w^ rfo h „ T^ i'\"?\"\"\"\"' \"\"\"\"''•'^' *^ hunted in vain. Even Sir Wdt..r \\i;)Zh I .. ? / P'^'tuguese, who were a famous Englishnnn. l.f (,^:;'E,i';b:SS ^ t!^ ^h^^ldir if ^ ^^'f ^ tune, seems to have b.^Iievcl the stories ine AM. m 1 .. t \" \"' ^'\"P'^^^' concerning the existen.-e of this iLT \"'^ ^™\" \"I'^ve^- The native races, which There if n.\u003ething ^^\" ; f c' Xe ZZl^ \"\"\"^'\" T^\"\"\"' '\"'\"*\"' ^^•\"'^' '^^ ztxela other than what i.as da - bee,\" ^^^^^ t fn \"f '\"\"'*^ \"^^ sai.l repuding the vallev of th.- oVinoc^ a e ca' , ib.T '^\"^'\"^ f''« '^'\"'^o\" tribes Venezuela, like n.any uK.re ..f t,... s;:^ ^ n oHllT^J \" ^'\"\"\"^ 'r'\"^ '\" An,erica„ countries, has be... i,. a n..\u003est 1 H^ \" -ll^ U.:\"\" T;\"^ ''T '\"'* unsettlcl con.lition sin..e the pe..ple threw trib^ct .-d ) l T\"; '•'.'\"\"' -\u003e'\"« off the Spanish yoke an.l began o goven .-. .1 P t '% :;^\"\"'' \" ''''\"' '''P'\"\"^'^ themselves ^^ -nast us. I-.-w .,f the native people have Bolivia. At one tim.. Bolivia held a small :Z!:fZr'' \" \"' \"'\"\"\" ^\" \"^'^ \" ''''- stnpof coast on the Pacific between Chili South \\,nmM,.o ;• m til Is .",
         "tf 144 A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS ■tiif been done than has been in the hvst four Inindred years, laid a people like the British race settled tiie land. South America has been too unsettled to make any great i)ro- jj^'ess. What may he done when war is a thing of the jms*. remains for the future to see. yufxrioNn. I. What .South American countries lie aloni,' the eiiuutor (nu'iiiory) ! L'. Name from memory tiie countries iilonj; the Pacific Ije^^inninK {a) at tlie nortli. (A) at the south, '.i. What city lien on tlie e(|uator f What do you know of this city ( 4. What and wheif are Atacama, tlie Chaco, Para, Lima, and Uio ! r\u003e. braw from niemoiv an outline map of South America. On this map mark (o) the coast waters, the liijjhlands, and the river basins, {b) the forest country, the K'\"ss-covered area.s, and the desert land.s. \"6. On anotlier map ma\u003cie in the same way, mark in the hijiiiiands and great river basins, and show the nitrate fields, the Panama canal, the cattle country, the wheat an\u003eas, the great coffee district, the j;uano islands, and the route of the only transcontinenUl railway in South America. 7. On a third map show the regions best suited to the tapir, condor, llama. South American ostrich, and the alligator. 8. Show on an outline map the position of the equator and tropic of Capri-corn and the dii-ection of the winds of most import-ance to South America. 9. What features have made Jiuenos Ayivs the greatest city in South America I 10. Describe a journey around the Horn, a journey up the Andes, a visit to the Atacama desert, and a trip up the Amazon. 11. What pic-tures do the following call up : an Argentine sheep farm, hunting in the Matto Grosso, among the rubl)er ti-ees in the Amazon valley, the harbor of Rio de Janeiro, climbing the Andes mountains, and chasing the rhea in the southern Argentine ( 12. What has South America for us? For Kurope? 13. Compare my Canadian home with a home in the Argentine Republic, countries are entirely 1 •'). What two .South American • irdand * IG. Com[)are the sheep and cattle lands of South America an\u003cl North America a.s to climate, latitude, character of output, etc. 17. Write notes on railway work in the Andes and the Argentine. 18. De,scril)e the condor, tapir, boa-constrictor, and the alpaca. 19. \" Horees are rearecl in .some parts of .South Ameiiea for their hides alone.\" What can you sav of the value of horses in such localities! 2ii. De.scrib' the gathering of rul)i)cr and Brazil nuts in .South America! 21. What months make the Argentine summer! 22. Name the great highlands of North America. What highlands of .South America are like these? 2.3. What South .Ami'rican river is H!t!i..itmi like tho «t. Lawrence, and what like the Mississippi ? Win- has not South America a river like the Mackenzie\"? Keview Question! 1. What is the season in Kurope in January? In South America in June f J. Over what line is the sun vertical on December 21st ( On June 21st? When is the sun vertical over the efjuator ? What do you call such times I 3. In what particulars is northern Kurojie like northern Canada ? 4. In what dirvction must a fmr.son look to see the sun at noon on December 2 1st if he were at the latitude of Capricorn ? Of Cancer ? 5. Where do the p^Hjple of the Hot Belt sw the nfM)n-\u003clay sun i (\u003e. Wliat line of latitmle is directly under the sun half way Ix-tween Decemlier 21st aiul June 2l.st ? 7. How many times a year is the e(|uator dirt!Ctly under the sun ? 8. In what direction must a person l(X)k to sih- the noon sun \u003cm March 21st if he were at the equator! 9. Can you tell why the jwles are always cold ( 10. When :.ave the poles their greatest heat ! 11. Show the new moon, the first quarter, and the last quart e . 12. Point to the north and the south poles. 13. Whac does ty, mean ! Where is tht\u003e zenith ! 14. Find out what is meant by a ./('.i-rf star and by a piauft. l.\"\u003e. De,scril)e as many ways as you can of finding the cardinal points of the com'i)ass. 16. On an outline map of Kurope mark in (a) the .seas, islands, peninsulas, stiaits, gulfs, and bays ; (6) the principal highlands ; (c) the three greatest rivers ; (rf) the ten largest cities. 17. Describe a journey by sea from the Black Sea to the White Sea. 18. Why .should central Rus.sia lie colder than western Eurf)pe ? 19. What and where are Valdai, Sardinia, and the Crimea? 20. On a map of the Me«literranean, locate the most imporUnt features. 21. What has Euro})e for us? 22. Draw an outline of .S\u003euih America and mark in the highland regions, the lowlands, the great rivers, the forest country, the wheat lielt, and the ranching lands. Show also the leading islands, capes, and coast waters. 23. If South America were to sink 700 feet, what would 1k' the shape of the }\u003eart above the sea? Draw this. 24. What month in South America is the coldest ! Why ! 25. When is wheat harvested in Canada? In the Argentine? 26. Point out in as many ways as you cjin wherein South America and North America are alike. 27. On an outline \u003cif North America mark in the highlands, great rivers, coast waters, islanils, countries, the Canadian provinces aiul their capitals, and t«n of the largest cities. 28. On another map, shade in the tundras, the forest country, the prairies, and the wheat, corn,and cotton belts. 29. On still another map show where the following things are grown : oranges, apples, tobacco, pine, and rice. 30. Commencing at the head of Lake Superior, state how a i)oat may reach the Atlantic Ocean. 31. Commencing at the ellx)w of Labrador, state wl:..t would 1m! passed in going along the eastern ct;asts of tiic Amcrica.\u003e, doubling Cape Horn and then coasting along the Pacific to Bering Strait. 32. What is the situation of Detroit,",
         "Denver, STL'DV OF THE COXTIXEXTS U3 tilt. Gulf ot Cahtornmf ;{;). What ,,ul«avs would y..u take \u003e„ „r,|,.r ,., s,.,. the M.-nrry .,f th.- 'CuunUm R.K-ku^? .U In what [.artsof th.w.Ml.l.lotholUher- mi'M of N,.wf„u,Kllan,l find a niarkot f.,,- tlu-ir ft.,h ? J.). Make a map of the Manitol.a lak... Show the ItfMl ami the AssinilH.in.. rivers aii.l the three eities of «re.ite.t size on the .\\.si„ihoi„e ;i.!. Make a n.ap of the .St. I^wrenee River an, I the (J.var Likes, ami show all .-..nn.rtinK wate.-s a.i.l the prin.ipai lake ami rner ports. .'i?. How ,|o v„u ae.ount for so many great streams risin- in th,. i{,K'ki,.s, wh,.n there w so much of the we«i fl,„t i-, ,|rv ? 3h What nvers ean you name entirelv in the Hot Helt / tlie Houth Tem,K.r.ite H\u003c.|t ' the'.Vorth Te,„,».rate H,.lt ( 39. Draw th,- \\ev.- Worl.l continents un.l sl,ow all the important earth lines running east an.l west Locate on this map all the c.untries v-m remember and mark in the c.«ist waters. U). What has made Winnipeg Montreal. Vanc.iner, San Francis,.„, Chica«o, New \\ork, Ruenos Avres. Hi,, de Janeiro l»ndon Pans, Moscow, and C.nstantinople gii-at centres; 41. What sea in Euro,H. is the Oulf of Mexico most like 1 In what wav 1 4-.'. What ship lines go fmm our continent (a) U, Europe and (6) to Asia f 43. Find out what \\-ou can of the Atlantic and the Pacific cables. 44. H,.w lonir does it take a traveller from Winnipe- to go to Santiago? to Lon-don ? to New York ? 4.5. Where ,lo our merchants get their tea, nee, sugar, bananas. w,H,llen cloths, cottons, nails stoves boots and shoes, lumlx-r, stone, and lime? 40. Uio de Janeiro is \\,mk(Hi upon as the most lieauti- ful city in the New World. Why ,so ! ASIA How much of the earths surface is shown in this hgure f Ot this amount how much sho,d,l v..u say A.sia oc-cupies 1 What continent is s,.,. aci-oss Woith Pole Who .liscovere,! the North Pole! When ! What c.ntinent lies to the west .' Pm.l the nanie of the mountains separating Eui„,e from Asia. What is the name of the givat bl.K-k of laml ma, e „,,,,» y ,,„., ^^. , ; ^^^^^, .^ ^^^,__^^^ ^^^^ nccte.1 with Asm ? Point out North America. What strait .seimrates north-eastern Asia an.l north western ^ortb America .' What two o,.eai,s are .-oMnect-Hl by this strait .' What c,mtin,.nt lies to the south-east , H,.w IS tins -•ontiiK.nt sepaiat\u003cNi fr\u003ejm Asia i Asm lies near what four contiiu-nts ( What o,-ean hes to the .south of Asia .' Asia t,.u\u003c.hos on how many oceans ? What s,.a lies lK.,ween Europe, Asia, and Africa? In the south of Asia there aVe tl.re^ gi-eat p«.ninsula,s, a squaiv-shaped peninsula on the \".uth-west. =, tria„g,i!.»- shaped peninsula in the centre, and a small clubshape.1 pt-ninsiila on the •outh-east. Name each of the peninsulas mentioned ami state what peninsulas in southern Eurooe are siimlur y situate,!. Name the extensions of the in.lian Y\"'\"'.' '\" \" \"*• \"\"■' I\" the west of India. How is Arabia separ.i.cl from Afn,.a? Whic irt of Africa? \" hat islands h,- to the souih-asi ( What two other continents have islan,ls ,n the s„i„e position '. What an- tl„.se callcl ( LK.king at th.. eastern coast of Asia point out tl„. Japan Islan-ls, iJ^.-ing .Strait. '-,1 the p,.n,nsula of Korea. What contine, t lies --St p,,., ,„,,„.„, Where is . ho great plaiJ Asm In «h.t .iin.,.t,o„ ,1., the Asiatic Highlands \u003e ' \" n,.w do\u003c.s tins agree with the America.s ? In « ha. hemisphere is Asia ? Where is the equator f Vould you say that the coast of Asia is deeply 1. d,-nte,l Is Europe more so for its size ? Is much ,.t Asia at a girat distune,- from the ocean ? What isaiMls west of Europe are similarly situat«l to the •bM-a-M-Islamls' Which is the larger, Asia or ■ ;\" ■' •\\, f ^'■\"^^:' \": ^^' '•' America ? North America ,11 .Niiitb .\\merica ? Tin- i^,„ti,„i „f A^in „ii„„„, the r,„,h,ienfti. Surface. Tlio .surfu,.,, „f Asia consists ot two re,i,'ioii,s, a lowlan.l area an.l a highlau.1 area. The lowland area fortu.. the Ureat Northern Pl.,in, or, a.s it i.s sometimes designated, the (},-eat Siherian Plain, a re-gion extending from the Arctic Ocean as tar .sonth a.s a line joining the .southern end of the Taspian Sea with Beiing Hea on the north-east. This plain is hut the eastern extension of the Emopean plain. Notice",
         "w\\ ]-Mi A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS m that the mst«Tu half of this phiiii is higher than the western iK)i-tiou. East of tlie Caspian Sea, and noith of the Sea of Aral, are th.' Kirgiz Steppes, on whicii tiie wan-dering Kirgiz tril)es rear inunense herds of cattie. Ill tlu^ extrenit« north ai-e the barren tundras, frozen all winter and changed in snnitner into swamps and marslies. marehed nortliwanl to a point near the Ivaia Korum Pass. The winter was fiight- fully eold. All the roads were filled with the carcasses of sheep and jmnies, which in the pure eol.l air seemed still alive, so that the dogs would Imrk at them. Eveiywhere are to be seen packages, bales of silk, etc t blown away, just a.s ships .-ast overboard then- last ballast in dire distress. Next Q,,„n, » ., I 1 , . \"\" '\"\"' \u003eHum.««i lu an-e Mistress Neit «r;::.*at r* ;:':,;r.!:\":'':^' r;;\"-r— \"'—'»■«»■..; J;^\" plateau crossed l)y a series of high moun tains running generally in i,n east and west direction. This belt of high gi-ound may be divided into a Central i-egion containing massive mountain rang, s and gnuid j.la- teaus, an Eastern regio. „iid a Western region. The lofty ranges of the Central »I\u003e these things. Jt snowed dav aud\"night for several weeks, and the snow lay on the g.onn.1 three feet deep. We could see •K'tiiiiig. Eveii the nearest ponv looked like a ghost.\" The eastern region, you will notice is very broad, but as a rule much lower than the I anuis This mass consist of valleys the plateau of Iran between tjfe Arab m^a and ridges, the valleys being higher than the an.l the Caspian the tabll II of A ? Alps, and the ridL'es \u003c.,..-^,p,1 «t.., n,. ,„ui, „..., ..... . , , ' , ', ! ^^'^'e-land of Arabia, Alps, and the ridges cohered eternally with snow. The \"Roof of the World\" is u fit-ting name to give this most desolate region. Extending from the ^aniirs to the south-east are the several ranges of the Himalayas, the \" Abode of Snow.\" The highest peak is and the table-land of Asia Minor. The peninsula of India consists of two mountain chains, the Eastern and the West-ern Ghats. Between these is the j.lateau of the Deccau, and between this plateau and the southern slope of the Himalavas is a Everest, which towers up intolhe aii- more greariow Ind ^n y L^n\"' T V thanfivemiles. The ^v),n)» ,.„... ^f.i.„rr:..-. t^ .. ' .1^ felopiug eastwards than five miles. The whole mass of the Hima-layas is bnilt on a gigantic pattern. Its passes are the highest and most dangeious in the world to cross. Its glaciers are of great area. Wherever its slopes are foi-est- dad, these forests are almost impossible W penetrate. The precipices and gorges of ihe Himalayas are built on a great scale. (}reat livers have their sources hei-e. The Himalayas shelter India fiom the north and provide for it the greatest of natural boun- ^Zh cu^I'^Z '^ 'tu\"'' ^'''\"'* ^™ * ^hnv the daries. At the bottom of the slor\u003ee on the ^^i^Ue'ZyZta'''^^^^^^^^^^ '\u003e-' southern side is a gi-eat swamp fully ten \"^P'-^teau of iraM SvJet iXTS s.T!\"'^v^^.^ miles broad, tlle home of wild })easts peninsula lies between the eastern end of the Me.li North of the Himalayas is the gi-eat IwX\",!!^ ^^^1\"\"^ \"\"*'' Notice the islands plateau of Tibet. This Lntry htC if^^^^!^^^!^ ^ZfJl.^ explored by Dr. Hven Hedin, the Sweflish Tu'* '=''''\"\"\"« »*\"' I\"\"\"\"- of being the birthplace explorer. Listen to what he says: \"We tL - T' p'^^- J°hn wrote the \"Book of Revela- J »e tion on Patmos. Antony and Cleopatra lived toward the Bay of Bengal and westwards toward the Arabian Sea. Coast Line. Notice the curve of the Arctic wla; istT \" ^\"'\".\"T™*^ ^'•\"\"' '^'\"'^h America? What IS the general direction of the Pacific ce«8t .•omthenorth-e.st corner of Asia to the southZ ■nd of the Malay peninsula? What peninsula he\" farthest north on this c,«st ? What sea hes t, he south of this ,;\u003c.ninsula ? What sea lies l„.twee, he •Japan Islands and the mainland ? In what mrt of eastern .V^a is Ko«.a f What sea lie outh ^ Koi-ea ; Whei-e is the East China Sea ? WJ.e.e",
         "the",
         "I 14H A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS -\"ff ^i- :if?rco,r.\"Jf ttr:, :nr^ei \"m»:i^ ^^'^ ^t\" '\"\"^ \"T\"7l\"' '^'^^ '\"\"\"\"• the tiijttuiicf from the wmth-west lorner of A»i« to y^^''\"J?. liowt'vor, to the IlKllt rainfall ill the the north wiftt corner. How far in ii Niniijijlit line is interior, tlie livt-rs Imve hut Mliall Volume Ik-ring strait from the H..uth end of the Malay 1111.1 SOino of tlu'lll \u003clo not reac-ll tli.. iH-..Hn at pi-ninsulu? In what way is east«Tn Asiu like western „ll V,., , . *\\ i ' * i t. . ' \"\"_ ^'\" \"\" \"'' Euro,H,J In what particular, i. the southern e.«.st \"\"' /'•\"'\"♦!'» \u003c^ tMltrul Reni.m the llverS of Asm like the southern coast rtf Europe? Draw \"OW 111 all (lilVctiolls. Thosf rciicliiliir tll\u003c\u003e sea the largest circle you can in Ania. What is the are the rivflS tluit t-nter til.' Aivtjc Ocean the r».lius of this circle f Is there much of Asia far ' \", i\"b inland 1 What are some of the disailvanta^tes of IjeiiiK stj Hituate\u003cn Conmicncing in the Arctic Ocean, name the various iMxIies of water one would pass through, or l.y, a trip to the Hluck Sea. Climate. I'nol the Equator, the Tropic of Cancer, and the Arctic circle. Name the re),'ions juis.sed Pacific liveiN, and the rivci-s of the Indian Ocean. Name the rivers of the Arctic nlii\u003ee. What .should hapiwii there in the winter? Notice liow the.«.e rivers and their triluitarie.s cover tlie country fn.m east to through by the tropic. Is much of Asia with'in the West. In the sllininer-tinie I lli'V should ))e North Cold Cap ( What is the climate of this part f In what Ix'lt of heat is that portion of Asia Ivinj; soutli of Cancer ( What kind of climate should this r\u003c';,'ioii have J In what heat Ixit is the remainder of A\u003eia ! Is there much or little land in this Im-Ii ', Is much of it far from the sea '. What is your latitude ! Kind this lim. in Asia. Is muih of .\\\u003eia norlli of this line! In what diifction ilis's SiU-ria sIojh' ! Is this away from or toward the sun ! Arc there any mountains acioss the north to shelter this ari'a from the north winds ! Are the Canadian prairies nindlarly situated ', What should you s.iy of the winter climate of the northern plain of Asia f Of its sununer clinuiti- ; There are jMjints in north-eastern SiU'ria where the temperature in winter ■roes down to 09 degrees lielow. What is your lowest winter tcm|ierature t These same legions have sometimes a summer temperaturi' of lOO defjrees in the sha\u003cle. What have vou ! of erreat importance to commerce. How so! Wliere will the melting of the ice lirst take I\u003elace in the north-flowing rivers J What will he the effect of this upon the lower portions of the course? What Canadian river is similarly situated ? Would you expect these areas to be well settled? What has settlement to do with the com-merce of rivers ? Tlu\u003c two important Pacific Hvers are the Iloaiig-ho, or Yellow River, and the Yangtse-Kiang. Notice where the Iloang-ho rises. Notice tlie great curve south, then east, then north. Into what (Jiilf does the nver empty? The lower portion of the The };ot-l)elt suggests a warm \u003c'limate and Iloang-ho cro.s.scs the (heat I'lain of China lH)s.sihly a wet climate. Wliy* Hut the one of the most fertile regions in the world! hitter is only tme of the south-east coiLst and The .sediment Iirought down has rai.sed the India. In Araliia and Persia the winds L'e\u003cl of the river alK\u003eve tin- surface of the hlow from the land most of the time, hence land, so that heavy eniliankments have to 1)6 there is very little niinfall. Much of these made to keep the ri\\er in its place. At regions are therefore deserts like the Sahara, times these have given away and the counti-y In the North Temperate belt there is a great has been Hooded. At one time the river variety of climate. Along the middle ea.st- flowed into the Yellow Sea. In 18.\")2 the ern coast the climate is much like the climate banks were broken down and the river made of eastern North America from Nova Scotia, its present channel to the Otdf of Pecheli. south. The greater part of the interior is The Hoang-ho has been called \"China's dry, becau.se the winds blow largely from Son-ow.\" Can you see a reason for this the laud and not from the sea. This area name? includes Gobi and Turkestan, which are Nothing is known of the source of the mostly desert. Yangtse-kiaug, with the exception that it How Asia is Drained. The formation of rises somewhere among the mountains",
         "of A STnn- OF THE CUNTINKXTS 14!* \"River of ,1... ooi.i. r.s , ' ':•,'\"' ' r: \" r'\"\"'\"^\"'^\"''\u003e' •\"\"\" '\"\"' -'\"'-'••« Hibk, that tlH.,v an. vnhu ..nii ,.' :: ^\"' \"'\"'^ \"» north-ws,.,,. I.Mia. This i.s Yan,\u003cso-kian,O.M,lMMli,s. , '';;;''-'. l''-''- of ,1... ,, v.. f..,- ....,,,..,, t'\"' -ountai,. wi.h all kin.ls .,:.,' :, ''l^J'; l;'^^ \"\"-^'' P -■in.. i'n..UKh H.uvlv t.. ,„vv..Mt «„v Chin, .,: *\" /'' '\"''*'\"^ \"\" \"^ ^^■\"\u003e- •\" «'«« At..„,.tini.Mla.I.:n,,hn,f,.s-Ti-risimp,t«i honsan.ls „f a,.,,,s „f hm.l. an.l |.n.vi.i,.d '\"■'•■•\"' '\"'■ \u003c\"'\u003c• \"f tlu ,irn-at.-st nations of '\"\"•UM,t tiM,..s. X.mth.. canals a,v(iil,.,|in \"\"•I ''\"t littl.. n-niains „f th,, f,,,,,,,,, .,,,.,„: \"'•■-- of this vali..v. Info what l,o^v of ah.nK its ,.ours,., an.l thron-h a lin.' .'oiiiitrv I.n..lucinK t.'a, Kiiiin. th.- innli..Tiv tm-. I'otton, rico, an.l siij;jir-\u003c-an... Tho riviM's llowinjr inio th.- In.lian O.-.-an am thf \u003c}anjr..s, In.h.s. an.l th.- Knj.hrat.-s- Tijjris. Hilt for th.- Hiniahivas an.l th. In.lia w.Mihl 1... a i.aivli.-.l-no l.in.l lik.- ih.. I'..si,i »i .\"^\" \"\"!\"\u003e • Sahan.. As it is, Ih.- In.lian I'^u. t 1 ,h.! ^ t ';;:\":;. T''''^ . \"'\" :-'\"' pvat riv.-rs, ,1..- (Jan^.-s an.l th.- In.h.s. lak,'! • . sj n^ \"\"\" '\"''■\"\"' .h.wn ,n a toan.mjr tonvnt nn'il it .-ni-rs ..,■ ,Jaxa.t.-s is ov.-r 1 nr. ^\\' l\u003e\"n'., th,. plain far h.low. Many tril aiari.-s join This H. is f. , ;\" , ''? '\" ^'■\"-•''• tl.o nnun stn-an. al..n, its rouU, ^^n,l\\u. Un'hiX ^rll ZlU Z \"'\"? f whol.. r.-Kion .l,,Mn...l hy th.- vi- .-r is ,hi,-klv as th. Nil/ l; v , ;'V'\"'^''\"''\u003e: settle.1. Mu.-h .,f th.- value ,f the riveV Vral is th t\" it '^'•\"\"\"••; \u003c'* th.\u003e S.-a of cotnes f,-..,n th.- ini^ation .-anals whi.-h t^^ .^1 ^Ivi: ;:,\".;;\"!;; '\"'\"' t'\" \"'« over the thirsty li.-l. Is. Th.- (Janir.s forms -....l th.- Hl^.-k s.- v . A\"'\"\u003c- Oeeun a .r..at ,l..„a .-all.-.l the Snn.hu^ans, I at^ fvl^L IZX^^^^^ .iun,^e-h..n,e ..f the H.-n,..! ti^er an.l ..ther sh. Jth.- D.-a.l S -a .1 h. liv \"l' i\"'\"^ w.M animals. Th.- H,.ah,na,.„.,tra, whi.-h Th.- snrfa.-e ..f th ! , L ai l\" \"\"\" jotns the (Jan,.os at th.- Snn.larhans, rises the s..a-lev..]. Th. s'a i so \"^t 't \"I north ..f the Ui.nalaya.s near th.- sonr.-e of bath.-rs .an .s.ar,- -Iv ,?k „ i t , «l the In.lus. At th., east..rn en.i it breaks cannot live i,. i^ Th.- ,tdan iV T through a roeky ^orge in the n.onntains western slope o^A^t Hetotr^^ and tiows towanl t Ik- Bay of Bengal. Jor.lan of !o-day is t,ot H. Jodan^f M The In.lus n.ses in the northern slopf of T.-sfanient titn.-s TI l the Himalayas, fully three miles above the an.l the Jonla.; valley 'is'IowWrlfrH' evel of the sea. At fir.s. it flows for several de.solate, instead of bd^; a \" land flo. \"n^ hundred miles in a north-westerly direction, with milk and honey.\" nowing ! ; , 1",
         "■a",
         "^ A STCDY OF TJJE CONTINENTS Vegetation. The tumlni vt.^,.|„tioii w,. alr»«u.Jy know. What is it ? Soiitli of tiu- tundruH in SiU'riii is a \u003e,M-.'iit t'oit'sf i-.tiinfiv. the extension of tli.- Ioivm li,i„|.s of Eiir..).\",.! Another forest it-Kion is in the wairn, moist sonth-east, where the tn-fs i,i-,. m. thi.'k that the forests are known in places ;, \u003e jiinules. The (U'sert rvjfiouH wlii.li cover niiK-h of Asia are lH\u003er(h're(l l.y (in4- irrassv phiins or HtepiM's. The SilxM-ian forest strfiili,.\u003e from tlir I'rals to the Kiver Amni'. These forests are miieli tlie same as oip- own iioitiiern woods. Wiiat tr.i\u003e v.-onl(l yon expect lo grow » As tile same kind of tree p-ows over u very w ide a re.i, the fore.st country i\u003e a hit monotonous. Portions of the Oh valley are protected by forest, and w heat is grow IiKh'ed, there are those wiio think that this region will he one of the great wheat hejts of the world some day. South of the forest land are th«! stei)|ies. l.-.l an 'vergreen shruh with shiny leaves and wliite (lowers. I'nder g(KHl governmeni, Asia Minor, the western peninsiihir country of .\\\u003ei,i, mi;rj,t Ix' a wonderful garden pr.Mlucing olives, figs, lemons, orang.vs. on tin- warmer and moister .oasts, wheat in the valleys, and '•edars on lii.. slopes of the UKMintuins. Snnth-.ast..ri Asia has a fertile soil, ahimdant moistuie. an\u003cl great heat, condi-tions most favoral.le to a heavv growth of veiretalioM. Wheat is ^-own\"!,, [„dia. Cotton, rie... tea. luel opium thrive in India • Hill Cliina. (Jreaf 7'//f /^ini/,111 trt'-, Jntliii. Thi takt nxjl ami tecome If there is suJHcient lii'inchm liriiji jiliiv, irhirl, lruiik» t)t till- tret. moisture tiiere is grass; if not we .slialj have such desei't areas as ({ohi. Whei'e I'ivei-s C1-OS8 the steppes there is always a fertile latid. What are the grassy plains like iii the spring-time ? What animals will likely l)e foiuid \u003cm them ? The hot deserts f\u003ef Arabia resemble those of Afri\u003c;a. Compare *he temjteratuie of the day and the night in the desert. What is the surface of the desert like .' What tree supplies the desert dweller with food ? Other desert plants aie senna, myn-h, giim- arabie, and frankincense. South-western Arabia is the home of the eott'ee plant, forest belts contain-ing teak.) )am I mio, and ebony coviM' por-tions of the southern slojie of the Uinia- layas and south-eastern Asia. Al-most any plant of a tropical or of a tem-perate climate can be grown in this re- jfion. Why so? Animals. Nearly all oui' domestic ani-mals have come fr-om Asia. Name anv that have co.ne from either North America or from Afrie ,. The reindeer belongs to the tundra region. So also ,|m the polar bear an.l the sable. Whales are .seen in the Ai-ctic waters, and wild fjeese on the Arctic lakes and swamps. In the Sii,erian forests fur -bearing animals are found. Name .some of these. They are alwut the same as with us. The steppt, country is the home of the camel and the donkey. Here also are an abuiKliUice of slicep. lu.r.-e.s, cattle, and goats. Of what value is the camel r How is it .suited to a \u003clesert-Iife f Goats live in drier and moie rocky regions than .sheep. t !",
         "\\::\\ 15J A STL'DV OF THK CONTINKXTS Tniinrfl iliphiinlmt irork mn ii, i tmiUr ,„ ,ii, l,„l,aii Ir.ilc jiiinl. The;/ ilii t/ir ii;„i iilmh ,,i Aintnin U'Diilil rrtfuirt cranen ur ilerrickt. Of wliiii viiliu' js tilt' Auptra jftmt ? Of wh' • vjilut' ail' catth\" to tlit- iioojilo on tlii\u003e Hti'|ii»esr Arabia i.s tin- lionic of tlif Arab iiorse. What do yoii know of this liorsc ? Amliia is also the ln.incoC th»' Arab. ion iitn and \u003c-aint\u003cl. Tli»' tin*' white donkey of Araliia belonjrs only to tin- IKHipIt' of hiyii rank. The yak is to the dry, oold niilaiids, what the reindeer is to the tnn- drasand theeaniel to the desert. At liist sijrht one mijrlit take the yak for a small cow. Its homs are heavy an\u003cl its lonjr blaek hair han-fs down its sides. It is nse.1 as a beast of burden in the high p»asses of the Himalayas, where its feet are sure. In the south and in the south-ea-st where veifetatioii is al)niidanl. life is also abundant. Among the wild animals of this region art\u003e the elej.hant, the tiger, the ourang-outang, aud the eolna. The Asiatic elephant is used solely for domestie pni-pnses. Herds of wild elei)hants are driven into a strong pen, where the best animals are j.ieked out and then traine\u003cl to work. In captunng wild elephants and in taming them, the people make use of tame elephants. Next to ihe eow, the f»eopl.' of hidi,, hol.l the elephant in very high reganl, and they enn\u003eider .-very movement of this huge beast as don\u003c\u003e most gra.-efully. Why d..es •' lephant n.'ed a trunk f What ean an elephant be taught to .|,\u003e f \\V|,at do you -iip|K\u003eM«\u003c the iM'ople mean when they say, \".May you have an elephant to rideujton!\" A splendid tiger, the Hengal, note\u003cl as a jrreat eatth' stejiler and a go.Ml lighter, is found among the .jungles of the Sundar- bans. Another speeies lives in the more unsettled part« of the country, but this tiger is very shy. Ourang-outang means \"man of the woo\u003cls,\" uud the name will tell you some-thing of its haiiit.s. Theourang is an animal that people have good rea.son to .shuu. It is I'ound in south-eastern Asia, The eobra is a snake some si.\\ feet in length, but so jioisonous that few recoxer fi-oni its bite. The eol ., \\s not always to be found in the .jungles of the for\"8t and the .swamp; he may make his heafhiuarters among the weeds aud biiish of the yard. Where is the cobra found *. Besides these, there are other animals of a more valuable sort. What would the silk distiicts of .lapan and Chimi be without the silkworm? I low are these woitns reared? Again, the rivers flowing into the Pacific are rich in fish. In Kam-chatka the salmon rivers are like those of our own Biitish Thr Tii/rt. The unrami",
         "ontiiHij. A MTII»V (»|- TMK roNTINKNTH 15;; Colimihiii. Ill ('liinii iniliiiin. ,,|' |n'.,|.!.. Hsli fur tli.ir liviiiL'. Thf People. Al»\u003eiii llir.'.\u003e.f.niii||v ,it' ihc l«'«\u003eji|\u003c' of Aniu iM'l.iiiir l'\u003e ill'' 1' IImw iji,.,.. 'riii'»«' |M'0|«li' nil' \u003e'lii'il, yi'lluw i-h ii |,ir. mill lin\\i' siiiJill (liiik \u003c'y\u003e'- I'lai'i'il It littli' ji'-liiiil iiikI .^iriiiu'lil I'iack liiiir. I'iti|,|,. of J, wliiif t\\ |M' iirf foiiinl ill west. Til A-^i:! jiliij ill |.j||!\u003e nf liMliii. I \u003e!irk('i'-»kiiiiii'il i;i«-i'* ;il'' IoiiimI ill flic \u003eoiitli-f:i\u003ef iiml ill tin- Kiisf Imlic's ( K-.t llllif tin- poopli- of tilt' Wni |,i li\\t' ill Asiji. Occupation!. \\Vll»t an' 'tji' iM('ii|iii!iiiii-. iif till' tiiiiiira |H''\u003e| ! Wliy hiiM' llii'sr |iiMi|i|c ti) w.iihIi r itlHiiit f Wli.it i-1 tilt* (H rii|iiiri\"ii .if tlir t'lii'i'Mt (■■.iililiy '. Ill w liiit «a\\s ail' hiiiitiii.' mill ti'ii|i|iiii;,' iiiti'iioi' tiM'iittli'iiii.l ilio'p i'.'ii'\u003ciiiL; ' \\\\ liiit 811' till' \u003c)CrU|«ltillIls (if till' LtrUHH laiiils ? Is thf |i\u003ci|iiilaniiii iif ilii\u003esi\u003e tlii'fi- iirt'iiH M'ly l/iri,'!' ' \\\\ liv ' AKi'i\u003c'iiltiiri' is tlif li';i\u003ciintr Oi'IMIlMltioll of till' VVJirilllT ami iiioister \u003eoiitli, \u003eoiillj- «'ii\u003el. iiiiil t'iist. ('i'o|)s limy lii'jfrowii soi'iisily tli.'it ^rii'af miinlM'rs of |n'i\u003e|)l(' max li\\i oil it small iii'i'ji. As I'ii-c is Olio of till' rllii'f crops, let Us seo wliiit it means to trrow this ifrniii. Uii'C licctls jiliuiiiliiii t moist iii'c. As so. Ill as a fii'lil is sown the water is allowcil to covcf it iiiilil till s|il'oiItc.l. It is tlicn ill'.'iilied yoiijii; rici' jilaiits i,'ro\\\\ rapi.Uy, ami liy till\" irraiii forms. Tlie licM i» floiiiled so iltH'ply tliJit till' cars al. aVM)V(' wattT. In tins comlition t , rice i-ijH'ns, t\\w water is lun off and the ij:rain prathereil and threshed. As wate' is very thr .-ii- »-.«, tllf M:\"rry, itttif ill' I'tinj riinji^r Nil Hit. si'i'ls Iia\\c \u003et1' .'iiid the V and i\u003c;ain . arc imp-'i'iaiit. lire ticld* mii^t cither U- oii ihc I'niie' irroiiiid- or tic -n sitiialc.l that ihcy ''all lie iiritfiitcd. 'I'. 11 IS another |ilaiil widi'ly ciiltivntcfj. lea !.'i|iiir..s if.iod soil and a Nimny s|o|h'. Th'' -hnili jfi'ows to a licii.dit \"t four feet, find the leaves .lie picked lliroiljrhuiit titc Ve;ir. As the (iavor is the iniport.iiit tiling in tea. it Hills' make .1 dill'ercnce wlietlicrold leaves or yoiiiijr le.ives are colic,. ted. Which do yoii think should make the ni'ii.' valiialile tea » The leaves are first dined in fhe Mill and then they are well tramped to f,\"'' I'id \u003c\u003ef all the iric list lire. Indian tea i.n said !■■ he liettcrthan f'liiiiese tea. The (ian\u003er«'s valley and soul hern China raise im- uicnsi' fields of poppies. What do yon know of oiir own (Mippy ? These j\u003eop- i'ie^. liowcvcr. are not jrrowii io look at or to make hoii- i|ne!s of. They arc ^ft-own I\"' 'he milky Juice which 'lie (ijiitit produces. When • le flowers are ready to droii \"If the jiK.'c is taken from til'- plants and opium is iiiaile. Opium is used as a meiiicine to a small extent. It is also smoked liy the \u003c 'liinese to Ics-eii ]iaiii or to leasanf kind of intoxication. So frreat an .'vil Ims it hecoiiie that the K')veriinient of \u003c'liina has ijranted hnt ten years to cjejir all the opium out of th.- eonntry. Siberia. W\" have .'i!re.«ii|v«cen that .'^-ihpria has a severe liinate, with lonjr, dry, cold winters and .')h«»rt,hotsuraniers. Theeouutry",
         "alioiit 154 A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS is so large and the people are so few, that it is difficult to know just what Sil)ena ('outains. The land may be thought of as lying in three great stretches, all sloping northwai-d toward the Arctic Ocean. The most north-erly region lies along the coast. This is a bleak and desolate land during most of the year. There are no trees, but the country is suitable to sucii animals as the reindeer, polar bear, and the fox. How long is a summer's day at tliis point ? South of the tundras is the forest belt, alieady described. The third belt boj-ders Ciiina and contains the best of the aniblc land of Siberia. Boat and IxMitmen in thi- haihi,,- „f Jaffa. The /licture ckanirti-r of the .Syrian iJioret. The people arc gcnciiiiiy poor, but their lot is Ijeing bettered, as the Russian Gov-ernment has built a great transcontinental railway stretching all the way from Moscow in P]urope to Vladivostockon tiie Japan Sea. Western Asia. The countries of western Asia are tiie Turkisli Em[)ire in Asia, Vrabia, Persia, and Afghanistan, all coun-tries of very interesting pasts, but now of veiy little account. The larger portion of A.siatic Turkey is a high plateau, with so little rainfall that grazing is now the only }..r()fitable occnimtiou, though there arc regioiis well adapted to fniits and grains. I'j the lower valley of the Euphrates-Tigris, ancient Babylon, one of the marvels of the world, flourished. But the country is now little better than a fever-breeding swamp. Find Bagdad. Much of the land of Palestine, a small region along the ea.stern end of the Mediterranean, is now a bairen waste, brought al)out in part by the removal of the protecting forests. The most inter-esting place in this region is Jerusalem, now connected l)y railway with Jaffa. The interest of Palestine as a whole, lies in the fact that it was the scene of the life of Christ, and later the battle-ground of the wars of the Cnxsades. The interioi- of Aiabia is largely a grazing country in-habited l)y a shepherd class of peoj.le. Hedged in by the sea (m three sides and checked on the remaining side by a path-less tlesert, Ai-abia had to turn hu-gely to the sea as an outlet. This is one reason why Ai-ab traders have spread over Afi-ica so much. Arabia is the home of the fleet Arabian horse, the Arab camel, and the Arab donkey; and the south - wes^t corner produces the famous Mocha coflfee. Mecca, the chief town, has long been important because it is the birthplace of Mohammed and the holy city of his religious foUowei-s. At the south-west corner is Aden, a British station, so placed as to guard India and the Ked Sea. Aden is a coaling station for our fleet. Why is this needed ? It is also well fortified. Why ? The water supply of the city co?nes entirely from the occasional heavy rains, when rain-water is collected and stored up in great tanks. Aden came into our pos-session in 1S37 beeau.se of the treatment of a British ship's passengers by the Arabs when the ship was wrecked on their coast. thowK the",
         "ri«ki/ A STl'DV OF THK CONTINENTS 15.1 Agriculture is .-Hnied ou iu the valleys distant past. India has been noted for its o Persm wherever .rr.gation can he em- .nanufa..tnre of shawls, .-arpets, wood, and ployed. The southern .M.ast of the Caspian ivory work, and nianv other things. Its bea has also some t,no,l h.nd. Persia is a people are of many races, manv religions, backward country, the uu\\y w..ll-kM.\u003ewn and ,nauy languages. Its scenery takes industry being the n.akm- of niirs. iu vast mountains, great rivers, spVeading Afghanistan is a wil.l and barren land, forests, and immense j.lains. No w.m.ler where the fight t,. live is s,. great that many that the p,.ople of Enn.pe were so anxious weaklings die young, and t hos.- wiio survive to find a .sea-route to India carry about with then, the signs of their Th.' surface features of India are easily gi'eat struggle with nature to earn their daily bread. Af- ghanistun borders north-eastern Imiia. Between the two countries is one of the best mountain pa.sses. It is there-fore necessary for Britain t . \\,(\u003e well accjuaii. , td with what is going on in Afghanistan. How so f Find Herat. This town stands on a river that never reaches the sea. This river sui)plies tiie water that has made Herat the \"\u003c'ity of a hundred thousand gardens.\" Herat i //,.//., ■ lescribed. On the iioith .side are the tremendous Himala-yas. In the southern angle between the (thats is the gi-eat highland region of the Deccan. Be-tween the mountains and the Deccan is an immense plain watered by the Gan-ges and the Indus. To the east is the Bay of Bengal, to the west the Arabian Sea. Ceylon Island is to the south, •eparated from the mainland by the Gulf of Manaai'. Three hundred years ago India was a land of of great \u003c'oneern to Britain, bwause it lies mysteiy to outside nations. India had on the great caravan route l)etween In.lia always been such a land, and this is one and Central Asia. Neai- it is the only gap reason why so many different races have iu the lofty wall of mountains protecting made tJH'ir home here. Let us try to get the north-we.st frontier of India. at this in another way. Many, maiiy years India. India, \"the biightest gem iu the ago a noble race of \"invaders, the Aryans, British Crown,\" is a vast country stretching came through the north-west passes and south from the Himalayas a distance of took i.ossession of the Indus and Ganges 2,000 mile,«, and sheltering a population valleys, driving into the forest and moun- almost three limes as gi-eat as the whole tain fastnesses the races jneviously occupy- population of North America. iug the land. The conquerors 'were not The histoiy of India dates back to a allowed to i-emain at peace, foi- the stor\u003e- of m ^ fel ^^1- ' t:",
         "I 156 A STUDY OF THE COXTIXKNTS : i if 1 rS the wealth of India had brought other races, uutil several different peoples had settled in the land. After Vasco da (Jama had dis-covered a sea-route to India round the Cape of (xood Hope, th(! iJuleii, the Frencii, and the British wei'e soon on the ground with tht hope of ol)taining a foothold. In KKMX^ueen Klizabelh granted a trading charter, or royal permission, to tiie East India Company to trade with India. This Compauy soon felt the oj)positiou of the Dutch and other traders who hail ni;ule an A roynl jxilare in .Vatiila/ai/, th^ capital of Burma, liidin. The minarets anil ilecora- tiotit are mart heautifutly carved. In tiiej'onijround it one of t/ie /Kilace servantji. entrance into the peninsula. AlK)ut the middle of the seventeenth century the British Company fotuided Fort St. Geoige on the site of the present city of Madra.s, Later Bombay and Fort William, now Calcutta, were ucipiired. The fii'st trouble came from the French who were established south of Fort St. George, and who thought by making a dash at the fort and taking all captive, to break up British trade in India. But this raid tunied out otherwise, for ir gave Robert Clive, a young clerk in the British service, a chance to make a name for him-self by first overcoming the French and afterwards l»y commencing a series of coiKjuests which led to the foundation of the present Indian Empire under King (ieorge V. India at this time had no one powerful enough to keep the country for the native- lK)rn. As a I'esult, native adventurei's of every description seized on great areas of connti-y, and these in turn favored either the !?ritisli or tile French, in l~\u003c\u003e(i Dowlah, native ruler of liie country alxmt the m o u t h of t h e Gauges, siu'prised the British at Fort William, or Cal-cutta, and im-prisoned 14() in what has been called the \"Bhu^k hole of Calcutta,\" a small room with only two '■•nail windows for ven-tilation. The hot uight of an Indian s'mmer killed them all but twenty-three ; but Clive revenged this and won Bengal in the great battle of Plas- sey on the ( Janges. At this battle Clive had only a thousand p]uropeans aial 'J,(M)() Hepoys, or natives in tlie employ of the British. The Nabob, or ruler of Bengal, had fifty thousand foot and eighteen thousand horse. One after another the Indian po.ssessions fell into our hands, until the natives became alarmeil and made a desperate effort to stav the tide of conquest. But they had to ha\\e an excuse. This came when the sohliers of the romi\u003eaiiy wco given a new kind of rifle, using cartridges that had been",
         "gi-eased. A STUDY OF THE CONTIXEXTS 157 ti-iulfs, iiiaiitifiK'tures, ami coimiuTcc. Tlu-sc iic'ii 11 |i('aci't'iil ('(Hiuiry, and tliis is m'i-iuimI liytlu' wutchfiiliu'ss of the sdldici- t'las-i. Tlic next is tlit\" scM'vaiit rlas\u003e^, tliose wliu lia\\c to \u003c1() tilt' lahorioiis work. Tin? last rlass arc tlif iiariahs, tlmsc \\vli\u003c.\u003e liavo lir\u003cii\\rii away tVuin tli\u003c\u003c oilier \u003c'lasst»s, and have thus lost tlifir social stamliii.tc as it were. Whatever class a llintl(»o is Korii into, ill that class he must iviuain. and all the \u003c,'old in the world could not iturdiase a different caste for him. Breakinu; caste is The cow hein^' a sacred animal, a Hindoo that of the sohliers, those who see that the has a great dislike to touchinir its fat. The laws are carried out. The third class error was corrected, Imt not soon enough takes in the workers, or all engaged in to prevent an awful mutiny ot the Sepoys and a reiidlion in a jjortioii of India. It was a good thing that so inin-h of India remained i|uiet. As it was, the Hritish tiiere sutrered all tiie jiorroi- of a war in which one side cai-ricd mi the strife in a way suited to liaiiiaiians. Ask your tcaciicr to tell you of the Cawiipore Well and the lielief of Luckiiow. The taking of Delhi, the very centre of the troulile, was a glorious deed. Delhi is situated on a rocky hill on the Ijank of the Jumna, one of the main streams Mowing therefore a seritms thing, and the j»ariahs into the (ranges. The city is suirounded are looked down upon hy those ahove l)y a high stone wall pieived hy sev- them. eral gates. To ent»'r Delhi it was necessary But all the people of India are not to blow np one of these gates, the weakest, Hin(h)os. There are, we have said, many of course, and therefore the liest defended, races in India, for luilia was a much sought Bags of gunpowder had to be placed at the land. Among these are Mohammedans, foot of the gate liv the British. Several of Parsees, and others. AMiat is the name of those who attemiited to do this were shot, the holy hook of the Mohammedans f What but others took their places; the feat was is the .sitmition of the Mohammedan holy accomplished, an entrance gained and the city ? These people never taste strong backbone of the reliellion broken. Why drink, and they are also taught by their slumld we not lie proud of the flag that religion to be helpful to those needing lielp. stanils for such (U'cds '. Britain has a right Were yoii to go to Bombay you would see to be proud of lier heroe-;. the Parsees, or suu-woi-shippers, a ra\u003c-e that The mutiny ended, the British (Jov- came originally from Persia. The Parsees ernment took the whole management of place their dead in great open towers to Hidia out of the hands of the East India whicli the vultures come in flocks. The t,'omi\u003eany. Now King (i.'orgc the Fifth is Ikhics are then ])laced iu a great pit in the Emperor of India. centre of the ground enclosed by the walls India is a land of strange customs, of the tower. The Hindoos have a peculiai\" Among the Hindoos tlcre are sevei'al grades belief. Tlu'y believe that only the pure and of society, or iM~^tes. The Brahmans. or the good can en,jt)y eternal happiness here- jiriests, belong to the nobility, and one has after; that when an impure man dies, his no troidile in seeing that they are snjierior soul enters some other bfxly. either human to tiie other cla.sses. They are intellectual, or l)rute, and he goes through life again, liolite, and well informed. Their place in and yet again, until he is made it to enter society is to lead, to make the laws, ami the etermd resting phu^e. to direct in everything that is for the Tiiere are many large cities in the valley betterment of the land. The next class is of the Ganges. One of these is Benares. if l^i m",
         "iV 158 A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS Thi's is the Hindoo iHlucatioiial uud re- liniotis centre, and is in eveiy way a beaiiti- fu' city with its many temples and shi'ines. It stands on high ground sloping toward the river, and the river bank lias stair-ways lea\u003cling from the water's edge to tlie top of tlie l)ank. From one of tiiese stairways the smoke from the funeral fii-es ra \u003cged along tlie river may be seen. Tlie Hindoo people liurn their dead, mid the man is poor indeed who ean- not gather enough sticks for his burn-ing. In the river are scores of men and women who may have come from afar to drink of the sacred waters, or to bathe in the same. What Kome is to the devout Roman Catholic, what Jerusalem is to the Hebrew, what Mecca is to the Mo-hammedan, Benares is to the Hindoo. The Ti-oi)ie of Can-cer passes about mid-way thiough India. In what heat -belts are the noi-therii and the southern por-tions of India? Where in India may climates of the world f Why so ? The winds liriiiging the moisture-laden clouds to India blow from the south-west for half the year and from the north-east the remainder of the year. Instead of hav-ing four seasons, India has imt three, a hot, a wet, and a temperate season, the latter lasting from the time the sun crosses the equator on its way south, until it returns again to the equator. the tro/iinil one have all the At what time «li\u003ees thfi sun chmw th»\u003c equator 1 When is the sun vertical ovt-r Cancer .' When over Cttjiricorn J In what diivction niiiy on« in Jntiiu liavo to |iK)k to sec the ncKHi diiy Min (hiiini; our KiiniMiei- season f From M^inli to .lunc tlie sun Ih'coiii(!s hotter ami hotter in linlia. Kroni May to Sc|itenil)or the Hoiitli-west winils lirini; rain. Over wliat sea do these winds come '. Wiiat mountains in western India lie uei-oss their patli \u003e. Wliat will Ix\" tlio ivsidt f Wlien these winds strike the Hima-layas, what will U'tlie result ,' The northeast wind blows from Octoln'r to May and hrinus rain to the eastern coast laru'ely. Where iloes this wind jjather the moisture which it \"5 leaves on India ? The occujiatious of the people may be easily infen-ed from the map. Inditi is a great farming coun-try. What lue the chief farm products, and where is each grown abundantly! What is millet f Millet is to the i)t»ople of India what wheat is to us. In the illus-tration no cattle are shown. This, how- e\\er, does not mean that the Hindoo does not raise cattle. It means that cattle cannot be raised in vor, \u003cjivi„., „ ,„hM uU„ of ^.g,.^. Ijj,. „„,„ijers fiirtattim. 1 ■ where the land sup-ports so :,'ieat a ])Opulation as India. Cattle re(iiiire some fiinge, and the pasturage for a few cattle would supjioi't severtil Hindoo families, if jJanted with riceor millet. Again, the Hindoo is not ti tneat-eater. The hot climate forces him to a vegetable diet, and his religion is opposed to flesh-eating. Cows ai-e used, however, for work and for milk. The principal cities of India are Delhi, Calcutta, Bombay, and Madias. Delhi, the capital of the land, is one of the most",
         "noted A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS I.')!) cities of India. The Molmmmedaii iiivudt'is made Delhi their capital. Years afterward it was destroyed l.y the Mofjids, who built a new city on the ruins of the former. The pre.sent Delhi was built hy Shah Jehan some three hundred years aifo. It stand- on the njifht hank of the .hunna Kiver, and occupies a locky hill overlooking the river. Within its high, nnissive walls are many beautiful liuildings. Among the j.rincipal are the palace of Shah Jehan and the equally fin«' .lumna mosque, whose marijle domes and minarets maybe seen towering above the city miles away. Delhi is now jin important manufacturing and ti.iding een- ti-e, and lines of railway connect it with idl parts of India. It wa.s at Delhi in l)ecend)er, 1911, that King George the Fifth was prochiimed Emperor of India at a most brilliant corona-tion Durbar. Words cannot describe the scene jtresenteil, when thousands of troops, native and British, the royal party, and the princes of India moved in a mighty pro- ces.sion to the music of massed bands and the roar of artillery. At this Durbar King George uttered the words that have trans- fen-ed the seat of govei-nmeut from the old capital, Calcutta, to the more imjiosiug and more historic capital, Delhi. Calcutta, till' former ciij.ital of India, is situated on a brandi of the (binges called the Uoogly. Where is Madi'as situated ? Madras has no natural liarijor, so th^u ships have to anchor out some distance and dis- (diarge their i)asseiigei's and their .-argoes into the boats whi\u003c-h put out through the surf from the city. The gai-ilens of Madras are said to be very beautiful. Can you give any reason foi- calling Madras tje \" Ocean City ? \" Bombay stands on homijay Island and faces two Ijcautiful bays, it has the tinest harbor in India and is in the centre of a very great cotton country. What city in North America is similarly placed ! South-east of India is the Island of Ceylon. Colombo, the capital, is situate\u003cl on the finest ami most central j)ort on the Indian Ocean. The Sinsihalese, as the people of Ceylon ai-e called, think their ishiud mast have been where th.\u003e (Jardeu of Eden was situated. In the Gulf of Manaar are valu-able jiearl (Ishei-ies. South-eastern Asia consists of several countries, the one of chief interest to us being Hurma. a Mritish possession. Cpper BiU'ma is almost an unknown region. The foi'csts abound in wild animals. Crocodiles and poisonous snakes inhabit the swamps. The .south-flowing rivers flood the country at times, so that the j)eoi\u003ele have to build their homes on piles. Railways in India have been built to develop trade, to permit of a rapid move-ment of the troops, and to enable grain and othei- food products to be hurried to the starving peasants dui-ing times of famine. The principal lines run east and west across the northern plains and across the tableland of the Deccan. Lower Buiira was first ac(iuii-e\u003cl by Britain, and Upper Burma came into our possession a short time ago when Theebaw, a young king, commenced to celebrate his accession • the throne b\\- a massacre of his peop], Some of his subjects fled to southern iiarma, where they asked for British protection. This was granted, and Upj)er Burma became a British posses-sion. Mandalay is the capital of Upper Burma. The southern end of the Malay peninsula and the neighboring islands contain several small native .states and British .settlements. Singapore has grown into a very important port, as all vessels plying between Em-ope, India, and the east coa.st of Asia must pass this point. In what way is Singapore valuable to Britain ? When\u003e is it situated",
         "f lt«l A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS China. This ^eat conutrj- is inado np of Cliiuii. MoiiRolin, Tibet. Mnijciiuria, and eastern Tui'kes- tan. Of these China is the most import-ant and best known, because the Cliiuese cany on an active trade with other nations. The boundary of China, as it existed 2,000 years ago, is marked in part by the Great Wall. This wall is still in fair shape and is an object of very gi-eat interest to travellers. Find out why it was built, how many people were employed, and how long it took to build it. The jrreat plains of China are situatetl in the east, along the lowei- Hoang-ho and Yangtse-kiang. The largest is the Hoang-ho or Great Plain. The in- tei-ior is largely hilly or mountainous. The land is all for the people and is held by families on the pajnuent of a yearly tax. Agiicultuj-o is held in the greatest esteem, the far-mer ranking next to the scholar, but the imple-ments of the fann are crude and the farms are very small. The land, how-ever, is tended with such caie and patience, and irrigation and fertilization are so well developed, that large quantities of rice, com, tea, silk, and cotton are raised. The roads ai-e jMJor and almost impas-sable, and men do the work of beasts of bm-den. Tibet and Mongolia are largely grazing countries. The exports of China, 1 : J ^ £,•-' ».%^ Tim buity \"treaty port\" nf jl'teutitin-tu. Japanese girli, ihowing the method of oarrying their baby brotheri and tittert. like t hose of other east-ern countries, are such stuffs as take little sjiace and cost a gj-eat deal. A shipload of silk is woi-th many times as much as a shipload of wheat or a train of cattle. China has few navig-able rivei-s and few railroads. The ports at which tiade is earned on are called \" Treaty ports. \" Tientsin-f u, for example, is the port of the capital, Peking. Hong-Kong, a most valuable British possession, is an island. In 1841 this island was occupied by a few fisher-men and pirates. It is now the largest trad-ing post on the Chinese coast. Here large quantities of British cottons are exchanged for tea, silk, and hemp. Canton is one of the largest cities in China, and one of the largest in the world. Canton is the chief silk port of China. Other small jwrts have been secured by Germany. France, the United States, and Japan ; each of these na-tions has n footing on Chi-nese territoiy, and would like to get more Ijut for the watchfulness of Jajjan. Lhasa, in Tibet, is the holy city of the Buddhists or religious followers of Gautama Buddha, the sou of a Hindoo of high caste. One night Buddha left his father's palace and be\u003c'ame a poor man so that he might teach his people how to live so as to enter into the Nii\"vana of eternal rest. Only a few Eui'opeans have suc- cee\u003cled in getting into Lhasa, because the",
         "city A STIDY OF THE COXTINENTS 161 Japanene mmieu n/niintiirt and iimivin/j Mh. The mlk yotxlg iiKuIe ill Jh/kiii art uJU-.n vtnj UauliJ'ul and very cottlij. have lieeii moi*t carefuUj- soluKjls. better justice, and has banished toituiii forever as a punishment of Korean culprits. The islaiids of Jjipaii aro very moun-tainous and tlm coast very irrepular. The loftiest and most beautiful mouutain ia Fujiyama, th«! saercd mount of Japan. Owing to t'piiuiMit eartlniuaki's each year Vniiidiugs, railway bridges, etc., must be built to stand a severe shaking without being damag.'d. The climate is moist almost evei'j'where, and ranges from cold ill the north to givat heat in the south. Forests alxnuid on the niouiitaiu slopes and grass and llowers grow almost every-where on the lower lands. Japan lias been called the \"Land of the Chrysan-themum.\" Can you give a reas«m for this t The Japanese i)eople belong to the yellow race. Thi y are more prosperous and more and countrj' guarded. The Empire of Japan. The Island Empire .„. , _ i..^.,^,..,,^, „^« ,„„.„ of Japan includes all the islands from nindeni thau any other yellow iH30i\u003ele. They Kamchatka to Foimosa, with the exception are very jwlite, veiy cleanly, and very fond of the uorthei-n half of the long island \u003c 'f beauty either in art or in natural scenery. of Saghalien. The i)iineiiial islands are \\Vhere may the last of these qualities be Niplion (Hondo) and Formosa. The ancient kingdom of Korea is now known ns Cho-sen. The 10,000,000 Korean-s and their 80,000 square miles of country are now a pai-t of Japan. This is the end of a country that began before David was King of Israel Since its occupa-tion, Japan has cleaned the Korean cities, built good roads, railways, i 1 J ' J Rite field* in one of the low, mll-mitered valley t of Japan. troduced good cofUinually being fed by the waloT m The",
         "lerracetan 162 A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS 1^ A with; ril/'iiif in .hi-i. .Vntiir thr fx'/s of ijnirr nvt the Jhm*ii o/ IIKlttillll. seen ? Within thf last fifty yeai-s tliey have adopted inaiiy European ways and have become an important nation, tlie so- called \" Britain of the Paeitic\" Some idea of Japanese landscape may be gathered from the illustration. Wliat may be seen in this pictui-e ? There are as yet few railroads in the country owing to its very mountainous character. There are many jroo\u003cl liarbors, and Japan is rapidly developing a great ocean trade. Tokio, with a iMjpulation of more than a million, is the capital and gi-eat manufacturing centre. Yoko-hama is the port of Tokio ; tea and silk are the chief exports. The East ■ idles. The Malay- Archipelago, or East Indian Islands, include a countless ninnber of small and of large islands to the south and south-east of Asia. Besides the Philip-pines, a possession of the United States note\u003cl foi- hemp, tobacco, coffee, and sugar, there are the large islands of Sumatra, Java, Borneo, Celebes, and New Onhiea. Tile clinnite is very moist and very warm, and hence vegeta-tion is everywlieiv abunilant. The chief pro»iucts are coffw, tobacco, spices, and costly woods. The animal life re- wmbles that of southern Asia and north-eastern Australia. Why so ♦ Manilla, on the Philippine.s, is one of the im-portant cities of this part of the world. Qlkhtionh. I. hewribe fnmi mem- oiy till! fiistfrn (•(Mist of Asia. The Hdvithein ((Mist. -'. Make an outline (if Asia from memory; mark ami print on it tiie following : («) The Kreat plateau country ami the Himalayas ; (6) The Silurian Plain ami the Great Plain of China ; (o) The rivers 01). HoaiiR-ho, Yangtsekiaiig, Ganges, Indus, ami Euphrates-Tigris , (rf) The Japan Islands, the Philippines, Sumatra, CeleWs, Borneo, New Guinea, Singapore I«land.s, and the Island of Ceylon ; (c) The jM-ninsulas and coast waters of the east, south, and west. X On another outline drawn in the same way, mark in (fli) tlie equator, Ti-opi(! of Cano«-r, and che Arctic circle; (6) The oceans ; (c) The tundras, sttppcs, and the Pamirs ; (d) The hsation of th\u003c\u003e Chinese empire, Siberia, India, Burma, Persia, Arabia, and Asia A marinej king village in New Guinea. The hoiuet are built \u003cm i^and* or vpon pili-» in tha/loiv tvater. H i",
         ",•1 A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS 163 .11 Minor ; («) Th« Caspian 8ea, tli\u003c' Hen uf Aral, and Lake Balkaith ; (/) Thi) iltwrt of Gobi. 4. Outline the peninHulaof India ami murk on it (n) the Hima-laya)) and the OhatH ; (l\u003e)T\\u' Dci-caii and the vullcyN u( the OangtiH ami ImiiiH : (c) Cult-utta, Itonilmy, MadroH, KenarcN, and Delhi ; (\u003ch The dintrictH huit- able tocotton.wluMit, rice, tea, and tfimts. '), Show on a nia|) the eaNtem \u003c'(jaHt of Asia and print on it the fullowinK: Niphon, Forniowi, Fujiyama, Tukio, Jajuin Sea, I'ort Arthur, \u003ciulf of Pechili, Iloaiigho, Peking, Hong KoM^', the Vangtse-kian^', Yellow Sea, Malay PeninHula, Singaixire City, the Tropic of Caneer, and the Chinese Seas. 6. On another map of Asia show the forest areas (north and south), the ptistui* landM, and the districts Iw-st suited to cotton, tea, rice, (tilk, coU'ee. 7. How \u003c1(H's the Asiatic elephant ditl'er from the African eli'phanl / H. (iive a descrip tion of the Chincie w;dl. rice-fariniiii.', hunting the Ik-ngal tiger, jicarl fishing, and the yak. 9. What are th«! capitals of India, the Pliilifipines, Aiuliiu, and China! 10. What are liena'cs, .M\"cca, and Jerusidein notetl for I 11. Wha' and where are MiM-lm, Manaur, Colombo, Lhasa, Syr-llariii, Jalla, Aden and HiMighly ! 1-'. Compare the sizes of Asia, Africa, North America, South America, Kuroix-, and Australia. If these are repies\u003c'nted respt'ct i vely by 18, 11, H, 7, '.if, and .1, Asia wcmid make how many EuropeH t How many South Americas ( 13. How would you get from Calcutta to New York ' From Vancouver to Canton ! From Honiljuv to London ( From Singapore to Cap*' Town '. 1 L What part of Asia has the gieaU-st numlK-r of people ! What has climate to do with the isipulation ! 1\"\u003e. Why lias interior Asia a more extreme climate than coastal Asia ? 16. Dcscrilie what you think th(r Hima layas look like. 17. Descii'U' a IwimlMM) tree and a tea plantation. IS. Compare the Indus and the Nile. AFRICA What continent is shown here ' What is its shaf*? .' What can vou say of th«^ re^'ularity of its coast line ; What ocean lies' to the east ( What to the west f What continent lies to the north ' Hi'w is Africa separattnl I'n.m this continent ? What continent lies to ;he iiurth-east f What continent is seen to the southwest! W'hat }M)int in tlic continent is nearest to Africii ! Where is .\\trica hroiwlest ! What is the name of the great .mmxc U-twet-n the northern and the southern i«)riions of Africa on the west! VVhat island lies otT the .southeastern coast! Where are the Caju- of O.nnI Hope, the Sahara Desert and Kirvpt ' Where are the main highlands uf Africs ' Mow does Africa compare ni size with North America, and with Europe ! In what hemisphere is Africa ! Which stretches the farther south, Africa or South America ! The iii»ili'iii lit' Ajrii'ii nmnini Ihf ruiitini'nl*. Were we to coinpart' a iikmUtii niai) of Afi-iea with a map of fifty or less yeai-s ago, wo «lioulcl fiiid som«' woiiili'i-ful cliaii^jcs. The Afiica of our jjraiKifatliers had tilt' words \" unexplored rej^ioiis \" covering al-most tlie whole continent ext'ept tl\u003ee nortli. tiie soutli and a narrow coa.st margin. Africa lias lieen called the Dark Continent, and there has l)een some reason for this name. One would think that Africa should have b\u003c'en expkued long before Xortli Amei'icu was settled, for the imrthern jKM-tion of Africa was well known to tlie people of southern EmoiM' and western Asia long hefor\" iH'oplt\u003e tiiought of an America. Tiiere were ^rreat nations on the shores of the Jled- iterran\u003can two thoiisantl years ago. On tiie i^in-opean side there were Grwce and Jiome. On the African side there were Egypt and Carthage. Why did these nations not lift tlie veil from Africa south of the desert ! The answer is partly seen in the wonderfully regular coast line. Etirope has a broken coast, -tt-ith great op«Miings and great penin-sulas showing how fully the s«'a jienetrates into the land and how well the land .stretches",
         ":r A 8TUUY OF THE CONTINENTS 165 into the sea. Africn i» wnntiiiK \u003e\" tlit'H** tliiiift^, the remilt Umuk 'hat tho interior in mnuy phwoH is very far nwiiy from fiit\u003e wa. and hpjie*» iliffii-ult \u003c\u003ef (U'\u003c'\u003c'hs, Ajtaiii. tli\u003e' gi-pat (l(\u003eHort of Sahara. MtrctrhiuK an it does acroHH tiu\u003e norflK-ni (lart of flu\u003e conti- neut, nimli* if Ufxt to iiii|\u003e\u003c«\u003e-il\u003ei»' to reach tb\" Honth by crosMiii); tht'fM\u003e wai^tes of wtaiAiiiK laud. Hut rivfi-s sonictini*\"* iN-riiiit exjilorei-H to enter unknown re\u003erioi.\"\u003c. While tiiis wa tnie in tljo eaw of the St. Lavreuee ami tip li» Plata, it is not so true In . . Africa has four veiy jjreat rivern, i»ut thes»\u003e have rajtids near their mouths, surely .ui ohstac'le in the way of the exi\u003eli\u003erer. Afiiea was thu.s u land of mystery to the wa-loviuff nations of the lifteenth eentury. Yerti' after year I'ortujruese ships crawled farther and farther alonj; Xh\" coast of Africa Houthwanls, .mlil the ('a]M\u003e was doulded and a. route from EuroiM' to India oimmumI up. What two men were concerned with this, and al)Out what time did it take place ? A Hhoi-t tim»' afterwards Portuguese and Uiiteh tradei-s estal)lishe\u003cl jilaees of call or trading iK)sts on the coast of S«nith Africa, and through these s«'ttlemeuts Central Africa came to Ije known to the woi-ld. In other words, the entmuce to luiexplonnl Africa was at the south instead of at the noith. Surface. Africa is a givat plateau or high plain, which in tuni is broken up into many smaller plateaus. In Afiica we liave no gi-eat highlands nor lowlands such as we have seen in the ca.se of the Americas and of EuroiH\u003e. The continent as a whole is liigh and rises quickly from the coast bv a series of \u003eleppes or terrm-es, to a luo or les.s saucer - shajKnl depression inland. These featuies may be noticed on the phys-ical map. All around the \u003c'oast you will see a narrow given strij) of low huid, a very small fraction of tho whole continent. What can you say of the lowlands of North America and of Europe f The presence of this narrow, low coast is soiuethiuf.' oti i mu*t not forget alxmt the ginigi-aphj of Africa. Vol will jiext study the thre«' shadeH of yellow. The de^'iK'st shade fells you where the highest lan\u003cl mass\u003c\u003es lie. Compare Africa ami South America in this pai1n'ular. Tho lightest yellow shows where wiucer-shai\u003ee\u003cl aiva« lie. and the midtile shade of yellow show- the plateau regions. Africa is higher in the east than it is in the west. Iligh- 'iinds stret\u003c'h all the way from al)Out the centre of the western coast of the K«kI Hea to the Ca|H\u003e of (}(mm1 llojie. The most rugge\u003cl |»ortions of this ridge, which we may consider as forming th\u003c\u003e main African high- lamls,jue evidently near the southeiu end of the K(hI Sea, in the African lake region, and in th\u003c' south. T'lose to the (Npiator gn)\\ips of oM volcancH's are s*\"**!!. Thew ri.s(\u003e to a height of stime thivr miles abt)ve the sea- level. It may help the Iniys and girls to think of KoutlH-rn Africa as In'ing a highland i-egion from which thive givat spuis aiv sent north-ward, the one on the Atlantic coast circling alK)ut the Gulf of \u003chiinea, the one on the Indian Ocean coast cxten\u003cling to the nii\u003cldle of the Ked Sea coast and \u003c'ven Ix'yond, and the third stretching in a broad band noi-th- wanl in the centre and crossing the Sahara Desei-t. The Atlas mountains form two great chains on the north-west. Qimate. IjfM'Ate till' equatur. What portion of Africiilii\"- ill tho uorfl ni lii'inisphpr*' ! What do you call the hm- runniriK cnst and west acnisM thu inup? Viril the Ti'pii'sof Cancer aixl Capricorn. When in the sun din ,tly over Cancer ( When over Capricorn 1 When it in inidsummer at the Cape, wliat seaMon is it HI niirtlieni Afiiea I In what direction must a rexi- (lent of (South Africa l'«ik to nee the n\u003c».n-\u003cltty «un1 In what belt of heat is tlie greater pait of Africa 1 In wJiat lieat-lielts are the norttiem and the southern coasts? Are these in the warmer or in tlie c\u003cx)ler portions of these Ijeltst What can you nay of the leuiperaturo »t the crmtincnt as a whole ? Equatorial Africa from the Gulf of Guinea to the Indian Ocean is well supplied with rain. From what",
         "ilirectioa IM A STUDY OP THE CONTINENTS I do the r»in - .vannK windu coim\u003e ) Off wh«t «ceM) t To the north and t\u003c\u003e the wmth of thin minj •rM art) areMi of httkt or mi rain. Hence wo have two deaert rPKionit, a very grpat region along the Tropic of Cani'er, and a tnialler region along the ■outhem tropic. What are the uameH of them deaertH, and why Hhould the louthem deiicrt be the ■malk\u003er of th\u003c\u003e two? The extreme north-wtwt and Houth-went onaHtH hav\u003c\u003e a fairly heavy rainfall. RivMB. Into what liodioN of watpr do th\u003c\u003e Nile, Nigor, Congo, and Zambexi flow ( Which of tli(\u003ei«\u003c riw* in \u003c\u003eqaat\u003c\u003erial Africa ? MoHt of the African rivcrx have falU and lapiils ulonu tlicii coumeH, and th\u003c\u003ei«\u003c an\u003e all near the itoa, Ht\u003ew will tliik interfere witii the valuo The A'ite at C'ainj. C'nim. Itn miiitnl o/ i,'i/i//il. m im/iortaiit lommen-ia/ly a ml i» III uek vuitnl by timriit\u003e. of these riven for commerce ( How will this aifect the ust'fulricNM of the rivertt as ii means of aceesH to thu interior \\ How may tlieste obstructions Ik\u003e overcome ! Name the lake Hource of the Nile. Whcif is this lake in relation to the e(|uator f Follow the Nile northwani to the Mediterranean and notice where the Hlue Nile entent fi-oni Abyssinia. Notic«! also the strange double curve of the river below this junction, and the almence of ti;biitarie.s from the Tropic to tiie sea. Why are then no tributaries here ? Measure with your ruler tlie di.itance from Lake Victoria - Nyanza to the mouth of the Nile. The Nile is the longest river in Africa and the longest in the Old Woild, and there is no f)ther river quite so famous anywhere. Without the river there would have been DO Rgypt, with its pyramids and other reiuuiuH of ancient duys to record. No wonder that the tuirly Egy])tiaiiH Icraked ujK)tj the river as u tuarvel. They knew nothing of its source, hut they di«l know that it tl(MMltHi the |iurche\u003c! lauds of their country once a year with the rich mud that funiished food to both mun and beast. This t{oo\u003cl is caused by tho heu\\'\u003e'Jinie rains on the liighlunds of Abys-sinia and rains on the U|i|)cr isirtion of its course. These mins wash down tons of rich s«\u003eil which is Imrne down the river and spreacl over the laud. As the river comes down the ter- raceil «'oiintiy south of Can-cer, a series of cataracts are fonned. Of these there are six. They are nuniben\u003ed, beginning at the north, First, Se\u003c'ontl, etc. At the Hi-st cataract, at a jihice calle\u003cl Assuan, a great dam costing millions of dollars was built across the rivi'i' a tfw years ago l)y the Hriti.«h jieople. This (him stoics up the water at Ho\u003cHl-tinies and, as it is neetle«l for irrigation, it is let out ujion the lower districts. The Nile provides many hundred miles of excellent navigation on the lower jH)rtion of its course. Parts of the upiKT Nile are also navigable. At the moiith tliere is a veiy imi)oitant fan-shaped jtiece of land known as the Nile delta, and through this the river Hows in several chaiuiels. In what part of Africa is the Niger '. Is the source in a dry or in a wet area ] Notice the great bend. What town is situated near the bend? Tlirough what kind of region does the middle Niger flow ? Has the river a delta \\ Does this show a rapid or a slow-moving stream I Name the curve at each side of the delta. The Niger runs through a forest",
         "country .\\ STl'DY OF THE roNTINKNTrt 1«7 of very great vaU,... o , i„ ..«,.|,..,. .x- l\u003e .u.iml iWt .i....p. He,^ «,,. UnmM th.. I»lo,H,-s WHM H S..,t..h,„a,. ..a,u«l M....K.. .fvaf V.Horia F,.ll.. tho Afri.-an Ni«Kum. In M«iT T\"' '\" •■'\"\"\" '\"\"\"■\"\"\" ''\"■'• 'r''i\"»^\"»\"Mn.nMamil,.wi.i..j„Hta»Knvfh« HI1.1 IW)., ,n frying t„ .-..niuv.. ,h.. .lark... .- (all.. Tlunk .4 all tl... wat.-r Mutt fu.v.Ml ro.n tl... ,.a.t f Tl... Niif.-r an.! its tnl.u- Tl,.- i.oi.,. is lik.- tlM.n.l.r as tu.- wat.-r .m^h am.H ..om.nan.l ila- tra.l.. of tl..- Su.ian tu,..l.li„tf f|„ou«l. tl... tl.i.tv-fiv.. ,...U .,f lH,tl. .,, tl... .,.„t,v a...l tl... w..st. ^..,p, Th.. Ii,s. whit.. ,„a,. to witn..s\u003e ,h..s., h.n.l Lak.. M ..-w.M.I,,. This is tl,.. wo,Hi..rf„| falls was |)avi.ll,ivln.,'st..n,. th,. sou.v..otth.. (•.,„_,.. F„llowi,„.th......m\u003e,f., ..xplon-rof tl... ZaM.U.si. Mv i„u's?on,.'was ii..fi.... that tl... liv,.!- swmus .„„-th ..,•l..^H .■imo„stolii..|oi,r ^vhatth..'•.aikil.K^tl.ok.■\" tl.^. ...iiiatoi-, tlfii lia.'k atraiii jiinl (lows so ott.... iiii.|itiuii.-\u003c| liy t'li' i.ativ.'s. r..)illv w).s, Whci. hi. si.w tl... fi\\ .Iiiiiiiisof mist lisiiijj JM-low tl... fiiUiii..! li..ai\u003cl tl... ....is.- «.f tl... falliiij; v\\at,.|s, h.. kii..\\v what wasi.a.ai.t. What tiil.iitiify ..niris tl... ZamlM'si n.-ar if., moiilh ? Fr.iii. what lak.. .' In what .liivc- 8outl.-w..st \" ito .11 Atlaiilir. Th.- .•iin..iit in so stroiij.' i!iat it is f.-il l.mi.liv.ls ..f .i»il,.s out atwit. W!:; has not th.. ('.. itf,i.i,|.-lta! Tl... t'oriu;., 'Hi I- (is ,,f \\\\\u003e. Mii.t/.iii it. thi- p-.'iii ;i'.-!i ,„ ii. i,.|.j,, .„! i„ it^ heavy rail. Hupi.Iy. i.i|.,- tl, • An, r;,.„. i|„. r..i.«u ,i„i, ,i.. ii.osi „{ th.. tcil.iila....'s '..f H hasiuai.y ti-iii;! aiM'^, ■ . 'ni •!\u003e ili.ii tfjr , !i,.fs How? What \u003cl.\u003e. hav.' iv|Mift..\u003c| .•ii.-i,..' iliniy-i '.. !..'i..ai..s ill uoiiJK a joiirii. N of ,1 t, v ;,,,iiis. Th.. Ijiisii. of this i-ivt'i- is wail.Hl in v 1 luimtains. What ar.. th...... .' Lonif ; -o ii is s.i|\u003e|mis...I that a jfivat s.'a (iil.Ki tin-, (l..|.ii.,ssioi., an.! that tin. oiitl.'l into th.. A-lanfi.- ;, iii.li ally woiv a path tl.i-uii^'h tlir wcstci-n ni iiiiiaiii\u003e low ..i.otijfh to .hail. otT tht\u003e wat..f. Xoti\u003c'«. tl... nun. .'lulls str. u.is on the south hunk of th.. riv(.r. Th.. (\\)iif,'o (low- through a Ki\"\u003c'at for.\u003est-.la(l j)laii.. It .'rosst..- th«\u003e tnjuator first at Stanlt.y Falls, wli..n\u003e th.. river is ahout a mil., in wi.lth. Fioin this pouit to Staiih.y I'ool the liv.-r is navijratil.' of I v«\u003er the \u003clo..s this t.'li you slojK\" '. Ila\u003e th.' liviT a .l.'lta .' Tl... Oraiit,\" !{iv.\u003er to th.. sonlli-u.-st. hiiM til.' usual 111. 1 ;,.•, of cataiaci-. rapiiis, hiu haw few .1 :!,. ■ , 1 i.-s. In th.. .|ry -..ason it is losi I.- ; its l,a: ',■\u003c .- r i.. T/'.e /jfrisMn hi is ai- -r ■•. ;..; ■ the M.. .'i i :.. tow I 1 lo;;. ^ .N)uator, h- • eternal siio\\'.. In tl... i-ainv .-eas. \u003en '•'he \\i..tolia-Xyanza . !^.k.. Sii|..Tior. To ■* \u003eri\"*'at mountains ; ' \u003clir..«.tly 01. the V- ,,... eov..n..| with ■\u003e\u003c.n.ler the jMx.r natives tl.oiijfht that tiiere w.t.. spirits at the summits, sjarits that hit ott\" their finjrers and From Stanl..y Pool, nain...l aft.-r II. M. t.M.s. Staiiiey, the .'xploivr of the Conffo, to a Th.. rej\u003cion of the Afri(.aii lakes is j.iuteau- point ..lie huii.livd mil..s from its mouth, like and cmsists of uAVma plains, with it l.'aps down from tl... plateau in several jjreat troughs in whieh the hiktrs are l\u003e-inK. cuturaets and series ..f niiiids. Taiifranj-ika to tl... south - w.-st is a long. The Zambesi, whieh tlows east ill a double uairow lak.' draining at high wat.'r into curve, is a most valuable iiv..r bt'caus.. it is th.. Congo basin. Lake Xyasa, to the south- the entrain... to a plat.-aii well suited to east, drains into the delta of the Zamliesi. liorthern Eurojieaiis. The river is bi^okeu m This lake, dist-overed by Livingstone, is many places by rapids, and midway in its now much us.'d by steamers, course it plunges into a great eanyon .several Lake Chad is situatefl about half way",
         "i HiH A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS between tho most easterly aiul westerly poiiits of Afnoa. This lake, which is on the southern edjye of the desert, is iai'ge or small act'Oi(lin\u003ej to the season of the year. Heavy rains eanse it to overflow. l)rj' weather reduees it materially. Its watei-s are fiesh. Islands. Find the i\u003e()siti(\u003ens()f tiie Azores, Ma\u003clfira, and Canary Islands. The Azores and the Madeiras l)elong to Portugal ; the Canaries belonging !\u003c\u003e Sj)ain. These islands supply ihe Loudon markets with grapes, early tomatoes, and jiotatoes. South of the equator are Ascension and St. Helena, the latter being the place of banishment of Napoleon from IHl.\") to his death in 1821. Madagascar on the east coast is the third largest island in the world. Fossil bones of a bird that stood ten feet high and laid an egg a foot long have been found on this island. Was the R«m' in the story of Sinbad the Sailor a myth ? Vegetation. There is always plenty of rain at the iHjuator. There is also abundant heal. These two conditions ai'e favorable to foi'est growth. The tHjuatorial forest stret\u003c ' acro.ss the country alK)ut the coast of the(iui! of Guinea for twelve hundred miles, and is, next to that of the Amazon, the largest forest area in tln^ world. If you can imaginean area four times as large as Great liritain, crow\u003cIed witii giant trees live feet in diameter and 2(K) tV-et in height ; trees whose branches are so woveu together that the sun can scarcely shine through th\u003c' dense foliage ; where each titn- stH'ins to be lasli(\u003ed toothers )\u003ey creeiMMs and twineis rangitig in size from the thickness of a jtiece of twine to that of a gieat roiM\u003e ; if you can further imagine an undergrowth so dense that walking through it is almost impossible; if you can picture a spongy forest floor, a dim light, thousands of murnuu'ing insects and vaj)Ors rising from the ground, you may have some slight idea of what this forest is like. Then you raist think of the hundreds of great Streams winding this way and that, but always in the forest shade. Into this great ar»a imagine human iH'ings living in total ignorance of the big open world beyond Ihe forest edge, and you hav«' a more complete but still a very im- imrfeet notion of this awful vastness. In the African fori'st are to Im' found the banana, the nil)lH'r plant, the ebony tree yielding a l)iack hea^y timber most us;'ful for the handles of table knives, for walking sticks and for jiiano keys, mahogany valu-able in cabinet work, the cofTtH' plant, and the palm. To the native the banana is most imjtor- tant. He roasts it, makes flour from it, and uses the fibre for making various things about hiw hut. If he has a few bananti phmts h(* is comfortable. Without them he will likely starve. The rublM'r phmt of Afnca is different from that of South Ameri\u003c'i\u003c. The Afiican plant is a crtH'per whose stem is often several inches thick. These creeju'i-s plait themselves like twining snakes alK)ut the trunks of trei's, or hang in great nuisses from the mighty branches. Tlu\u003ere is a .sajnng that where the rul)}H'r vine is abundant, neither man nor biid will find a good home. The oil-jtalm is abundant in the forest along the Guinea shore. The pidp is boiled in water an\u003cl the oil skimmed off as it rises to the top. North and south of the forest area are th • park-like lands where trws and rankgra-sses grow. Beyond these are the steppe lands, or grassy plains somewhat like our own prairies. In the park lands the natives pursue a lK)or class of farming. As these regions are .subjtH't to what may be called the wet and the dry seusons, the natives either follow their flocks and herds from pasture to pasture, or remain in the one place and try to do a little farming. One",
         "tree 170 A STUDY OF THE (CONTINENTS TmnKiinrtatnm iirmn thf dfterU Lonq caravami or ttuini o/canteh riirrii iiirirfiitnthiu- mrr tliiK ilmert rr\u003cii\u003crn. poculiar ti\u003e tliis rcj^ion is tin- Imolxib, -.vliow erie. Tli. tniiik (\u003ert«'n iii.'iisiiivs 1(M» U-i-X in ciiviiiii- far south tVi-fiKv. Th.- fniit of tlii. tnv is as l.ij. flios,- of soutlicrii AtVira, a.T for il,e pvat.'i as an orange an.l is us.-u as f,.o.l. B..yon.l part lik.\u003e th.- animals aUmt ..tir ..wii l,n,a.'\u003e Describe the products of each of the regions mentione*!. On the island of Zanzibar, on t!io eastern coast, cocoanuts and cloves are jjrown. Wliat do you know of thi- cocoanut l\u003ealni ? Clove trees jri(,\\v to |),. thirty or moiv feet in heijfht. Blossoms appear about the sixth year. These are pitiiered, cured in smoke, and then siiip- p'd to all parts of the civilizeil world. Animal Life. Nearly ail the animals of Africa aiv unlike those of any other continent. These w\u003c»uld })e stran.!i:e to us e.\\cept those we may have seen at a circus or in \u003eome menai:- animals of northern Africa as as the Tn.jiii' cif C-incer, and the paik lands are tln= stejijM's, where then is gni.ss and no ti'ees, and beyond the stepjie lands aie the deserts. No ve^ictation but liri\u003c'kly j.lants ■.^\\■ plants with toujrh eoveiinjrs \u003c'an live in such ailesert as the Sahara. Still there are a few jjrreen islands in this wilder-ness of .sand and .stones. The Sahara is The rest of Afriea has animals pceuliai- to itself. The antelojie, a sjxH'ies of il»^.|\\ the zebra, and the jriratTe f | ujH)n irrass or on the herbajre of the smaller \\v\u003e-*-^. \\n noithern and southern .Vfriea. and t* the ed\u003cre of the ,:r'eat fore-ts are found the lion, the livena. eaters. hi the forests are the tuske\u003cl elephants, and the p.rilla. \u003c n diles. Iiippopota- mns»\u003ej\u003c. an rhiinH'erosea \u003clesert .miy because there is not en.mfrh and the leoiwrd. which prev ui-on li»- fjra rainfall. Wlierever water eomes to the ... .smfaee as a spi-ing, or where it has ben reached by dif.'}rinir or boriiijr. there are th.\u003e oases of the de-ert. Their ehief product is the date-jialm, which produc.- from 300 to 600 pounds of dates j„.r tn ach .vear. The date-palm jnov ides the traveller throuj^h the (h'sert with f.M.d. timber, and shade. The vej^etation of Africa alon;; the Mediterranean is much the same a\u003e that of southern Europe ; whereas, that of i^outhern Africa resembles the vej;ctiirion of the Argentine Republic. Why shouhl this be ? ■vi;s:z.^^Bfi*'j^»ijmA^",
         "fssm- ai-e found in th\u003c' streams and nmrslics, and cannils and osfiiclit's oii the desert iiiid stej)pe areas. Tlie jrii-atr.' vanes in lieifjlit tVoni 15 to 20 feet, the jrreater |iail of tlle lieif,'|lt l..'inp (hie In tile ^'reat {.•njrtli \u003c\u003ey its neek. Its tri||irii(\u003e is |,,||y .«\u003c) tliat it eaii easily stii|i tile leaves otV the trees npoil wliirh it feeds. Some of tiicse auiinals hiive a ix-ailtifnlly- S|«'tted ImmIv. (»|li,.\"rs ai'e .-lif'stnilt - eolnred, and ail in their native wilds may so reseniMo the tn-es that the hniits- nnin. unless an exj'ert, does not even \u003eU|)jH»e thai ffirartes are near. The zehra is a small stripe.! hors,- said to I,.. very ditlienlf to fame. Its home is ill the hifrlur park country of eential Eai*t Afriea. What are the eohir: (,f t|„. /.ehra's stripes f The raiJKe of the lion was oiiei- trom one end of Africa to the other. As the lion feed\u003e on .mj. ma! food it can liveoiilv where otiier animals are found. Jt pos.sessc\u003e;frc;n strenjfth. swiftness, and vouvufTo: it is .solitary in its lial.its. and usually hunts al\u003c.ne. T()-.iay, the lion is found only north of the Oranjre iiiver. STUDY OF TUE CONTINENTS 171 Tot Ovu-'- -ItunuM rhiruxerta. The gorilla, the largest and lier\u003c-est of the monkey tril)e, when fid! gi'own is as tall as a man and of enormous Streno;t),. The home of this ape is foim.l j,, f|„. deeper forests of the coast of the (J I, If of (iiiinea. (JoriJIa life i-c a fiimily life. Its food eonsi.sts of nuts, fruits, ejrj^'s, etc.. found in the forest. The African eiepoaat, or hiff-eared clepi, uit. '•nee roamed all over Ceiural Africa. Xow there is much dan;,'e)' that before many years the hunter uilliiji'v,.' shot tlie last of these tine e!e- I'hants. This anin.'al, as .von know, has enormou.« ivory tusks, hence the slau\u003c;hter. Dead ivory, that is, ivoi-y found thioujrlioiit the forest wherever elcj)hain^ have died, is not ,is «r,„,,l ;is fresii ivory. J\u003eead i\\..)y i\u003e. however, colle.'tiMj ^ind taken north alon;; \"ith the fresh ivory. The African elejihant cannot he Inuied His i\"Mie is partly in the woods, whei-e his ~|i(,i,rs or trails are ivadih ■ lowed, and partly in the open .\u003c,'round VVh.it do eleplianfs fe\u003c-d upon ? How (Jo they \u003cjather tins? \\\\ hat do they i^ain l)y iivniff m lierds f ' i: -i.-i s*'*.\u003e^^-i •",
         "v 17: A STUDY OF THE CONTINp]XTS - -i Thi4» lii),»po])Otnnr\u003eii«. \u003c.r rivor lioi-so. is a is rcait'd on the Diiu'lics of soiitlicni Afiiea giciit li«a\\ V iM'iisf liviin: iiloiii; ami in thf the same as cattii'. horses, and siieep tire swamj'V rivers and sinalliT lakes of Africa, reared. Tell what ynn ean of u South How nni'-h will a lai-jie hi|)jMi]\u003e\u003c\u003etaniiis weijih? African (tstrieh fai'in. making mention of What is its color ? How nniny toos has it its size, the hatehinjj of the chicks, danip^r on eacji f(M\u003et ! How many toes has an from the liiyr hirds, jfatherinjr f' ,ith\"i-s, elephant on ea\u003c'h foot .* etc. The rhin(M'eros scratches the eaHh with Afriea has als*\u003e (hinijeroiis insects as well its foot, then witli two oi' three lilows \u003c(f its horn, which is kept movina; like a pickaxe, it loosens up roots, vvlncii its lips seize and it- teeth crush. Its eai-s move with its iuws, its siioit tin! swinj;s a\\^ay. and nunihers of An (ittrii'li t'ttrtii. T/iriv hirih nif rtiiiwd t*'i' thru' trtttlirr*. oit. tnitl niny. liirds eliiiir to its Ijaek and sidef\u003c. What ai'c these birds finding; .' \u003c »f what other service may this lie t'\u003e tiie animal '. (live I'casous why the rhiniM-eros should he the very kiny of iieasts. The camel is the \"shii\u003e of the desert.\" It can tiavel altout thirt\u003e miles a day and carry a very liea\\y load. Its lii'oad ilat feet ]»-evcnt it from sinking; in the sand. It can feed on the spiny sluulis of the deseii and can j.ro without water for se\\eral days. It- eyelashes arc lonj;: it can close its nostrils, and is in e\\'ery way a \\ei-y desirable lieasi foi\" the desei't. The ostrich inns ali\u003enj; tiie st\u003c»p}^»edands liorderinir the desert, and was formerly At*^ lor its boiiuiiiul feulhers. X-v. the ostnri. as danjrerous animals. There is the Av/.sr tly of the south-eastern coa-t. Il is no larger than a small house-lly. yet it- bite is so |)ni^)noiis that thousands of hor\u003ee-.. she»»p, (.xeu, dojfs. and even some i\u003ef the wild aidiiials have be«»u destroyed within I few years. In otherdistrietsthe /V////'/-,aii ittseet whi\u003cdi burrows unih'r the toe-nails and lays its ««^tr- theiv, is found. What may be th\u003c' rt*sult should an infecteil toe be neijiected ! In S\u003entli Africa and in Afnea south of tlie Saliai'a, one may see jjreat hills or mounds of earth Id to 1.\") fwt hitfh. the homes of myriads of ants. The white ant is iiarlieularly des- tiuctive of wood. The drivel-, or soldier ants, when on a march will cau.-e ail animals to tiee lieforc them. The People. The in-habitants of Africa are either of rlie black or of the white race. As a rule European- live eitln'r in the very noi1hei-n or in the very .southern pai'ts of the continent. Northern .\\fiica is peojiled in the main liy a white race ditTer- in.sf from the Canadian liecause c.i a darker skin, an o\\al ^nv\u003c\\ and sliarp features, \u003c'h(ir- a\u003cteristics best seen in the Arab of the desei't. About the (Tulf of \u003cruin(\u003ea, in the interior, and pui-tieularly in the .Sudan, \"the land of the blacks,'' are tn be found the nejjroes. These people are jet lilai-k, ^ooil-lookinj;, and well built. The nejrroes are likp over-grown chiidien, givou to iuioness, ioud uf ) ■)iiii\u003ci nuirielvet rtrentlij hntckril. The little liii-ilt iritt iirmr to n heiifht i\u003et ittiftHf rtttht",
         "ffft. A STFDY OF THE CONTINENTS ^^ ^Qi^ «^UM1NENTS 173 oraament and ..r pleasure, ami ,m. „s„„ilv tI.h Rnh, ';:'■\u003e■ «\"^«l-\"--\"\"n.,l. TlM.ir |.„n.,.s a.v h„t o «ra.s, mMls, ,n„.|, ,„. LranHi.-s. Tl,..i, Hotliu.K is s.-anty. an,l ,h,.v ,,.](,.,,. ,,,^.,, tht-ir fetisli ,„• l,n„.,..,.ia.l.. j:o.| (it ,uav I., \u003c..ilyasnak..Vh,.a.i, ,,, „!,„.,, ,,„.,,^.,, ^^;^_^.., sj..nr n-si.lin:, '\"'I'\"..! .-very ......k.t.v... ..,,.1 •\"sli.l-to.\\,n.Ti,.aasslav,.s. South ol' U.. ••quator aiv tli,. Iijrlit..r.,..,ln,v.| 'I'MtrofS kllnw,, „. ,).,. p,,,,^,|, 1\"''\u003e|.1.'. Tlics,. ,uv ,|ivid\u003c-.| into a iiiiii)l,.T\u003ciftiilM.«.of«Jji,h iIj,. Katlir, ZuJu. HaM,.... .\\|;,tal.cl,., -Masliojja. an.l |;,..-iiM;uia aio III.- most iiiijM,r)i,i,i. Th,. Katlir. ^llJll.aii.l .Malal..-I.arf walTJoi-s ;•'•'■ th,. s,,..ar ai.-l tl... ,,o,.on..,l „,tow. •ti- villatrrs or haul., of tli.- Hottfutots \"!••• tni,„.l on tli,^ jn-ass-..„v,.ml plums where fli.y lai,-... J, f.-\\VNh,.H|.an.i t-atfl.'. Th.. !nif\u003c-|j. w},\u003c.Mi vv.. I.av.aln.a.lv uwu- '\"\"\"■''■ \"■•••■\" fl'\" «\u003e-t I\" s«ttl.. in South Ainca. #kK\u003eii Hft-r ti„. /i,.,t ....ftLna-nt at ikmtata rilUujt /» (;,,,ti„l At,,,-,,, natturn tor inn-i). .\\,,i, fl,, A liiiilir in l^irttrimi will, f/, •lifil fill . i III, tiitkn. arc Wal'i'ioi-s andhmit.Tv. Th,- B,...huanas ,..,. „„,,,„, ami tanneixand the Mashon.-,. an.l Mas„to a.v more ^iv-n to airn.-ultnral pursuits. Ihe KatHi-s an.l Zulus ar- a han.lsom.. l)eopl,. whose principal weapons of war aiv the ,\u003eipear or asx-ifai, the h.-aw chil, shield. ^ . '^ \"\"^.u I.) K.M'ji slaves m Jintjsh I.. ihc ,o„ti,.iv,..t oonioi,,,,. ii„. B„.i,m,.„ ;'■.'■\"\"\":■■ , '''•; »™'' »«' H\"- \u0026■.»■« (ivkk,.,i. ^ ««/».■.• i-illa/j,. St/ath Africa. CajM' T..wn was made, thev found that the int.-rior was i, iro...l farininsi: country, an.l iioises. she..},, cattle.\" jrrain. uud ^'aix's wen. introdu.-ed and jri-owii successfully. As farm h..lj, was often n--*Ml..,l. all the earlv I\u003euf.-h Jarm.'rsliad t.. .lo was to round \"I' -.n,.. imfortunat,. Hotfntot kraal ami \"'islavc all lh..y ..ar-tured. This went on ■mnl lSi.,i ,vh..n Britain took ov.-r South Ah-i.-a an.l i,..,...,,) to, .la..,. En^dish-sp,.akinjr s.ntlers a.m.njr tlm Dut.-h lions, that is farmer. I„ ]«{;; Bntain passe,l « ,aw tnnL'iitt* t*- ill . 1 .",
         "I 174 A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS was fountlwJ the gtate known ns the Orange Kiver Re|»ul)lic. But the more detennined Boers pressed on into the country across the Vaal River and settle*! in what is now known as the Transvaal, or the conntrv hevond the Vaal. Rhodes, who devoted his life to the develop- tnent of his country. RhodcHia is one of the finest areas in South Africa and one well suited for the residence of northern p(H)ples. The grave of Rhodes is on the top of the Mattoi)iK\u003e hills, a range of rolling While the trekking Dutch were settling country in the centre of Rhodesia, a fitting in these regions, British settlers continued resting place for a tnily great jtatriot. To to enter the Cape country, or ( 'ape Colony, the south-east is Matabeleland and to the and soon there was trouble with the native north of this is Mashonaland. After Britain races. Kaffirland to the south-east was first had taken the oversight of Rhodesia, the added to Cape (\"\u003c.I ony. Then Basnto- land, the Switzerland of Africa, a region west of Natal. Then came a bitter stniggle with the Zulus, the most hoj)eful and in-telligent of all these tribes. Cetewayo, the la.st king of the Zulus, had succeed»'d in creating in his subjects a gi-eater fondness for war than was ali-eady presp iV in a people natiii\"!?.'v given tf\u003e biHi'!' ;.'.uiil fighting. He did this by le- fusing to allow his young men to marry before they had shown distinction in battle. You will easily un\u003c!ci\u003etand what this would mean to a lot of sa\\.i\u003cj(';. It was not until Cetewayo was .^ , „„„, finally dil'cated an\u003cl captured that the Zulus time a givat many British and othei settlod down to the ?nore useful work of mining advc'uturers entered the land. These farijiing. Their country now forms the newcomers changed a fainiing communitv norther/i part of Xatal. alnu\u003est unknown, into a busy, bustling centre B'chuaijiiland was added to British teiri- of j)opulation. President Krugei-, the last tory in hS^o iM(au--e the whole country was pn'sident of the Transva4il, refuse*! to i-eeog- \u003clisturbed by Itickering among the various nize the outlajuler, or foreigner, as a citizen ' biefs. Beyond Bichuanaland is Rhodesia, having any rights in the country. This ;xWc4 ^u,v tlu' ir?-.oji. y.:-.!!tl3 Afrif'an, Cecil led to the late Boer war, in which the Xiitiir Xulu\u003e. The vf/meti ifrmii in lihiiikrt* ami l/n i/irii III hitleii nf (ininuih. All irmi- iniiiiiinnti' \"/ Ih'iiiIk. /mt/irm, mid iiittal hriinlrt*. war-like Matalx'les made it anything but pleasant for the Mashonas, a more IH'aceful and agrictd- tural race. In 1893 a stop was i\u003eut to this whe)i the British tnxips defeate\u003cl the Matabele king Lo- bengula at Bidu- W'lyo, \"the place of the killing.\" Ten years afterward, Buluwayo had a rail-way station, schools, churches, fine I'esi- deuces, and beautiful parks. They form a St liking contrast to the kraal of the Matabele king with its hundreds of savage wairiors. In ]8,H4 gold was discovered in a locky lidite in the Transvmtl, and in a short",
         "TMm A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS 175 wliicli it tl..w.-.l. Fc.r ymrs nothinR was lu'iud nf him ; hut so \u003e,'ivaf was his work iiikJ so much loved was the man that «'x- pwlitioiis were oiuaiiized to go in s»«aich of him. Henry M. Stanley, the tliseoveier of OiUHKe River eonntry joined the Transvaal. The re.siilt was that both \u003cM)untries were defeateti by (Jreat Britain, and the bound-aries of British South .Vfriea yreatly e.v- tendetl Hinee then Boer an.l Briush are .,.,„, „ . working hand-in-hand to buil.l „,, a great the ( ..ngo. wis' sueeessftil in finding him . Thewor.oft.eB^p,o.. With the r;\"i;:;:r^i^';r \" ..^ti-r;;;;!;::: ingot the mneteenth.-enturv,t -urtahi ..f had the .«,we,- ,.F .t , ' \" '\"* .\"'''\"\u003e** ^':- r \" r' \"\"\"'■•\" \"- '\"•■'-'\" \"n^-i\"..' r' r ;: 'ir;;:;: rivers, lakes, and mountains, • ' '\"' ^ and the hidden continent became uiK'overe\u003cl. M.-foie this t\u003cM\u003ek place the geographical e.x- plorer had to |.ress liis way through deadly swamjis and a\u003c!ross torrid deserts, scorched to the marrow liy the sun, smitten by naineless fevei.s, tormented by insects, menae«\u003ed by wild beasts, and ambushed by wilder men. A Scotchnum by the name of liruce searched for the sourci- of the Nile iu 17H8. Another Scotchman, Muugo Park, gave up his life in trying to oj.en the way down the Niger. Hut the man who succeeded in lifting the veil from the Dark Coiitiiient wa^ Da\\-id l.ivingstone. Livingsioni 2!MKH) miles in Africa and added one-twelftl. of its whole ai-a to the known regions of the world. It was Livingstone who dis\u003c-overed tlie Zambesi River and name.l the Victoria /.-n.mlin,, „. E,,„,f. Th. ,mter U lifu,l l,„ hurk.,. l,:„„ . 1; II,. ..Ih.r. „,.,! ,„ ,■„,;■„\u003c/ /,,/ ,-h„„,„h I,, tl„ M.l,, tl'a\\e ••-•\"Id an.l .-arri..,! it to the coast to Ik- sent !o_ Ills own lan.I. His body „ow rests in \\Ve-.tminster Abbey among other illustiious Miitish dead. r-i ,1 ,^ , , , .\\ttei' the discoveries of l,i\\-inirut.,i.o Pails. It wastlnouuh the workof Livin.'- the work .,f ,.v. i . i^mngstone. r-;,!;;\"' ,\"■; *'■■ »'- r\\ \"\"^' '^\"^\"\"^-'^-'\"-:::;i x:;;;:;;-\" ..;: .1..; A„,i.. i,„,i ,,„.„„i ,„, „,,. h,„k,.„ ,„.. „ „„w ,..„.., k,,,,,,,, „,„„ ,.„„.,, x^;2 and that Central Africa is ni.iiidy Britis Livingstone went to .\\fncii as a mis-sionary in lS4(t. After discovering the Zambesi country, he was anxious to leani .some of the se\u003c.rets of the givat Coul'. -Ameiica (n- Asia. But Iheie was trouble 111 store when «o great an area was made known to Kiirof».«n nations anxK.us to extend their lands. The River and of ,he f,.,vs, \u003c.ountry through wtthstatalcivilizH arnnel. \"ir^fie endlh.i;:",
         ":^^f. 17ti A STIDV OF THK cnXTINKNTS foiiiitiy would have t.. !«• jcivoii to Biitiiiii. (»\u003c'riuany. or FiniM-e. Tlies.. hihI ,,tla'r Kur.\u003e|K'iiii nations a^'rctxl to pjiivcl u|, tli.- ••ouiitry into what |,as l.,H-n call.-.l ■• Spiinvs of inducnc.'.\" In othor words. Hritain was t,'iv«'n certain jfit-at tracts of ronntry ov.-r which her contiol wuiil.l I... tVcdy ,.xi'rcis.Ml in the way of develojang tlie hind an.l (h)inK Iter duty i)y her l.iacl\u003c subjects, (ierinany was jrivcn otlier districts. Fran.-e and other nations were al.so j;iven wliat was consitlered im/ioit'lilt il» II nillnni .,,,,1 iiillimi their share. This is the rea.son wliy you find on u njo(iern map of Africa such \u003e,'reat British areas, fine (Jerinan districts, and immense stretches of French country. This partition is intended for the jiood of Afi ica, and the successful nations are, as a rule, usinK it wisely. The Nile Valley. Egypt, the \"gift of the Nile.\" belongs to Turkey, though its affairs are really managed by Bi'itaiu. How \u003clid this come about ? Acro.ss the l8thmu,s of Suez is a great canal constructed in l»6y by Egypt, sui)iM)rted by Britain. British interests in India are to.. gre.if to allow tiiis sea-route to fall into the hands of en..mies. or even to \\». negle\u003c-ted bv Fgyi't. As Egypt was until lately a very I'udly gowrned .•ounlry. Hritain took cou- ti\u003c.i and at \u003c.nce set to work to improve tiif con.htion of the people. The nrmv has l\"'..n trained by British otKcers. taxation has been regulate.1, schools have been iu- trodn.ed, railways h„v\u003c. been built, and the wonderfid dam at Assuan has been con-structed. Without tlie Nile, Egypt Would become a par\u003c-hed uj» laud. With the Xile. the country on each side, for a few miles. is a garden capable of growing rice, cotton, sugar-cane, tobacco, maize, and wheat. Cairo, near the delta, is the pi-incipal city, and comnuinds both lail and river. It is well situated to become a very great fity. How would you get from Cairo to the pyramids? VV hat would you see when you got there • Alexandria, at the mouth of one of the rivers of the delta, was founded by Alexander the areat. Whrn taken by the Mohammwhin Arabs its tine libiary was burned. Britain has also done much for the Egyp-tian Sudan. How Britain came to iM.ssess this region is easily told. The Mahdi, a Sudane.se religious fanatic, gave much trouble while Britain was endeavoring to improve Egyptian affairs, and (Jeneral (Jordon was sent to Kh,\"n-to!;m to restore order. Khartoum fell into the Mahdi's th.' }rr,i;hir\u003ci„ xffltltiH. * It I'lftJ.,^",
         "it A .STl'UV OF TUK roXTINEXTS 177 t(v..s whoM. ,u„t. „nist ,K, moist, but wh..,s^ f-F-s uuM 1... stnToiuul..l l.v tl,o hot drv -n\u003e.ny,mof,|„..|,.s..r-t. B..si;i..s,l„.,iw..|U.«i ;;\" \"\"••••■'-'■Ntl\u003e\"r.. an. l.ui l-u ,vsi.l..nts of tli- N.l.am. .umI tl,m\u003c ei'.h,.,- liv,. l.v 1,1,1, „i,.,.- \u003eUK w,.ak .•.„•„ v.„,\u003e or .-Is.. lal.M'as ,.a„ul- •''•'^\"'•-- N.. on,. s....k-\u003e tl... ,|..s..,-. for a I'l'-'-^\"'.. Kro,„Hl. I.if,. H,,., ,.„.j„..^^ ,.,.„^^ \" '\u003e■ I'\"\"'- «-Ih..1, 1..,..1 tVo.n oasi. ,o oa\u003ei. ;\"\"'»'•\"\u003e\" ;v«-llt..u.. 11. ,....l«lonirwhi,.iMl..: IxmeH of ,l,.u\u003cl tiling- U.VM.VWU ha«\u003cls „n. (onion was sl.un. Jn m, ».'.i.ral K„..h..n..r ,.n,.h,..| ,i,.. .m,,,,.,;.^ fon-eM at \u003chn.|„,,n,.n, oppo.,,.. Ki,a,,o,nn •;'\"\"J\"^I-\u003cvptian,SmIanl...,.a,n.. .., |..,i,i.i; 7*'\"'7 \"*■ i\"'l\".-M.....\" a ...-u'ion to h.. ,1... v.'I(.p..«| as (,nly Britain can The Barbary States Tl, ,.n,n.. aion.. tlH- M..h,..rra„..an S.-a fonn what a,v Al\u003e.'\u003c:nn, Jn„i., an.l Tripoli. .\\,^,,,, ,„„,' Jums an. nn.i.-r Fn-n-l, ,„(I:,..,u-... L,.n.^ \"K\u003c\u003e AljruTs. til.. \u003c-lii»'f city of Al- p-ria, wasancstof 1 Pratt's wlio ,„a,l,. «liil\u003epinfr in Die Mt'ditcrrancan lather hazanloiw until the British tl»'«'t iindcr Xaj)ier eaily in the niue- t^'cntJi century Ixunbarded their strong -hold an,} \u003c'aiise«l fheni to oeasit theii' pinicy. Jji Tunis are tlie remains of Carth-age, the stro),!,' fity of the once formidable Car-thaginians \\vj,0 fought Kon„. „n,ii ,]„. «,„„„„„ destrove.1 their city. What.loyo„knnu-of[JaK„il,,l. M\u003c.n.cco,.mderitsprcs..ntl.i;roted .Moham-medan i.\u003c.op|c, is a count ,y of bad n.ads and \"o,.n.gre.s.s The l;,i,d «o„M pn.du. lives «Jates,an\u003cl figs, if the people we,-e willing t.^ •••ilt.vateit. Sonie\u003clayFran,.cwilllikelvown Morocco. Noti,.e the st.eet scene in THpoli. V\\ hat does it tell yon of the count ,v • The Sahara. The Saha,a is a gn-a, lone :;;ii';;,::;;r' ^Lv l-l ot sand au.l rock over wh,,-!. ca,-avans feaZ.!:: n. '!2\\.,. ,. -a^cl ..ko ships on Ihesea. Hen- and then. tVo„, th.\" euT, '■\"t, '\"\" \"'\"\"' \"'\"^ an 00818 nourishes a dum,, of .Jate pahns ,.ort ., ■ \";'.'•\"'■'\"'\"' J'i'\u003c\u003e^ is -.ni im- t ■'\"\"\u003e. l\"\"tant person in this land. He is s„^kwM \"f the d(-sert V ill tli!\u003c ■, »- \"''■•■ } said The Central Sudau. !S, nj! I- a wide jji'assy iv^on laii-, session of France. \\V. iu?v something of I^ake !'„.-.'; ••\u003c'\"\u003e,t,y fn.m the eas, toihcw^r^,.. ,„ '•aravan-n.ures. Fn„a ,.,i.,rs in tne S^ulL to point. acn.ss the ^iui,,^ . ,,., { c.irava.,.n.„tes. The iidu.'.itant. •• M,o S-'dan nnse (h.cks and he„is, cotto. ..d ocoileci ivorv,",
         "ostrici 17ft A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS ■f «'ull.'.l fli,. A»Vi.-au KwitzeilaiKl. WImt xliouM tins t..|l you of tlio imtiiie of the country • Rai„ is «l,„n.lmit, the m.il is neh, l)iif the p.\u003eo)\u003el». H,v l,izy. Al.vssiniu is a linid of l)i« j;ai,„.. It i„ „|^„ ,1',,. „,j,j^.^. Ix.mo of the coffee j.luut. Where is «„ffw now \u003e\u003ci\u003c)wn ; British West Africa. Between the mouths of tlie Sen.'jjal and Ni\u003e?er rivers are four s*'|.urate Bi-Jtish colonies -Ua,„hia. Sierra Leoiie, (fol.l Coast, and Lagos, (fainl)ia, founded in 1588, takes its name fi-om the river which Hows througii if for several hundred miles. Sierra Leone (lion moun-tain). Home 'AH) miles to the south, is called after the small peninsula at the foot of a rocky hill somewhat the shajte of a croucli- iiiK lion. In 1787 the peninsula of Sierra ^ r„= » -;:i- -E ^^v:=,,.--?-zs:;t: chiefs as uu jwyhim for liboratwl ne^ro slaves. Gold Coast consists of a strip of lan\u003cl al\u003cm;,' the north shore of the (Julf of Guinea, and was so named hwause „f the Rold flje blacks hrouulit to the trading; posts as one of tiie pr.Mlucts of their c(miilry. The four colonies mentioned were orijfiii- ally tradinjf settlements or posts where the products or' tiie sun(mndinK lejrions ctmid becollecte\u003cl an\u003cl tra\u003cled for European ^nnxb transterred their iM)sts on the Gold Coast to Bntain. Koffee, King of the Ashanfeo tnlM-s, ol.ject»Ml, an\u003cl declared war. His forces were chust'd through dense forests an.l across groat swami.s by Sir Garnet Wolseley. th.. British co.nmander. Coo- nmssi.., the native .-apital, was biirne\u003cl to tlie groun.l, and the Ashanfee iK)wer was biidly siiattered. Some twenty years after-ward, I»rempeh, another Ashant'ee king, nnide war upon the iieighlKninK friWs, with the i-esult that Biitain interfered, banished Prempeh to one of the islan«ls of the Indian Ocean, and took the whole Aslmntef* country under her protection. To the north-east of the (»ulf of Guinea IS one of the most imiwtant regions under British influence. This aiva comprises the Its slave-raiding, several other small native kingdoms, and the large and fertile Nigerian ••omitry; in other words, the whole region exfendnig from the (fulf to I^ike Chad Nigeria is the largest and most valuable of the Bntish possessions of W,.st Africa. In area if is abt)ut fom- times the size of the island of (Jreat Britain, and its population i« twice that of Camida. The natives are a fine, strong, intelligent race, known as the In time the majority of these Stat onsex-i;ted' 1l2 \"^ '\" eiiigent race, known as the entirely f.r t J .aVe trade. ^S!!;;:^: • I Sn;:;.;'^: l^^lZ X^\" ^ H word, meivly establishments from which throughout this vast .1., ?\"'^' shwes could be s.,,.lied n\u003er the West Indian and S^ ! ^ ^i- rilell'^Z^:^' see of th. ^m.pean 'n^.r hl^S; ^",
         "K'^^^ri^^^li^t A BTT'DY OF TrfE fONTlNKXTS «•\"; »■ '»•» t ,.o„n.i .1..! Ni.;r:i: : :;:\":: '•\"•■'''^ '\"''\"'■\" \"- \u003c-•\"«•' -.n,l^ \"\"^ ':^ \" '\u003c\"'\"l-.v -r I..,..:, x,.,, ,. i*^ ' \"•\"\" '\"\" l-U.-.y work. As a rul... of S..ko,., ,.,. ,..„,, , ,^„ , ; ;\" '''-v.-.ys,„all|....... „,„,,•...,. Ta„oo' \".K.. mark..,, i.„t „a, ,,,,, ...,„. , 'J:::::''''';.''';''\"''- '^ ^^'••'-•-'^^^ ••\"iiffht Hii.i ...I.I f„r v..ar\u003c ,.u„.i.,..,l „r '\" '\"\"\"'\"\" \"'•\" know,, 1,^ ,|,„ Hlav... All ,1... ,s„.a„ ,i,„. ,. ',; '•';•:;''''•,.-'\u003e•, I,.. ,....,1. a,... ,il...|. kin^. What this „...a„, v.., vi I , ?,i \"•■;•'•'\u003e••\"•\"'•■\u003e;. -l-s.. vvhol.. |i,. j, .,J \"•\"1-tu.al, wh..n i, is saiil ,i.at . l' ' ''y'' \"\"-''- '-ni... ....... Th.-y a,\u003e/l.,. alone ha,I to pay a .- '\" '\"\"' '\"'\"•' •'\"\"' i\"tHliK..nt animals, who ''\"\\'' li'an,».(| how to make hows and ai-- lows, spears, tiaps. and n..ts. They aie fond of hananas. |.,- Iiarc,.. and ojh.-r |'rod,i,.,sof (h.'op..,, '•onntiy, and sotik-- linif^ hartt'r furs for ''lt's\u003c-. Mix-., often Hit.y steal w hat they '•an iret hold ..f. Th'o ''i\u003el,p. cHllidy is under the ea,v r,f '^\"•iiriiini. in whose alone had to pay a tribute of H(M» slaves a month. ThoUamhiaeonn- try sui,jdios the ground-nut, the oil of whieh is used as a substitute for olive oil. The eapiial is Bathuisi. Fieetown, the capital of Siei-ra Leone, i» one of the busie.sf seapo,(s on thiseoast. Jl is also a \u003c'ouling station and tin. head.,,mrf...-s of the H.itjsh We., \\,-,i. fan s„uad.-on. The p,,,t d.awhaek ..f this and the other settlement, mentioned is the hot. damp, malaiions el i mate. Sie.ra Leone WWnealh.d the -white man's „.ave.\" ean . Sz\\o. '::!'\":;;\":!':''.':•'!'•••■'•• ^--'•'•- -d. beeswax, ami ,vo,y, all of whieh a,e ea,Tied to the coast on the heads of th,. LPu-k rreijjhters. The O.df of Guinea coast has two dis-advantages a had ..linrntc, and a harho.less con.st. The heavy su,-f and the wan, nf nir hors make it ne.-essa,y ,„ eonvev coods . ... •-■.■III. Ml wnose \" '•\"■'-•^ \"em-v M. stanlev n.ade an ex- l''';';'',7 '•'•'• •''i---ri-n. HomaandLeo- l;\"'''^ '\"'■•. '\"■\"'•\"\"• -nonthof the rive,..a,-e \"\"• '';\"';■''\"'' \"\"\"\"■-• y^^^^\\ ou, wi.a, v,\u003eu ;•■•'\";■' the way Mel..„m has .oven.ed ihis South Africa. South Afri,.a ,ises j,, ^ M-n.vs of tetraees fVotn the sea inwanls. l-Mst IS the low J.lain of the eoa.f • ,he -•ond is .ailed ,he \"Little Kar,.,..-. ';;:\"';••'' -'li.; '-Urea, Ka,-,.\u003c.o\"; andtl.; .^hcst pa,-, o, ,he pla,eau is calle.l the I , , ..!.» o. .-oiivev croods -'Hi.r!. Vel.U •' Ti ii- • t- , baekwanl and f..rwanl ,o ,he ships in small on, Fnto i\\l\\c i V'\".\"^\" ^ \"''\" ■^f-'Hics Ws. The chief pro\u003cluet.sa,.erul her iv^v | ,, \"k' '\"' \"•\"\"■'• ''^'\"'Karroo and gold dust. ' \"\"• ' T ^ ^\"'■'■''' \"\"■•\"\"■\"'^' '''•^- «'• \"'id) a,e famous sheep and goat region... Ou the",
         "i MKROCOPV RESOLUTION TKT CHART (ANSI and ISO TEST CHART No 2) jj25 y^ Ui tii, ■ 12 ■ 2.2 Hi Ibb Im 1.8 11^ ^ •IPPLIEC IM/1GE Inc ^^ 1653 East Moin Street S',2 Rochester. New York U609 USA '■^S (716) *82 - 0300 - Phone ^B (716) 288- 5989",
         "-Fox 180 A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS :m KaiToos are also the ostrich farms. Three South African products are therefore wool, inohair (the long silky haii- of the Angora goat), and ostrich feathers. How does South Africa compare with Austi-alia and the Argentine Republic in wool ? On tlio High Veldt and in the Kanxws areas of pineapples, and numerous lemon and orange orchards. Name a region in North America something like Natal. In South Africa the invader supplies the biains, but the native-born do the manual labor. Cape Town, beautifully situated at the foot of Tfible Mountain and on Table Bay, is protected by a heavy break-water from Atlantic storms. From Cape Town the gi-eat \" Cape to Caiio \" )'ailway runs northward, ciosses the Zam-besi on a mighty steel stnxcture at Victoria Falls, and is being extended from year to year to join the northern i-oad ininning up the valley of the Nile. What will such a road do for vast herds of cattle and horses are reared. But while South Africa is largely given to the grazing of horses, cattle, sheep, and goats, a great deal of atten-tion is also paid to the growing of wheat, maize, and gi-apes. Natal, on the east coast, is the \"garden of South Africa.\" As one goes up the terraced country from the coast of the Indian Ocean, one passes through ra\\'ines, over wooded hills and across rolling meadows where num-erous cattle are feeding. On the higher lands maize, oats, and barley thrive. On the lower lands are orchards of peaches and apples. Lower still there are tea and coffee farms. On the coast lands there are I'ahle Mountain, South Africa, owe* iU name to its peculiar Aapt amd flat tummit. Thit magnificent iiuimi of rock i» very preeipitoiu and can be teen from several mile* out at tea. Africa! Other cities in South Africa are Kimberley and Johannesburg; the former was built up because of its diamond mining, the latter because of its gold mining. The diamonds are found in the blue clay several feet below the gi-ound level. This is quar- fields of tobacco, sugar-cane, and rice, gi-eat ried out, and after an exposure of nearly",
         "a A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTC 181 whole year to the air, the clay cnimbles and the diamonds are then washed out by Kaffir workers. These employees are shut up in special houses during the whole time of their engagement. On leaving thev are most carefully searched to see tiiat no diamonds have been taken away. The richest gold region in Africa is found in the Transvaal. The gold- hearing rock is under ground and has to be rained. How is the gold obtained from the quartz i-(M;k f Dar»-€».Saiam, ths Capital of Gervum East Africa. Note its modern appearance. BRITISH EAST AFRICA Uganda, in the western part of British East Africa, is one of the most valuable and most interesting of our African possessions. The countiy is one of great variety in land-scape. Here are hills of fine pasture ; there, dense woods filled with wild animals enough to delight the heart of the greatest hunter in the world. In one district the grass gi-ows higher than the head of the tallest man. In another part are great swamps choked with papyrus reeds. There are also great meadow lands, dotted with banana ;)lants and trees, which shelter numbers of villt,\u003c?es with their little gardens and their well- cultivated fields. The people of Uganda are polite, clean, modest, and intelligent. Nearlv eveiy family has a garden of sweet i)otatoes, and some have pat.lies of gi-ain, coffee, and sugar-cane. Mombasa is the seaport of this legion. From it a railway runs far into Biiti.sh East Africa. Questions. 1. With what are the names of Cet-il Rhodes, David Livingstone, and Henry M Stanley connected ? 2. Outline Africa from memory.' Hlaie .,„ ,t the equator, tropics, coast waters the tour great rivers, the two deserts, and Capo Town Cairo, Kiniberley, .Mombasa, and Algiers. 3 Chi another outline i)rint the l.x^ijities Iwst adapted to ivory, gold, diamonds, ostrich feathers, Imnanas, cotton, the date-palm, the baobab, woo], wine, and rubber. 4. On another outline mark the regions best suited to .sheep, goats, camels, the elephant, the crocodile, the ostrich, the hippopotamus, and the pygmies. 5. What do you know of Vasco da Gama and General Gordon ? 6. What regions in the con-tinent are suitable for homes for people like ourselves? \\Vhy .so ? 7. Why would you not like to live about the coast of tlie Gulf of Guinea ? 8. Describe an elephant hunt, ostrich farming, crossing the Sahara by caravan, and the Congo Forest. 9. How did the British get South Africa? 10. Who wei-e I\u003e,bengula and Cetewayo, Kruger, and General Kitchener? 11 Give a description of Cape Town, Natal, Uganda, and Cairo. 12. Describe the Nile and the Congo 13 W hat and where are the Sudan, Good Hope, Victoria- Nyanza, and Khartoum? 14. Which are nearer the equator— Cairo or New Orieans ; Cape Town or Rome ; the mouth of the Zambesi or the La Plato? 15. Measure from Cape Town to Cairo, and from Cape \\ erde to Cape Guardafui. 1 6. Place the point of your pencil on that part of Africa most distont from the ocean. From it draw a line 1,000 miles long. Tak i n •' the point as centre and the line drawn as distance, describe a circle. What d.«s this tell you of the size of Africa ? Draw a line 500 miles from the coast. Is much of Africa more than 600 . miles from the sea ?",
         "te 18-J A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS What is the name of the continent shown in the fiillowing figure ! WJmt is its shape ( What curves are shown on the north and on tht south coasts? What island lies a short distance off the south-east angle 1 How is this island separated from the mainland i What islands lie away to the south-east? What iK'eans lie east and west? What ocean lies to the sou'li f Where are the highlands of Australia? What do you know of the western slope I What continent is seen to the north-west ? Name the two arms of the sea seen in southern Asia. What islands lie between Australia and Asia ? In what hemisphere is Australia ! What season havf- the people of Australia this month ! Is the climate of Australia cold, hot or just agreeable ! Miikt- from memory an outline map of Australia on the lilack- board and show the equator, the highlands, and the chief coast waters and islands. Autitralm, xhtimng iu jtotitifm in the water hemiijihert far from any other continent. AUSTRALIA Australia, the new world of the southern hemisphere, was probably first visited by the Portuguese and the Dutch. But the land remained unknown imtil about 1770, when Captain Cook, a famous British sailor, visited the eastern coast and reported the country suitable for settlement. A few years later, in 1 788, a nnmber of British coloni.sts landed and commenced the fii-st Australian settle-ment near what is now called the city of Sydney. New arrivals year after year soon made the settlement prosperous, until the Mother Country began to use fra--away Australia as a convict station. This was very hard to endure by the industrious settlers, but the most serious thing was that some of the worst of the convicts escaped from time to time and formed themselves into gangs of bushrangers, who became the terror of the whole settlement. Strange to say, the British Government did not see its way to put a stop to this until 1853. In the meantime, many of tbe original settlers and nearly all the new comers had gone south and north in quest of a safer and more agreeable situation. In this and in other ways the Australian settlements spread, and Victoria, Queensland, Tasmania, South Australia, and West Australia were added to New South Wales, the original settlement. Position and Coast Line. Australia, the South Land, lies between the Indian and the Pacific Oceans. It is south of the equa-tor, and numerous islands lie like stepping stones between it and south-eastern Asia. In area it is the smallest continent. Find by using the scale on the map, the gi-eatest length and the greatest width of Australia. Australia is of a compact shape, the two indentations or bends in the coast preserv-ing rather than interfering with the regu-larity of the outline. What other conti-nents have a similar coast line ! Is the coast line gi-eat or small for the size of the continent ? The northern and western coasts are mostly low, sandy shoi-es with but few openings of value, aiid few rivers worth the mentioning. The coast along the Australian Bight forms an unbroken cliff from 400 to 600 feet high, whUe the eastern and south-eastern coasts are mainly bold and rocky, with some fine harbors and navigable",
         "rivers. A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS The most wonderful coast feature is the Great Barrier Reef which extends from near Cape York, the end of the Yo.-k peninsula, some 1,500 miles to the south. This reef is foiTOed by the coral polyp and rises from the bed of the ocean to the surface of the water at from 20 to 150 miles from the coast. Between the mainland and the reef the feea is usually calm, even when storms are ragmg and breakers are dashing against the outside of the reef. The channel, however, is difSeult to navigate ou account of the sunken i-ocks, and ships using this passage must anchor at night. Opposite the mouths of the larger i-ivers there are gaps or breaks m the reef, the coi- il polyp being unable to live in water holdinj.' sediment. Surface. The continent of Australia is shaped like a flat pie-dish, vnth high laud on the edges, and a saucer-like depression m the interioi-. The highest land is to-ward the east, where the Great Dividing Range runs parallel to the coast for ni\u003cir« than 2,000 miles, or along its entire length.",
         "14 184 A 8TTTDY OF THE CONTINENTS In the south-east the range is continuou\", but farther north it appears as tho edge of a table-land, which giadually sinks in the west into plains of great exte? The coast ranges extending along the nc u and west borders are not well known. Climate. Is Australia north or south of the equator f Does Australia have its hottest or its coldest weather in July f In what other continents do summer and winter occur at the same time as in Australia ! What kind of Christmas day would you have in the int\u003c\u003erior of Australia! What portion of The towering peak» of the Awirtiian Alpt, with a portion of the broad interior plain. Australia should be the warmest? Why? Has any part of Australia a very cold winter ? The temperature of the different parts of Australia depends more on eleva-tion and distance from the sea than upon distance from the equator. In the neigh-borhood of the ocean there is no very great difference between tho temperature at mid-day and mid-night Inland these differ-ences are often considerable. As Australia is situated in the southern hemisphere its seasons are in every r^-^pect the reverse of ours. The noon-day sun is seen in the north, the south wind is the cold wind, and mid-winter comes in the month of June. What is the name of the dotted line running east and west across the centre of Australia? What doe6 this line mean 1 How much of Australia is in tho Heat Belt? Is the climate of southern Australia warmer or colder than ours ? Northern Australia, oeing between the tropics, is of course very hot. The rest of the continent is in the temperate region; hence, the heat diminishes towards the south. One of the most striking features of the Australian climate is the amount of sunshine. fiJeldom is the sky covered with clouds for a lonj^ time. The climate on the whole is very healthy, but its great drawl^acks are the long periods of dry weather, and the dry, hot, dust-laden winds, called \" brick-dustei-s,\" which some-times blow from the interior during the summer. When these winds are blowing the streets are deserted, all windows and doors are fastened, and yet the dust gets everywhere. The \"brick-dusters\" wither the pastures and play havoc generally with vegetation. The princii)al winds come from the east and the south-east, and are laden with clouds from the Pacific. As these winds ascend the eastern slope of the Divid-ing Range, the mountains rob them of their moisiure and as a result the eastern country has numerous rivers and rich pasture and fai-m lands. Beyond the highlands, the winds continue their course across the coniiuent, but as they bring little or no rain the interior becomes more and more desert-like, till at last it is nothing but one vast expanse of sandy, stony desert, covered here and theie with spinifex and other prickly plants. Western Australia is watered by moisture - bearing winds from the Indian Ocean. What parts of Australia have the greatest rainfall, and why 1 If the highlands were in the centre of the continent what difference would it make to the rain-fall ] If they were along the western instead of the eastern coast what difference would there be? Ip western Australia the climate of the north is",
         "diy •nd hot In the south it is healthy. ple.iHant and h« an abundant winter rainfall, v/ha? oZ iarje A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS 185 Rivers and Lakes. Australian .iveiM an- usually swollen HoodH iu tho rainy season and mere threads of water or d.y l\u003ee\u003cl8 in tbe diy season. There are numerous lakes towards the south, but nearly all of them are salt and little better than shallow, reedy swampsor salt marshes during the dry season. On their surface *here is not a single boat, and on then- shores not even a small village. The only long rivers are the Murray and Its tributary, the Darling, which receive aU the inland streams of the south-east. 1 hough both streams have long courses and numerous tributaries, they cannot be \u003c-alled large rivers. They are not broad, neither are they deep except when swollen by rain^ In Its lower course the Mui-ray is quite a swift stream, with muddy banks widening near the sea into a lake too shallow for navigation. On portions of the Murray, flat-bottomed boats ply backwards and for-wards. The length of the Murrav is some-thing more than 2,000 miles. The Dui-liug IS often nothing but a series of pools in the summer season. The rivers on the eastern slope are numerous and rapid. Why should you expect this? Near their source the scenery is often very fine. There are no nvers flowing into the western half of the Austi-alian Bight. Why not f Plant and Animal Life. We have in Aus-tralia a dry interior where only plants of a desert character can grow, a belt of grass lands where there is a moderate lainlall, and a belt of forest wherever the rainfall is verj' abundant. The scrub lands, that is, the lands covered with vegetation of a st.intc? character, are mostly in the interior, though in parts of the far interior there is no vegetation worthy of mention. As a means of avoiding the loss ot moisture, some plants turn the edges ot their leaves toward the sun; others have thick, leathery leaves, and othei-s secrete oil borne imes the roots have to go very deep into the ground to obtain moist- re enough In many regions all the moisture comes from the heavy dew. Two plants may be mentioned here, namely, the mulga scnib and the spmifex. The mulga scrub is com-posed ot tlujrny a acias covered with short 'harp spines which tear both the clothes and the flesh of all who try to cross the region where they gi-ow. Spinifex is the dreaded i)orcupine gi-ass whose l.-avcs re-semble a thousand knitting needles stuck into a large pin-cushion. No horse can enter a spm.fex-covered area without woundine his legs and feet, and often these animals have to be killed to put them out of suffering The grass lands are found on the plains some di8tan..e from the eastern coast. Nearer the coast the country is covered with open, park-like lands gi-adually passing into the open grass lands. On these areas the kanga.00 grass and the salt bush, two very excellent pasturing plants, are found. The grass lands of Australia range from yctona to the Darting Downs. Western Australia has also similar lands. The chief points to be remembered alK)ut he forest life of this continent are, first, that most of the forest trees are evergreens' and secondly, that they do not, as a rule' grow massed together like the trees in our forests, but in small clumps, the g.-ound be-tween one dump and another being covered with a dense undergrowth, through which It 1^ a difficult matter to make one's way The forest regions lie near the coast where there is abundant moisture The northern forests are tropical, the bamboo and the palm prevailing. In the eastern and south-eastern forests various species of eucalyptus, or g-jm trees are found. One species of eucalyptus is a giant",
         "reaching n^^ fVVT i. ipms",
         "'P-niT A STUDY OF THE OONTINEN'JS A mi/ar-rane /arm. a height of 450 feet. Beautiful ti-ee ferns upwai-d8 of fifty feet high abound in these forests; but strange to say there is not a •single uative fruit other tlmn a small woody sort of pear to be found, a (.ir\u003c'unjstnn\u003c.e you must take mto account when we come to speak of the native races. In the western Australian woods, the jarrah, the karii and other valuable timber ti-ees flourish The former tree is used for paving streets, build-ing boats, and for making bridge timbers, turniture, and railroad ties. The karri trees have straight trunks ^Aiich tower to great heights. The wood is used for the same purposes as jarrah. To these native plants the settlers have added such grains, roots, and fruits as have 187 Jound in the new land a suitable home lu tropieal A;i..tnJia, bananas, pineapples.\" oranges, susrar-cane, uvo, and tobm-o have been mtrodu.ed. What do you supjK,se a banana plantation would l,„,k like f A HUgar-cane farm looks something like a field of Indian corn. The eanes are cut when juicy, l,ound into great bundles and carted to he press, where the jui,.e is squeeze.! out H.Hl collected. How is sugar made from this .l»\"*\u003c' . ^V hat market has the planter for his Hiignr ! A pineapple field is shown in one of the figu,e«. Describe the pieture and teU ^vlHMe the i.menpples probably find a market. Wliat IS a fobae\u003c-o field like \" A fehl of to'itcco. A^ jnneapple . fidd. Grapes g,ow well in south-eastern, south-ern, and w .srern Australia. Aj.ples thrive best 1.1 the dry heat and constant sunshine of western Australia and i„ T-ismania. In-deed, Tasmania is noted fo, . fine orchards and fruit gardens Think of a Christmas table la\u003clen with twenty-six ditferenl kinds of fruit, and you will understand why Tasmania excels in the cannjnsr of fruits. Oats, bariey, peas, corn, and wheat thrive m New South Wales, Victoria, South H",
         "Pi \\m A STUDY OF TUE CONTINENTS Australia, aud West AuHtralia; the uiily drawback beiug that the funu IuikIh at u dk- taiice from the count must be iiTiguted. To Ifivo Houio idea of the ({uautity of gruiu growu, we may udd that Australia oc'j'usioually has millions of bushels of wheat for ex{)ort. The uativi' Austruliau auimuls Mre strauger even than the native phuits. li is said that Australia has some ({uadruiHHls that travel uii two -jt only, foxes that Hy, biiils that run, and spiders that whistle. The kauKaroo belongs to the class of auiniuis known as the Marsupials, or ani-mals which cany their young in a {)ouch of skin on the under side of the body. WTieu the baby kungaiVM) is born it is veiy small and very helpless, nence the necessity for the pouch. The kangaroo has short, weak front legs, and .-strong hind legs, that it never runs on all fours, but hops about on its hind legs, using The kangaroo. its powerful tail to help it to spring. It is hunted with specially bred dogs and pro-vides royal sport for the hunter As a result the kangaroo has disappear(;d from the more thickly settled parts of the country. What parts are these ? The dingo is the wild dog of Australia. It is as cunning as a fox, and kills sheep whenever it gets a chance. Because of this the dingo has a price on its head, and is hunted much as wolves are hunted in some parts of Canada. The largest bird of Australia is the emu, or Australian ostrich, a large, dvk'brown bird having wings so small that they are useless for flight. The - are much like hair and are valueless les. The e.uu feeds on the plains an(' hunted by the people with almost as great a delight as in the cose of the kangaroo. Can you see why it would be a gooil thing for Australia t«) get rid of the three animals mentione\u003cl T Along the channels of streams u very sti-ange animal may be seen. This is the duck-bill. The duck-bill has thick soft fur instead of feathers, a bill like a duck's aud webl)e«l feet with claws for swimming and foi- bunow.ng. It lays eggs like a bird, hatches them, and then suckles its young. In West Atistralia there are black swans. In north-eastern AustrtUia there are thou-sands of beautiful plumaged parrots, and bush turkeys whit h lay their eggs in a great heap of rubbish and leave the heat of the fennenting pile to do the hatching. The satin bower-bird builds a sort of playhouse near the tree where its nest is. The lyre-bird has a tail shaped like a lyi-e. English birds, sparrows, larks, thrushes, an'' ^ther singens have been introduced, though Australia is not without songsters peculiar to itself. As to Australian reptiles and fish. It may be said that there are alligators in the ri '^ers of northeiTi Australia sharics off the west-ern coast, and snakes are so common that the schools give instruction as to the best treatment \u003c\u003ef snake bite. There are many kinds of edible sea fish in the Australian waters. The salmon is lai-ge but has not the fine flavor of the northern fish. Among the curious fishes is the dugong, which eats gi-ass and grain though it lives in the water, and the frog fish that walks rather than swims. The pearl oyster is found in the northern waters, aud divers are at work whenever i:ere is suitable weother gathering the living oyster for the pearls, and the shells for then- mother-of-pearl, which is",
         "sent to Europe to be muuufac.tui.Hi iuto knitV naudleg, buttou», etv. 8«ttlers in uew eouiitii...s huve .«),uHi,uc. mti-,Mluc.«l nmmalHaii.l ,,1,. ns that huv,- not provKl b««eflci«l. Th« English rahbi, hun laoi-euHed to stieh an ..xteiit, thut iu pluci's ;t eatH up u . th.. KiUHH, «„d jp-eut ,.ffort.s u.« being put forth to k.-ep thi.s unimal in ohw-k i'astures are Huimun.'o\u003cl with wire uettinir- poiMou i« phu-ed out h,Mo unc: there, and u regular roun.J-up of th«. rabbits in u particu-lar Iwjal.ty is „ ..,„„n.on thing. The oidv return outsid.. ■ of the exercis«\u003e afforded in rabbit-huntiug ij owing to the fact tliat rab-bits can now be frozen and sent as foo\u003cl to England. Australia, as you know, is wanting in in-land rivers and is subject to long periods of dry weather. This intc'-feies STUDY OF THE «'ONTIXKNTS A ;/r\u003e»,/, of enitU on a ranch. froui S„uth Africa, where the Merino sheep have thriven wonderfuUy. .sh,H.p fu^.,uH vary ,n size. Those near the coast are «niaU, b.,f those on the plaiuH remov«l frou. he cojist arc so g-.at that mounted shep-herds take a week or ten days to ridearouud then rang»'s. Think of , • m),m) .hH.p are feeding. \\V|,at a busy nne there will 1„. shearing sn.-h a n.unln^r ! Uow do you suppos.. this is done? The Au-rahan sheep tWd on .he kang«ro\u003c. grass \"»•' »'»• '^\"It bush sununer and wirt^ There is no wintei' feeding as underst\u003cM)d by us. Tbe \"\"'.V great drawbacks are from dry Weather and from floods. Artesian wells are now being Intred in lai-go numlMMs. aini these Weils iw^ among sue great blessings that the couniry liHs i-eceived. with cattle pastures and general fainiinir 'Pi, i ^ \"\"^ i-eceive\u003ci. hot permit. ,he exi,te„e/„f ^e^TS ,V„™ .h!\" '\"T 'I' ■*\"'''\"« \"\"\"\"\u003e \"\"J . — -^xoLcin-c yn great sneep pastures and the production of immense quantities of wool. Cattle ranches are tound in the moister areas along the eastern slope, an. frozen bee. is shipped in huge quantities to England as a residt. Sheep however, have m Je this continent u pros-perous one. In no eountiy has wool raising reached a higher standard than in ^u*.\"- ti-aha; and buyers from Eui^laud, France, Hndsit.waytothisg;;at'^Z;^f™S .s oaaed upon ocean boats and' take Mo Europe and to America. By what routed ao these boat.s go f How long is the journey u each case? The carriage costs bout a r,;;7 of a cent a pound. Why is it ^^ Horses a,e raiseti for pleasure, for fa.m Gennany,andthel};-;;,lSr;::;5 Zt^a^^^ ^^ '^^^^ ^^--^ Ther sheep inti^uci in 1797 came Ho^r^j y^f^",
         "^^;:^:^;l,^ IfW) A STUUY OF THE COXTINENTH weighing \"iOO |miuikIh f H«'V»'ral wiii'li liiinpH buve Ihm'U fouiitl in N'iftoria; iiutl whut an expit\u003c\u003eiii(\u003eiit tlit'v \u003c'kus«mI iiiit only ill Australia but tliroUKlioiit tlu' worMl Towiih w«\u003er»! dHsvrtiMl by all «\u003ex«M'|»t the v«'fy y\u003c\u003euiix«\u003estuiHl tht! vt\u003ery ohlfHt iiihahitaiits. ThoUHau\u003clH of gol«l-H«'«'kerH iiiva\u003ci(.Hl tlii» \u003c'\u003cmutry to Hwarch ill the river j^ravels for tlit! priM-iouH tiK'tal. When thi« wax «'xhuu«tH«l shat'tM w«'r»\u003c sunk into tliH earth to reach tlie K\u003c\u003el\u003cl-'\u003e*'\u003ci)'iiiK rocks, so that tliese could Itc crushed and the Kold extra(?ted. This dis«'\u003c\u003every Idou^ht thouHttudH of enterpHsing people to Aus-tralia and thus helpe\u003cl to settle the country. New 8i\u003euth WaleH in sjiid to 1m\u003e one jfieat coal Held for huudrMlH of miles along the coaMt — a valuable thing. How so f The Native Races. Australia would ap-pear to have had little more than its healthy climate to recommend it as an ttbo\u003cle of man ; and yet, in a short period of tiiMe, British emigrants have made it a rich and prosjierouH «'ountry. The natives of Australia, at the time of its discovery by EuroiHjans, were among the nH)Mt miserable of people ; the «'ause of this lay largely in t.ie character of the small continent itself. Vegetation of a ftK)d-giving kind was scarce, and there were no animals that could be employed for domestic purjtoses; a poor country imleed for a savage people to make even a living in, a iK\u003eor laml to develop farmers and home makers. The \" black fellows,\" as the natives have been calle\u003ci, are dark-brown in color, with broad, squat noses, Mgh cheek bones, ugly mnuth.s, fine leeth, \u003c*urly black hair, and large beards. For food they eat anything they eau chew, and some of the wilder tribes are even said to devour liuraau beings. Their clothing is scanty, and their hoiises but pooi-ly constructed bark shelters. Their intelligence may be under-stood when we ai-e told that thev cannot count to five. At the snine time they l\u003eossess certain talents which have made them clever hunt* rs and tishermeu. Ho keen is their sight that they aie sometimett Ux-il as trackers of men. For weaiKins they use the sjwar, \u003c'lub, stone axe, and the IxH.inerang, the latter a curiously cut hard- wcmmI club uxed much as we use quoits. Hometimes these jK'ople can Iw |H'rsuaded to do a little herding, but «\u003en the whole they cannot Ih» truste\u003cl an«l they have often been a sour(!e of gi'eut annoyance to the settlers. In what way! So strong is their attach-ment to the wild life, that native children reare\u003cl by the settlers esca]\u003ee at the lirst opportunity to the bush. The Occupations of the People. In the desert there ore no jteople ami therefore no occupations. In the grass-lands the chief occui»ation is sheep-raising, which employs but few people to the s\u003cjuare mile, but which, nevertheless, retjuires energy and brains on the part of the worker. Why ! As a rule the sheep ranchei-s or squatters have fine horse.s, and live in comfoitable homes on their ranches. Their children, who jilay the ft -les that English-s]»eaking i)eople lov , are jiteii educateil by a private teacher. Fiom the cattle ranches great numbers of cattle are taken for shipment to Europe. How can a country where snow is seldom seen on the groimd, i)rovide the ice for the cold-storage of beef to Europe ! Your teacher will tell you of the great cold- storage plants on the Imats jtlying between Europe and Australia. If you have followed this account of the geography of Australia carefully, you will readily understand why the population is to be found near the coast and not in the interior. If you now bear in mind that Australia had not a single valuable animal, not a useful grain, and no fniits worth mentioning, you will appreciate move fully the agricultural labors that have reclaimed -",
         "0 thougau.U of aoTOH of .lonert luit.i hy iniga- tiou; thut huve intnxiii.HHl au\u003cl MUcceHHrully cultivttt«.l the moio im|H)itinit Brifi.Ml. ^laiiH an. fruitM; hu,! thut i-uv,, Kivun to .h.. htn.i mjllio iH of 8h.'ep and thoiisa-idH c,f h«\u003ei\u003e.w Hiid I'uttJe, uoi only ..iHMiKh lor the four or five niilhon iH-opl*., but wheat and im\u003ef in hirKo «|uantitit'M for export. The warm northern waters are the .-ent res of the pimrl-oyster flnhinj? ; tlie forest lands of the east, the 8outt\u003e-,.«st, an.l the west provide coDMidernl.l.' luniberinK; and the nch gold-mining U«ld» scattered throughout A HTrUY OF TIIK C(»\\TI\\KNT8 What w«)ul\u003c 101 TKe harfMt- f\u003ef Sydney, Kew South Wait*. the length and breadth of the continent world give employment to u great many people. Commerce and Commercial Centres. On January Ist, 1901, the Australian states, namely, New South Wales. Victoria. (Jiiefrw Ian, so^h A,,st.iia, w.t ^^z. po^d^ii; 1 ':^;^:Tk::^z the Wand of Tasmania, were united to form In 1834 the site of thil gi-eat city w^ ^^»\u003eV nntf What would Im. the vuhe of Mirh a li,u. f Telegraph iin..^ conne... ,UI the iiniK.rfant to-ns, an.l c.-ea,, ,.„|,K., k.H.p Australia in touch wi the r..^ of the world, and the rest .,f .i,,. worl.l i„ tou..h with Australia. Th.t c.nstru.-tion ,•' t ..•\u003e.. hr...s was n..t always an ..asv matter. A telegraph hue runs overland thr..ugh the desert fV.,ni .V.h.Iai.le, the .-apifal of }So„,|, Australia, north tu lli., shores of th.. Indian 0.'eaii. Th. Mts on this line am iron for WO.H1 V Mi ; never st«n.» the attacks oi the wiKMl-e.. , ants of this regi.m. Australia, like all new lan.ls, has luwl her hero- explorers, and the names. Hturt, »urke, WUls Kyre, an.l Warburton ai.i nani.\u003es held in revi'ience and wit* afle«'ti(.n by the Con-mon wealth. Sydney and Mell)ourn« are the chief .'ommerciul centres. Sydney, the capi-tal of New Sf.uth Wales, is the oldest city in Australia. It is \u003e\u003eeautifully situate.1 cm Port Jacksim, one of the Hafest, deepest, and most picturesque harlxirs in the I v^ '^^'^ •''*-^' ' ' '^'■^\" ^\"''t, and it would be diftculv to fiud more delightful gardens than those of Sy.hiey. Wliat trade h,iH Sydney with Euroi,ean countries? Melboutne, in size, in wealth,\" and in the Australian Commonwealth, the only case in the world where a whole continent belongs to one people. The flag of the Commonwealth is the Union Jar ^ on a blue or red ground, with a sLx-pointed star in one quarter. What does this star represent ? The railways of Australia are numerous, but there is no transcontinental line as yet. known only to the Australian savages from whom it was purchased for a few bottles of sjiirits and a couple of blankets Melljourne is not beautiful because of the .•harms of the sun-oun.iiug landscape. The city makes its own picture. The streets are wide, and large spaces are devoted to i.ublic gardens.",
         "l 19-J A STUDY OP THE CONTINENTS TASMAiriA The island of Tasmania is the Switzer-land of the south. What does this mean ? Tasmania has high mountains in the north and west. Forests adorn the mountain slopes, and numerous lakes nestle in the valleys. The climate is superb. All the ft-uits of the Temj\u003eerate Belt gi-ow here in abundance. NEW ZEALAint This group of islands lies some 1,200 miles to the south-east of Australia and exactly opposite the British Islands on the other side of the globe. The map of tnese islands is something like that of Italy turned upside down. North Island is a hmd of vol-canoes and hot springs. Think of washing-day in this island. Think of using Ixuhng water of nature's own heating to cook Christmas puddings ! South Island has a range of timber- clad mountains aloMg the west. The liighest of these mountains are covered with peipetual snow, and glaciers and glacial lakes and streams aboun^l. The climate is tempei-ate, moist and healthy. The kauri-pine, a fine timber tree, yields a gum used in making varnish. This gum is collecteil after the tree has lain on the gi\"ound sevei'al years. The curious birds of New Zealand are the kiwi or apteryx, a wingless, tail-less bird with a long, slender beak ; and the parson-bird, with his shining black coat and his white throat feathei-s. The natives, called Maoris, belong to the brown race. They spin, weave, and dye flax. They are also skilful fishermen. The settlers are mostly from Scotland. Sheep- farming is tiie greatest industiy; the sheep being reared principally for their mutton, which is sent in great quantities to Eng-land. The '• Britain of the South,\" as the Dominion of New Zealand has been called, has a government of its own. Wellington, on Cook Strait, Noi-th Island, is the capital. Qi!K8TiON8. 1. On nil outline map of Australia place the scale, the e\u003ciuatoi- and tropic, the New Zealand Islands with their separating strait, Tas-mania, and the Australiim coast waters. 2 On another map place the DividinK Itange, Murray, and Darling rivers, Australian desert i^egion, lake region, overland telegraph line, and the chief Australian centres. :i. On a third map locate the regions where the kanganK*, emu, dingo, black swan, and the rabbit thrive best. 4. On a fourth map locate the Methmimt. Across tlie vuter is the industrial porticm. of the city. regions best suited to tlie growing of tobacco, wheat, apples, grapes, cattle, and sheep. .\"). Describe a kangaroo hunt, a rabbit round-up, and an emu hunt. 6. Describe a visit to the pearl fisheries, gold-mining in Western Australia, lumbering in the Australian forest country, a visit to a sheep farm, gathering fruit in Tasmania, a New Zealand hot spring, Tasmanian scenery, and a journey fi-om Adelaide to the Indian Ocean. 7. Why does Australia rear sheep for their wool and New Zealand rear sheep for their mutton ? «. In new lands there is little manufactur-ing in the early years of their settlement. Why? When Australia enters upon a manufacturing career, what are likely to be the first things manufactured, and why? 9. Should a railroad be built to join eastern and western Australia, what would be the difficulties in operating it ? 10. Should the capital of the. Oomraonwoalth be situated in eastern or in west- em Australia ? Give reasons. What is the capital",
         "? A STUDY OF THE CONTINENTS if);{ Why was not Melbourne selected ( 11. How far is It fitim Melbourne to Perth (West Australia) ? How far from Cape Leeuwin to Ca|)e York, and from Bass Strait to the Gulf of Carpentaria? V2. Describe a typical Australian. What do you know of Austra-lian football and cricket? 13. The Commonwealth 18 said to l)e very loyal to the British Crown. What does this mean ? What has Im-n done of late years to show thisf 14. What is meant by an \"all white Australia \" ? 1 5. How would you jjet to Canada from Sydney f 16. De.scribe New Year's day and Christ-mas day in MeUK)ume. 17. Compare a Canadian home with mi Australian home. IS. What does Australia import fi-om England ? 19. What have we for Australia ? JO. Eastern Australia fjatheis honey and wax. What two things may \\\u003ee inferred from this? 21. Where are Perth, Brislwne, Adelaide, and Hobart situated respectively ( Review Questions 1. If you were to start from your home and travel round the world eastward, wliut Ixnlies of land and water would you have to pas.s over, and what great cities would you meet on your way ? 2. Starting from your home and travelling around the earth, what directions would you take, and what bodies of land and water would you cross ( 3. If you started southward, what directions would you have to take and what countries would you cross? 4. What oceans might we cross in goin\" from North America to Eurasia ? Which if going to Europe ? 5. Name the ocean boundaries of each continent. In what direction is each continent from our own? 6. What continents are cros.sed (a) by the Equator, (6) by the Tropic of Cancer, and (c) by Capricorn f 7. Which is the warmest continent? Which has the most irregular coast line I Which have regular coa.st lines? iS. What line divides the earth into northern and southern hemisphei-es ? What continents are entirely in the northern hemi-sphere ? What continent extends farthest south 1 9. Draw from memory the Atlantic Oi«an and name the continents on its borders. If the Americas were brought eastward, how would they fit into Euiope and Africa? 10. Draw from memory the Pacific Ocean and show on it the bordering continents, the great highlands of the world, and the imaginary lines which show the positions of the most northerly and the most southerly vertical sun. 11. Describe the earth's surface diametrically opposite North America; Asia; and Africa. 12. Make a map of the southern hemisphere and place on it such continents, or such parts of continento and oceans as are found there. 1 3. Place the school globe so as to divide the earth into land and water hemispheres. 14. If you were at the North Pole where would you see the North Star! What cluster of stars is directly over the South Pole 1 16. Make drawings showing the moon at first quarter, at last quarter, at new moon, and betwiH-n the last quarter and the new moon. 16 What are the positions of the sun, moon, and earth at full moon ? at new moon ? When d\u003cjes the sun nse in the true east ? Is it north or south of this point in our .summer? In our winter? 17. When we have summer, what sea.son have the people of South Africa? What other parts of the earth's surface have summer when we have sunimer ? 18 VV hat IS the greatest depth of the ocean ? What the highest land? 19. Where are wheat, rice, barley, tea, coflSee, bananas, oranges, mahogany' bttinUx,, cattle, sheep, goats, and the ostrich raiswl bt^t , 20. Where is the home of the elephant, camel, reindeer, polar l)ear, alligator, croc.Klile, ,hm, emu tiger, hon, giraffe, parrot, wild turkey, wild goose! and c\u003c.ndor? 21. What world regions are Ix-st suited t« cotton, silk, wool, furs, foi-ests, grazing, and fruit-growing? 22. liescribe the winter s.-ason of your province. Describe the summer season. 1,3 What pnKlucts are shipped out of your province? VVhere does each go? How does ekch get to its destination? 24. What things are shipped into your provin.e ? Where d«)es e^h come from ? 25 frace a chest of tea from Ceylon to Winnipeg, a bag of rice from Egypt t\u003c. Vancouver, a Img of Brazil nuts from South America to London, England, a crate of oranges from southern California to Regiiia, a case of pears from British Colunil)ia to Toronto, and a case of jack-knives from ShetKeld to EdmonUm' 26. Name the heat l)elts. 27. What continents have {larts in the Cold Caps i What people live in these regions? 28. Where is the Hot Belt? 29. Which continents have parts in the thre\u003c! belts of heat ? In which belt do you live ? Are you in the warmer \u003c\u003er in the colder portion of this belt? 30. Where is the sun at ikkhi I How can you find the exact sun-noon? 31. How does the noon point of the sun vary from winter to summer, and from summer to winter? When does the sun reach its greatest altitude with us ? When is it in its lowest altitude? 32. Draw on the blackboard a curve representing the path the summer sun appears to take from sunrise to sunset. Do the same for the winter path. What does this teach you ? 33. Why does it grow dark at night and light in the morning? 34. When does the sun pass from the eastern to the western part of the sky? What do you mean by dawn and twilight ? 35. How long does it take the earth to turn on its axis ? How long to go around the sun ? How long does the moon take to make its orbit ? In which direction does the earth turn on ita axis? In which direction does the moon go around the earth? 36. Make a drawing of the Great Dipper. Which star of the seven is the faintest ? Show how you may use the stars of the Dipper to find the North Star. 37. Which way does the Dipper turn about the North Star t",
         "Show 194 A STUDY OF TTTE CONTINENTS thiD by drawing a cirule on the board or in your exercise book. 38. Do any of the ^tars of the Dipper rise and set? Where does the new moon rise} When does the moon rise between the last quarter and the new moon ? W^hen does the moon put the earth between herself and the sun ? When are both on the same side of the earth 't Why does an ecliftse of the moon happen when the iroon and sun are on opposite sides of the earth 1 What kind of eclipse should happen when both are on the same side of the earth t Make diagrams showing both cases. 39. Do any constellations rise in the east and set in the west t Do yuu know the names of any of these ? Why do the sun and the moon and so many of the stars app\u003eear to rise in the east and set in the west? 40. If the earth were to turn from east to west, where should the sun, mcxm, and stars appear to rise ? Why? 41. Is the sun low or high in the sky when the shadows of things are long ? When are the sun's rays hottest in the day ? At what time of a summer's day is the temperature usually highest ? Why not at noon ? 42. Why is it warmer in summer than in winter? Why is September hotter than March, although the sun is just as high in the sky and shines just as long in March as in September ? 43. Commencing at Bering Strait, name the islands, peninsulas, coast waters, capes, and great cities you would pass through or by ingoing around the two Americas. 44. Commencing with Bering Strait, name the islands, peninsulas, capes, coast waters, and great cities you would pass by or through in going all around Eurasia. 45. Make a memory map of North America and locate on it the highlands, lowlands, gi'eat rivers, and at least fifteen great cities. 46. Where are the North American deserts, and what has made a desert of each region ? 47. Give several reasons for thinking the Mississippi the most useful river in North America. 48. What are the advantages of the St. Lawrence River and the lakes connected with it ? What are its disadvantages? 49. Make a map of the Great Lakes and the river St. Lawrence, showing all con-nections, locations of canals, regions of rapids or of waterfalls, and the principal lake ports, American and Canadian. 50. In what country do you live ? What is its capital ? In what province is your home? What is the capital of the province? 51. What is the capital of the United States ? Where is it situated ? Why should it not be situated some-where in the valley of the Mississippi ? What manu-factories are there in Washington ? What kind of citvis it? Who is President of the United States? What party selected him? 52. Compare homes in southern California, the Canadian prairies, south-western Ontario, South Africa, and south-eastern Australia. 53. Where do the people of prairie Canada get their oranges, lemons, English wal-nuts, early cabbages, early lettuce, early cucum-bers, tomatoes, strawberries, peaches, plums, peara, binders, threshing machines, boots and shoes, thread, and coal? 54. Make from memory a map of Canada and place on it the highlands, lowlands, great rivers, and lakes, the wooded country, the fishing grounds, the wheat lands, pasture lands, fruit lands, the gold and coal lands, the pro-vinces (localities only), provincial capitals, Dominion capital, and the transcontinental lines of railway. 55. Whatdifterent peoples are there in your district, town, or city? Where did each nationality come from originally ? Do all speak good English ? 56. Who is our King ( Where does he live ? Who is his representative in Canada ? 57. Draw from memory a map of South America. Locate on it the highlands, lowlands, great rivers, forests, wheat lands, grazing lands, deserts, countries, ten cities or towns, the islands, straits, capes, the Equator, and the Tropic of Capricorn. 58. What wild animals are found in South America ? Where ? Why is South America so far behind North America in education and enterprise ? 59. In what direction is Europe from North America T In what belts of heat is it ? Describe the shore Lie. Where do the rain-bearing winds come from ? Which coast, the east or the west, is the better watered? Why ? 60. Make a map of Europe and place on it the coast waters, peninsulas, countries, highlands, lowlands, rivers, and fifteen great cities. 61. Make a map of the United Kingdom and locate the coun-tries, capitals, highlands, rivers, coast waters, manu-facturing areas, and the great cities. 62. How does Africa compare with North America in size ? Draw Africa and show the deserts, highlands, great rivers, lakes, coast waters. Equator and Tropics, Egypt, South Africa, East Africa, the Congo forest country, Good Hope Cape, the Isthmus of Suez, Cairo, Algiers, Kimberley, Johannesburg, and Cape Town. 63. Name the wild animals of Africa and describe their appearance. 64. Give a description of the Pygmies ; crossing the Sahara ; and ostrich farming. 65. Make a map of Australia and locate on it its situation regarding the Equator and the Tropic of Capri-corn, highlands, desert countiy, sheep lands, farms, banana plantations, and the gold lands. 66. Name the states of Australia. What do you know of the early settlement of Australia ? What do you know of Melbourne and Sydney? 67. Why is western Australia largely desert? 68. Name and describe the wild animals of Australia. Can you give any reason why these animals differ so much from the animals of North America? 69. What has Australia to export ? Where do these materials go, and how ? 70. Make a map of Asia and show on it the coast waters, peninsulas, highlands, islands, lowlands, countries (not the boundaries), chief pro-ductions of farm, forest, and coast, and fifteen large cities. Mark in the important imaginary lines and the belts of",
         "heat. SELECTED LIST OF GEOGRAPHICAL NAMES KEY TO PRONUNCIATION ft as a in ale. ft \" o \" am, carry, •h \" a \" arm, car. aw \" a \" all. 6 \" e \" eve. 6 \" « \" end. Aar Abitibi Abyssinia Acapulco Acarai Achill . . Aconcagua Adelaide Aden Adige A(\u003ciroudac\u003c( Adrianople Adriatic i^gean . . Afghanistan Agassiz . . Aix-la-Chapelli Ajaccio . . Alabama . . Alaska Albany . . Alberui . . Alberta . . Albuquerque Aleutian . . Alexandria Algiers . . Allegheny Alluniette Alma Alsace Altai Amazon . . Amiens . . Amsterdam Amur Andes Andorra . . Angers Anglesey Annapolis Antarctic Anticosti Antigunish Antigua . . Antilles . . Appalachian Apennines Apure Aral Ararat Archipelago Ardennes Arequipa i as « in ice. i \" »• \" ill. 0 \" o \" old. 6 \" o \" odd. u \" u \" use. Pbonunoiation ahr. . . ah-betib'be. . . ab-is-sin'-e-a. ah-kahpool'-ka . . ah-kah-re'. . . ak'il. ah-kOn-kah' crwah. ad'-elud. . . o'-den. . ftd'-eja (ah' de-ja). . ftd-Iron'-diik. . ad-re ftnO'p'l (f«l rSa-nO'-pl). . ad-re at-ik (a-dri at'-ik). 6-je' an. . ahf-gahn-is-tahn'. . 4g' assS. uks-lah shah-per. ah-yaht'-cho. ftl-ft-bah'ma. ah-las'-kah. awl'-bft-ng. ftl-ber'-nfi. . 41-ber' ta. ahr-boo-kar'-ka. ah-lu'-slmn. . ftl egs-an'-drl ah (ftl-eks). Al jeerz'. . al'-le-ga-ne. ahl-la-met'. ftl'-mft. ahl-sahs'. ahl-ti'. ftm'-ft-zdn. am'I-onz. ftm'-ster d\u0026m. ah-mooi'. ftn'-dez. an-dOr'ra. ahn-zha'. ang'-g'l-ss. ftn-nftp-o-lia ant-ark'-tik. an tl-kos'-tL ant'-ig-0'ni.sh. ahn-te'gwah. ahn-til'-Iez. ap-f» la' ohI-an(ap-pa-Uch'-i-an ). fip'-en-ninz. ah-poor'-ro. ftr'al (ahr-al). Sr'-ft-rat. ahr-kl-per-ft-go. ahrd^n'. ah-rakee'-pah. u lis li in up. 00 \" oo \" food. 00 \" oo \" foot. ow \" oMi \" cow. .N'amb Argenteuil Argentina Argyle . . Ari(n Arichat . . Arizona . . Arkansas Armagh . . Aroostook ' Ashtabula Asia Assinilioiu Assiniboine Assuan Astrakan Asuncion Atacama . . Athabaska Athens . . Atlas Australia Austria . . Auvergne Avon Aylmer . . Ayr Azores . . Azov Baden Bagot Bahama . . Bahia Baikal . . Baku Balearic . . Balkan Baltimore Baluchistan BanflF . . Bangkok. . Barbados Barcelona Barranquilla Basel Batavia . . Baton Rnuge Batum Beauee Beauharnois Bechuanaland Bedeque . . Beirut Bering . . ch OS cA in chair. % \" g \" go. ng \" ng \" sing. «b \" z \" azure. Phonunoiatior . . ahr-zhOn-tC'y'. . . ahr-jen-tee'na. ahr-gil'. ah-rO'-kah. . ar'-Ishat. ar-lzo'-na. ahr'-kan-saw. ahr-mah'. ft-roOs'-took. . . ftsh'-ta-bu'-Ia. ft'-she-a. . as-sin I-boi'-a. as-sin'-l-boin. . ahs-swalin'. fts'-tra kin'. a-soon'-se-on. ahta-kah'-ma. . ftth ft-bA.s' kft. ftth' 6nz. . ftt'-las. . aw.s.tra'11-a. aw.s' trl-a. O'-ver' nye. . av'-un. al'-mur. air. ah-zorz'. a'-zov (ah-zoT'V bah'-den. bah go'. bah-na'-mah. boh-e'-ah. bi'-kahl. ba-kOO'. bftl-eftr' ik. bahlkahn'. bawl'-tl-mOre. bA-loo'-chis-tahn' bamf. ban-kok'. bahr-ba'-iloz. bahr-s€-10'-nah. bahr'-ran-kel'-ya. bah'-zel. ba-ta' vl-^. bat'-un-ro6zh. bah-toOm'. bOce. be-hahr-uwa(h'). betch-oOah'-nft b6-d«k' ba'root. bs'-ring.",
         "195 196 SELECTED LIST OF GEOGRAPHICAL NAMES Namb BdfMt .. Bdrnd*.. Belie .. .. BelleohMM Belle-Ue BoUeville Beoarea .. Bwigsl .. Ben n .. . . Ben Nevis Beiven .. BerDn . . .. Bennndaa Berne Berthier . . Bhutan .. Biofra . . Biarrits .. Birmiogham Biacay . . • t t Blano (Mont,\u003e Blenheim Bloeinfontein Bluefields BotfoU .. Bohemia . . . Bokhara . . Bolivia .. Bologna .. BonaTentme Bonifacio- Bordeaax Borneo . . BoBDoms Boulogne Bourlmn . . *. Brahmaputra BraichyPwll . Braa d'Or Brazil BrauM .. Bremen . . Breelau .. Breton . . Brindisi . . Britain . . Bachan Nem Bndapert Buenoa Aires . Bukareet Bukhara . . . Burma Batte • • Caconna . . Cadiz Caicos .. Cairo Calais . . Calcutta . . SiS^:: ■• Calnmet . . Cambrian Cambridge Campbellton Gampeche Caoaan .. Canao Caoton .. Oaiaeaa .. Caraqoat Oudiff .. PaoNmrauTMM fa«l-(aat'. btl-grid'. b«-toet'. bU-shaha. b«Mle'. bCl'-rIL ben-ah'-riK beo-gawl'. ben-fin', ben-nev'-is. bir'fctn. b«r-Tin'. bfir-mO'-dte. b«rn. ber-te-ft'. boo tahn'. b«-af'-ra. be-ahr-rStE. ber'-mlug-am. bte'-ka. mong-blong, blen -im. bloOm'-fOn-Un', bla'-feldz'. bOgO' ttth. bo-he'-mla. bo-kuh'-rab. bo liv' l-A. bo-lOn'ya. bOn-a-vfint'-char. bo-ne-faht'-ciiu. bOr-dO'. bOr'-ne-O. bOa'-pO-rftfi. boo-lOne'. boor'-bfin. brah-mA-poo'-tri. brI'-ke-pooL brah-dOr'. brftzU'. brab'zOs. br6m'-en. brfis'-lou. Mt'-un (bret-Qn). br«n'-de-ge. brit't'n. bAk'-an-neas. boo'-da-pest. bO-nOs-Jl'-ria. ba-ka-rest'. bo-kah'-ra. bur'-ma. bate. ktth'koo-nah'. ki'-diz. kl-'kos. ki'-ro. kal'-is (kah-lu). k\u0026l-kut'-ta. k\u0026l'-gah'-r\u0026 kahl-Iah'o. kU'-u-met. kim'-bri en. kim'-bridge. kim'-el-tan. kahm-pA'-die. ka'-nin. k«ii'.«a. kin-ton'. kah-rah'-kaha. kah-rah-ket'. kahr'-dlK . Nau Plioni7.\u003ccouTM« Caribbean .. kir-ib-bs'-an. Carillon .. kah-reel-yon'. Carmarthen . . kahr-mahr'-theii. Carolina . . . . kftr-O-lin'-i. Carpathian kahr-pi' thi-an. Caasiar . . . ■ kas'-sl-ahr. Oaasiquiari Catoc\u0026e .. . . kah-ae ke^h' r«. kah-to'-che. Oauoasus . . kaw'-kah-^Oa. Caughnawaga . . . . kaw-nah-waw'-gah. Causaes .. .. kos. Cavan . . k«v'.\u0026n. Cayenne . . Celebes .. . . k4-«n' (ki.«n'). . . aere-boz. Cenis . . s6h-n«'. Cettinje . . . . set-ten'-y«. Ceuta . . sa'-ta. Cevennes si-v«nn'. Ceylon . . . . »e-10n' (sn-on). Chad . . chahd. Chaleur .. shab-loor'. Charobly. . . . shahm'-ble. Cliamplain . . 8hAm-pIane'. . . 8huhr-I«-voi' (vwa). Charlevoix Charlo . . shahr'IO. Chateaugnay . . shah-tO ga'. Chatham , . chit'-am. Cherbourg : . sher-boorg. Cherra Punji . . cher-rah-poou'-jA. Chesapeake Cheshire.. . . ches'-i-pek. . . ch«sh'-Ir. Cheviot .. . . chfiv'-o-at. Cheyenne shi-enn'. Chicago . . shl-kaw'-go. Chicoutimi she koo'-te-me. Chidley .. chid'Ie. Cbignecto Chifi shig-nfik'to. .. chlFlS. Chilkac . . . chll'-kat Chilliwack . . chirie w\u0026k. Chiltem chil'-tern. Chimborazo chim-bo-rah'-zO. Christiania kris-te-ah'-nfi-oh. Cienfuegos . . se-fin-fwa'-gOce. siu-sin-nah -te. Cincinnati CindadRodrigo. . the-00-dad' rod-rC g\u0026 Coaticook . . ko at'-I-kook. Cobequid . . kob'e'-kwid. Cobonrg . . kO'-bfirg. Cochin kO'-chin. Cologne .. . . ko-lone'. Colon . . kolone' Colorado . . k0l-o-rah'.da Connecticut kOn-net'-I-kftt. Constantinople . . kOn-Btan-tl-nfl'-pX Copenhagen . . kOpen-ha'-gen. .. kOr'-dO-vah. Cordova . . Corinth .. . . kOr'-inth. Corrientes . . kOr-re-en't«8. Corsica . . .. kor'alkah Cotopaxi.. . . ko-to-pak'-se.- Cotrichan kow'-itch-an. Crimea . . . . krim-e'a. Cromarty . . krOm'-er-t«L Cara9ao .. . . ko-rii-aah'-o. Cuzco . . koos'-ko. Cycladae.. .. Blk'Iah^Ks. Dahomey dah-ho'mi. Dakota .. . . da-ko'ti Dalhoasie . . dil hOO'-iB. Danube .. . . dftn'-ab. Dansig .. . . daot'-aig",
         "(dta'talahy. SELECTED LIST OF ^**\" I'MMfDNOUnON »«*«^\u003e- .. .. d*hr^4.u«U'. 2™° .. d»-re«n'. »2«7«« .. .. iWl'-ahw.™. {2 d«l'i (d«'-hl). »^\"\u003e« .. del-o-rtn'. \"^ g^«»«\" .. .. d«m-6r.«h-.r». DesMoin* .. .. de-moin'. ^'«\"t d«.troit'. ST'\"\" dav'on. ^!«»f na'.per. Doinimoa .. ddm-I-nee-kmh. }\u003eoyrefjeld .. do-vrtfe-eld?^ S*;;f drftve (drah veh). S\"\"\"™ •• .. dQloOth'. Dnmfne. ., .. dam-freece'. R»°*?? dfln-daa'. i^.\"^'\" dfln-s-din. ^\"^ dve'.uJi. \"y^ . di-6 -ah. S?™ urn. ¥\u003e\"\u003e, e-brtJ. iS^^'u •• •• ek-wahdor'. ^\"^ :: :: «j-.'n-«\u003ear.roo(*i'.i„.b\u003cirg). Kleuthem' ]'. [[ s-ld' ther-ah. W^^ «-pah'-90. tt-;: :. :; KsT ■l!\u003cne a'-re. B^birge :: tote^.ber'^rt. \u0026oam.n«s .. «8i?„,i„X Etchemin .. .. et'-che-min. £*\"* flt-nah. 5\"^, a-be'-ah. \"y\" air. Falmouth .. fii'.„outh. Fermanagh .. ftr-nmn'-ah. fl'J' fe-je- S°^°\u003c=« fl6r'.ence. ^^«J» flOr'-Idah. Fredericton .. fred'-er ik-tan. |,~*t°7 foo'-chow. i,\"\"^ fo6n-8hahl'. l'\"^y ffln'^1. S\"!!\"\" foo'-nen. Fuji-yama .. foo-jfl-yah'-mah. Jff\" gah^'tah. SS^ lahliSh-rat ™W\" ean'-jflB. g:!2°* »^'*^- '*'•'\" gW-pB (gahs-p*'). GEOGRAPHICAL NAMES 197 Oatioaan.. Uebtrge . . Genoa \u003cibent (ihiieh . . UibralUir (lironde . . (ilaoe (Jlaagow . . Uleichen . . Olouoefiter Oobi (iodavery (ioderich.. Uothard . . Qothenbuiv QraciaHa-Dios Oranada . . Greenock Greenwich Grenada . . Guadalajara Guadalquivir Guadeloupe Guam Ouardafui Guatemala Guayaquil Guayra . . Ouefph Guernsey Guiana Haarlem . . Ha^ue Hainan . . Haiti HaUe Hanoi Havana . . Haverhill Havre Hawaii . . Hebrides. . Hecate . . Heidelberg Helena . . Herat Hnrzegovina Himalaya Hindo Koosh Hobart . . Hochelaga Honduras Honolulu Hoogly . . Houston . . Howth . . Hyderabad Iberville . . Idaho Illecillewaet fllimani . . Illinois Indiana .. Indianapolis Indus Inverneas looa Iowa Iqniqne .. Irak Armbi PtamvuoiAttom ■ ■ Rah-t« no'. ■ . gther'gt, ■ ■ jen'-o-ah. .. g«nt. ' . se'-zeh. • • }l hrawl'ter. jl-roiid'. •• gUce. . . glAn'-gO (/laa'-kO). .. gli'ken. • • glOH'-ter. • • go' be. ■ • go-dah'-ve-re. KOd'-rich. • gOth'-ahrd. . . gOt'en-bdrg. • grah'-aO-ahs-ah^de-Ooa'. . grah-nab'-dah. • green'ock (gren'-uk). • ?rln'ij (gren'-ij). ■ grdn-a'-dah. . gwah^dahl ah-hoh'ra, • gwah-dahl kwir'-er. . gahde-loop'. ■ gwahm. • gwahr'-di-fe. ■ gaw-t«-mah'U. • gwl-a-ker. ■ gwi'-rah. . gwelf. . gum'ze. ge-ah'-nab. hahr'-lem. h\u0026g. hinahn'. hi'-tl hahl'-leh. hah-noi'. hah-vftn'-ah. h\u0026'-v6r-IL ohvr. huh-wi'-e. bSb'-ri^det hek'-A-te. hl'-del-bflrg. hfil'-e-nah. h«nht'. hertfte-gO-vS'-nah. hl-mah'^.yah (him-A-l\u0026'.yahl hiu'-doo koflsh' hO'-bert. hosh-e-lah'-gab. bon-do'-ras. hO-nO-loo'-Ux). hoo'-gle. hOs'-tiln. both. hi-ddr-ah-bad'. e-b»r-vel'. t-da-ha Il-le-sir-l6-wefc el-ye-mah'-ne. il-Un-oi'. in-de-An'^Ui. in\u003cle-an-ap'-\u003cl-liiL iD'-d4a. in-Ttr-iMH'. r-o'-nah (•.fi'.nali). r-o-wah, A-kS'kS. •-nk'",
         "ahr'^a-ba. 196 SELECTED LIST OF GEOGRAPHICAL NAMES MAMI PaOMUVOUTKHI Inm t-nhn'. InwKli Ir'nJi-WBh'-dL Ireland irlmnd. Irfcatak Ir-koOtak'. Iwr C'-zer. l«l»y I'lA. Imulis aa-moh e'-\u003e«-ah. Itoaok I-tM-ksh. Ivi9B 9-ve'-nh. Ixtaocihustl .. «a-Uk sA'hwaa JadqanCartier.. .. ih\u0026k-kahr-Ut-r. Jaoquet l»k'-«t. Jamaioa Uh-mi'-kab. Java jah'-VBh. Jedo ye'-do. Jena vft'-nah. Jen'^: Jem jA-rfl'-tt-lem. Johanoesburg . . . yO-tuthn'-nes-bniv. Joliet W-lI-«t. Joan de Faoa . . . . ja an-d«-fO'-ka (wan-dA-foo'-ka). Juneau Jfl-nO'. Jnngfran .. yo6ng'-frow. Kfcbul kahbool'. Kamchatka kaLm-cUt'-kah. Kamouraaka kah-moo-rahf\u003e'-!ia. Karachi ktt-rah che. Karakoram kah-rah-ko'-rnm. Karroo kah-rOO'. Kaalo kas'-lo. Kaatala kaha-atkh'-lah. Katahdin kah-tah'-dio. Katrine \"At'-rin. Keewatin .. Uirah'-tin. KeUt ke-Iaht'. Kennebeobjia .. .. ken-nebek-i'-aia. Keuora kS-nO'-rft. Khartoum kahr-toom'. Khiva k«'-vah. Khyber ki'-b4r. Kiel keel. Kiev ke'-ev. Kilimanjaro kil^e-maho-jah'-rok Kincardine kin-kahr'^dln. Kirkoi\u003edbright . . kir-koO'-bre. KjOlen ky-OO'-len. Kootenay .. koO'-teo-ft. Korea ko-re'-ah. Kuen Lnen . . kwen-ioon'. Kurile koO'-ril. KnroShiwo .. kOO-rO-shS'-wa Kyoto ke-o'-to. La Beanoe lah-bOce'. Labelle lah-b«I'. Labrador Ub'-ri-dOr. Labuan loh-boo-ahn'. Laccadive .. lak'-kah-dive. Lachtne lah-shen'. Ladoga lah-do'-gah. Ladronea lah-drOnz'. La Ouayra lah-gwi'-rah. Lahave lah-nftv'. I«nark Un'-ark. La Paz lahpahz'. La Plata lah-plah'tah. Ia Prairie . . lah-prft'-re. L'Asaomption . . lahs-eOnae-on'. Laurentiau .. law-ren'shinui. Lausanne lo-zahn'. Laval lah-vahl'. Lebanon Ub'-k-non. SAtm PHOMUHOIAIMM Leipzig llp'-aik. LeprcHu . , M-prO'. Letite U-tM'. Levant M-vint'. LeviH to've. Leyden ll'^dtn. Lhaaa Ihah'-Mh'. Liige le-ftih'. Lille lei. Lillooet .. .. lil'loA-M, Lima lA'mah. LimoKea le-moch'. Lincoln link'-tkn. Lipari lip' ah-r«. Ii«bou lix'-bOn. L'lalet |«.U'. Liatowel lia-tO'-tL Llaiielly lah-neth'-lei Llanofl lah'-nOz. Loch Linnhe . . loklln'nA. Lofoten lO-fO'-ten. Loire Iwahr. Longueuil . . long-gole' (lon-gt'y). L'Orignal .. lo-reen-yahl'. LoaAngeleo .. loa ang' k«1 «■ (lOa an'-jella). Lotbiniere 10t-b\u003c-uI ar'. Lonisburg .. loO'is-bQrg. Louisiana ... loo e-z«-«h -nub. Lourenfo Marquee . . Is ren'-so mahr'-kAk Louth lowth. Lucknow Ittk'-now. Luzon loO-zOo'. Lyons H'-uns. Macao mah-kah'-a Macon m\u0026'-kAn. Madagveoar .. mad-ah-gia'-kahr. Madame . . mah-dahm'. Madawaska mad-ah-wOs'-kah. Madeira . . mah-de'-ni. MadrBF mahdris'. Madrid mah-drid'. Mafeking .. mah-ft-king'. Magaguadavio .. .. mkk-t d\u0026'v\u0026 Magdalen .. m\u003cg'-d\u0026l«n. Magellan mah-jel'-Ian. Maggioro .. mahd-jA'-ri. Masog mt'-gte. MaUoca mah-iak' ku. Malaga . . mah-lah-gah. Malay mah-li'. Manan manin'. Manitoba man-I-tA'-bah. Manitoulin man-I-too'-lin. Maraoaibo .. mah-rah ki' b\u0026 Marmora mahr'-mO-rft. Marquesas .. mahr-kt'saha. Marseilles mahr-silz'. Martinique mahr-tl-nek'. Masoareen mfa-ka-rCn'. Maekinonge .. mas-ke-nfinj'. Maasachusetta .. .. mAs-sA-cha'-sMk Massowa. . mahs-sow'-ah. MatamoroB mat-a-mo'-roe. Matanzas .. mah-t\u0026ii'-zfis. Matapedia .. niAt-ahpe'-dlah. Mattawamkeag . . mat-ta-wOm'-kflgi Maugerville mA'-jer-vII. Mauna fiLea mou nah-k\u0026'ah. Mauritius maw-ridi'-I-n\u0026 Mecca m6k'-ka. Medina mft-d\u003c'-nah. Megantio ..",
         "Bi»-g*n'\u003etik. SELECTED LIST OF GEOGRAPHICAL NAMES Nam* Melboama Memphremagov Menai Mendocino JKerdeOUoe Merthyr Tydvil Maaaina .. Meteghsn If euse Michigan Michipicotan Milan Milwaukee Minos Mindanao Minneapolia Minnesota Minorca . . Mique!on Miramiohi Miacou . . Missisquoi MiasiHsippi Miwouri . . Mitylene. . Mobile .. Mocha Mohave . . Moluccas. . Mombasa Monaco .. Mooaghan Mont^fue Monta . . Montank.. Montcalm Montenegro Montevideo Montmagny Morocco .. Moscow . . Mozambique M\u003cikdeii .. Munich . . Mnskoka. . Musquash Mufiquodoboit Nap^osaki Nakusp . . Nanaimo. . Nantes . . Napanee . . Nasbwaak Nassau . . Natal Nechako . . Nepal Nevada . , Newfoundland New Orleans New Zealand Niagara . . Nicaragua Nice .. Nicobor . . Nicolet . . Niger Nimes Nipbon .. Nipigon . . Nipiseing Vizhniy-Novgorod PnORDIfOUTIOM . . mtl'bflrn. nutm • f r6 • mA' •gug, m^nl. in«n-dO'M«'-iia. mAr de-glifi'. mar-thfir tid'-vU. lata »i'-i\\ah. mM-A'-gAii. max. mish'-I gAn. miNh-I-pI-ko't«n. ■nll'-an (inil-an'). mil-waw'-ke. ml'nuK. . inen-da-nah'-o. inin ne-ap'o-lja, min-nfl'SO'-to. inin-or'-ka. mik-«-lon'. mlr a-me-shfi'. inis'-koO. mJA-Kis'-kwoi. inio-iR oip'-pt, miR-soo'-re. mit-Me'-ne. ma 1*1'. mo kah. . . mo hah'va. mo-lak' kas. mOm-bah'-sah. mOn'-ah-ko. mdn'-A-han. . mOn'-tA-gfl. mOn-tah-nah. ■ mdntawk'. mAnt-kahm'. mon-UUn\u0026'-gra mon-te-vld'-e-a mon-mahn-ye'. . morok'-ko. mOs'-ko. mo.zftm-b«k'. mMk'-den. mO'-nik. ■ mOskt^'-kah. man'-kwosh. mOsk-O-dOb'-It nah-gft^tah'-ka. na-ka.sp'. nan-i'-inO. nAnts. iinp'-A-nS. nAsh'-wawk. IIOH'-NaW. nAtahr. ne-cliak'-o. iiSpawl'. n«-va.i'-dah. iiO fdnd-land'. nQ 6r'le nnz. nQze'-land. ni-Ag-A-rA. uik uh-rah'gwah. nCs, nik-o-bohr', nlk-o-lA'. nl'-j«r. nte). nl-fon'. nip'-i-gon. nlpMs-sing. nyer'-nye-nov'-go-rot uw Namb Norwioh . . Nottawaaaoa Novo ScoUa Nova Zembia Nyanza . . Nya Oahu Oblrtysh Ol.i .. Oceania . . Oder Odeawi .. Oesel Ohio Okniiagan Okhotsk . . Oklahoma Omaha Onega Ontario . . Oregon . . Orillitt Orinoco , . Orleans . . Oromocto Orontes . . Ottawa . . Ouse Pacific . . Padua Palermo . . Palk Pamir Panama . . Papua Para Paraguay Paramaribo Parana Paritt Passamoq noddy Passaro . . Patagonia Pechili . . Pei-Ho .. Peking , . Pembina . . Pennine . . Pennsylvania Penobscot Penaacola Peoria Perekop . . Pernambuco Persia Peru Petitcodioo Philadelphia Philippine Pico .. Pictou Pisa Plymouth Pomona . . Pompeii . . Pontiac . . Popoc-alepell Portage la Prairie Port juf.. POrto Rico Portugal . . Pmo.mi'noutioh . Bor'-rij (nor'-ritokV . natUwA-naw'-gC nO'-vA-NkO'-tiliA. nO'vA-z«ni'-bI4, ne-ahn'xah. nC ah*' Rah. O uh'-hoo. oblr'ttah. 0'b«, O-Nheah'nl-a. O-dfcr. O-des'-Ho. O'-sel. OhI'o. O-kan-ah'-gin. O-kOtnk'. Ok-luh ho' _ O'-mah'liHW, 0-n«'-go. 6n-tA'-rI O. 6r'-e-gon. Oril'-H-uh. 0-rin 0' ka or'-Ie anr or-o-mak'-to, fl-rOn'-tflt ot'-tah-wah. OOz. pah-Hif'ik. . |iAd'-a-a. . pA'lir'-mO. pawk. . |\u003eah-m«r'. . pan-o-nuh'. . pap'-oo-o. . pah-rah'. . pah-ra-gwa'. . Iiflrn-inAr'-l-ho. . i«h ruh'-nah (nob ). . pah'-re-ah. . pas-.sA-mA-kwod'-dy. . (uhH-sah'i'O. pit'A-gO'-nl-a. . pa-ch6-le'. pA-hO'. . pC-kin'. pfim'-be-na. pen'-nln. pen-sIl-vA'-nt-a. pen-Ob'-nkdt. pen-sah-ko'lo. p60'-rlah. pa-ra-kop'. pdr-nAm-i\u003eM'kO. jier'-shA (per'-zhA). |)S-roo'. pet'-ekO-dS-ak'. nl'A-del'-fe-a. fil'-ip-pin. pe'-kO. pik'-tfl. pS'aih. plim'-ath. pO-mO'-na. pom-pa'-yS. pOii'te-ak. po pO-kah ta'-p6t'L pOr-tazh' lah pr\u0026'-r\u0026 port-nflf. pOr'-tO rfi'-kO. pOr'-tO-gal.",
         ".1 200 Nam* Potomao . . Potod Prague . . Pretoria . . Prnaria .. Pueblo . . PunU AreiuM , Putumayu PyreneoH. . Quaco Qu'ApiwIle Quebec . . QuesDel . . (juiote Quito Racine Raleigh . . Rangoon . . . RaptiahauDook . Reading . , R«ggio .. Reikjavik Reims Renoug . . Restigoucfae Rhodes . . Richelieu Richibucto Rideau . . RimouHki Rio Grande Rio Janeiro Rio Negro Ripon Riviera . . Riviere du Loup Roanoke . . Rochdale Rochefort R* chelle . . ■ochester Rosario . . Rossignol Rothesay Rouen Roumania Russia Saale Saoo Sack imento Saghalien Saginaw . . Saguenay Sahara Saigon . . St. Augustine . . St. Bernard St. Croix St. Denis St Elias.. St. Helena St. Hyocinthe . , St. Louis St. Malo . . St. Maurice fit. Pierre St. Roquo Sakhalin.. Salamanca SELECTED LIST OF GEOGRAPHICAL NAMES PMONVIIOlaTIOII ■ . pO-tO'-inak. . . |iO-U\u003e ■«', or po-ut'w. Pr*g . . pr«-t« re-aU. prdnh'-i. . . pw«b'-l0. . . poon'-tah uh-rA'-nahs. . . poo-too-mi' 0. . . plr' e-nex. kwuw'-ko. . . ktp.uer. kwe-Mk'. ken'-neL kwin'-t«. . ke'-to. rah-sen'. raw'le. rahngoon'. rap-piih-ban'-nAk. rM'-ing. red'jo. rJ'-kyah-vek. remz. r4n00«'. r6M tl'gooah'. . rodz. re-she-loo', rish l-bak'-to. redo', rfi'-gah. re-moOs'-ke. re'-o grahn'-d4. rfi'-o zhah-na'ra . rfl'-o na'-grd. rIp'-Qn. re-vea'nth. re-ve-ar' Uooloo'. rO-\u0026-nOk'. rOtch'-dale. rOsh-for'. rOsher. r0tch'-es-t4r. rO-sah' le-o. rOe-sen-yor. rtith'sft. roo'-6n. roo-ma'-nl-a. rOsh'-a. zah'-leh. saw'-ko. H\u0026k-rah-men'-tO. sah'-gah-len'. Kag'-in-aw. sag-e-na'. s\u0026-hah'-ral.. si-gon'. sint aw'-gOs-ten. sant ber'-nard. sant kroi', sahn deh-nfi'. sant 6 li'-As. sant he-Ie'-na. sant hi'-a-sinth. sant loo'-is. sahn niah-lo'. sahn mo-res'. aalin pc ar'. sahn rok. sah-kah-lyn'. sal-a-man'-ka. Samm Baiisbwy Balonick . . 8«ma« Samothraki SanBlaa.. San Diego San Francisco . . San Jose . . San Juan SanU Fe Santiago.. Saone Saskatchewan . . 8B\u003e-katoon 8i\u003c t 8te. Marie Savannah Scatori . . Scheldt . . Schenectady Schleswig-HoUtein Schoodic. . Schuylkill Soilly . . Scutari I Sedan I Seine I Senegal . . I Seville .. Sf ychellea f janghai Shawenegao Shediac .. Shemogoe Hhenandrtth Shepody . . Shippigan Shunenacadie Shuswap. . Siam SicumouM Sicily Sierra Leone Sierra Madro Sierra Morenn . . Sierra Nevada . . Silesia Sinai Singapore Sioux Skager Rack Skagway Slocan Smyrna . . Socotra . . Sofia Solent Somaliland Sorel Soul Soulangee Souris Spoka Spokane . . Sporades. . Sproe Stanovoi . . Stettin . . Steveston Stewiacke Stikine . . Stockholm Stour Straabarg PllOHUNOI4'/IOIf . . Miwli'.b«r-«. . . Mh-iA-n«'-kC. . . lah-mo'.*. . . Mh'iBOthnih' k«k . . lahn blabs', sahn d£'\u003e'-go. whn frftn-itls'-ko. sahn ho mA'. sahn hoo ahn'. . sahn'-tah fil'. sahn-tA ab'-ga . »0n. ab-katch -ewOn. sAm katoon'. sOo sant ma'-re. sah'VAn'-nuh. . skat- A- re'. . skelt. . skenek'-Ude. shlaz'-vig liol'-ttln. skoo'-dik. . skOOl'-kll. . sil-le. skoo'-tab-re. se-dAn'. sAn. sen-e-gawl'. se vil' (sev'-il). . sA-shel'. shang-hi'. shHh-wen.e-gAD'. sheJ-e-ak'. shem-0-gwe'. shen-an-dO'-ab. shep'-O-de. ship-ue-gAn'. shoo-ben -Ak'-A d«. shOs'-wap. si-am' (se-am'). sik'-A-mooa. sis'-I-lfi. se-Cr'-rah lA-o'-ne. se-er'-rah mnli' drA. se-*r'-iah mo-ra'-nab. se-er'-rah ue vah'-dah. si-le'-shl-a. si'-nA (si'-ni). sing-gA-pOr'. sOO. skag'-er rak'. skag'-way slO-kAn'. smiir'-na. so-ko'-trah. so-fe'-ah (so'-fe-yah). so'-lent. so-mah'-le-'.and. sO-rer. seh-oor. sOO-lahnzIi*. soo'-r6. spA. spO-kAn'. spOr'-A-dezk spra. stab no-voi'. stet'ten'. stevs'-ton. Rf«w'-e ak. stik-en'. stOk' holm. stoOr.",
         "strahs'-boOrg. SELECTED LIST OF GEOGRAPHICAL NAMES Namb Strombeli \u003e4tutt«it Huttkin .. 8imUu .. Hum Huloinuui Humalr» . . HuaqiMhaniM HwkiuMk . HwadUnd HyracuM. . SyrlMria Byrift TitboainUo Taooma . . TadouwM Tahiti TallahaaM Tampiuo . . Tanaiiarivo Tanganyika Tangier . . Tantrumar Tanmania Tatamagoucbe Taunton . . TauruH . . Teber\u0026n . . Tehuan tepee Temiacouata Teneriffe. . TenncMee Terrebonne Terre Haute Ttuunee . . Thebes . Theim Thian Shan Tibe*/ Ticiao Tientain . . Tierra del Fueiro Tiflis .. Timiakaraing Timor Titicaca . . Tobago .. Tobique . . Tokyo . . Tonquin . . Tormentine Torquay . . Toulon . . Toulouse. . Tours Tracadie. . Trafalgar Transvaal Trieste . . Tripoli . . Trois Pistolee Trondhiem ''Vossachs Troyes . . Tunis Turin Turkestan Tyrol .. Ucayali , . Uganda.. Pmmuncuimm .. atrOm'-bo-lt. . . stot'-gabrt. .. swab' k«n. MM-dabn'. »oO tt'. noo-la-mahn'. . . Boo-mah'-tr*. ■OK'kwt'-han'-oali. ■won'-a«. swuh' « Und. sir'-tth-kaii. sir dahr'-]-ah. sir'-i-a. tah-Q Hin-tak'. tab-ko'-mah. tah-doo-Htk'. tah-h«'-t«. . . Ul Id-liAA'ne. tiin-|ie'-kO. tall nahnah-re'-va tabii-glian-yfi'kah. tahn-jer'. tan-trah-mabr'. ■ taz-mft'-nl-a. tat'-nmb-goosb, tahn' tftn. ' . tu riui. te-he-nihii'. 'a-wabii-ta-pek . t^ni -Im- k wuw'- tib. . MSn«rir. t*;i-n6s-»*'. t6t-')6n'. t«r'-fe-bOt. timz. . tbcbz. tip^. te-bhn shahu'. . Ubet' (tIb'HJt). t*-ch6'no. te-en'-t8«n. t«-«r'-rah del fwi'-iro. . tif-les. tlm-ls -ka-ming. t*mOr'. . tite-kah'-kah. to-ba'-go. tO'-lteek. tA'-ke-o. ton -ken', tor'-men-tine. tor-ke'. toO-ldn'. toA-looz'. toOr. trak''a-d\u003c\u003e. traf al-gi.br' (trA-fahl'-g^hr) tran.sralir. tre-Cst'. trip'o-le. twah pes-tol'. trfln' yem. trOs'aks. trwah. tO'-nis. tQ'rln. toor-kfis-tahn'. tir'-ol. oo-kab-yah'-le, or oo-ki-ah'-le. oo-gabn'-da, wiat. 201 N'AMB UllMwater Ungava . . Upwla .. Ural Uruguay . . rtrecht . . Valdai . . V|alenoia \\ Valcntia / ValeiicieiiiieM \"alpitraitio VanoDuver Van Diemeii'ii V|au\u003clreuii Venezuela V'ora Crux Verchi-res Vermont VerNailles Verte I VeHuvius I Vienna I Vimlhya . . j Vistula . . Vitoria . . Vladivostok I Vosges WaliiiHh . . \\Vul)i(foon Wallachia Wurwiw . . Warwick Wasatch . . Wiishaclcmoak Wear Wein.ar . . Welland . . Wener Weser Wetaskiwin Wetter . . Whyeocomagb Wichita . . Wiesbaden Wight . . Winnipegosis WoUaKton Woolwich Worcester Wyoming Xalapa Xeros Vablonoi . . Vakutsk . . Vama.ska Vang tse Xiang Yenisei . . Yokohama Yosemite Voughal . . Yucatan . . Zaandun. . Zambesi . . Zante Zanzibar . . Zuider Zee Zurich i'luiML'scunon Oli'-waw-ter. unggah'vab. . dp Mih'lah. . . 0 r»l, • fl' riiogwa (06-nia.gwl). O'-trekt. vahlili'. vuh'-lcn'-Hhla. vah-len xi-pnz' (vahUhnsi .n'* vahl-fialirr MO. van-kuO'ver. van ile'-menz. v6-\u003clroor IvO^lrO'-y). venez-w6 -lub. ver'-ab krOOz. vor nlmr'. vCr-mOnt'. . • ver salz (versah'y). .. v«rt. ■e NQ'-vi.ikt. V(5 en'-oah. vinil'-yab. vIVtQltt. vft to're-ah. vliib-de-vOs-tAk'. • • vozh. waw'-l)Aiih. WHW' bf goOn. wfll-lii'-ki u. wawr'-saw. wiiw'-rik (wawr'-wik|L waw'-satch. w6Nb-A.de-moik'. wCr. wi'mabr (vi'mahr). wel'-land. w\"'ner (ve'-ner). »a'-zer. we-tas'-kl-wln. • wet'-ter (vet'tcr). why-kog'-o mah. wiK'b'-l-taw. ves-bah'-den. . wit. win-nl-pfi-go'-sia. wel'-laston. woal' itch (wool-ij). woOs'-ter. wW-ming. chub lab'-|jah. eher-es'. yah-blo noi'. yah koAtsk'. yab-inahs'kab. yftng-t-e kfang'. y6ne-sa'-6. yo-ko-hah'-mab. yOsem'T t«. yawl (yoh'-bai). yookah tahn'. cahn-dahni'. zuhk-a-ta'-Iuu. zahm-ba'-ze (zabm-be'-ze). zahn'te. zahnzl-babr'. zi'.der ze.",
         "zoo'rik. SUGGESTIONS FOR COLLATERAL READDfO The rafermceH given Iwlow h«v« been curefully ■elected from all available nuppleroentary volunieM, and are here preitented because of thiir worth an collateral reading on the topics indicaUnl. The referenceii are given by chaptero to.- convenience in uae. KIY TO ABBBBVUTI0H8 Amerloui Book Company (A. B. C.) ; D. Appleton A Company (Ap.) ; E. P. Dutton \u0026 Company (D.) ; Educational PubUahing Company, Boston ( E. P. C. ) ; Olnn ft Company (0.) ; D. C. Heath ft Company (H.); Rand, McNaUy ft Company (R., McN.); MacmlUan'a (M.). Amohkws' Sbven I,iTri,K Sisters ((J.), and Each ano Au, ((;.). Andrkwb' SroRir* Mothkh Natitrk Told Hkh Children (O. ). Olio of Ood'8 StorehoufWH, p. 125, etc. Carpe.nter'8 Socth Amep ca, ErRorK, AmicA, Asia, AND AnsTRALIA (A. B. C. ). Fairbanks' Home Oeoorapdv ton Prihaky (Jradks \u003cE. H. C). Occu|«ti u ., |). 177 J Trade nnd Commerce, p. 181 ; Hunting and Fishing, p. IHH ; Farming, p. 180 : StockRaising, p. 104 j Lumbering, [). 100; The Making of Sugar, p. ai3 ; The Story of the Silkworm, p. 221 ; Where Minerals are Found, p. 11(1; How People Used to Travel, p. 167 ; Travelling To-day, p. 171, etc. htn OP Drake ; Life or Livingstone (M.). Macmillan's Gkoorafhy Rraderh (M.), Books 3, 4, fl and d. Macmillan's New (iE\u003cHjRAi-HV Rraukrs, Asia, Amerk a, Arr..CA, AND ArSTKAMA. Millek's Little Pkoi-le or Asia (U.). I'ARKER AND HeLm's Vsfl.K Rl.BERTS (JKO\u003clRArHV, Book IIL (Ap.). A Diiyoii the River, p. 13r» ; The Walk After the Rain, p. 158, etc. I Favne'e Dbooraphual Nati-re Htddim (A. B. C.) Farming, p. KB; KtockRaising and I\u003e«irying, p. lufl\", Lumbering, p Um-. Mining, p 111 ; Fiahing, ,i, 119; Manufacturing, p. 114; Making Flour, p. 117; Making Cloth, p. 110; Making Iron and Stael, p. 12S i The Occu-pations-Trade or Commerce, p. 124 , Transportation by Land, p. 125 ; Trans|iorUtion by Water, p. 127, etc. Ferjce and La Victoire'b Child Life in Many Lands (B., M N.). Hunting and Fishing, p. 45 ; T«i p. 89. Schwatka's Children or the Cold (O.). Shaw's Bio Peoi-le and LrrrLi PaorLcor Other Lamm (A. B. C). Smith's Eskimo Stories (R . McN.). The Ncrtldand, p II ; How the Eskimos Live, p. 16 ; The Walrus, jk 20; Seals, pp. .-a and 40 ; A Long Journey, p. .11 ; Ioe|«r(r»,' p. 37 ; The White Bear, ,.. 38 ; The Story of a Real Eskimo, ! P Starr's Stranoe Peoples (H. ). Chinese, p. 69; Thibetwis, p. 81 ; South Ameriran Peoples, p. 26, etc. The Wide World ((}.). Dining with a Mandarin, p. 20 ; Boys auil liirls of Paris, p. 65 ; The Boys of Mexico. \\\u003e. 108. ^ Youth's Comi,.mo.n Series, Northern Europe (O.). A People on Stilts, p. 4« ; The Eirtel Tower, |fc 53; Scenes in Hollnnd, [). 18 ; A Dutch Market Place, p. 29; The Faroe Islands, p. 1. Youth's Companion Series. Stranoe Lands Near Home ((!.). In the (irand Plaza of Mexico, p. 16; A -Mexioun City, p. 2« ; A Growing Mounuin, p. .36 ; A \"Trip to Santo Domingo, p. 8 ; A Venezuelan Railway, p. 44 ; Life in Asur.rion, p. 60 ; An Odd City in the Andes, jx. 75 ; The Limd of the Llamu, p. 8ti ; The Argentine Capitel, p. 97 ; South Aniertonn Games, p. 101. Youth's Companion Skbies. Toward the Rising Son (O.). A School in China, p. 16; Country Life in China, !•. 29 ; A Chine.\u003cie Visit, p. .36. Youth's Cmiamon Series, Under Schnv Skies (G.). Acrotw the Desert, p. KJ8.",
         "202 PRAIRIE PROVINCE SUPPLEMENT The provinces of Manitoba, Saakatchewan, and Alberta, on account of the surface aspect of their best known s, are commonly grouped together under the name \" Prairie Provinces,\" the term \" pr lirie province \" being first applied to Manitoba alone. With the progress of settle-ment and the establishment of a common form of political organization over two more recently established provinces, the term has been widened in significance to stand for the area included in Manitoba and in the two provinces between it and the Rocky Mountains. MA NITOBA . SA SKA TCHEWA N, AND ALBERT A THE NORTH-WEST TERRITORIES On May 2nd, 1670. Charles ll., king of England, granted a charter to the Hudson's Bay Company by which the ownership of Rupert's Und, as the vast centra] area of Canada was then called, became vested in this company. It controlled all the trade, regulated all the afl.tirs, and became its sovereign rulers under the authority of the monarchs of England. On November 19, 1869. the Company surren-dered its rights in the North-West lands to the British Crown, and on June 22, 1870, the surren-der was formally accepted. The North-West Territory at this time was practically the Mac-kenzie basin, while Rupert's Land included the rest of Western Canada north of the international boundary, as far west as the Rocky Mountains, east to include parts of northern Ontario and Quebec and nonh to the Arctic Ocean. On the Dominion Government .satisfying the claims of the Hud.son's Bay Company, this territory oecame part of Canada on July 15th, 1870. The name \"North-West Territories\" was applied to the whole of the newly-acquired country. As soon as practical, after its -\"^-luisition, the central government at Otta- , the sub-division of this vast area i. .vinces and territories and formed local gv^verning bodies similar to those already established in the older parts of the Dominion. The creation of the province of Manitoba in the year 1870 was an important event in the history of Western Panada, as it meant the exercise of effective sovereignty with respect to the West as well as the establishment of local self-Kovemment . The western boundary of the province was the meridian of 99 , which waa extended to just beyouil the meridian of 100 in 1877, but the total area in either case w-.s only a fraction of the present area of the province. The present boundaries were fixed in 1912. The name of North-West Teiritories has been used at all times to designate the parts cHVestem Canadaoutside of the organized provinces. The organization of this territory has gone on gradu-ally to answer different needs and demands. In 1876 Keewatin District was formed, and made tributary, politically, to Manitoba. In the .same year a Lieutenant-Governor and Council were given to the rest of the Territories which had been tributary to Manitoba up to this time. In 1882 four districts— Assiniboia, Saskatchewan, Alberta, and Athabaska— were marked -juc from this area for postal districts. Electoral divisions were carved out of this territory between 1875 and 1877 to the number of fourteen, and the members for these were added to the council. In 1888 an assembly wholly of elected members, which by 1900 had acquired practically all the iwwers of provincial governments, took the place of the council. In 1905 the two provinces of Saskatchewan and Alberta were formed out of the area approximately contained in the four provisional districts of Assiniboia, Saskatchewan, Alberta, and Athabaska. Geology. The plains ot Western Canada lie in a wide trough between two elevated masses of rock, the Laurentian Plateau .^nd the Rocky Mountains. The Laurentian Plateau extends from the Atlantic to the Arctic Ocean in the form ^f a broad V around Hudson Bay. It is",
         "t 2 PRAIRIE PROVINCE Sl'PPLEMENT compnaetl of ifnieouit riH-kii, and in ifenerally Huppoded to have bci-n Ihi- firnt part of the continent that apjicarwl. Havintf been actetl upon for ajfeM by wind and water, ice and mow, and other erosive utfencieM, it ha« irraduiilly been worn down until only a portion of it remainji. In mi«t placcH its mountain rharac- teriHticM have di8ap()eurcd ultonethcr. North- wcHtward from the head of Lake Wir oeff it has more the nature of a plain than a eau. On the western slope of this axis, lonjf oefore the upheaval of the Rtwky Mountains, the many beds of sr Jimentary rocks that at prewnt -mder- lie the prairies were formed. In the Re\u003cl River Val! • these rocks are for the most part from 40 t feet below the surface. At one or two points oufroppinKs of limestone are fotmd, with only n few feet of earth on top. From these, buildinjf stone is (piarried in larjfe quantities. The elevation of the Rockr Mountain chain was the last K'reat upheaval that took place in our continent. It followed lonjf after the sedi-mentary rocks n erretl to had been formed. Subsequently occurred the many chantfes that have given rise to the present configuration of the plains. These changes were mainly brought about durin;^ the glacial period, when the clays, silts, sands and gravels were brought down from the hig r levels and distributed over the ' djacent low imls. Th^.se \"drift\" deposits are spread more uniformly over the first and second prairie steppes than they are over the third. The r'ch black loam which covers the under-lying drift over such extensive areas is of com-paratively rece- t origin. It is formed largely from the accumulation of decayed trees, grasses, and other plants. Unde'-lying the third prairie steppe are ex-tensive coal-beds. They are very valuable as a source of suppl\\ for fuel. In the valleys of most of the streams issuUi^r from the Rocky Mountairs, beds of sandstone are seen wherever the i.vers have cut their channels deep enough. Most of this sandstone is easily worked and is used extensively for building purposes. Fine gold is also found in the beds of most of these sy-eams. It was thought at one time that the source of the gold was in the mountains, but it is now generally agreed that it exiita in the gravels that were distributed over the western plains during the glacial ciMK'h. PoaitioB and EzMat. The provinces of Mani- tobit, .Saskatchewan, and Alberta occupy the greater part of the Great Central Plain lying within the Dominion of Canada and stretching from the international boundary to the Arctic Ocean, and in width varying from 800 milea in the south to 300 miles in the north. The province*, lie »x:tween the Rocky Mountains and the Laurentian Plateau, but the latter highland intrudes oii the north-eastern parts of all three provinces. These provinces are bounded on the north by the North- West Territories on the south by the United States, on the east by the provii, e of Ontario and a small part of the United States, and on the west by British Columbia. The greatest length from north to south is 750 miles, and from oast to west about 1,000 miles. They comprise a total area of 756,000 square miles. Surface. The term \"prairie provinces' ' which is commonly applied to the group made up of Manito'\u003ea, Saskatchewan, and Alberta, is appli-cable only to the part of the group lying along the southern boundary. Four different surface aspects in relation to the presence or absence of timber occur within the provinces. The southern part of the pro-vinces is prairie, which shades into a mixed timber or scrub and prairie country in the cent, sometimes called the i)ark country. The northern part of the area of the three prairie provinces is generally well timbered except in the extreme north, where timber growth lightens toward the limits of the temperate zone. The most imjjortant structural features of the area taken up by the provinces are displayed in the orairie .irea. The country south of the North Saskatchewan is naturally divided into three distinct levels, called the three prairie steppts, and ct^nforming generally to the areas occupied by the three provinces. These steppes differ in elevation and surface features. The first steppe is represented in the province of Manitoba, and consists mainly of the Red Rivcf Valley. The surface is generally level",
         "and 1'17 '\"• \"\"'' *•\" «''\"\"•'' '^'•'vatrnn id about »00 feet. Its nvcrntfc width in 120 miles The Hccnd pininc «tep,Hj betrins in Manif.Ki Its eantcrn boundary runs northui-stcrly. ;;n(l i. markctl by a scrien of hills, chief of which are the Pembina. Riding, and Duck Mountains and th'- Porcupine and F'as,,uia UiJN. I, j, ,„,.re .l.verHifie«l in surface than i. the firnt prairie »tep,K.. Isolate\u003cl hills or ^rronp. „f hills occur at intervals, and the northern part is li;,.htly wo.xle,l in parts. The rivers also run at ^-reater Uepth. Its avera«:c elevation is about 1 6(M\u003e feet and it is alxjut 250 mik.s wide. The thinl step.H.- 18 bounded by a series „f hills similar f tli-se on the eastern side of the .secnd level and nin»;-n»r tn the same direction. Tlie n mie Missouri Coteau is .sonu-tinies Riven t.. this ridKc The chief elevations are the D.n Mills the Coteau. Bear Hills, and Ea^^le Hills. This Htepjie begins in the south-w-st corner of Saskatchewan and includes the ^-reatcr i.art of Alberta. The third prairie st.ppe is still ;\u003e,ore diver«,fied in character. The prairie is m.,re rolhnK:. the river channels are deeper, coulees ore common, and elevations more frequent. The th.rd steppe, as in the case of the s.^cond level, becomes lightly woix'ed t,,uard the .„.rth Its elevation increases from 2.(m.0 feet at -he east to 4.200 feet at the f.K.thills of the R.k.- \" s ind It is about 450 miles in wid»h. Manitoba is thejfathcrinK-placeof the j-reater part of the drainage of the three Jevels Lake .'mn.peg is the largest of the prairie lakes. Lakes Wmnipegosis and Manitoba form an intermediate basin parallel to Lake Winnipeg and draining into h from the west bv Dauphin River. The lakes in rhe rest of the prairie are chiefly local drainare basins Drainage. The draina,^- of the praiHe pro-vinces ,s chiefly by two systems, the Mackenzie and the Saskalchewan-NeLson. flowing north and east respectively. The height of land however, lies north of the international boundan^ for the greater part of the way in Albena and Saskatchewan, and a small part of the drainage is directed into the Mississippi. On the other hand, the Red River flows north from the Ln.ted States. The chief rivers of the northern system are the Athabaska and Peace and their PRAIRIE PROVINCE SUPPLEMENT 8 Tibntaries. The Peace flowK into Slave River just north of Lake Athabi.ska. and the Athaluski empties into .Slave Uke, which is drained by the Slave River to CJreat Slave Lake, which in turn IS drained by the Mackenzie. The rivers flowing east arc the Assinilv.me, a tributary of the Red, with its tributaries the Ou'Appelle and .Souris; the S.Lskatchewan. made up of the north and south branches which rise in Albert, and unite in Saskatchewan ; and the Churchill . -h is found in Saskatchewan and Manitoba' From th.- south the Red River flows into Uke \\V innipeg. The imiK.rtant lakes connected with these systems are Lesser Slave Lake, which •Ira.ns into the Athabaska ; Slave Lake, at the mouth of the same river ; an.l Lakes Winnipeg Manitoba, and Winni,K-gosis. The Churchill is 'ed by a numl)er of lakes at its head, and by Wnndeer Lake and Lac La Ronge, along its eourse through Saskatchewan. aimate. The climate of the prairie provinces ■nay l,e generally described as extreme, owinir to their interior position. The winters are \u003erenerally cold, and the summers hot [n rela-tion to rainfall there is considerable variation, it is restricted in comparison with the rainfall m both the eastern and western sections of the Dominion, hut it is generally adequate u. needs in the growth of crops, especially of a superior class of cereals. In the south-«estern part of the area extending across southern Alberta for some distance into Sa.skatchewan. the availiible or effective rainfall is somewhat reduced by the influence of the Chinook. On the other hand the same influence is accountable for moderat-ing practically the climate of the whole of the province of Alberta, .so as to change materially us extreme character, and to open up possibili-ties for northern development which, up to the present, have not been fully or adequately taken account of. Its influence extends for a consider-able distance into southern Saskatchewan, and necessanlytheunobstructedsurfaceof the prairie intenor makes perceptible, even into Manitoba the atmospheric changes which occur in the other provinces. The importance of the Chinook .11 relation to the western part of the interior --s such, and its effect is so much in the nature ot an exception, that it demands",
         "explanation PRAIRIE PROVINCE SUPPLEMENT \\m Tlie term Chinook was first applied to a moist w 1 blowing: along the ocean over Astoria, in Oregon, from the direction of the camping-place of the Chinook Indians, near the mouth of the Columbia River. The term has since been extended, and its significance changed to stand for a much more important and larger influence. It is now applied charac-teristically to warm, dry winds descending east of the Cascade Range in Washington, and of the main range of the Rockies in Montana and Alberta. It was supposed to owe its existence and character to the warm Japan current, and this is still a common belief ; but this current is small and is 1,000 miles from the coast, and need not be assumed to account for even the warmth of the moist coast Chinook, as against the moderating influence of the great body of the Pacific. The warmth of the dry Chinook is due to a wholly different cause. It is due chiefly to the compression of air descending from the moun-tain, the moisture from which has been ab-stracted on the western slope of the Rockies. Its peculiarity is that it blows from the mountains and plateaus where ice and snow persist, and occurs on the prairies as a dry, hot wind. It has no relation to the warming effect of the sun, as it arrives as frequently in the dead of night as in the daytime. The beginning point for the prairie Chinook is a high pressure area in the Rocky Mountain plateau, as that over Utah or southern Idaho. This area customarily moves north from Cali-fornia and dissipates northerly, giving rise to a Chinook between the Cascades and Rockies northerly or north-westerly, as well as a north-easterly wind which climbs the main range of the Rockies. The movement of air up the mountains from the base of the anti-cyclonic column leads to its expansion from decreasing pressure as higher altitudes are reached. This expansion u.ses up heat. The capacity of air to retain moisture decreases as its temperature is lowered, so that condensation of its vapour occurs as the air reaches higher altitudes. Condensation of vapour renders sensible the latent heat used in previous evaporation, so that the lowering of temperature goes on at a rate below normal. The descent of the cun-ent on the east side of the Rockies means a heighten-ing of temperature from pressure of the upper volume of air. It is estimated that the increase is half a degree for every three hundred feet of descent. As the height of the mountains is from 5,000 to 8,000 feet, this means considerable direct gain. The warmth of the prairie Chinook will then be seen to be due to two causes : the evolving of latent heat by condensation of mois-ture on the western slope of the Rockies, and an increase of temperature due to compression on the eastern side. The effects of the Chinook are startling. It introduces April weather into midwinter, and may remove a foot of snow in a few hours. It makes possible the running of stock out of doors the year round . The visits of the Chinook lessen the danger of spring floods, by carrying off precipitation in instalments. The sudden changes in temperature do not seem to induce sickness and disorder, though changes of from 20 to 40 degrees in tempe'-ature may occur in fifteen minutes. On the other hand, it has given to localities over which it blows the name of being semi -arid. Though these areas have precipita-tion about equal to that in other parts of the province, the evaporation of rain and snow by the Chinook has reduced available moisture, or has made necessary the employment of special methods of soil culture to receive and retain moisture. Except for the Chinooks, which generally come with considerable velocity, the provinces are not subject to violent atmospheric disturbances. System of Survey. There are three systems of survey followed in the provinces of Manitoba, Saskatchewan, and Alberta. These systems are essentially the same, differing only with respect to the number and width of the road allowances. The first system is the one under which the older part of Manitoba, that portion of Saskatchewan lying east of the Second Meridian and south of Township 31, and small areas in the vicinity of Prince Albert, Rosthem, and Kinistino, have been surveyed. The second system is restricted to Townships 1 and 2, Ranges 1 to 8 inclusive ; Townships 19 to ?.0. Ranges 1 to 12 inclusive ; and Townships 27",
         "to PRAIRIE PROVINCE SUPPLEMENT 30 Ranges 13 to 16 inclusive. The third system IS the one uifdcr which the greater part of the land in Saskatchewan, Alberta, and the northern part of Manitoba has been laiti \u003c,tit. Under the first and second sjsiems of survey, a road allowance of one and one-half chains, or 99 feet in width, was provided around each section In the third system, road allowances one chain in width were allowed on every section line runnine north and south, and on every alternate section line running east and west, that is. along the north and south boundaries of the township, and along the second and fourth section lines north of the south boundary of the township. In all the systems, the land is uniformly laid out in quadrilateral townships about six miles square, and containing thirty-six sections each one mile square, together with certain allowances for roads, as in the accompanyin.s,- \u003c]iad the position of thero^5 anowLrnVt^i,,-!''' ''\u003c\"'»''«\"■?«»\u003c indicate in wldtii. Under thfi fl~i 2^.?\"'^® • 'jhich are one chain or «B feet portions 'of Manitoba ^,d.5ikato\"^^^ and one half ehai.is or « fcM ,\"1. wirttlfw ,i'i^„5\"''*''\"S\"' °\"? section. ™int in wiath «as laid off around each These sections are divided into quarters, and each quarter may be funher sulxlivided into forty-acre plots, styled legal subdivisions. In commencing the survey, the international boundary line was fixed upon as the starting point, and was called the first ba.se line. From It other lines, called initial meridians, were run due north. The first initial meridian, called the Principal Meridian, passes about eleven miles west of the town of Emerson, in Manitoba. The Second Meridian corresponds with longitude 102 the Third Meridian with longitude 106, and so on, each initial meridian after the second being four degrees west of the preceding one. For convenience in surveying, the land is first aid out into blocks. This is done bv surveying lines parallel to the first base line, and twenty- four miles, or the width of four townships, apart These are also called baselines, and are num-bered in regular order northward as far as the survey extends. These lines form the northern and southern boundaries of the blocks The eastern and western boundaries are formed by surveying meridians north and south from the base lines to the depth of two townships. Owing to the curvature of the earth's surface, these meridians approach each other as they extend northward, and diverge as they extend south-ward ; and as the blocks have been laid out of a uniform width of twenty-four miles, these meridians will not meet, thus giving rise to what is commonly known as a \" jog \" The lines along which this jog is laid off. and which are midway between and parallel to the base lines, are known as \" correction lines.\" They too, are numbered in regular order as they extend northward, the first correction line being twelve miles north of the first base line the second one twelve miles north of the second base line, and so on. Each block is then surveyed into sixteen townships, and each township is further sub-divided, as indicated above. In subdividing the blocks, the townships are laid out of the exact width of SIX miles along the base lines, exclusive of road allowances. The eastern and western boundaries are then run due north and .south till the correction lines are reached. The townships are numbered in regular order from the 49th parallel, or first base line north-ward. The first tier of townships adjoining this base line on the north is called Township I,",
         "the 6 PRAIRIE PROVINCE SUPPLEMENT second tier north Township II, the third tier north Township III, and so on as far as the survey extends. These townships lie in rows or \"ranjres,\" and are numbered in regrular order east and west from the Principal Meridian, and west from the other initial meridians. Thus the first row of townships adjoining the Principal Meridian on the east is said to be in Range I, the second row is said to be in Range II, etc., east of the Principal Meridian. The first row of townships adjoining any initial meridian on the west is .said to be in Range I, the second row is said to be in Range II, etc., west of the Principal, First, Second, etc., Meridian, as the case may be. This numbering is continued until the next initial meridian is reached. The numbering of sections in each township begins in the s \u003enth-east comer. The ..-uth- east section is number 1, the one immediately west of it is number 2. The second row of sections begins with number 7, immediately above number 6, and the third with number 13, above 12, etc. In all townships subdivided as above, Sections 11 and 29 arc set apart for school purposes ; Sec-tion 8 and three-quarters of Section 26 belong to the Hud.son's Bay Company. In every fifth township the Hudson's Bay Company has in addition the other quarter of Section 26. Of the remaining sections, those bearing even numbers have been reserved by the Dominion Government for homestead entry, while of those bearing odd numbers a large number belong to the Canadian Pacific and to other railway companies. An exception to the sys'em mentioned above was made in the case i . certain settlements along the Saskatchewan and Red and other rivers in the different provinces in which the land was laid out in long, narrow strips fronting the rivers. The.se strips of land are called \" river lots.\" Transportation. The prairie provinces are served by three great systems of railway lines, the Canadian Pacific, Canadian Northern, and Grand Trunk Pacific. The main line of the Canadian Pacific, which was completed in 1885, is the only tran.scontinental line yet completed. It runs through the southern part of Manitoba and Saskatchewan at a distance of from sixty to one hundred miles north of the international boundary, turns north-west in Alberta, and leaves the province by the Kicking Horse Pass, about one hundred and seventy-five miles north of the southern boundary of the province. Its important branch lines are the Crowsnest Pass Railway, the Macleod, Calgary, and Edmonton branch, a line connecting Portage la Prairie and Wetaskiwin by way of Saskatoon, and another connecting Moosejaw and Lacombe. A branch running from Moosejaw south-east through Portal, is jiart of the Soo line, an alternate route to the east by St. Paul. Besides these, the system has a great number of branch lines in Manitoba and Saskatchewan. The Canadian Northern enters the prairie country near the south-east corner of Manitoba, and runs in a general north-westerly direction through Winnipeg and Battleford to Edmonton. From here its route is directly w to the Yellowhead Pass, from which point .vill run south-west and reach the coast at Vancouver. It has also a number of important branch lines ; one through north-western Manitoba runs north of the main line to Prince Albert, another con-nects Prince Albert, Saskatoon, and Regina, and a third connects Regina with Winnipeg. A branch rtinning directly north connects Edmonton and Athabaska Landing. It has branches from Saskatoon and Vegreville to Calgary. It also has branches running south into the United States. Controlled by the Canadian Pacific Railway Company, the Alberta Railway and Irrigation Company has a small system between Leth- bridge and Coutts connecting with the Great Northern system, and a branch line from Stirling to Cardston. The Grand Trunk Pacific runs north- wresterly from Winnipeg to Edmonton. Its route is then west to the Yellowhead Pass and north-westerly to Prince Rupert, on the Pacific Coast. It has a branch from Regina north-east to Melville, one from Tofield to Calgary completed, and a number of other branches projected. Before the advent of railways considerable traffic was carried on by flat-bottomed boats and canoes in the North Saskatchewan",
         "and PRAIRIE PROVINCE SUPPLEMENT other rivers of the province. At present steamers ply east and west of Prince Albert and on Lake Winnipeg:. Improvements at the foot of Lake Winnipeg and at the rapids below Prince Albert will give a water route between Edmonton and Wmmpeg. Steamers ply on the Athabaska and Peace Rivers, and on Lesser Slave Lake. POPULATION The Indians. The aboriginal inhabitants of Western Canada were the Indians. They were practically in undisturbed occupation of many parts of the western provinces within the memory of living men, and are still seen in all the pro-vinces unmixed with civilized new-comers. In all the provinces, likewise, there has been con-siderable intermarrying of the white and red races, and half-breeds are common throughout the three provinces. The great Algonquin nation, with its Crees. Ojibwas, and Blackfeet, stretched from Labra-dor, past Hudson Bay, to the Rocky Mountains. The Swamp Crees were between Lake Winnipeg and Hudson Bay, the Wood Crees along the . North Saskatchewan, and the Plain Crees in Southern Saskatchewan, while the Blackfeet were in Southern Alberta. The Ojibwas were on the present western boundary of Manitoba and around the Qu'Appelle. The Assiniboines were along the inner slope of the Rock:( \u003e-: To the north the great Athabaska nation .,pread from Hudson Bay to Alaska and up to the Eskimo country. A remnant of them, the Sarcees, were as far south as Calgary. A small settlement of Iroquois were near Edmonton, and a larger number around the headwaters of the Athabaska, having been brought out origin-ally by the North-West Fur Company. Their distribution has remained about the same, but they are now confined to reserves allotted by the Dominion Government. An attempt is being made to teach them the arts of the white men. Some progress is possible on the industrial side. Ranching and a little cultivation are practised. All efforts at liberal culture appear to be wasted on them. They cannot be assimilated to the white man's civiliza-tion on the intellectual and social sides ; and not only this, the cramp of settlement is fatal to them. They are becoming fewer in numbers annually. The total Indian population of the three prairie provinces is only 24,141. White Population. The greater part of the present population of the prairie provinces is British or Canadian. Though the population IS quite cosmopolitan with respect to the number of peoples represented, British and Canadian people predominate in seven eighths of the settled area of the country. The order in which the British people stand as to numbers is English, Scotch, and Irish in the order named. Next to British and British-Canadian come French, fol-lowed by Germans, Scandinavians, and Aus- trians. A considerable section of recent additions to population consists of reixttriated Canadians from the United States. The .social and political ideals of the western provinces are distinctly and essentially those belonging to people who have been bred under the British flag. The foreign population of Western Canada is made up of industrious and law-abiding people. The vigour of school administration in the different provinces . is rapidly moulding them to Canadian ideals. The establishment of white settlement and white domination of the vast interior of Canada followed different lines and directions from those which have been more recently followed with the introduction of a transcontinental railway. From the nucleus of the Selkirk colony in Manitoba, the general route of exploration and serious settlement was along the North Saskatchewan Valley, by way of the Touchwood Hills, to Battleford and Edmonton. These three points stand for early development in settlement and cultivation. The advent of the Canadian Pacific Railway swung settlement along the southern part of the prairie. Latterly, with the build-ing of the Grand Trunk Pacific and Canadian Northern, a new area for settlement has been opened up, and settlement is spreading rapidly northward. The proposed Hudson Bay route still farther north will open not only new an as for settlement and cultivation, but will develop the forest, lake, and mineral resources of all the provinces, and inaugurate a new era in transportation by shortening the route to Liver-pool, as well as reducing the cost by shorter rail and relatively longer water",
         "transportation. 8 PRAIRIE PROVINCE SUPPLEMENT OoTernment. The government of the provinces of Manitoba, Saskatche^van, and Alberta con-sists of a Lieutenant-Governor, appointed by the Dominion Government, an executive council representing: the party having: a majority in *he legrislature, and j.n elected Legislative Assembly. MANITOBA Position. The Province of Manitoba is situated along the southern boundary of the Dominion, about midway between the east and west coasts. It is the most easterly of the three prairie pro- \\ ■ ccs. It is bounded on the north by the 60th parallel ; on the south by the United States ; on the east by the Province of Ontario, and a small part of the United States, including- a part of the Lake of the Woods ; and on the west by the Province of Saskatchewan. The 60th parallel forms the northern boundarj-, and the 49th the southern. Area. Its area is 251,832 square miles. Surface. Approximately, half of the province of Manitoba consists of land in the area of the first prairie steppe, which runs north-westerly through the province. On the east side the Laurentian Plateau falls within the province to the extent of about a fifth of the total area of the province. The second prairie steppe, whose eastern boundary runs from the north-west cor-ner of Manitoba to a point east of the middle of the south boundary, covers fully a fourth of the area of the province on the west and south-west. The middle area gives the province its charac-teristic feature, being generally rich level prairie land of great depth and fertility. The elevation of Lake AV'innipeg is 700 feet above the level of the sea, and the average elevation of the whole of the first prairie steppe is only 800 feet. It is in this area that almost the whole of the water surface of the province occurs, which is about one seventh of the total area of the province. The boundary between the first and second prairie steppes is marked by a series of eleva-tions which occur under the names of Pembina Mountains, Riding Mountains, and Duck Moun-tains, in Manitoba, the Porcupine Hills on the boundary, and the Pasquia Hills in Saskat-chewan The Turtle Mountains lie in an • related group in the south-western part of the province. The Riding, Duck, and Turtle Mountains are held as timber reserves by the federal govern-ment. The part of Manitoba in the second prairie steppe is more rolling than the central portion, but the cc\"trast in surface between it and the surface of the first prairie steppe is not great. The Laurentian area, on the other hand, in the east and north-east of the province, is more abrupt in slope and more diversified in surface. It is rough, broken, rocky, and wooded with light timber. Some portions of •♦ are wet and boggy. The effect of the rivers in relation to surface features varies. In the second prairie steppe the Assiniboine, at the western boundary of Manitoba, flows in a channel from 250 to 300 feet deep, the sides of which are locally known as \" cutbanks,\" v.nile in the first prairie steppe the rivers frequently overflow their '^^nks. The rivers in this steppe are filled with j.Jiment in the bottom. The erosion is wholly lateral, and the rivers are generally very wide. In the Laurentian slope of the province the rivers have cut deep, rocky channels through their valleys. Tree growth is common on the banks of the rivers of the second prairie steppe, and to a less extent along the banks of the rivers of the first prairie steppe. The Laurentian plateau is generally wooded, though the timber, except in the north, is not heavy. South-eastern Manitoba is fairly well wooded. Drainage. The whole of the drainage of the province of Manitoba finds its way to Hudson Bay by the Nelson River. The great gathering- place of the rivers of the province is Lake Winnipeg, which receives its waters from slopes on the south, west, and east sides. The Red River is the largest and most important river of the province. It rises in the state of Minnesota, flows north for 700 miles, and empties into the most southerly extremity of Lake Winnipeg. It carries a vast amount of sediment, with which a large delta is being formed at the head of the lake, and which interferes with lake and river navigation. The western slope of the province is made tributary to the Red River basin by the entrance of the Assiniboine at Winniijcg. The Assiniboine rises in the pro-vince of Saskatchewan and flows",
         "south-easterly. PRAIRIE PROVINCE SUPPLEMENT After crossing the Manuoba boundary it receives the gu'Appelle, also from Saskatchewan, at Fort ElHce. and finally flows east till it reaches the Red River. A second important tributary of the Assiniboine is the Souris. The Souris rises in the Missouri Coteau, flows east through the greater part of Saskatchewan, turns south into Dakota and, doublinff back, enters the Assiniboine east of Brandon. From the Riding Mountains a third tributary, the Little Saskat-chewan, is received. The Pembina is a tributary entering- the Red near the boundary. The western slope of the province to the north is represented in the Dauphin River, which drains Lakes Dauphin, Winnipegosis, and Manitoba into Lake Winnipeg through the Fairford River and Lake St. Martin. The chief river entering Lake Winnipeg on the east is Winnipeg River, which, with its tributaries the White- mouth and Bird, drain the south eastern por-tion of the province. The Winnipeg River has its source in the Lake of the Woods. Its course is rapid and is frequently broken by S/. Andrews Kapids and Bridgf, Red River. rapids and falls, which offer large possibilities for the development of power enterprises, one of which has already been inaugurated at Lac du Bonnet. Numerous small streams enter Lake Winnipeg farther north. As has been seen, the lakes of Manitoba are an integral part of ih'^ drainage sv-stem. Besides this, the lakes are interesting by reason of their being the centre of an ancient basin containing a much greater volume of water than the present lakes contain, and which has had an important influence on the economy and industry of ihe province. Lake Agassiz is the name applied to this body. It covered about three quarters of the present area of Manitoba, ani extended into Ontario and the United States, the western boundary being the lin^ of hills marking the eastern bt ; 'ary of the second prairie steppe. By reason of Lake Winnipeg being the centre of such a large sedimentary basin, it is extremely shallow in relation to its area. Lakes Manitoba and Winnipegosis are of the same character. These two bodies are of the same elevation, the current of the connecting stream, Ebb and Flow River, flowing north or south according to the direction of wind pressure on the surface of the lakes. The outlets to Dauphin and Swan lakes are the Mossy and Shoal rivers respectively both emptying into Lake Winnipegosis All the important lakes of the province are thus seen to be tributary to the great drainage reservoir of Lake Winnipeg. Lake Winnipeg Itself has a length of 250 miles, and varies in width from 25 to 60 miles. It is in no place more than 70 feet deep, and its channels must be carefully followed in navigation. The proximity of the large lakes to the centreof population of the prov-ince is important on account of the oppor- ?s they afford for rec. tion. They are attractive to the sports-man and to the summer visitor. Winnipeg Beach, Whytewold, and Ponemahare popu-lar summer resorts on Lake Winnipeg. Climate. The province of Manitoba, being situated at a long distance from the moderating influence of large bodies of water, and in the temperate zone, is subject to extremes of heat and cold. Summer heat frequently rising to 90 degrees, and winter cold as low as 40 degrees below zero, are not uncommon. The great evaporating basin of the lakes exercises a per-ceptible influence in the reduction of summer heat locally. The seasons are usually steady and well-defined. The snow lies without inter-ruption in winter, the spring is marked by liberal rainfall and very rapid growth, and the summers are warm and conducive to the full ripening of the characteristic cereal crops . The autumns are sharp and generally clear and highly enjoyable. The snow is dry and the air clear and bracing in winter. The precipitation is ade-quate to the growth of heavy crops throughout the province, being about twenty inches",
         "anrually 10 PRAIRIE PROVINCE SUPPLEMENT IIIDUSTKIES AND KI80USCES Agriculture. Manitoba stands in the first rank for the quality of its wheat among the different wheat-producintr countries of the world. Grain- growing is the chief industry of the province. The soil of the greater part of ihe province being the sediment of an ancient lake topped by centuries of decayed vegetation, is in most places extremely rich in the elements of plant food. The soil of the second prairie steppe is somewhat lighter than it is in the first steppe. The climate, as respects both the liberal moisture of June and the heat of liurvest time, is the other imp(jrtant condition to successful giain-growing. The long days of sunshine and the short nights have an important influence. Crops are likewi.se aided by the deep frosts of winter, which insure the gradual rise of moisture by capillarity and support the crops notwithstanding occasional interruptions of precipitation. The other grain crops grown are oats, barley, rye, and flax. All kinds of tame grasses .succeed, and mixed prairie hay of fine nutritive properties can be cut in abundance in both prairie and slough land. Fodder com is a successful crop. The system of agr' uUure is being rapidly modified by the substituting of mixed farming for grain-growing. Fodder crops are being more generally grown, and the returns from land increased and made more certain and stable by more complex and varied production. Mani-toba excels in the quality of its heavy horse stock and shorthorn cattle. The province raises a large number of cattle of export quality ; and dairying, hog, and sheep raising are becoming settled and important adjuncts to cultivation. In certain districts dairying has become a special industry. The chief agricultural exports are grain and cattle to the British market, and dairy products to the western provinces and the Yukon. An important development of the grain-grow-ing industry of the province is the trade in seed grain arising from the perfection and constitution of the northern grown grain. Vegetables, nxsts, and small fruits are other crops that succeed well, and tree fruits are being experimented with for the development of hardy varieties for general use in the province. Lumbering is carried on in the northern part of the province chiefly tributary to Lake Winni-peg. Selkirk, Winnipeg, and Brandon have saw-mills. The chief kinds of timber found in the province are spruce, poplar, jackpine, birch, and tamarac. The chief sawn timber of the province is spnice, which is useful for IcK-ai needs, but the indu.stry drjcs not meet the general needs of t!.e province for this class of building material, British Columbia furnishing a considerable part of the lumber reciuired. Fishiug. The fishing industry is of great im-portance and commercial value to the province. All the lakes, Winnii)eg, Manitoba, Winnipe- gosis, and Dauphin, abound witli a good class of *- *_ .:3 ff^ ^J^j^^^'^ \"■■WfPH MTtHOlY \"^ •• : -T. - ' ■ 1 p. ■^FrVrc ' \"^S '■' j^lil fish Hatchery at Selkirk. food-fishes, such as trout, whitefish, sturgeon, pickerel, perch, and pike, the most important and valuable being whitefish and sturgeon. The industry engages considerable capital in tugs, boats, freezers, and other equipment, and gives employment to a great many people. The greater part of the catch finds a market in the United States. The industry is under strict government supervision and regulation. Mining. Manitoba is not rich in minerals. Soft coal occurs in Turtle Mountain in the south-west but there is no actual mining. At Gypsum- ville, on Lake Manitoba, gypsum is found and treated. Salt is found adjacent to Lakes Mani-toba and Winnipegosis, and limestone is quarried at Stonewall and Stony Mountain. At Tyndall a fine quality of finishing stone is quarried, which has a large sale within and outside of",
         "the PRAIRIE PROVINCE SUPPLEMENT 11 province. Irun ha.s been found at Black Island in Lake Winnipej^, but is nut mined. Manufacturing is becoming' of considerable importance in Manitoba, chiefly in relation to the materials of the common resources of the province. Flour-mills are common everywhere, and all of them manufacture for exp\u003cjrt. Cereal foods of all kinds are manufactured and ex-ported. Lar«-e packing concerns are established in WinnijjeR. The making of bricks, drain tile, and other clay prtxhicts, is Injcominff a larj^^e industry. Lime-burnin«: is an important in-dustry. The manufacture of farm imjilements, wire fencing-, and throshins: machines is carried on in Winnipeg,' and Hrandon. Winnipeg Ix-injs' one of the great transportation points of the three transcontinental railways, the work (jf the shops gives employment to a large number of men. The manufacture of iron and steel struc-tural material is becoming very important. Leather manufactures, principally of harness and saddles, are important. They produce for a large western demand. Biscuits, pickled goods, and cigars are manufactured in Winni-peg, and gla.ss at Beausejour, east of Winnipeg. Transportation. Manitoba, in common with other prairie provinces, requires large trans-portation facilities to carry the immense weight and bulk of grain towards the great export points and to distribute wholesale commodities to the west. The greater part of the crop moves out to Fort William and Port Arthur for lake shipment while navigation is open. Three great companies, the Canadian Pacific, the Canadian Northern, and the Grand Trunk Pacific, have lines running through the province and connect-ing, or being about to connect, both coasts of the Dominion. The Canadian Pacific and Canadian Xorthem and Cireat Northern have routes to the south. All the great lines of rail-way are running lines north-west to serve the needs of distribution and production in the northern parts of Saskatchewan, and more particnlariy of Alberta. The province is a net-work of branches and cross lines. Navigation is not important, except on Lake Winnipeg ; and up the river as far as Winnipeg, the railways have taken the place of river trans-portation. It is certain, however, that water trans]. ortation, particuhirly on the Saskatche-wan, will be facilitated by improvements which will overcome the raiiids, and that a long water route from beyond Edmonton to Winnipeg will be developed. At present the railway companies are laying lines to secure territory, but the economy of water traffic will mean its later use. Closelv- connected with the transportation facilities of the province is the vast storage capacity represented in the elevator system. The chief terminal elevators are at Fort William and Port Arthur. In the province hundreds of the.se appear along tne lines of railway. CITIES irinnipeg, the cajiital, and the largest city cr the province, is situated at the junction of the Assinilx.ine with ihe Red River, ft was origi-nally a trading-i^ost and fort of the Hudso \"s Bay Company, anu was called Fort Garry. 1 its growth has occurred within the past twenty- five or thirty years. It is a striking example of the speed of development of a western civiliza-tion for which it characteristically stands. It is just at the entrance to the be.,t part of the great prairie provinces, and practically all the heavy traffic between Western and Eastern Canada passes through it. All distribution to the west- em provinces takes place from Winnipeg, or passes through it. It has three great lines of railway, the Canadian Pacific, Canadian Nor-thern, and Grand Trunk Pacific, running from coast to coast, passing through it, and the Great Northern from St. Paul enters Winnipeg. In addition to this, innumerable branch lines bring a large area of productive country directly tribu-tary to the city. It is the educational, political, commercial, financial, and railway centre of the province. It is the headquarters of the govern-ment telephone system, which has a vast net-work of lines in almost all the towns and villages as well as in the rural districts of the province. The University of ^lanitoba, St. John's, Mani-toba, and Wesley Colleges, the Agricultural College, Medical College. School of Pharmacy, the Institute for the Deaf and Dumb, and Pro-vincial Normal School, comprise the educational institutions of provincial importance. The edu-cational ser\\'ices of the city itself are of",
         "the 12 Pk AIRIE PROVINCE SUPPLEMENT best possible character. The public schools are unsurpassed, and the hiph schools are of a specially modem type, in relation to industrial and technical, as well as academic training^. The public and business buildinjfs are generally eood. The manufacturing: interests of the city include the making of flour, biscuits, soap, lumber, cured meats, wire fencing, ajrricultural imple-ments, leather goods, cigars, pickles, clothing, and articles of iron. The largest abattoirs in Western Canada are at Winnipeg. Its interests are largely railway and commercial, but it will no doubt increase in importance in manu-facturing. Brandon is situated on the Assiniboine River, about 125 miles west of Winnipeg. It is on the main line of the Canadian Pacific Railway, and on a branch of the Canadian Northern Railway, and is the terminus of a branch of the Great Northern as well as of a number of other branch lines. It has a college and good local educa-tional services. One of the Provincial Asylums, an Industrial School, and a Dominion Experi-mental Farm are located at Brandon. It has manufactures of lumber, woollen goods, and farm implements. It is supported by a fine grain and live-stock district, being specially well known for its draught horses. Portage la Prairie is situated about midway between Winnipeg and Brandon in thfe centre of a highly productive district called the Portage Plains. It is an important railway point. It has the three great Canadian main line systems, and a number of branch lines. An Indian Industrial School and the Provincial Home for Incurables are situated at Portage la Prairie. It has large elevators and flour-mills. Towns The towns of Manitoba are local market towns in most cases, and their growth is limited to the growth of the districts they serve. Some of them have already developed large business in-terests owing to the wealth of production and the rapid improvements about them, and a few are aided by special industries in addition to the grain and retail trades. St. Boniface, opposite Winnipeg on the Red River, has woollen-mills, flour-mills and brick yards. It is connected with the capital by a number of bridges. It has a French College and Normal School, a fine Roman Catholic Cathedral and Convent. It has interesting historical associations. West Selkirk is at the head of Lake Winnipeg, and is connected with Winnipeg by a suburban line. It has lumber-mills, a nsh-hatchery, and large fish trade. An asylum for the insane is situated at Selkirk. Stonewall, also north of Winnipeg, has large quarries. Near Stonewall is Stony Mountain, where the Provincial Peni-tentiary is located. Carberry SinCi Virden are grain shipping points on the Canadian Pacific west of Winnipeg. The latter is one of the most attractive residential towns in the province. Dauphin is a divisional ix)int on the main line of the Canadian Northern Railway, and is the market centre for a large agricultural district between the Riding and Duck Mountains on the west, and Lake Dauphin on the east. The country is specially adapted to mixed farming. Other towns to the north are Grand View and Swan River. Neepawa, Gladstone, Minnedosa, Birtle, Bin- scarth, and Russell are situated on the Yorkton branch of the Canadian Pacific Railway. Neepa-wa is the centre of a rich country known as the Beautiful Plains. Minnedosa lies in the valley of the Little Saskatchewan. Both towns have railway connection with Brandon. Morden, Manitou, Killarney, Boissevain, and Deloraine are on the Deloraine branch of the Canadian Pacific. They are among the oldest towns of the province, and are centres for highly developed agricultural districts. Melita,Napinka, Souris, Treherne, and Carman are flourishing market towns on the Glenbow branch of the Canadian Pacific Railway. Souris is an important divisional point and has flour- mills and other mai '\"cturing interests. Emerson and Gretn^ /e on the south bound-ary, the former on the Canadian Pacific, and the latter on the Canadian Northern railway. Both are customs",
         "ports. PRAIRIE PROVINCE SUPPLEMENT IS SASKATCHBWAR Potltlon. The province of Saskatchewan i» the middle one of the three prairie provinces. It 18 bounded on the north by the North-West Territories and on the stnith by the United States ; on the east by the province of Manitoba, and on the west by the province of Alberta It is separated from the North-West Territories by the 60th parallel of latitude, and from the United States by the 49th parallel. It lies west of the second meridian as far south as latitude 56 from which point the meridian between ranges 29 and 30 west of the principal meridian forms the dividing line to the international boundary. The 110th meridian separates it from the pro-vince of Alberta. TAe Cnlhgf, oneofllu many stately buM„,g.s, Univ.rs.ty of tMskptchevan, Saskatoon. Area. The province extends for 750 miles from north to south, and is 250 miles wide at the north and 400 miles wide at the south. Its area is 250,000 square miles. Surface. The characteristic surface features of the southern part of Saskatchewan are those of the second prairie .steppe. Though the con-ventional boundaries of the province do not correspond with the natural b(nmdaries of this elevation, the greater part of the second prairie steppe is included in the province. The province of Manitoba includes a small portion of this elevation, while the province of Saskatchewan cuts off a similar portion in the south-western corner from the third prairie steppe. Saskatche-wan is midway between Manitoba and Alberta with respect to elevation and surface aspect. Its average elevation is about 1,600 feet, and its surface, while not showing great variations, It slightly more rolling than the surface o.' Manitoba. Its rivers show deefHJr channels, and buttes and groups of hills are more common. The chief elevations of the southern part of the province are the series of elevations marking the eastern and western boundaries of the second prairie steppe. Tho.se lying within the province on the east side are the Porcupine and Pasquia Hills, and on the west side the Dirt Hills, the Coteaii, Hear Hills, and Eagle Hills. Other isolated elevations or groups of hills are Moose Mountain. Touchwood Hills. Wood Mountain and Cypress Hills. Smaller elevations, called buttcs.\" (K-cur in the southern parts of the province. The pi vince north of the 52nd parallel is diversified by bluffs and an increas-ing number of patches of scrub and soft timber but with large stretches of open land. North of the North Saskatchewan River the land is (|uite diversified in aspect and surface. Wooded areas become more prominent, the timber is larger, and the country is well watered by numerous lakes and streams. The Laurentian Plateau reaches into the province on the north-east corner. Tlie southern part of the province is not marked by many large lakes. They are usually local basins, and are not connected with the .vreneral drainage system. Many of them are alkaline. The most important are Chaplin Johnston, Last Mountain, and Big Quill' Farther north are Lake Jlontreal and Lac La Ronge. At the head of the Churchill is a chain of lakes, chief of which are Island, Clear and Buffalo lakes. The largest lakes of the province are those skirting the Laurentian Plateau of which Reindeer, Wollaston. and Athabaska are the most important. With the exception of Chaplin, Johnston, and Quill, these lakes are usually well stocked with fish. Drainage. The general slope of the province IS easteriy or slightly north-easterly. The Hudson Bay receives the major part of the drainage, but the northern part is drained to the Arctic Ocean through the Mackenzie system and a small strip south of the height of land to the Gulf of Mexico through the Mississippi system. The chief rivers flowing east are the Souns and Qu'Appelle, both rising in",
         "Sas- 14 PRAIRIK PROVINCE SUPPLEMENT katchewan, and tributary to the AsHiniboinc ; the North and South Sask itchewan, riNin\u003ef in Alberta and joininjf near Prince Albert, and ^ flowinjr into Lake WinnipeKf ; and the Churchill in the north, which flows directly into Hudson Bay. ImiKirtant tribut.iries of the North anrl Stjuth Saskatchewan are the Rattle River and the Red Deer, botli risinj,' in Alberta and joininjr the North and South Saskatchewan in Saskatchewan. The Churchill is fed by a series of lakes and small rivers on the western side of the province. The greater part of I^ke Athabaska lies within the province, its chief tributary beinp the Chipman. It is drained to Great Slave Lake by the Slave River, antl thence to the Arctic Ocean by the Mackenzie River. Two small streams called Rattle Creek and Frenchman River flow south, and become tributary to the Missouri. Climate. The province of Saskatchewan, by reason of its ix)siti\"n in the interior of the con-tinent, and becau^ it is situated in the tem-perate zone, has an extreme climate. The south-western part of the province, however, has milder winters than the rest of the pro-vince, owing: to the influence of the Chin(x\u003ek winds. It is likewise drier in summer. The winter season is generally steady and the snow-fall is fairly heavy. The atmosphere is clear, dry, and bracing. The snow is light and dry. High winds are not common in winter, but when they occur occasionally develop into severe storms on account of the lightness of the snow. The snowfall is slightly heavier in the north than in the south. The average annual precipitation of the pnn-ince is between fifteen and twenty inches, two thirds of which occurs between April and September. High tempera-tures are sometimes reached during the summer days, but the nights are always cool and in-vigorating. The country is free from violent atmospheric disturbances. The climate on the whole, and in conjunction with the phenomenal excellence of the land, makes for the highest success in wheat growing. The progress of crops in spring and early summer is very rapid, and the ripening process is intensified by the bright sunshine and dry weather of ha*' time. mDUSTKIU AlID REIODtCBt Africnlttira. The province of Saskatchewan is essentially an agricultural country, four-fifths of the population being engageil in agricultural pursuits. Its oiwratiois are commonly on a large scale, steam an.l gasoline |H)wer being employed in the larger enterprises. The soil is very fertile and endu-ing, and the climate ideal for the prcxluction of the best ixissible nuality of cereals, r(X)ts, and grasses. The growing sea.v)n is marked by liberal rainfall, alxiut half of the precipitation falling within the months of May, Jur.c, and July, and the harvesting pericxl by ccntinuoiis, bright, dry weather. Threshing is done in the \u003c)\\H:n. The (|uality of wheat Ploughing by Traelion Kngine on ihe f^tairit: Aote that the engine is breaking ten /urrc'u'S and thertfott doing the wort of twenty horses. grown is etjual to that of the best wheat areas of the world. Barley, oats, and flax succeed equally well, and all classes of vegetables and small fruits are grown in abundance. The usual varieties of tame hay yield heavily, and the prairie furnishes large quantities of native hay. Practically all development is south of the North Saskatchewan River ; but the open stretches of country to the north, where the soil is of great depth and fertility, will display heavy production in the near future. In the best settled parts of the country dairying and live-stock interests are developing rapidly. Herds of registered stock .^re cnrrmnr!, and special feeding enterprises are carried on at the large elevator towns. The \"park district\"",
         "is I'kAIRIE PROVINCE SITTLEMENT IS not u» cttHJly broken hh the oiwn prairie tliKtritt, and stock -jrrovvifuf is umiully associated with cultivation in this area. The south-west comer of the province was formerly ^iven over to ranchinjr on account of the suitability of its climate to winter jTrazinjf. but the .\u003ei)en ranjre area is beinjf rapidly settled by the home-steader. Ranjfe proi)erties in horses, cattle. • ind sheep .still persist, but larjre holdiuKs are becominjf impossible. Lumbering. The extreme southern part of the province is wholly open prairie, but patches of brush and light timber appear in the northern half of the part of the province south of the North Sa.skatchewan. The timber in tiiis district is chiefly pole timber, which is use-ful for local settlers. The men hintable timber grow- north of the Saskatchewan, and it occurs in such (|uantity as to form the bjisis of an active industry in lumber, and to become an important .source of suiiply for the province. The timber is white spruce, which jrrr)ws to a size of from two to three feet in diameter, and black spnice, birch, tamarack, and jack pine, the last beinjr used i)rinci|)ally for ties. Prince Albert is the centre of the lumber indu.stiy. Fur Trading is still an important industry. The chief furs takei are bear, otter, beaver, mink, wolf, marten, and musk-ox. The chief fur-tradinjT centres are Prince Albert and Hattleford. The output is valued at S200,000 annually. Mining is carried on principally in the Souris district. The coal is li«rnite, and does not com-pete with the harder varieties of Alberta coal, except locally. The two chief centres at which coal is mined are Bienfait and Roche Percee. Including the Wood Mountain, Cypress Hills, and Willow Bunch districts alunjr with the Souris, the e.stimated coal area in Saskatche-wan is 7,500 square miles, with an estimated tonnag-e of twenty billions. About 200,000 tons were mined in 1910. Gold is found in small quantities in the sands of the North Sas-katchewan. Fishing is yearly becoming more imiwrtant. The northern lakes abound with a «-ood quality of whitefish, pike, pickerel, and sturgeon, which are caught through the ice in winter-time. Tile industry not only furnishes larKc local supplies of fcMKl. but is the basis of an imiwrtant trade with e; stern and southern markets. Manufacturing. The most imin.nant manu-facturing interests are those connected with the c(mverting of cereals into fixKls. Flour-mills are comnu-n throughout the i)rovince. The makingof cement and bricks is a thriving and important industry. TransporUUon. Three railway companies are ojH-rating in the province. The Canadian Pacific mair line and the Porta:.re la Prairie- Wetaskiwin branch traverse the province. From Moosejaw the Soo line runs south-east, leaving the province at Portal, and the Lacomlie branch runs north-west. The com-pany has T my other short lines. The Cana-dian Northern and Grand Trunk Pacific main lines nm almost parallel to each other north-westerly through the province. The Canadian Northern has important lines connecting Kegina, Saskatwm, and Prince Albert, and Prince Albert with Dauphin, Man., as well as a number of other branches in the southern part of the i)rovince. The Grand Trunk Pacific has a number of branch lines in ccjurse \u003c\u003e( construction. Th.jn is considerable need of colcmization roads, to make the resources of the north available to the .southern part of the province. CITIES Ktgina, the capital of Saskatchewan, is on the main line of the Canadian Pacific Railway and on the southern branch of the Canadian Northern Railway, running from Winnipeg to Prince Albert. It is the terminus of the Areola and Moose M.juntain section of the Canadian Pacific between Brandon and Regina, and is connected with the Grand Tnmk Pacific by a branch from Melville. It is an imponant terminal point for both the Canadian Northern and Grand Trunk Pacific lines. The district surrounding Regina is one of the best wheat sections in western Canada, and it has under-gone rapid development in the last few vears. The city has a large distributing business north, south, and west, and a heavy local trade supported by the productive area tributary",
         "to 16 I'RAlRIIi PROVINCE SUPPLEMENT the city. Itn Mchuulit, churcheH, and other public biii!ilin;,'H are of cnitsitandtni; excellence, and its buMincsM bl(x:ka und humcH Nubtitantial. The city in well paved and hus good parks and boating; facilitieii. Its utilitieH arc owned by the cily. The Provincial Normal School is nituated at Kes:ina, and the city is the headquarters of the Royal North-West Mounted Police. SiiikatooH is situated on the S\u003cjuth Saskatche-wan River. It has imp\u003cjrtant railway interest.s. It is on the main line of the Grand Trunk Pacific Railway, and on an imiwrtant branch of the Canadian Pacific between Portage la Prairie and Edmonton. It \\* connected with the main line of the Canadian Northern at War- man, thirteen miles north, and with Regina by a branch line of the Canadian Northern run- ninyr south-east. A branch of the same line runs from Saskatoon to Caljjary. The facilities of the city for distribution could scarcely be improveil ujxjn. It is already an active com-mercial centre. Its j;-rowth from a villajfc to an imjxjrtant city has all taken pUice in half a dozen years. The district around Saskatoon is an excellent grain and stock country, and is already highly improved. The Provincial University is located at Saskatoon. Among the faculties of the University, that of agriculture is being given prominence, in order to relate the work of the university to the dominant interests of the province. A large experi-mental farm is part of the university site. One of the Provincial Normal Schools is located here. Moosejaw is on the main line of the Canadian Pacific Railway. It is a divisional point, and an important junction point on the Canadian Pacific. It is the junction of the Soo line nmning south-west through Portal to St. Paul, and of a branch running north-west by Outlook, to Lacombe, Alta. Many new lines and branches are projected. There are large shops in the city for the work of the company. The country around Moosejaw is excellent wheat land, and is well settled. The city has large elevator capacity, one of the largest flour-mills in the west, and large abattoir and stock yards. Feeding enterprises are carried on from the elevator waste and screenmgs. The city has excellent schools, churches, nnu other public buildings, and Mubstantiul business bliK-ks. Prince Albtrt is situated on the south bank of the North Saskatchewan on a site of great naturoi beauty. It is the terminus of the Regina and Prince Albert branch of the Canadian North-ern, and of a branch of the same line from Dauphin, Man. Extensions of this line south-west to Battleford and north-west toward Lake Athabaska are now being made. A branch of the Grand Trunk Pacific from Young is nearing completion. Prince Albert is the centre for the lumber trade and the fish ;rade of the province, which are both expanding rapidly. It has large flour-mills and a large packing plant. It is the chief fur em]X)rium of the province, and the most important distributing t\u003eoint for supplies to the north. Power is being developed from the rapids of the Saskatchewan east of the city. It is making rapid i)rogrcss in the establishment of goiKl schools and other services and utilities. The country about Prince Albert has a deep black soil of great fertility. North Dattleford is an important city and a divisional point on the Canadian Northern Rail-way. A branch line runs north. It is situated on the north side \u003c ' rli . ' irth .Sass.'.v.-hcwan River. TOWNS The growth of towns with resi)ect to both number and size has been very rapid. There are already over fifty towns and four times as many incorporated villages in the province. The transportation involved in the immense wheat production of the province has made immense elevator capacity necessary, which has given rise to a great number of market iwints on all lines of railway. Many of them are of local imix)rtance only, but the growth of branch lines of railway has already increased the busi-ness and traffic of a number of jxjints to take account of wider relations than those of the immediate district. Most of the larger towns exemplify an active municipal spirit, and own and oixjrate their own public utilities. Indian Head, on the main line of the Canadian Pacific Railway, east of Regina, is one of the oldest and wealthiest towns of the prov-ince. It has nine elevators, large",
         "flour-mills, I'kAIklK PROVINCE SlTl'PLEMENT and mh .nd door factnnc. I, in wdl cc,„i„|H..d for modem public utilities, which are ownd an.l operated by the town. Surr.,nndin« „ is a f.ne agricultural ccntry wl.ich has bt-en infh.cncnl by the work .,f the Dominion F-xpcritncntal Farm. The forestry branch „i thi- farm is doinir an important work for the prairio ,.rovinces bv the distribution of trees as well as bv its ,lcm.,n- Mration work. To the wcs, is C\u003e«'./M//^ one of the oldest settlements of ,1k- province, an.l to the east l^o/se/o; Orn,M/, Uroadiuw an.l Afooiomin. Broadview is a divisional ,,..int and Moosomin i.s makin«- ra,.id i.roK'rcss with respect to public .services and utilities Swift Current o.m\\ Af„pU Cr..k are the- .....st mipr.tant towns west of .M.^st-jaw. .Swift Current is a divisional p\u003c,int. Maple Creek was formerly a ranch centre, but is now sur- rounded by farms. Both t..wns serve lar^-e r.reas north and south with supplies. Eitnan, Alameda, (\u003eiA'7r.and Camd^riArx, im-portant market towns in the rich southeastern part of the province. Estevan is the centre ..f the coal industry, and has larire brickvards. Weyburn is the larjjcst town on the P.,rtal- Moosejaw secti.m. It is an important junction point and is dcvelopinj,' rapidlv in up-to-date municipal utilities. Fast of ,, „„ the Moose Mountain section, are Areola and Carlyh: I.umsden, on the Prince Albert branch north of Repina, is a fine live-stock centre. North of it on the same line are Davidson and Dnmiun,. Outlook is a H-rowinsr divisional jioint on the Moosejaw-Lacombe branch of the Canadian Pacific Railway. Melville, Walrous, and liii^gar arc thriving towns on the Grand Trunk Pacific main line. Near Watrous is Little Manitou Lake, where the water has valuable medicinal i)roperties. A larg-e sanatorium has been erected here. Yorkton is an important town and divisional point on the Grand Trunk Pacific and Canadian Pacific railways. It has lar^-e elevator accom-modation. Batlle/ord, on the south side of the North Sas-katchewan, is connected with the main line by a short branch froiu Baitief.)rd Junction. It is a place of histoiic interest and of picturesque situation. 17 A. I*,.,,,,/., Ifnmholdt, an.l l.lont„,i„.ler are otl^ r live t.mns on the Catia.l.an N'orthern l\u003c them ,s a vt.kmI ajfr.cultural town on the Prmce AllK-rt branch. Afel/ort ixn^\\ A-i\u003e,i.ti»o are important towns i„ the centre of the fertile Carrot River country kind,,sfev an.l A',..,/,,..,; are ,..^r..win\u003er iH.'int* m a rich aK-ricultural tract on the .S.iskat.K.n- Cal^fiiry branch of the (^ma.Iian N'ortlurn iMHi^a,, an.l .\\'.„d,;, a, « .livis,„„al p,„„,s „n 1!k. Kirkella section of ,he Can.ui.an P.uiii,. Kail way. ALBERTA Poiltlon. The province of AlU-rta is the most x«esterly of the three prairie provinces. It is iH.linded on the li„rth by the \\.,rtll-\\Vest Terri-tory, on the south 1m- the Cnitcl .Stat.s ,.„ the east by Saskatchewan, .m.! on the we.t In- Hntish Columbia. The f.otli p.-.r.dkl se;,arates It tn.m the North-West Territories, an.l the 4')t!i from the Cnitcl States. The IK.th iiKn.liai, separates It fr.mi Saskatchewan, an.l tlu^ 1 'Otj, trom British Columbia, as far .s„„th as the 54tli parallel, south of which the summit ,,| the Rocky Mountains forms the dividin- line. Area. The province exten.Is from iioriii to south f..r 750 miles, and fn.m Joo p, 4n.) fmni east to west. Its t.'tal area is estiniaf.l .it .?5,^,54() s.juare miles. Surface Features. AllxTta is j.art (,f the Great Central Plain of North America, which in the upiK.\u003er part of the continent is (lanke.l on the east by the Laurentian M.)untains, and un the west by the Rocky Mountains. The part of the province .south of the North Saskatchewan River, except for an area extendin.vr for fifty or .sixty miles from the m.nintains, lies within the third ,,rairie step,H.-. Outside of the m.nintain distnct this part of the province varies in elevation from 2,000 to 4,000 feet. While the surfar is diversified in comparison with the surf . \u003ef Manitoba and Saskatchewan, it is not marked by any important structural elevations. elevations occur in isolate.l «Toups of hills, as in the case of the Hand, Beaver, HIackfr-.f ;.-.,] part of the Cypress Hills. Smallerrej-ularl'y formed elevations called \"buttes\" appear in different irts of the prairie. The prairie",
         "is 18 PRAIRIE PROVINCE SUPPLEMENT deeply cut bj' its rivers. CorrcspondiriK' to the canyons of the mountain area, steep banks of clay, locally known as \" cutbanks,\" flank tbc sides of the rivers in the prairie area often to a depth of 300 feet from the prairie level or \"bench land.\" The area adjacent to the rivers is diversified by \"coulees\" running' back from the rivers at rijrht angles for lon.wr distances into the prairie. The Dominion Government has established two imptjrtant game reservations in the prairie area east and south-east of Edmonton. Elk Island Park at Lamont consists of 16 sciuarc miles, and Buffalo Park at Wainwrijjht of 162 square miles. These are larsrely for the preservation of a herd of eipht hundred prairie buffalo pur-chased in Montana. The mountain area of Alberta lies in the southern half of the province. It embraces a strip about sixty miles wide on the western side of the province, bein.tj the eastern slope of the Rocky Mountains. The eastern slope oT the Rockies is rather abrupt, and the surface is irregfular. It has no supportinj,^ structural elevation parallel to the main ranj^e, and is deeply cut by canyons and ravines. The general elevation of the main ran.ue of the Rockies in Alberta and of the lands lyin.i; away from the mountains, is greatest in the south. The chief peaks are Mount Brown, 16,000 feet; Mount Hooker, 13,500 feet; and Mount Murchi- son, 13,500 feet. The mountains are traversed by the follovvinRf passes, which are important as channels for transportation across the moun-tains : North Kootenay, 6,600 feet ; Crowsnest, 5,500 feet ; Kicking Horse, 5,300 ; Yellow- head, 3,733 feet; Pine River, 2,850 feet, and Peace River, 2,000 feet. The Kicking- Horse and Crowsnest are traversed by the Canadian Pacific Railway, and the Yellowhead by the Grand Trunk Pacific and Canadian Northern railways. In the mountain area of the province, the Dominion Government has set apart large areas for forest and game preservation and for recrea-tive purposes. They are patrolled by fire and game guardians, and are being improved by the construction of roads and trails to facilitate sigbt-seeing. The chief reserves in the moun-tains are Rocky Mountains Park and Jasper Park, containing 4,500 and 5,000 square miles resiiectively. Rocky Mountains Park is situated on the main line of the Canadian Pacific Rail-way. It is watered principally by the Bow River. Two important resorts within the park are Banflf and Laggan ; the former very popular on account of its hot springs, and the latter for its natural beauty. Jasper Park is on the main line of the Grand Trunk Pacific. It is watered by the Athabaska, and has hot si)rings, which are near the Yellowhead Pass. The govern-ment sanatorium is located at this point. The progress of the railway up the vall°y of the Athabaska is by a route of great scenic beauty. The government has also a reservation of fifty- four stpiare miles at Waterton Lake. The area north of the North Saskatchewan River is skirted for some distance by the Rocky Mountains, but is for the most part an imdulat- ing plain. Its elevations appear as prominent isolated hills or groups of hills, chief of which arc the Carilxxi, Clear, Birch, and Buffalo Head. The north-eastern corner of the province is rough and broken in character from the cross-ings of this area by the Laurentian formation. Farther south, areas of sand are found on the eastern boundary of the province. The interior of the northern part of the province between the Peace and Athabaska rivers is well watered, and has stretches of muskeg which will become valuable when drained. The rivers in the north enter the province by deep channels, flanked in some cases by regular terraces rising back to the level of the prairie . The Peace and Athabaska rivers spread into broad deltas at their mouths. The lakes of the province are not important in the south, beir : generally shallow local basins or sloughs wiiich ..brink in volume and area after the s ring and early summer rains. The largest is Pakowki. In central Alberta larger bodies of water occur, such as Beaver, Bittern, Pigeon, Cooking, Sullivan, Birch, Gull, and Wabamim — lakes which are large enough to carry small craft. The lakes in the northern part of the province occur usually as part of the drainage system. The most important of these are Lac La Biche, Lesser Slave Lake, and Lake Claire, belonging to the Athabaska",
         "system. PRAIRIE PROVINCE SUPPLEMENT 19 The southern part of the pnn-ince is treeless except alonK: the bottom lands of the rivor.s ami in the mountains. The side of the coulees ex-posed to the north is frcpiently covereil with short low scrub. In the central part of the province clumps of scrub and li^ht timber alter-nate \"'ith larire prairie stretches. The river hr-y,:^ :.r,,: liiiibered, particularly in the upper 1' vols. In tin- II . r hern part of the province the p.ov.'i is consi. arably heavier and the areas lt:V-tr. Ou'sid of the upper waters of the nveis, tiic uLi'-f forest areas are on the east side of the Athabaska and between the Athabaska and the Peace. The country north and west of the Peace is generally open, with occasional patches of scrub ; and south of the Peace River and west of the Smoky, and includinjr the Grande Prairie and Spirit River district, is open prairie. Drainage. There are three j,aoat draina,i,^e sys-tems repicsented in Alberta-- the Mackenzie. Saskatchewan-Xel.son, and Mississipj.i. The Peace and Athabaska rivers drain the north-ern part, their waters i)assingr by the Great Slave River and Great Slave Lake int., the Mackenzie, and finally into the Arctic Ocean. The Peace River enters Alberta from British Columbia in an easterly direction, turns north-easterly and enters the Slave River a short distance north of Lake Athaba.^ka. Its impor-tant tributaries are the Smoky, Wabiskaw and Red rivers. The Athabaska River rises in Alberta, flows north-ea.st and finally north into Lake Athabaska. Its important tributaries are the Macleod, Pembina, Lesser Slave, and Clear-water. The North and South Saskatchewan rivers drain most of the southern part. They unite in the province of Saskatchewan and. joining: the waters of the Red River in Lake Winnipesr, form the Nelson River, which empties into Hudson Hay. Both branches of the Sas-katchewan rise in Alberta and flow in an easterly direction. The chief tributary of the North Saskatchewan is the Battle River. The chief tributaries of the South Saskatchewan are: on the north side, the Bow and the Red Deer rivers, and on the .south, the Bellv River with its tributaries the Little Bow, Old Man, and St. Marys. The Milk River, which flows throujjh the province for a distance of one hundred miles just north of the international boundary, joins the Missouri River in Montana, and pas.ses by way of the Mississi|)pi into the Gulf of Mexico. Climate. The climate of Alberta is usually described, alonjr with that of the rest of the prairie provinces, as extreme ; but this is sub-ject to important and characteristic exceptions. The ran«:e between hij^h and low temperature IS scarcely as wide as in the other prairie provinces. The summer seasons are not marked by excessive heat, the nij^hts beinj,^ always cool, and the riRors of winter are broken by frequent visits of the Chinook winds. The influence of the Chinook is greatest in that part of the pro-vince south of Red Deer, but the same general influence for which it stands has some effect over the whole province, and distinctly so in A:,„r/„;,jr Srene in .Uherta-CatlU Herdi ■ng. the upper valley of the Peace River. The econo-mic and industrial significance of the Chinook influence is scarcely realized. With the filling up of the southern strip of the prairie provinces as far west as the Rocky Mountains, the move-ment of the homeseeking population for agricul-tural lands must necessarily be north. The climatic limitations to this northward movement are not great in Alberta. Good grain and vege-tables are grown to the northern limits of the province, and a vast development of Northern Alberta will follow colonization railways if they are constructed. The influence of the Chinook extends into Saskatchewan for some distance and moderates the climate of the south-west part of the province. The precipitation averages sixteen or eighteen inches annually. The greater part of the rain-fall occurs in the months of Mav, June, and",
         "July 20 PRAIRIE PROVINCE SUPPLEMENT m INDUSTRIES AND RESOURCES Agriculture. The jirovince f)f Alberta is im- purtant ajrriculturally, not only on account of its .irencral fertility, but on account of its rapid proj^res.s in diversified lines of ajfricultural work. The rancher, prain grower, dairyman, stock grower, and irrigator have appeared side by side or in quick succession within a decade as highly efficient i)roducers. The country south of the main line of the Canadian Pacific Railway, and to a lesser extent for a hundred miles north of it, was formerly devoted to ranch-ing. It is what is known as a short-grass country. The naturally cured prairie grasses of low growth furnished fo.id to stock summer and winter. Recently this area has been invaded by the settler, and has been changed to a grain- Fnrm Flock near Edmimton. producing country. Though having sufficient absolute precipitation for grains, grasses, and nxjt crops, the work of the Chinook has made it necessary to check evaporation by a special method of culture, called dry farming, a method generally followed throughout the prairie prov-inces. It is briefly a plan of preparing soil, by deep and thorough tillage, to receive moisture and of ])rcventing evaporation from capillary action by frecpiently stirring the surface soil to make a dust blanket. This method, consistently followed, successfully removes danger of failure from drouth. Three imjKirtant irrigation enterprises have been inaugurated within this area at Calgary, Lethbridge, and Medicine Hat, which will arti-ficially water a total area of about 2,500,000 acres of land. A few small ranch enterprises still persist in the southern and south-eastern part of the pro-vince, but grain-growing, principally of winter wheat, spring wheat, oats, and barley are general. Alfalfa and sugar beets are important croDs in irrigatetl lands, and stock enterprises on the farms are increasing in number and importance. Central Alberta is devoted to mixed farming and dairying. It is a country of choice dairy and beef herds and of a gofjd class of horse stock. The butter output amounts to about 2,500,000 pounds annually. Hog raising is becoming an important industry. Winter and spring wheat and barley are satisfactory crops, an\u003cl oats grow in the highest perfection. Northern Alberta is undergoing development. The land of the Upper Peace River Valley is being settled, and rapid .settlement will follow transportation over the greater part of the country, which is generally good land, and which has been demonstrated to be fitted for the growth of good cereal, vegetable, and fodder crops almost to its northsm boundary. Lumbering. The lumber industry is not yet important from the standpoint of total produc-tion. Timber growth south of the North Sas-katchewan is limited largely to cottonwood and poplar, the latter being locally useful. Saw logs of spruce, pine, and birch are floated down the Saskatchewan to Edmonton. The northern part of the province is rich in timber resources in the forest areas between the Peace and Athabaska and east of the Athabaska, the chief varieties being jack-pine, balsam, spruce, poi)lar, and birch. Mining. Alberta possesses a great wealth of coal. Its distribution extends from the inter-national boundary to the Peace River, and from the mountains well toward the eastern boundary of the province. The quality varies from lignite to anthracite, the harder quality being found in the neighbourhood of the mountains. The chief centres of the industry are Taber, Lethbridge, Blairmore, Coleman, Frank, Lundbreck, Hill- crest, and Lille on the Crowsnest Railway ; Bankhead and Canmore on the main line of the Canadian Pacific, and Edmonton, Clover Bar, Tofield, Morinville, and Cardiff in the Edmonton district. Large coal properties are in",
         "process of development in the district between the theT\" Ti '\"\"'''■''^'^^^ ---. o,nti.n,ous to the Grand Trunk Pacifie Railway. The total area of coal land is estimated at 16,000 s,iuare miles. Gold is found in payi„« ....antilics in the sands of the North Saskatchewan and Peace nvers. Oil wells have been sunk at Morinville and near Cardston. Important results are looked for from the work of iKdf a do.en companies borin^r alon^^ the Athabaska C; ts .s found in Medicine Hat in quantitv to answer for light, fuel, and power purposes,' and also at Bow Island. There are lar^e salt deposits neu- Fort Smith. Immense beds of tar sands arc ^een east of the Athabaska River, which with transportation will prove ,.( .^rcat value for roadmakingf. Fur Trading. The taking of fur is still an important interest. It is tributary to Edmon-ton. The most important fur district is in the northern interior between the Peace and Atha-baska. Three companies, besides manv in-dividuals, are enj,rajjed in the traffic. Its value IS one million dollars annually. The furs are bear, beaver, mink, marten, fox, wolf, musk-ox coyote, etc. A large herd of wood buffalo' nrnibering from four to eight humlred, nm of the Peace in the north-west corner of -ovince. They are pn.tected hv federal : -^Illation. Fishing is important in relation to local f(,oci supply in the north and centre of the ,.rovinee The northern lakes are heavily st.x-ked with trout, whitefish, pickerel, and pike. The in-dustry will become i-.nportant with the establish-ing of t: . nsportation . Transportation. The province is served bv the Canadian Pacific, the Canadian Northern and the Grand Trunk Pacific. The main line of the Canadian Pacific enters the prox ince about sixty-five miles north of the international boundary, and runs in a general north-westerly direction through Calgary, leaving the province by the Kicking Horse Pass. The Crowsnest division leaves the main line at Dunm.-re junc-tion, runs almost directly west through Leth- bridgeand Macleod, and enters British Columbia by the Crowsnest Pass. A branch connects Lctii- bridge and Calgary. The Canadian Pacific PRAIRIP PROVINCE SrpPLKM::XT 21 Railway Company contn.ls and operates a line formerly owned by the Alberta Railwa\\- and rngation Company, running so„tli-e.ist in.m Lcthbrulgc to the boundary, and a branch of the same line from Stirling- running south-west to heyou.l Cardston. A line runs directly north and south from Macleod, thnnigh Calgary, to tdmontor.and two branch lines running north-west from M,K)sejaw an\u003cl Saskatoon join the north and .south line at Lacombe an\u003cl Wetaski- wiii resi)ectively. The Canadian Northern main line running north-westerly between Winnipeg and Ednion- U\u003en crosses the Saskatchewan River at Fort buskatchewan. A line runs to Athabaska Land- y,.r,r/,on „fthc Echo and Bo-u- Rhrrs, Banjff^ i\"M- n\u003c,nh, aiul others run west from ICdnK.nton. ; '•- '\"\"\u003e\" '■•\"'-■ will ultimately run to Vancouver I'.v way of the Vellowhcad Pass. A line con-nects \\ egrcville and Calgary. The Grand Trunk Pacific also runs from ^\\ .nmpeg to Edmontcm in the .same general cl.rect.on a little farther south, and nins west to the Athabaska River, following the river sou h-west and cro.ssing the mountains by the \\ e lowhea.l Pass. A line connects Tofield an\u003cl l-algary. The advent of railways has done awav with water transportation in .southern Alberta. Stern- wheel steamers ply on the Athabaska Pe-ice and North Saskatchewan rivers, and on Lesse^ Slave Lake. It is probable that the develop-ment of production will involve the improve-ment of transportation services on all the important rivers of the",
         "province. 22 I'RAIRIE PROVINCE SUPPLEMENT CITIES Edmonton, the cajjital of the province, is situated on the North Saskatchewan River, about two hundred feet above the level of the river. Tin- ( it v now includes what was formerly the two cities of Edmonton and Strathcona. The site is one of jrreat natural beauty. The river is spanned by the hi),di level railway and traffic bridK-e of the Canadian Pacific Railway, and by other brid.y:cs. It is on the main line of the (irand Trunk Pacific and Canadian Northern railways, and is the i)resent terminus of the Caljjary and Edmonton division of the Canadian Pacific, as well as of a direct line from Winnipej;:. A number of lines of railway radiate from Ed-monton west, north-west, and north. A branch of the Canadian Northern Railway runs to Atha- baska Landinjj, and does a large distributing traffic for the north at this point. Extensions are projected north to Fort Murray, north-west to the Peace River, and also north-east. The city has important wholesale interests, large flour and lumber mills, brickyards, ironworks, and large abattoir and packing plants. It is the largest frontier fur emporium in North America. It has a good class of commercial and public buildings, more especially schools. It is the seat of the Provincial University, which is situated on a site comprising two hundred and fifty-eight acres, with a view to permit of suitable expansion into experimental and demonstration work in relation to the teaching of agricultural science. The scope of the work of the university is expanding rapidly through the policy of receiv-ing in affiliatitm colleges which are serving the denominational interests of the ]irovince. Calgary is the largest city of the province. It is situated in a valley between the Bow and the Elbow rivers, and is on the main line of the Canadian Pacific Railway, on a line of the same road nmning from Macleod to Edmonton, and has shops and terminal facilities. It will like-wise be served by branch lines of the Canadian Northern and Grand Trunk Pacific lines from Saskatoon, Tofield, and Vegreville. The city has large wholesale interests, and distributes west, north, and south. It has large mills, brickyards, cement works, breweries, foundries, stone quarries, harness manufactory, and meat-packing concerns. The city is substantially built of local sandstone, and has good banks, business blocks, colleges, schools, and churches. The Provincial Normal School is located at Calgary. Calgary is the headquarters of one of the largest irrigation enterprises on the conti-nent. The irrigated lands are being converted to heavy production of grains, grasses, sugar- beets and other roots, vegetables, and small fruits. Calgary, which was formerly a ranch-ing centre, is now an important district for registered and highly improved cattle, sheep, and more especially horses. I.cthbrid^c, situated on the Belly River, is a divisional point on the Crowsnest Railway, and is the hcad(in,irters of the former Alberta Railway and Irrigation Company's line. It has a line run-ning north-west, and it vill be the terminus of a line from Weyburn. It is the centre of the first large irrigation enterprise in Canada. The irrigated lands in the district are producing grain, roots, alfalfa, and other fodder crops abundantly. The district is well settled as respects both irrigated and unirrigated lands. Winter wheat is an important crop. One of the Dominion Experimental Farms is situated near the city. The Gait coal is mined at Leth- bridge, and a number of other important mines operate in close proximity. The city is wholly modern with respect to educational and other services and iitilities. Medicine Hal is situated on the South Sa- katchewan River and on the main line of the Canadian Pacific Railway, a .short distance east of its point of junction with the Crowsnest branch. It is a divisional point. The city has large supplies of natural gas which furnishes light, power, and fuel at low cost. It is owned by the city. It furnishes power to the shops of the railway, and fuel and power to an immense manufacturing concern east of the city. The Alberta Clay Products Company manufactures pressed, glazed, and fire brick, sewer and dn.in tile, and a variety of other clay products. There is a provincial demonstration farm adjoining the city devoted to showing the ,','orking of the best dry-farming practice. The district about Medi-cine Hat was formerly oi\u003ce of the most important ranch areas in the west. It is rapidly",
         "losing PRAIRIE PROVINCE SUPPLEMENT this character, and has already become a ,rrain- jrrowmgr and mixed farminj? district. The city is compactly built. It has jrowl public and busi- ness buildiiiK-s, substantial ilnirchcs, schools, and homes. U'elaskiwin is situated on the Battle River and on the Calj,'ary and Edniontcjii Railway, about forty miles south of EdnK.nton. It is the junction point of the Saskatoon section of the Canadian Pacific with the Calj,'ar/ aid Edmonton division. The city is the centre of a fine grain and stock -^rowinj,' country, and has large elevator interests. TOWNS The development of trans-portation interests has led to the establishment of a great number of new towns, the ultimate importanccof which can scarcely be forecasted. Places of any size are con-fined to central and southern Alberta. In central Alberta and in the lines tributary to Edmonton, the towns of l'ertni/io», WgrevUlt, Foil Saskatchn^ati , and part of IJoydminstcr are on the Canadian Northern Railway to the east, and AUiabaska Landing, Morinxille, and St. Albert to the north. demonstration farm and is a divisional point, and Athabaska L.inding is the farthest point nonh to which the railvay has penetrated in the western interior of Canada. It has a pro-vincial demonstration farm. Morinville has large coal mines. Tojleld and Wainuright are thriving places on the Grand Trunk Pacific on the east, and Edson on the west of Edmonton. Ponoka, on the Calgary and Edmonton line, is the seat of the provincial asylum. * RedDeer\\^ the largest town between Edmonton and Calgary. It is situated on Red Deer River, has mills and brickyards, and is surrounded by a good grain-growing and live-stock country. The Alberta Central Railway is at ,)resent being \u003e .iit westerly towards Rocky Mountain House\" 23 Laiombe, twenty miles north, is im,K)rtant on account of the (|uality of its live-stock and its heavy i)rod;iction of grain and grass crops An experimental farm established by the Dominion Government adjoins the town. It is the junc- ti.« point of a branch of the Canadian Pacific Railway from Moosejaw. Important towns \"n tins line within the j.rovince are Slrltl.r and Castor. Paysland and Camrose are on the Wetaskiwiii - .Saskatoon line. The latter is the point ui crossing of the Toficld- Cakary hi-anch of the (Jrand Trunk Pacific It is the seat of a provincial Normal School PariiamiNt JJuiMings, K.imonton. Vermilion has a /nnis/ait, /iouden, O/ds, Didsburv, and Car- stairs are thriving centres of the dairy interest of the province. Olds is the site of a demon- ■'^tration farm. South of Calgary, on the Macleod line are Okotoks, High Ki,er, Xanton, and ClaresJulm which are im,x.rtant centres for the growing of winter wheat and the raising of horses. West ot Calgary Dankhcad and Canmore are mining centres. *\" Macleod is the junction point of the Edmon-ton and Macleod section with the Crowsnest division of the Canadian Pacific Railway It IS situated on the Old Man River It is the centre of a good grain-growing country whieh was loniieily devoted to ranching ft still has large stock interests to which it",
         "is 24 PRAIRIE I'ROVIXCK Sri\u003eI\u003eLKMKNT siK-cially adapted \u003ciii acroiitit i\u003e( the eluiraeler of its grasses, al\u003eiiii(iaiue of water, and the iiit]iieiiee of the Chinook. /\u003ei,„/„r Cnrk is the centre of a K\u003c\")d mixed fannin.^ are:-.. The otlier towns wliieh liave attained imi)ortaiKe on the Crowsnist Railway are tlic niiiii)i,i; towns of Tiihr, , ll,ll,:iic. Iraitk, /!/ain,i,»f, and Cohniiiii. /\\\u003c\\viiioii,/. ahoiit twenty miles south of Lethbrid-e, has a larvae sn.trar refinery. It is on a branch of tlie Alberta Railway and Irri.iiation Conijiany's railway and on the irri- j,'ation canal. Its tributary interests include the K^rowiiiK of Js'rain, the cultivation of sugar beets, and the ktmuxk and fecdin\u003er of live-.stock. Slir/iHii is a junction point on the railway, and is watered by the canal. Magrath i.s in an excellent farminjr district, and is also on the canal, dndston, which is nearer the foothills, is beautifully situated, aiui is likewi.se in an excellent mixe\u003cl farminj,' di.strict. It is equally noted for its heavy yields of grain and for the excellence of its stock. Warner is a new town between .Stirling and the boundary, and is in the cintre of an excellent wheat-growing district. Washing Gold vith a \"Un'ssi:(y."
      ],
